Authors
David N. Butterworth
Number of Reviews
247

Title
Review for Baise-moi (2000)
        Anyone who's constantly frustrated by the simulated sex scenes in
mainstream movies (wondering why, as adults, we're not permitted to see
more explicit sexual activity in R-rated and, frankly, NC-17 rated films)
should check out the controversial French film "Baise-Moi" (or "Rape Me,"
to give the film one of its less literal/more printable translations).  One
look and it'll be obvious why.  *That's* why they don't do it, you'll
quickly come to realize.
        "Baise-Moi" is unique in so much as it's a mainstream film peppered with
hardcore (i.e., non-simulated) sex scenes and (hopefully) simulated scenes
of extreme violence.  Well, mainstream in as much as you'll have to seek it
out at the artiest of the art theaters in town (in Philadelphia that's the
Roxy and only the Roxy and don't count on it playing there for long).
        It's an interesting but extremely unnerving film, unnerving in the sense
that at times it feels like you're watching a pornographic movie with a
plot thrown in to move the "action" along, rather than a "Thelma and
Louise"-inspired killing spree with occasional time-outs for graphic sex.
        The sex here is not only jarring in its explicitness but, if you'll pardon the
expression, it sticks out like a sore thumb.  It's not titillating
(because it's too distracting, in an oddly anachronistic way), and it
doesn't have much of a chance to be sexy, because the ultraviolence soon
comes down like a ton of bricks.
        The violence itself (aimed at both women and men, so don't go into this
thinking it's some feminist anthem) is pretty nasty, so much so that you
actually crave the sex scenes just to have something else to look at (until
they arrive that is, orchestrated to a thumpa-thumpa rock beat, and then
you're all distracted and non-titillated again).  It's a circle ... and a
very vicious one at that.
        Based (or maybe I should say "baised") on Virginie Despentes' "brutal,
savage novel," the film follows the explosive exploits of two women, Nadine
and Manu who, tired of being brutalized by society, go on a murderous
rampage.  And that's pretty much it.  Despentes' wound up co-directing the
film with French adult film actress Coralie Trinh Thi after the process of
casting the two leads dragged on forever (Karen Bach and Raffaela
Anderson--porn stars themselves--finally got the parts).  Both actresses
are comfortable on camera and create complex (if volatile) characters--not
something one might expect from their day jobs, necessarily.  And the
filmmakers, who share "a cutting edge sense of provocation," pull
everything together tightly and skillfully, as if they've done all this
before (they haven't).
        But the repetitious nature of the film drags it down: kiss kill, kiss
kill, for 80 long minutes.  You just sit there, waiting for the bodily
fluids to flow.  Shock me now, shock me later.  But yes I was shocked, a
little.  And I was disturbed, a little.  Because I haven't seen anything
quite like this *in context* before (and that's the key to the whole
"Baise-Moi" experience).
        It's unlikely that the film will loosen any standards of what is and isn't
considered acceptable in terms of sexual explicitness in the megaplexes.
If anything it'll further convince many to keep this stuff *out* of the
mainstream altogether (although Harvey Keitel is still probably pretty
safe).  "Baise-Moi" is most likely a one-off and in a lot of respects it's
probably best that way.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Baby of Macon, The (1993)
        No other filmmaker, living or dead, could have made "The Baby of
Mâcon."  And no other filmmaker would have wanted to.
        Peter Greenaway's controversial and rarely-seen 1993 film saw a
very limited run here in the United States, opening in New York and L.A.
and then disappearing forever.  Its content--your typical Greenaway
excesses of murder, gang rape, disembowelment, dismemberment, full-frontal
nudity, and more philosophical and allegorical allusions than you can shake
a stick at--was judged too offensive, and the film failed to find a U.S.
distributor.
        "The Baby of Mâcon" is staged as a 17th century masque performed
before a live theater audience of Medici noblemen and women.  Unfolding
like a spectacular Renaissance tapestry, the film makes full use of
Greenaway's huge and non-traditional cinematic palette, a
highly-ritualistic style that emphasizes the filmmaker's straight-laced
approach to the film's unsettling themes.  In "The Baby of Mâcon,"
Greenaway employs widescreen, saturated hues (a lot of the time it looks
like it was shot in red and white), extravagant costumes, baroque music
(without the help of regular composer Michael Nyman, alas), and a wildly
witty and literate script that is often times absurd, provocative, and
downright nasty.
        All the descriptions commonly associated with the director's work
apply here: sumptuous, decadent, outrageous, intellectually provocative,
hard-to-stomach.  Greenaway's artistic assessment that the making of his
films is more stimulating than the watching of them will be supported by
those looking for traditional elements of plot and character, but fans of
this unique talent will find much to appreciate in "The Baby of Mâcon,"
even though the film is definitely not one for the squeamish.
        In a world riddled by plague, pestilence, and female sterility, a
beautiful baby is miraculously born to a grotesque old woman.  The baby's
sister (Julia Ormond) claims the child as her own, proclaiming a virgin
birth.  Ralph Fiennes as The Bishop's Son is plainly skeptical that the
child is the new Messiah and takes it upon himself to disprove the
blasphemous contention.  As one might predict from both the subject matter
and the director of the piece, "events build to a shocking and brutal
climax."
        With "The Baby of Mâcon," Peter Greenaway once again proves that he
is unlike any other filmmaker and that makes this film--and his eclectic
body of work in general--well worth seeing.  Unfortunately, after just one
week, Greenaway's latest opus (the less-satisfying "8 1/2 Women") has
already been and gone.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Drowning by Numbers (1988)
     Following the release of his highly controversial THE COOK, THE
THIEF, HIS WIFE & HER LOVER this time last year, the Roxy Screening
Rooms in Philadelphia presented a retrospective of films by eclectic
British film director Peter Greenaway.
     Included in that retrospective were the Art House hit THE
DRAUGHTSMAN'S CONTRACT, the film which put Greenaway on the map in this
country, and two Philadelphia premieres -- A ZED AND TWO NOUGHTS (which
prior to that time had only seen a limited run on the Bravo cable
channel) and THE BELLY OF AN ARCHITECT.
     Conspicuous by its absence was Greenaway's 1988 movie, DROWNING BY
NUMBERS, a film which is only now making its much-belated Philadelphia
debut.  This city, it seems, has saved the best until last.
     DROWNING BY NUMBERS is another visually striking essay by Britain's
master of the cinematic put-on.  Brimming with absurdist wordplay and an
exacting eye for detail, it's a very Tall Tale of murder, mathematics,
and misdirected love.
     From the opening scene, you know you are not watching any ordinary
film, or dealing with any ordinary filmmaker.  A young girl, bedecked in
an outrageous, fairy godmother-like party dress, jumps rope whilst
reciting the names of the stars in the constellation.  The lighting
casts giant shadows on the building behind her, an imposing Regency
edifice fronted by pom-pom-shaped trees.  A dead bird hangs from a pole
in the foreground.   It's like something out of Lewis Carroll.
     Three generations of women, each named Cissie, drown their husbands
out of passionate detachment.  They are played by Joan Plowright, Juliet
Stevenson (who can currently be seen in TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY) and
Joely Richardson.   This maternal camaraderie is incisively drawn, a
refreshing change after the misogynistic flourishes of A ZED AND TWO
NOUGHTS.
     A willing ally to their sanctimonious crimes is a local coroner
named Madgett (Bernard Hill).  Madgett, along with his son, Smut
(newcomer Jason Edwards), is an obsessive game-player, much like
Greenaway himself.  In love with all three women, Madgett pronounces
each death an accident.
     But Greenaway appears to be less concerned with plot than he is
with color and composition.  The writer/director uses Madgett's
indulgent preoccupations with contests and counting as an excuse to
exercise his own exuberant imagination, layering on the details like
oils on a canvas.
     In fact, many of the sequences in DROWNING BY NUMBERS -- the scenes
with the apples, the white beach house against a blackening sky, the
angular symmetry of the swimming pool -- are shot with a painter's eye
for beauty, like a Constable landscape or a Ruebens' nude.
     The numbers 1 to 100 run throughout the film like a chronometer,
marking time.  They start out obvious enough -- pinned to trees and tin
baths, painted on buildings, cows and passers-by -- but wind up being
woven into the overall fabric.  It's a rich and colorful tapestry, a
sumptuously crafted and richly textured experience that is at once
wicked, wry and thoroughly entertaining.
     If DROWNING BY NUMBERS is "about" anything, then it is about the
way in which women conspire together, choking the life out of those who
have disappointed them sexually, emotionally or otherwise.
     A darling of the British Film Institute, Peter Greenaway made his
mark in the late '60s/early '70s with a string of independently produced
short films.  His big break came in 1982 with the BFI-funded THE
DRAUGHTSMAN'S CONTRACT, an erotically charged murder mystery set in
17th Century England.  But it wasn't until the release of last year's
THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE & HER LOVER that American audiences were
once again treated to the cinematic excesses of this extraordinary
talent.  
     In keeping with the film's mood, Michael Nyman's score is somber
and atypically melancholic, not the sawing strings that have punctuated
his other collaborations with the director.  And Sacha Vierny's
photography is no less exquisite than the picture-postcard perfect views
of Rome and its surrounding countryside that graced THE BELLY OF AN
ARCHITECT.
     The themes which populate most of Greenaway's films -- sex, death
and decay, puns and punning, religion, numerology, entomology and
ornithology  -- are also very much in evidence here.
     In DROWNING BY NUMBERS, Greenaway's most accessible film to date,
these collective themes add together to form a bizarre jigsaw puzzle
with few straight edges, a delineated, looking-glass world in which
numbers count for everything and love is often left dead in the water.


Title
Review for Musketeer, The (2001)
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A young French boy sees his parents killed before his eyes by Tim Roth, oops...I
mean, an evil man. He vows revenge on that man and is taught the ways of the
Musketeer by some old dude who used to be one himself? Anyway, fourteen years go
by and...arrgh, well, you know the rest...swish-swish-zzzzzzz! 
CRITIQUE:
This is a pretty bad movie. Let's see, where should I start? Okay, first of all,
the story is just plain boring. It's not original, is entirely predictable and
lacks energy. Okay, what's next? Acting, you say. Hmmmm, well, the main actor,
Justin Chambers, is basically an uncharismatic version of Chris O'Donnell but
with less range (think about that!), and Mena Suvari, is just plain off. Not as
bad as Thora Birch was in DUNGEONS & DRAGONS, but entirely miscast, with bad
deliveries, awful sequences and a piss-poor accent that comes and goes. Now I'm
not sure if this was Ms. Suvari's fault or the director's, but I've definitely
seen her at a much higher level than in this film. The only semi-saving grace
actor-wise is Tim Roth as the irrepressible "bad guy", but once again, it's not
something that we haven't seen before...a thousand times...by the same guy!!
Tim, please...for the love of God, beg your agent to ask the marketplace for
some modern day "American roles" for you as a "nice guy" in a romantic comedy or
something. Stretch, dude...stretch!! We all know that you can do much better
than this gunk. Alright, what else was bad in this film? Oh yeah, the score!
Yikes, how's about taking it down a few notches there, fellas? This thing blares
in your ear whenever it feels the need to accentuate a certain scene, but
actually does little more than annoy. I think it's important for the man behind
the music to recognize that this film isn't a "real epic" by any stretch of the
imagination. It's a fluffy rehashed cake-walk created by some "shrewd" studio
heads who decided to take advantage of the whole "kung-fu" phenomenon in films,
and test it out on an old classic. Dudes...you failed all around! (keep
reading)
The editing is also pretty shoddy in this movie, the dialogue banal and stilted
and the plot problems...plentiful! (why does the guy on top of the horse
carriage just stand there when his opponent takes forever scampering his way
back to the top? why don't they just cut the mouseketeer's rope at the top of
the tower, instead of jumping down on their own chords and fighting him while
hanging? why doesn't anybody look a day older, when the sequence says "14 years
later"? (at least...change your shirt, man!) Keep in mind that I have never
strayed away from championing certain movies that are created simply for the
sake of a "fun time", but this flick just didn't cut it for me. It was boring
for stretches, the acting was atrocious at times (the "romantic" scene between
Suvari and Chambers next to the lake reminded me of plays in high school which
made you cringe), there was little reason to care for anyone and since when were
the Musketeers fat?
I will give the movie this much, and that is that its main reason for being (its
"raison-d'etre", as the French would say), its fight sequences, do come through
despite the lack of their numbers in the film. I was hoping that the movie would
be packed with cool stuntwork as promoted in its trailer, but what you see
there, are essentially the snippets from the two major (and cool) swashbuckling
sequences from the film. The first comes right at the beginning of the movie,
while the other essentially finishes the film off, hanging from the tower and
juggling off ladders. The ladder sequence itself is a definite keeper but
unfortunately the rest of the movie is just regurgitated crap. And can anyone
please tell me how Catherine Deneuve got her name placed at the top of this
film's credits? Hullo? The film is called THE MUSKETEER and stars a dude name
Justin Chambers. Deneuve is barely in this movie! Ugh, just another small thing
that annoyed me about this trash.
Now say it together, gang: "All for one, and one for all...we vow to stay away
from it all!!" Thank me later.
Where's JoBlo coming from?
A Knight's Tale (7/10) - American Outlaws (5/10) - Crouching Tiger, Hidden
Dragon (7/10) - The Matrix (8/10) - The Replacement Killers (6/10) - Romeo Must
Die (3/10) - Shanghai Noon (6/10)

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
        Hot on the heels of--and certainly not to be confused with--that
other mother-daughter road picture currently doing the rounds (the Susan
Sarandon/Natalie Portman "Anywhere But Here"), Gavin O'Connor's
"Tumbleweeds" tumbles into town  and will likely tumble right back out
again.
        Writer/director O'Connor, who also appears in the film as a
melancholy truck driver, might think he has something going here but what
he has is a Performance (capital P) and a handful of secondary characters
and situations that don't amount to much.
        That Performance comes courtesy of Janet McTeer, a respected
English stage actress who won a Tony for her performance as Nora in the
1997 West End revival of Ibsen's "A Doll's House."  In "Tumbleweeds,"
McTeer makes a radical departure by playing Mary Jo, a sassy West Virginian
single mom.  McTeer throws herself into the role with aplomb: Mary Jo is
brash and uninhibited, dresses for sexual success, and has zero talent when
it comes to picking suitable mates (or "future ex-husbands" as her
12-year-old daughter likes to quip).
        Your enjoyment of the film will entirely depend on just how
irritating you find Mary Jo's character.
        Ava, her daughter, is played by newcomer Kimberly J. Brown.  She's
adequate in the role, but no Natalie Portman, and serves mainly as a
sounding board to McTeer's liberated ebullience.
        As the film opens, Mary Jo is in the middle of yet another domestic
argument.  She and Ava pack up and hit the road.  If we all upped and ran
every time we squabbled with our spouses there'd be a heck of a lot more
traffic on the interstates.  Where to this time?  Ava suggests California
after a breeze through Missouri leaves an unappetizing old flame standing
with reverse-tire tracks burned into his driveway.
        But it's not long before Mary Jo sets her sights on some other
wagon-hitching material.
        O'Connor's character, Jack, is an odd one--hapless and sullen.  I
swear he doesn't smile once in the entire picture.  OK, so perhaps when he
first meets our female protagonists, when their car runs out of water on
the highway--"I should've used my piss!" squawks Mary Jo alluringly.
        While some might find Mary Jo's vulgarity a little much at times,
there's no denying that her relationship with her daughter is an open and
loving one.  The film, however, takes the all too obvious tack of having
the mother be the carefree, irresponsible one with the daughter providing
the centered, calming influence.  "Tumbleweeds" rushes to summarize this
familiar dichotomy in a creaky metaphor concerning Mary Jo's reluctance to
go near that big Pacific ocean.  You don't need to have seen "Anywhere But
Here" to know it'll be Ava who serves as her swim coach.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Rear Window (1954)
        Quick.  Name Alfred Hitchcock's masterpiece.  "Vertigo"?  "Psycho"?
How about "Rear Window"?  Yeah, that's it...
        Fifteen years after "Rear Window" enjoyed a mini-revival along with
four other "long-lost" Hitchcock treasures--"Vertigo," "Rope," "The Trouble
with Harry," and the remake of his own "The Man Who Knew Too Much" (the one
in which Doris Day warbles "Que Sera, Sera")--the director's most
accomplished film returns to theaters in a fully-restored print.
        The old-fashioned dying process used to restore the negative has
created a film version with richer, denser colors than we see in
contemporary film stocks.  Whereas these improvements might only be
noticeable to a film historian viewing the prints side-by-side, the best
thing about this restoration is that it gives moviegoers another chance to
see this magnificent film as it was meant to be seen: in the theaters.
        "Rear Window" is the one about the newspaper photographer (Jimmy
Stewart in one of his best roles) holed up in his Manhattan apartment,
confined to a wheelchair with a broken leg.  Here he receives daily
rubdowns by an insurance company nurse (Thelma Ritter, spouting more
one-liners in one film than Arnold Schwarzenegger has achieved in his
entire career), and occasional visits from his "perfect" socialite
girlfriend (Grace Kelly at her most luminous).
        With seven weeks to convalesce and the temperatures in the
nineties, Stewart's L.B. Jefferies (Jeff) is given ample opportunity to
observe the comings and goings of his neighbors since their blinds, like
his, are invariably left up.  Neighbors such as "Miss Torso," a
well-proportioned young woman who enjoys performing calisthenics in her
underwear; "Miss Lonelyheart," a depressed middle-aged spinster who
fantasizes about meeting Mr. Right; and an aspiring songwriter who taps out
compositions on his piano late into the night.
        Most intriguing, however, are the Thorwalds who live directly
across the way.  Since Mrs. Thorwald is an invalid, Jeff's curiosity is
aroused when he observes her husband making three mysterious trips very
early one morning.  The next day the blinds are drawn in the Thorwald's
bedroom and Jeff, now more than a casual voyeur, begins to suspect foul
play.
        The entire film is shot from the claustrophobic perspective of
Jeff's apartment with the only glimpse of the outside world supplied via a
narrow alley leading to the street.  The suspense unfolds within the red
brick confines of the rear of the buildings, with the neighbors' petty
dramas spilling out into the courtyard below.  Inside, the nosy threesome,
now joined by Jeff's old army buddy (played by Wendell Cory), discuss,
hypothesize, argue, and intellectualize about the possibility of a crime
having been committed.
        John Michael Hayes' dialogue--at times crafty, alarming, witty, and
never less than sparkling--is masterfully realized by a perfect cast.
Ritter is a hoot and the sexual tension between Stewart and Kelly just
sizzles.  What's remarkable about Stewart's performance is that he spends a
large proportion of the film simply observing, reacting--mostly with his
eyes--to the things going on outside his window.  A lesser actor could have
easily overdone this.
        With a playful score by Franz Waxman, stunning gowns by Edith Head,
and Hitchcock's brilliant direction keeping everything in sharp focus,
"Rear Window" is a near-faultless work that is as absorbing today as it was
some 46 years ago.  Don't be a mug and wait another 15 years to see it.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Map of the World, A (1999)
        When the kids are acting up, parents may wish to be transported to
some solitary place where the rigors of domesticity can be placed far
behind them, if only for a couple of hours.  The state penitentiary would
probably not be most people's first choice of destination, but that's where
Alice Goodwin finds herself in "A Map of the World."  Oddly, Alice seems to
welcome, even relish, this opportunity to get away from her demanding
children and her ineffective husband, yet there's one thing she cannot get
away from no matter how hard she tries: the specter of irreconcilable guilt.
        How could anyone live with oneself when a child entrusted into
one's care dies?
        This act of criminal negligence isn't what lands Alice in prison,
but it is the start of a downward spiral that Jane Hamilton examines in her
book, and director Scott Elliot attempts to examine in his cinematic
adaptation, scripted by Peter Hedges and Polly Platt.
        Elliot's "A Map of the World" fails to pack any kind of emotional
wallop, however, which is strange given the film's subject matter and even
stranger given the confident performances of its leads.  Sigourney Weaver
is convincing as the emotionally-troubled Alice, David Strathairn plays her
husband Howard with his usual sensitivity, and Julianne Moore is typically
strong as Theresa, the friend and neighbor whose young daughter
accidentally drowns in the Goodwin's pond.
        Alice, who has promised to take Theresa's two young girls and her
own two daughters swimming, spends a little too long searching for her
bathing suit and returns downstairs to find one of her charges missing.  A
few panic-stricken moments later, Alice discovers the little girl lying
face down in the water.
        Compare this scene to the drowning at the beginning of Nicolas
Roeg's "Don't Look Now," for example, and you'll get a sense of Elliot's
lifeless handling of his film's dramatic content.  In fact, the director's
matter-of-fact approach to the material is a serious liability; scenes and
situations are presented rather than developed, and while Weaver gives
Alice her all, we are left feeling distanced from this woman and from this
cast of characters.
        After the accident, Alice, a part-time school nurse who has always
spoken her mind, is accused of child abuse as the unnamed Wisconsin town
turns its back on her and her family.  The film veers between rural
domestic drama and tacky women's prison melodrama culminating in an
impotent and blessedly-short courtroom sequence.  Again, Elliot keeps the
events at arm's length, as if afraid to commit one way or another.
        Arliss Howard plays defense attorney Paul Reverdy with a wink in
his eye which comes across as tasteless given the seriousness of the
charge, and that's Louise Fletcher (Nurse Ratched from "One Flew Over the
Cuckoo's Nest") as Alice's conscientious mother-in-law.  Their
contributions are adequate, but don't enhance the drama any.
        "A Map of the World" is a well-meaning but imperfect work,
recommended only for fans of Ms. Weaver, devotees of imperturbable cinema,
or, perhaps, cartographers.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Election (1999)
        Pitched as a high-school comedy, "Election" is a troubling movie
more suited to an arthouse audience despite its mainstream storyline of a
young and motivated overachiever working the system.  While at times the
film matches the wit and sophistication of Wes Anderson's "Rushmore," a
film which sports similar themes, it doesn't apply as consistent an
approach, and "Election"'s overall mood is too dark and disturbing to shrug
off this weakness.
        The laughs are certainly there, even if empathizing with the film's
characters is difficult.  The actors, however, cannot be accused of turning
in less than accomplished performances.
        Reese Witherspoon, who seems to be fronting just about every other
Hollywood release these days, is bright and confident as Tracy Flick, the
perky go-getter who's running unopposed for Carver High's student
presidency.  That is, until poli-sci teacher Mr. McAllister convinces Paul
Metzler, a big lug of a football hero, into running against her.
        McAllister is played by Matthew Broderick with just the right
amount of murky ambivalence.  McAllister dislikes Tracy Flick, blaming her
for just about everything that has gone wrong in his life.  And he blames
her for destroying the life of one of his colleagues, with whom Tracy had a
brief but devastating affair.  "Some say it was because I never had a
father figure in my life," comments Tracy.  "I just felt so safe and secure
with him."
        It's throwaway lines like that which give "Election" its disturbing
edge.
        Director and co-writer Alexander Payne ("Citizen Ruth") rarely
misses an opportunity to make these subtle jabs.  Of course, once you're
lulled into this predictable pattern, Payne delivers a shocker of a
distinctly unsubtle variety.
        Payne's turbulent styling extends to his main characters.  While
clearly a tragic figure, Tracy is so irritating that she alienates
everyone's sympathies.  McAllister, on the other hand, is painted as a
likable schmuck but is almost repulsive in his hypocrisy and self-delusion.
It's an odd technique by the director, since you wind up not liking anybody
yet feeling sorry for everybody.
        "Election" pushes its satirical way through the seemingly
good-humored election race, pausing from time to time to blindside you with
some jarring realizations about human nature.  By the time the campaign is
in full-swing, Paul's sister Tammy has submitted her candidacy for
president as a knee-jerk reaction to being betrayed by her girlfriend, who
doesn't share Tammy's deeper feelings.  Tammy's Ross Perot-inspired
strategy is one that seems to appeal to the apathetic students of Omaha's
Carver High: vote for me and I'll do nothing!
        What we have here is not just another pubescent comedy because its
moral and ethical observations are shocking and true.  Payne understands
satire and possesses an innate ability to go for the jugular but sometimes
his deft and subcutaneous touch is too uncomfortable.

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
        Nine years after they first struck Hollywood gold together in
"Pretty Woman," Julia Roberts and Richard Gere have teamed up again with
director Garry Marshall.  Whereas many will be thrilled to see the two
stars back together in "Runaway Bride," some will quickly realize that the
most creative aspect of the film was the decision to reunite Roberts and
Gere.  Everything else plays like an afterthought.
        The wafer-thin plot involves "USA Today" columnist Ike Graham
(Gere) hearing of a woman famous for leaving men at the altar (three to
date and counting).  Intrigued and desperate for copy, Ike heads on down to
Hale, Maryland to interview Maggie Carpenter (Roberts), and winds up
falling in love with her.
        Unfortunately, it's missing two critical ingredients: romance and
comedy.  OK, so I admit that this isn't my genre, but the comedy is trite,
forced, and highly unoriginal, and as for the romance?  Well...  Roberts is
engaging, she almost always is, but Gere is smug and full of himself.
There's a scene in "Playing by Heart," an ensemble piece from earlier this
year, in which Sean Connery humiliates himself by impersonating an
excitable puppydog.  Gere, it appears, was taking pointers.
        The occasionally competent actor (or the screenwriters--probably
both) goes out of his way to be cute in "Runaway Bride."  Whether it's
having his graying hair dyed all the colors of the rainbow, or providing
whimsical voiceovers for cake decorations, or clowning around in a field
like a drunken scarecrow to avoid "snakes," Gere relies on oafish physical
comedy rather than witty or sophisticated dialogue.  In fact, in "Runaway
Bride," Gere approximates a male version of Laurie Metcalf, who used to be
witty and sophisticated on "Rosanne," and is now oafish and physical on
"The Norm Show."  Metcalf puts in an appearance in "Runaway Bride" (as Mrs.
Trout the baker) and she's about as welcome as the horribly corny songs on
the soundtrack (Hall & Oates' "Maneater," for example).
        Not all of the performers disappoint, however.  Joan Cusack, as
Maggie's friend Peggy Flemming ("not the ice skater"), nails her role
delightfully, and unfortunate husband-to-be number four is given a charming
naďveté by Christopher Meloni.  Hector Elizondo, on the other hand, who
co-starred with Gere and Roberts in "Pretty Woman," seems to have followed
Gere's lead in "Runaway Bride" by staying up nights studying "How To Be
Full of Yourself For Dummies."
        Not content with being only sporadically funny and peripherally
romantic, the film takes "important" time out to make some serious asides,
such as portraying Maggie's father (Paul Dooley, who if nothing else gets
to show off his juggling skills) as a struggling alcoholic.  All this does
is dilute a plotline that is already heavily watered down.  How about this
for an alternative characterization: Maggie's dad is, wait for it, *not* a
struggling alcoholic!
        I am not such a confirmed curmudgeon that I couldn't smile from
time to time, or find the relationship between Ike and Maggie appealing on
some "what else is there in this picture to get excited about anyway?"
level.  But "Runaway Bride" is, by anyone's standards, a marketing strategy
first and a cute and funny movie second, and in that regard it--like the
hippie, the priest, and the aristocrat all abandoned by Maggie--should have
been left at the altar.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
        It's such an obvious concept you have to wonder why someone didn't
think of it sooner.  Unfortunately, Bobby and Peter Farrelly, the sicko
sibs who brought us "There's Something About Mary," did think of it, and
that means their latest film is filled with as much gross-out humor as it
is Jim Carrey going "from gentle to mental" (the film's smart tagline).
        In fact, "Me, Myself & Irene" is actually filled with *more*
gross-out humor than it is Carrey doing his split personality thing, and
that's its biggest failing.  After the success of "'Mary," the Farrellys
have clearly been trying to top their hysterical hair-gel sight gag, and
"Me, Myself & Irene" serves up a scene or situation every ten minutes which
threatens to dislodge it.  But it never quite manages it.  That's because
"There's Something About Mary" was a rather sophisticated little comedy
that went for shock value any chance it could.  "Me, Myself & Irene" is a
pretty tasteless--and much less funny--film highlighted by Jim Carrey
pratfalling all over himself.
        In this tale of a mild-mannered highway patrolman named Charlie
(Carrey) whose pent-up emotions are finally unleashed in the form of an
obnoxious alter-ego named Hank, the rubber-limbed comedian is adroitly
cast.  Charlie is so meek and well-meaning that he's taken advantage of by
just about everybody in his small Rhode Island town.  Until he meets Irene,
that his, and the lascivious Hank emerges.
        Two personalities in love with the same women?  Clever idea.  Let's
stick a chicken up someone's butt and see if it flies.  Ah, the subtle
humor of Bobby and Peter Farrelly.
        Renée Zellweger ("Jerry Maguire") plays Irene.  Her performance is
an odd one, since it feels displaced, as if phoned-in from another movie.
She's never involved in any of the truly shocking stuff, only occasionally
pausing to crinkle up her nose when Carrey (as the bully Hank) says
something outrageous.
        The Farrellys have a unique talent for making us squirm, but for
two hours straight it's a bit much.  I can watch a dog defecating on
someone's lawn without paying $8.00 for the privilege thank you very much.
"Me, Myself & Irene" is filled with a lot of good ideas that just sit
around awaiting punchlines, or one-joke setups that are stretched out in
perpetuity.
        Take Charlie's three African American sons, for example--that's
right, it seems that his pretty young (Caucasian!) wife was less than
faithful.  It's a funny concept, but the writers (the brothers and Mike
Cerrone) do little with it and instead go for cheap laughs by having the
trio constantly spewing street language.  I like the idea of three
behemoths kissing their racially-different Daddy on the cheek as he leaves
for work but all the stuff about quantum physics (their biological father
is a Mensa chapter leader) is ridiculous, as is most of the film.
        Once again the Farrellys poke fun at everyone, so no one group
should feel singled out, but it takes away from what might have been some
truly inspired cinema.  Jim Carrey struggling with a multiple personality
disorder is indeed an obvious (if clever) pitch for a whacked-out comedy.
Unfortunately, the bulk of "Me, Myself & Irene" is raunchy and crude and
all rather obvious too.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
        In the spring of 1995, the 'Dogme 95,' a collective of Danish
filmmakers, among them Lars von Trier ("Breaking the Waves") and Thomas
Vinterberg, entered into a radical agreement that would henceforth dictate
their style of filmmaking.  This pledge, which they named "The Vow of
Chastity," decreed "all shooting to be done on location with available
props, stories to be contemporary, sound to be ambient, cameras hand-held,
film in color, no artificial light," and that "the director must not be
credited."
        The inaugural product of this unusual contract is a brilliant piece
of work by the 29-year-old Vinterberg entitled "The Celebration" ("Festen")
and it is in large part successful due to the pact under which it was
produced.
        Shot in grainy, unsettling hand-held "video verité," "The
Celebration" centers on the family reunion to end all family reunions.  The
action takes place at a lavish ancestral estate, where aunts, uncles,
cousins, grandparents, and grandchildren gather to commemorate the 60th
birthday of Helge (Henning Moritzen), the family patriarch.
        Among those present are Helge, his wife Else (Birthe Neumann), and
their three grown children.  Children who, in the eyes of their affluent
parents, have never amounted to much.
        There's Christian (played by Ulrich Thomsen with a permanent frown
on his face): clean-cut, furtive, with a history of emotional problems.
There's Michael (Thomas Bo Larsen), the youngest: a failed restaurateur
with a fiery temper and an emotionally-abused wife, Mette (Helle Dolleris).
And there's Helene (Paprika Steen), who was given up for lost when she
joined the Young Socialists and pursued a career as a singer.
        Not present is Linda, Christian's recently-deceased twin sister,
about whom Christian is asked to say a few words by his father during
dinner.
        Christian's few words prove to be the first of several bombshells
that turn the otherwise upbeat festivities into a boiling pot of
parent-child emotions.  As deep, dark family secrets go, the revelation is
not entirely original, but the set-up, the delivery, and the slow
unraveling of the truth are masterful.
        Vinterberg's cinematic vision is beautifully realized by
cinematographer Anthony Dod Mantle, whose jumpy, colorful, fuzzy-focused
style gives "The Celebration" a documentary look and feel.  Combined with
top notch performances by the entire cast, the result is an uneasy feeling
that we are eavesdropping on a real family gathering rather than a
fictionalized account of one.  This pushes the emotional content through
the roof.
        Although contrary to the tenets of the 'Dogme 95,' Thomas
Vinterberg should be applauded for bringing this film to the screen.
Powerful and emotionally disturbing while at the same time funny, fresh and
moving, "The Celebration" has the uncanny ability to make you laugh out
loud while tears still linger in your eyes.  It left me shaken long after
the end credits had rolled.

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
For those of you who were smitten by Pennsylvania Lottery fever earlier
last month and avowed never to stand in line again, you might want to think
twice.
Hot on the heels of all the hype and the hoopla and the hullabaloo, the
movie itself finally makes an appearance, overshadowed, in part, by the
furious fervor that preceded it, a marketing blitz the likes of which
Hollywood has rarely seen.
But put away the bat memorabilia for a moment and ask yourself the one
question which surely must be on everybody's lips: was it worth the wait?
One cannot begin to talk about BATMAN--the phenomenon--and not use
superlatives.  It's certainly the biggest, boldest, most-publicized, most
eagerly awaited film of the summer.  BATMAN--the movie--doesn't quite live
up to its own high standards or expectations--how could it?--but you won't
leave the theater feeling cheated or ripped off.  BATMAN delivers all
right, every high-tech, high-brow minute of it.
For those of you who have been in a coma for the last six months, BATMAN is
the latest depiction of the two-dimensional character created by comic book
artist Bob Kane.  It's the story about the
millionaire-by-day/daring-do-gooder-by-night who rids Gotham City of its
criminally undesirable.
Although the film is thoroughly entertaining, it does contain some serious
production flaws.  Fortunately, these are offset by a refreshingly original
look which helps keep the film on track.
For instance, Michael Keaton's woeful miscasting as Batman proves to be a
major liability.  Bruce Wayne is portrayed as a sensitive introvert, an
interesting digression from the campy, tights-clad Adam West of the 1960s
television serial.  But Keaton walks through the movie with a puzzled look
on his face as if he's misplaced the keys to the batmobile.  His scenes
with photographer-turned-love-interest Vicki Vale (played by Kim Basinger)
are awkward and unconvincing and his cherubic looks invariably do him in.
But once Keaton puts on that batsuit - well, it could be Pee Wee Herman
under that cowl for all we care.  It's a transformation; Keaton IS Batman
... though does anyone ever remember Batman, the character, referring to
himself as such?
Another limitation is the fact that there is virtually no plot to speak of.
In some movies this would be a drawback but in BATMAN it seems to matter
little that the storyline is relegated to second place.  Overwhelming it is
Anton Furst's impressive production design, which borrows intelligently
from the likes of Fritz Lang's METROPOLIS and H.R. Geiger's metallic
constructions for ALIEN.  Gotham City has never looked more architecturally
imposing.
And we don't learn much more about the man behind the mask.  Who dug the
bat cave?  Where did Bruce get all his money?  Who actually makes the bat
gadgets?  He's already up and running when the film opens, so we never
learn how he got started in the crime-fighting business, though we are told
why (his parents were callously gunned down by a pair of aspiring hoodlums
on Gotham's violent streets).  Since the film is reputed to be closer to
the original comic book character, the writers should have dug a little
deeper and unearthed some of this dirt.
Last but not least, supporting characters are wasted.  Jack Palance (as
Carl Grissom) is severely under utilized, and you often wonder why he, or
Billy Dee Williams, who plays political candidate Harvey Dent, was ever in
the picture to begin with.  On a related note, has anyone else noticed that
the mayor of Gotham City bears more than a passing resemblance to Ed Koch?
What, does this film have a biting,  satirical edge to it too?
But the film's trump card is Jack Nicholson.  If you thought Nicholson's
part as the Devil in THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK was the ultimate showcase for
his talents, wait until you get a load of him here.  As the Joker, the role
he was born to play, Nicholson is at his roguish, flambuoyant best--and
absolutely astonishing!
No other actor could have pulled off this role without leaning towards
self-parody.  But Nicholson plays the villainous reincarnation of Jack
Napier straight down the middle and, as a result, flabbergasts the audience
with his rendition of the maniacally wide-eyed, white-faced jester.  The
climactic face off between the Joker and Batman requires the viewer to
suspend considerable belief--and by that time you'll be rooting for
Keaton's caped crusader--but it's Nicholson's movie every step of the way.
BATMAN will no doubt become not only the summer's top grossing movie, but
quite possibly the most profitable film ever made.  If you do go to see the
film, and chances are you will, go see it for Nicholson.  Director Tim
Burton pulled off the casting coup of the decade when he signed Nicholson
to play the Joker, a role for which Nicholson was reportedly paid $11
million.  No wonder he's smiling throughout!

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
        So I took my little sister to see "Practical Magic" because it
seemed like a better choice than "Rudolph the Red-Nosed Reindeer - The
Movie" (even though "Rudolph the Red-Nosed Reindeer - The Movie" features a
new version of 'Rudolph the Red-Nosed Reindeer' by Clint Black).
"Practical Magic" stars Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman who play sisters
who are also latter-day witches, and if you've seen anything else with
Nicole in it you'll know this isn't much of a stretch for her.  She plays
the slutty witch with the red hair whose freewheeling lifestyle gets her
into trouble.  Sandra plays the good witch with the black hair who has hung
up her broomstick and decided not to dabble in the black arts.  She wants a
normal life with a husband and two kids (one has black hair, the other red,
coincidentally) and a business selling shampoos, soaps, and body oils.  If
you've seen anything else with Sandra in it you'll know this isn't much of
a stretch for her.  Unfortunately Sandra and Nicole are the latest in a
long line of witches who have been landed with a nasty curse: any man who
falls in love with an Owens woman is doomed.  To sit through this movie,
they mean.  So I tried to keep my eyes off Sandra and Nicole as much as
possible, lest I fall in love with either of them, and marvel instead at
Stockard Channing and Dianne Wiest who play the girls' over-stuffed, campy
witch aunts, with whom they are forced to live and eat chocolate for
breakfast.  Stockard essentially recreates her over-stuffed, campy role as
a bordello proprietor in "Moll Flanders."  Dianne says something
funny--there's a big dramatic pause right before she says it--but for the
life of me I can't remember what it was now.  Maybe it was during the
embarrassing "midnight margaritas" sequence.  That's part of the problem
with the film; it's not very funny (unless substituting a dustbuster for a
broom is a new sight gag for you).  On the other hand, Sandra's tears are
quite convincing when her husband gets run over by a truck--think what she
could do if a storyline required her to blubber for 90 minutes
straight--but that's the other problem with the film.  It's all over the
place.  It's part light romantic comedy, part sappy sentimental tearjerker,
part Tuesday night domestic violence drama, part murder mystery, and part
"Exorcist"-styled demonic possession flick, and none of this fits together
particularly well.  I asked my sister what she thought of the film and she
said it was a bit "slow."  But her biggest disappointment was that Aidan
Quinn, who plays an Arizona cop who comes looking for Nicole's missing
boyfriend, didn't take his shirt off.  As for the film's soundtrack...  Oh
geez.  Just when the film gets quiet or moving or poignant the filmmakers
force some loud, inappropriate pop song down our throats.  Thankfully
someone must have whispered something in Griffin Dunne's ear--Griffin
directed the picture with far too much soft-focus and hand-held camerawork
for my liking--about halfway through the film because the songs stop, just
like that, until Stevie Nicks, a self-confessed witch in her own right,
warbles a new version of Fleetwood Mac's 'Crystal' right at the end of the
movie, following it immediately with another sudser over the end credits.
This so that they could stamp a big "features two new songs by Stevie
Nicks" on the print ads, presumably.  Maybe Clint Black crooning 'Rudolph
the Red-Nosed Reindeer' wasn't such a bad idea after all.

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)
The imposing New England homestead that serves as center stage in "The Myth
of Fingerprints" also serves as an obvious yet apt metaphor for the
dysfunctional American family that was raised there.  In long shot it's
strikingly handsome, but up close its cracked and peeling paint indicate
the need for repair.
In a wintry November setting writer/director Bart Freundlich weaves his
discriminating, multi-layered story of a family reunion that's wrought with
angst and grief.  On the surface, "The Myth of Fingerprints" might seem
like any old home-for-the-holidays scenery chawfest in which the central
characters get toasted and roasted along with the bird.  But Freundlich's
take is a little different.
Why do people subject themselves to such familial hostility each and every
year?  What causes grown children to revert to infantile behavior in the
presence of their parents?  And do you have to have had a healthy family
life in order to have a successful relationship?
While "The Myth of Fingerprints" is bigger on questions than it is on
answers, it challenges its audience to think.
Bigger, perhaps, and more intimidating than the ancestral centerpiece is
Hal (Roy Scheider), the impassionate, detached patriarch.  He's a little
odd and visibly wrestling some deep, dark secret.  It's Thanksgiving, and
Hal and his faithful, nurturing wife Lena (the dependable Blythe Danner)
are welcoming their four adult children home after a three year absence.
Eldest daughter Mia (Julianne Moore, who's a hot property these days) and
son Jake (Michael Vartan) are bringing along their significant others,
causing Dad to comment "There's more of them than I remember."
The film is almost perfectly cast with performances to match.  Noah Wyle,
who brings the discontent son Warren to life, is a quivering mass of
brooding sensitivity.  Laurel Holloman plays the pesky younger daughter
Leigh to coquettish perfection.  Moore, too, is especially good.  Mia's
bitterness almost single-handedly makes the tensions run high.
First-timer Freundlich resists the easy temptation to bring these tensions
to an explosive, emotional head and instead develops the characters slowly
and with subtlety, drawing us in, exploring their motivations, their
weaknesses, and their desires.
But there is laughter among the tears; the director balances the drama with
humor and pointed observations, lightening the mood with a flurry of eager
bedfellows.  In addition, the film has a palpable sensuality; you can feel
the cold of the New England air and smell the antiquities, the wood smoke,
the oil on a gun stock.  "The Myth of Fingerprints" shows us how families
interact, collide, kiss, and maybe even make up.  It's about lovers and
friends, and how interchangeable these sometimes are.  And how mistakes can
turn a family inside out.
Family gatherings are often fraught with stresses and anxieties and "The
Myth of Fingerprints" skillfully demonstrates that you don't have to use
bombast--just high-caliber acting and introspective writing--to make these
things interesting.

Title
Review for Another Stakeout (1993)
     A Hollywood production office--plush, swank, business-like.
Interior.  Day.
     Writer Jim Kouf is pitching his idea.  He draws an imaginary
theater marquee in the air and announces proudly, "STAKEOUT II.  It's
perfect.  Think.  It's six years later.  We'll pick up the story where
the first one left off.  We'll get Richard back, and Emilio.  And maybe
even John would be willing to direct again.  The thing'll write
itself."
     Producers Cathleen Summers and Lynn Bigelow look skeptical. 
     "Hell yes.  We'll stick Rosie O'Donnell in it.  Anything she
*does* is funny.  We'll blow up some real estate at the beginning and
blow away some people at the end to satisfy the action fans.  It'll be
something new, yet something familiar.  Audiences loved the first one.
It can't fail."
     The producers seem sold.  "Just one thing," says Bigelow.  "That
title.  It has to be punchier.  How about...  How about ANOTHER
STAKEOUT?" Kouf agrees.
     ANOTHER STAKEOUT is the sequel to the 1987 film, STAKEOUT.
Richard Dreyfuss and Emilio Estevez reprise their roles as Chris Lecce
and Bill Reimers, two Seattle police detectives who once again pull the
worst assignment on the duty roster.  This time they are joined by
Assistant District Attorney Gina Garrett (Rosie O'Donnell), and the
three pose as an average American family in order to locate a key
witness in a Las Vegas mob trial who has gone underground.  It's a
dubious domestic arrangement at best, with Lecce as Dad, Garrett as
Mom, and Reimers as their grown son.
     A comic battle of wills ensues as this dysfunctional trio attempts
to play house whilst keeping an eye on the home of their unsuspecting
neighbors.
     What made the original STAKEOUT so popular was a combination of
two things.  First, the on-screen magnetism of its two male
leads--likable characters that shared a believable chemistry.
Secondly, a deft blend of comedy and real suspense contributed to
making the film a surprise hit.
     Unfortunately all those elements are missing from the sequel.
Because he assumes we know these two characters, writer Kouf never
takes the time to develop them, and they spend most of their time
mugging shamelessly to the camera.  There is very little tension, and
the film plays more like NATIONAL LAMPOON'S SEATTLE VACATION than a
comedy/drama about undercover cops.
     After a promising opening scene that is truly explosive, ANOTHER
STAKEOUT quickly deteriorates into childish physical humor and stilted
wisecracking.  Lecce battles a crook in a dumpster filled with rotting
vegetation and winds up with a mackerel in his gun holster.  Ha ha.
After having to shave off his moustache, Reimers whines about how he
has a special relationship with his facial hair.  Ho ho.  Garrett's
stupid-looking rottweiler chases a rabbit through the pine trees and
drags her after him.  Hee hee.  It's yuck-a-minute kind of stuff.
     Dennis Farina and Marcia Strassman play the O'Hara's, the couple
whose palatial family home is under surveillance.  They play things
pretty straight, but there is one hysterical scene in which they
attempt to leave a dinner party early.  Too bad it's the *only*
genuinely funny scene in the film.  Cathy Moriarty, who looks
strikingly like Faye Dunaway in this picture, plays Lu Delano, the key
witness in question.
     The film seems to have had its share of production problems.
Madeleine Stowe, who played the object of Richard Dreyfuss' desire in
the original film, has a fairly substantial part as Maria, but her
appearance is uncredited.  Then there's a scene with another neighbor,
Barbara Burnside (played by Sharon Maughan), involving a baseball and a
broken window that ends abruptly.  Her son Ronnie, presumably the
culprit (and a role attributed to Taylor Estevez in the closing
credits), never appears in the finished film.
     ANOTHER STAKEOUT is director John Badham's first sequel, and he
should have left well enough alone.

Badham Badham's Butterworth Cathleen Dunaway Estevez Faye Followup Hee Kouf Lecce Lu Maltin Maughan Mom Newsgroups O'Hara's Reimers Rosie Rottweiler STAKEOUT Stowe Strassman a1.mscf.upenn.edu butterworth cbnewsj.att.com dumpster ecl hee r.a.m.r rec.arts.movies rec.arts.movies.reviews thing'll whilst
.


Title
Review for Lengua de las mariposas, La (1999)
        There are two remarkable images in the Spanish film "Butterfly"
("La Lengua de las Mariposas").  The first is of a young Chinese woman
running through a field--a simple, transitory moment filled with fervent
beauty.  The second is a slow-motion shot of a young boy chasing after a
truck while hurling rocks and epithets at the downtrodden people inside.
        Both images are related in that they deal with loss--José Luis
Cuerda's film is filled with easy metaphors, as subtle and delicate as a
butterfly's wing.
        The Chinese woman is running to wave goodbye to a young saxophone
player, Andrés, who briefly visited her island home and moved her with his
innocence and caring.  In the film's more potent closing scene, Andrés'
younger brother Moncho runs with tears in his eyes as his cries of
"atheist" and "murderer" turn to more genuine remembrances of his teacher,
Don Gregorio, one of many republican sympathizers now being carted away.
        "Butterfly" describes this time of emotional upheaval through the
eyes of an eight-year-old boy (Manuel Lozano, whose resemblance to Mark
Wahlberg is uncanny and whose outstanding performance as Moncho belies his
years).  Moncho, an asthmatic, lives with his parents and his older brother
(Alexis de los Santos) and, as the film opens, is being taken to school for
the first time.  Having learned that the schoolmaster Don Gregorio strikes
his boys, Moncho is not surprisingly fearful, but Don Gregorio turns out to
be anything but an insensitive brute, taking the little Swallow (Moncho's
nickname) under his wing and teaching him about nature, bugs, and the
tongues of butterflies.
        Don Gregorio is played by Fernando Fernán Gómez, a veteran Spanish
actor whose on-screen performances span more than 170 films.  He's
wonderful, like a cozy old grandfather whose lap you wish you could curl up
onto.
        Cuerda cleverly relegates the political turmoil to the background
so that the overriding feel of "Butterfly" is a heartwarming coming-of-age
tale set during a difficult time rather than a movie directly focused on
the Spanish Civil War.  This allows the director to shape the story with
humor and fondness as we witness the two brothers just being boys amid a
lot of beautiful settings.  But the effect of the country's changing
allegiances is very much there in the faces and actions of the Galician
townsfolk--the rich landowner who attempts to bribe Don Gregorio with a
pair of capons so that his son can receive some personal tutoring, and the
priest who airs his disapproval to Moncho's father now that Moncho's
schooling has taken away his desire to become an altar boy.
        And the impact comes to a head in that final, powerful scene, when
Moncho is forced to publicly renounce his teacher--a man who has loved him
and cared for him and opened his eyes to the beauty all around him--in
order to protect his family's true loyalties.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
When you know you're going to die, the food looks better but you can't
smell it.
That's just one of the many bittersweet observations about death in "Dream
With the Fishes," writer Finn Taylor's offbeat directorial debut.  An
official selection at this year's Sundance Film Festival, the film can
easily be described as "promising."  Viewers with little sympathy for
missed opportunities, however, are likely to be more interested in Finn's
*next* project.
"Dream With the Fishes" is pretty quirky.  Much of its quirkiness is drawn
from the fact that its lead characters, Terry (a nervous, voyeuristic dweeb
solidly played by David Arquette) and Nick (awkwardly realized by Brad
Hunt), are both close to death.  When Nick--who's dying of some unspecified
disease--first meets Terry, Terry is about to commit suicide by jumping off
a bridge.  Rather than talking him out of it, Nick suggests a less messy
but ultimately unsuccessful alternative, and their evolving friendship
leads to a bizarre pact: if Terry will help Nick live out his fantasies
before his time is up, Nick will return the favor by killing him.
Taylor could have gone on a shopping spree with this setup.  Instead, he
tries to balance the story with a combination of offbeat and serio-tragic
episodes.  The quirky ones work: the two engage in some late night nude
bowling with a couple of hookers, for example.  The script's more serious
turns, unfortunately, don't.  When Nick returns to his childhood home in
order to make good on his estranged relationship with his father, their
conversation deteriorates into embarrassing cro-magnon hijinks.  It's
obvious that Taylor is less comfortable with these scenes of domestic
reconciliation than he is with his characters doing--and talking
about--wacky things.
A lot of the ground is familiar or just plain stolen (including a lottery
sequence lifted straight out of a "Full House" episode).  A psychic down at
Fisherman's Wharf tells Nick "you will be given the job of protecting all
the fishes."  This results in him, off-camera, stealing a fish, just the
one fish, from the local aquarium and letting it loose in the sea--huh?.
Often Nick asks Terry about fulfilling *his* fantasies too, but the best
Terry can come up with is "all you can eat Cracker Smacks."  A strange
response from a man we've already witnessed spying on Nick's tattoo artist
girlfriend, Liz (Kathryn Erbe) and other sad women through binoculars.
Grainily photographed (at least in the beginning; for some reason the
graininess disappears about halfway through the film--perhaps this is what
the Sundance people mean by a "lean style"), "Dream With the Fishes" offers
a wonderful soundtrack of tunes by the likes of the Waterboys, Squirrel Nut
Zippers, and Sun Volt that, unlike many pre-packaged indie song scores,
actually fits the mood.  Taylor also employs the splendid Cathy Moriarty as
Nick's Aunt Elise, a faded dancing queen, but her presence is another
example of unrealized promise.
Auspicious is too strong a word to describe the director's first effort,
for "Dream With the Fishes" gets by less on what might have been and more
on its implicit assurances of what's to come.

Title
Review for Memento (2000)
        I went into "Memento" knowing only three things about it: 1. it's about a
guy (played by Guy Pearce) who suffers from short-term memory loss; 2. it
co-stars Carrie-Anne Moss and Joe Pantoliano (both from "The Matrix"); and
3. it's received some pretty good press.  But that's all I knew.  In many
ways this is already too much information since the less you know about the
film going in the more likely you are to enjoy it.  For reasons that are
hard to explain, I had an innate sense that this film was going to be
good--very good, in fact--so I avoided reading anything about it
beforehand.  That proved to my advantage.  For you to be at a similar
advantage, stop reading this review now, go and see the film (and don't
talk to *anyone* who's seen it before you do), then come back and finish
reading from where you left off. 
        "Memento," a crisp, stylish film noir that plays havoc with the senses (if
anything it's more a physiological than a psychological thriller), is
written and directed by Christopher Nolan (this is only his second
feature).  Its storyline concerns an insurance investigator, Leonard Shelby
(Pearce), who suffers from chronic loss of memory.  He cannot remember much
of anything, cannot create new memories, cannot remember someone he was
introduced to moments before--he has to rely on prolific note-taking, body
tattoos, and
Polaroids to keep track of who he is, and what he's doing.  What he's doing
is trying to find the man who raped and murdered his wife.  Again, it's
unfortunate knowing that particular piece of information, for example,
beforehand since the way this plot detail is revealed in the film is
extremely powerful. 
        So Nolan centers his intelligent, fine-looking film around this man with a
mission.  Leonard's investigation itself is complex and intricate.  Then we
have his condition, which adds to the complexity and intricacy of the
narrative.  These two elements make the film extremely engaging, but Nolan
doesn't stop there.  Perhaps the most intriguing component of the film is
the way in which it's put together.  Events happen not chronologically, but
backwards in time.  Nolan's film isn't the first to do this, of course.
"Betrayal" (from 1983) documents, from a cuckolded husband's point of view,
an extramarital affair in reverse chronological order.  And Quentin
Tarantino's masterful "Pulp Fiction" plays around with continuity like no
other contemporary piece of filmmaking.  In "Memento," this rarely
attempted cinematic technique seems less like a plot device and more an
integral part of the film's framework, working superbly in context given
the medical condition of its lead--Leonard is always backtracking, checking
his notes, trying to remember things; it's the perfect combination of
substance *and* style. 
        In that regard, "Memento" excels on every imaginable level.  The writing
is sophisticated--clever one minute, funny the next, gut-wrenching
thereafter; the acting (by Moss, Pantoliano, and above all Pearce) is
sublime; and the direction is brave and intellectually stimulating. 
        If you've heard *anything* about this film you've probably heard how good
it is and of that you can be assured.  "Memento" is quite simply the best
film of the year.  It's the smartest noir thriller since "The Last
Seduction," the most brilliantly structured film since "Timecode," and the
most mesmerizing mystery story I can remember seeing in a long, long time.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
        It begins with big, bland titles and the cloying strains of James
Horner's obsequious score starting up, a simple refrain repeated so often
it gnaws its way into your cranium like a coprophagous beetle digging for
dung.  Yuk.
        Next we're introduced to our cast of characters, a predictable
weather-beaten lot with handles like Murph and Bugsy and Sully.  The
stubborn, macho swordboat captain (George Clooney); the inexperienced young
punk (Mark Wahlberg); the burly divorcee (John C. Reilly); the token
African American (Allen Payne); the troublemaker (Michael Fichtner); the
scruffy one who smells like fish and can't get a woman to even look at him
(John Hawkes).
        It's not that we're simply introduced to these stereotypes,
however.  We have the intimate details of their personal lives thrust down
our throats within the film's first fifteen minutes.  I mean this happens
*very* quickly.  Why are the filmmakers in such a rush to fob us off with
these hokey, trite, and laughable scenes?  So that we'll care about these
people as individuals once we get to the storm stuff, of course.
Ironically, the latest coming attractions for "The Perfect Storm" now
position the film as a personal human drama rather than a rousing
action-adventure flick.  Interesting.
        Anyway, for the next interminable two hours we get the story.  The
true story.  But what story?  Six idiots lost at sea--*that's* the story.
That's all there is.  Gloucesterman Billy Tyne (Clooney) is having a run of
bad luck and vows to take his Andrea Gail out for one last (and hopefully
big) haul to make his quota.  "I catch fish.  It's what I do" he sneers at
his pit boss ("Starship Troopers"' Michael Ironside).  Billy's ragtag band
of fishermen all need the money so they're happy to ragtag along, at least
initially.  Wahlberg shares a tender moment with his lovely thirtysomething
girlfriend (played by Diane Lane) before he heads out beyond the Grand
Banks.  "Last night I dreamed that you are I were so close I couldn't tell
where I ended and you began."  Or something like that.  I tell you the
dialogue in this film must have been written by a three-year-old (although
screenwriter Bill Wittliff appears to be considerably older than that).
Anemic and foolish, the on-screen patter makes you want to spit.
        The promotions people would have us believe that "In the Fall of
1991, an event took place that had never occurred in recorded history" but
the meteorological intrigues of the plot are reduced to having a Boston
weatherman (played by a bespectacled Christopher McDonald, Adam Sandler's
golf opponent in "Happy Gilmore") "ooh!" and "aah!" at advancing weather
patterns on his computer screen.  As he traces the swirling masses on the
monitor with his finger he comments to himself "This is unheard of.
Hurricane Grace kicking up a fuss down here, a system rising off Sable
Island there, and the Gulf Stream pushing forth a cold front over here.  If
these three were to collide it would be a disaster of epic proportions.
It'd be the storm of the century.  No wait, it'd be--dot dot dot--The
Perfect Storm."  Or something like that.  I haven't seen a decent film yet
in which a character speaks the film's title, often times to camera.  I
still haven't.
        Once the winds whip up it's like the wreck of the Hesperus out
there, with the film piling on the "suspense" by regularly flashing
subtitles at the bottom of the screen. "Mistral (Plymouth, NH), 345 Miles
Off Bermuda."  "HMS Hermes--Halfway to Havana."  "Meteorological Tracking
Station U-571, Baffin Bay."  And "The Flemish Cap" moments after Cap'n
Billy announces they are steering towards The Flemish Cap, a remote section
of sea that's barely on the map.
        These reference points come so thick and fast it's as if the
filmmakers expect us to have a lapful of nautical charts and are plotting
the rough weather's course every step of the way.  Another way the film
creates "drama" is to have two of the crew members constantly battling with
each other.  The minute Reilly and Fichtner's characters are introduced
they start bickering, trading barbs and insults--"your mother was a
lobsterman!"--without explanation.  Why?  Because there's no other dramatic
tension.  Except for a sloop with Karen Allen aboard being buffeted around
with another testosterone-driven male at the helm.  "I don't use charts, I
just go with my gut.  Let's ride this one out," says Dad.  Or something
like that.  Who are these people and what are they doing here?  The men in
this film give their gender a really bad rap; it's hard to care about
morons.
        But the women don't do any better.  A bunch of them sit around the
bar at the Crow's Nest in Gloucester, Maine chewing their fingernails and
watching the devastation being wreaked on the television.  Lane's brow is
constantly furrowed.  And Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, who seems to have
modeled her rival skipper character on Clint Eastwood, what with her
growled delivery and gnarly, barnacled appearance, provides two
embarrassingly heart-wrenching soliloquies, the first of which goes
something like this.  (On the radio to Billy): "Oh my God Billy, it's
happening!  You have to get out of there now.  It's the mother of all
storms.  It's a huge epic of unfathomable proportions.  It's the devil
itself.  You're headed right into the eye of a monster!"  Or something like
that (cut to two hours of our actors having buckets of water dumped over
their heads).  If anyone had drawn a gun in this film the trigger would
have jammed.
        It wasn't until a rescue helicopter flew over the choppy North
Atlantic that I was reminded that Wolfgang Petersen's last film was that
mega-turkey, "Air Force One."
        "Lost at sea."  "Petersen has missed das boot here."  "This one
stinks of fish"  "Rough waters."  "Waves of emotion."  "Perfectly
horrible."  "The Perfect Mess."  There are so many ways to describe "The
Perfect Storm" but "a satisfying movie-going experience" just isn't one of
them.  Disastrous?  Yes.  An epic of tragic proportions?  Sure.  A tragedy
of epic proportions?  Absolutely.  I can think of only three good things in
the film: the Big Waves (courtesy Industrial Light and Magic), how expertly
the cast handles tackle and bait, and Reilly's knit cap.  Otherwise it's a
bust.
        Had I not been obligated to ride it out I would have stormed out of
this one at the quarter hour mark.  It would have been the right decision.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for What's the Worst That Could Happen? (2001)
WHAT'S THE WORST THAT COULD HAPPEN?
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 2001 David N. Butterworth
If you've been following William Fichtner's career (and there's absolutely
no reason why you should have), you might have noticed that he's played
some rather similar roles over the years.  Like Sully in "The Perfect
Storm"--tough, gruff, and a little bit scary.  Or Law in "Albino
Alligator"--tough, gruff, and little bit scarier.  Or Colonel William Sharp
in "Armageddon," or Dwayne Engelman in "Strange Days," or even his brief
appearance towards the beginning of "Pearl Harbor," as the abusive father
of Danny--here is an actor who gravitates towards tough, gruff,
hard-hitting roles.
Which is why his performance in "What's the Worst That Could Happen?" is
such a shock, such a delight.
In the film, Fichtner plays a blonde haired, meticulously dressed, overtly
effeminate, dog-loving detective.  As Alex Tardio, Fichtner's performance
borders on caricature but goes beyond it.  It borders on offensive but
doesn't really manage it.  And it borders on clichéd stereotype but doesn't
quite succumb to that definition either.
In a role so diametrically opposed to what the actor has played before we
should have seen it coming, Fichtner isn't perfect--you can see him
struggling a little at times, concentrating a little too hard on the look
as he swishes his hand through the air, or nuzzles a coiffed canine up
close and personal--but he's pretty damned good, and silly, and without
question the best thing in the film.  In fact, had it not been for
Fitchner's sudden and bizarre appearance, and his jarring screen presence
thereafter, I would have walked out, for "What's the Worst That Could
Happen?" is mesmerizing in its awfulness, a poorly written, haphazardly
edited, and totally unfunny (yes, it stars Martin Lawrence and Danny Devito
so how could that be possible?) moviegoing experience.
Fichtner's performance doesn't exactly save the film, and it's not like
I'm recommending "What's the Worst That Could Happen?" solely on the
strength of the actor's dramatic turnaround, but his contributions do raise
the film's rating from no stars to one-and-a-half.
Thumbs up to Fichtner then, and thumbs down--way, way, down--to everyone
else involved in this sorry mess, a movie so dull and pedestrian and
nonsensical it doesn't even warrant discussion.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
        Jackie Chan does it all, often writing, directing, and starring in
his own films.  And, of course, the diminutive Hong Kong action star, who's
half cuddly koala bear, half springbok, does all of his own gravity-defying
stunts, risking life and limb in the process.
        With "Mr. Nice Guy," Chan's latest outing repackaged for the
American market, the likable action hero should have had the opportunity to
demonstrate some culinary arts along with the requisite martial variety,
since Chan plays a TV chef (kind of like "Yan Can Cook" for the
high-kicking set).  Unfortunately, apart from the opening credits sequence,
Chan doesn't cook a thing.
        Plots are generally inconsequential in Jackie Chan movies but this
one plays like a pilot George and Jerry could have dreamed up to pitch to
NBC (Chan forced to play a TV chef by an unsympathetic judge?).  Given that
Chan doesn't come anywhere close to a saucepan, or a stove, his occupation
here is moot.  The *idea* of Chan playing a TV chef is actually funnier
than the movie itself.  As for the film's "translated" title, the TV
reporter that Chan "rescues" early in the film thanks him and calls him a
really nice guy.  It probably wouldn't have taken a whole lot of effort to
have come up with something a little more creative.
         The film is set in Melbourne and I can only think of two reasons
why that is: 1) filming in Melbourne is cheaper than filming in Hong Kong,
and 2) all those Australian accents would have seemed peculiar otherwise.
        There are two sets of bad guys in the movie, one called The Demons
(snarling, accented dudes in mod clothing who look like rejects from a Dark
Bros. porno video) and the other a gaggle of suit-and-tied mobsters led by
a nefarious drug lord (Richard Norton) known simply as Giancarlo--ooh,
scary!  Neither appear to have watched any Al Pacino movies, as the drug
deal they're involved in early in the picture turns sour (ever see a drug
deal on film that didn't?).  Weapons are drawn, money is scattered, cocaine
is spilled.  Filming all this in an attempt to get a TV exclusive is
reporter Diana (played by Gabrielle Fitzpatrick), who runs into Chan and
the chase is on.
        The chase in question lasts about twenty minutes during which
Jackie--as he's called in pretty much all his imports--throws a kick and a
punch or two (make that closer to a hundred), and even tries to explain he
doesn't even know this woman, but the hoods aren't buying it.  Diana
settles down to watch the tape...in her underwear!...and realizes it got
switched somewhere back there, and the chase is on again.  Attempts to
retrieve said incriminating videotape by both parties prove to be the
central "plot" of "Mr. Nice Guy."
        The film's climax involves Chan commandeering a monstrous
earthmover and razing Giancarlo's obsessively-clean luxury mansion.  Glass,
concrete, and wooden structures burst into flames at the slightest of
touches.
        Jackie Chan's films are equal parts silly, cute, and exhilarating.
Chan himself is at his best when interacting with props--there's a
contrived but effective sequence on a construction site with a lot of
architecturally-suspect blue doors--or putting himself in physical danger
(watch out for that buzzsaw!).  Obstacles are irrelevant to Chan; he scales
them, avoids them, engages them, all with consummate ease.
        But his latest movie, although not without its flourishes, tends to
concentrate on the cute and silly stuff, leaving even the most diehard
Jackie fans screaming "no more Mr. Nice Guy!"

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
Who would have guessed that Ewan McGregor belting out Elton John's "Your
Song" while dressed in the period garb of 1900's Paris would be so
electrifying an image.  Yet in Baz Lurhmann's "Moulin Rouge," it's just one
of several hypnotic musical sequences.
In the hands of, say, anyone other than Baz, "Moulin Rouge" could so
easily have been a laugh riot (unintentionally speaking that is).  But the
Australian director of "Strictly Ballroom" and "William Shakespeare's Romeo
+ Juliet" proves he has what it takes, defying his critics by taking an
original story (loosely based on the Orpheus legend) and, in a "reinvention
of the musical form," interweaving contemporary songs in a way that, simply
put, just works.  Amazingly!
Jim Broadbent ("Topsy-Turvy") and Richard Roxburgh (as The Duke) goof off
to Madonna's "Like a Virgin," for example.  A minor character with the
arresting name of The Narcoleptic Argentinian performs a tango-inspired
take on The Police's "Roxanne."  And Nicole Kidman does "Diamonds Are a
Girl's Best Friend" on a swing.  And that's just a fraction of it.
"Moulin Rouge" is a musical extravaganza about a musical extravaganza, a
Spectacular Spectacular starring McGregor as a penniless poet who's
enlisted to write a can-can cabaret under the absinthe-clouded guidance of
Toulouse-Lautrec (played by John Leguizamo).  McGregor's Christian soon
becomes enmeshed in Lautrec's seedy, ooh la-la underworld of bohemian sex
and high-kicking showgirls where he meets--and quickly falls in love
with--a high-priced courtesan named Satine (Kidman).
Pretty soon it's apparent this one is heading in much the same direction
as Luhrmann's previous effort (the afore-mentioned "Romeo + Juliet"), but
that's not a bad thing.  "Moulin Rouge" kicks off with lots of rapid-fire
imagery, swooping camerawork, and intricate model shots that it takes a
little getting used to.  But once you do, and can revel in Luhrmann's
wicked sense of humor and extraordinary visual style coupled with co-writer
Craig Pearce's wickedly anachronistic dialogue (citing 20th century lyrics
whenever possible), you'll soon appreciate the film for what it is: a bold,
brave, audacious work that entertains on many levels.
None the least of which is listening to McGregor and Kidman warbling "The
Hills are Alive with the Sound of Music."  Forget Tom--every time these two
get together (and they're both excellent) Luhrmann cranks up the strings
and at the Moulin Rouge, it's enough to make you want to cry.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Plein soleil (1960)
Miramax Zoe pictures in collaboration with film preservationist Martin
Scorsese have chosen to re-release distinguised French director Rene
Clement's 1960 suspenser PLEIN SOLEIL (loosely translated as PURPLE NOON)
at a time when deliberate, carefully-crafted movies are uncommon.
PURPLE NOON does not boast the multi-million dollar budgets of some of this
summer's wide-eyed extravaganzas but it does boast the Tom Cruise of its
day in Alain Delon, almost perfectly handsome with his dark hair, straight
nose, firm chin, and soulful, expressive eyes.
Looks are important here because although PURPLE NOON is a singularly
thrill-less thriller, it is lovely to look at.
Based on Patricia Highsmith's "The Talented Mr. Ripley," the plot of PURPLE
NOON is deceptively simple: Tom covets everything of his playboy friend
Philippe--his money, his yacht, and his girlfriend--that he plans to murder
him and assume his identity.
Tom Ripley (Delon) has been promised $5,000 by a wealthy American, Mr.
Greenleaf, for the safe return of his errant son Philippe (played by
Maurice Ronet), currently savoring the good life in Italy.  Along for the
ride is Philippe's fiancee, Marge (Marie Laforet), for whom Phillipe's
impressive sloop is named.
Although the first part of the film takes place aboard Philippe's sailboat,
the film does not create the sexual tension of similar loony-on-board
psychodramas, such as DEAD CALM or Polanski's KNIFE IN THE WATER.  Instead,
Clement's film builds slowly, intensifying the brooding relationship
between the two men, with Laforet's role reduced to little more than cabin
crew.  Delon and Ronet are an imposing screen pair, and they handle
themselves well in a movie that, although not nail-bitingly suspenseful or
even very clever, is a textbook exercise in subtle malevolence.
But the real star of the film is cinematographer Henry Decae, whose use of
saturated color and monster close-ups make PURPLE NOON a visual treat.
Decae bathes the actors in color: the often shirtless Ronet is positively
bronze, as if he's been glazed by the Mediterranean sun; Delon is lovingly
photographed with the same kind of respect as one might give, say, Ingrid
Bergman; and the pouty, very French Laforet shimmers in her stripey tees
and tricolor deck garb.
In addition to the beautiful people, Decae also captures the complementary
hues of the surrounding topography; the pastel-painted haunts of Rome,
Taormina, and Mongibello, with their red clay roofs, bright shutters, and
ornate marble tiles.  Likewise, the interiors of these dwellings are
asplash with a splendid variety of tints and shades.
And, of course, there's the blue, blue sea.
Rene Clement is often credited with providing inspiration for the French
New Wave and this film confirms that assertion.  Buoyed along by a vibrant
Nino Rota score, stunning photography and solid lead performances, PURPLE
NOON is worth a look any time of day.

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
        Sometimes a stellar cast can compensate for a lot of things, and
"Pushing Tin" certainly features some name stars who are going places:
Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina Jolie, and oh yes John Cusack
who might not realize it at first, but he's actually the *veteran* among
this quartet of fine-looking people.
        Sometimes a terrific cast like this can compensate for a lackluster
screen treatment of an idea that has "hip comedy" written all over it,
compensate for workmanlike but uninspired direction, compensate for an
obnoxious score that would have anyone but the tone deaf screaming for the
exits, compensate for clichéd characterizations, compensate for
embarrassing "you have to be joking" situations.  Etc.
        In "Pushing Tin," Thornton, Blanchett, Jolie, and Cusack don't have
an earthly.
        From the opening sequence the film is in big trouble: squiggly,
"quirky" credits, fake-looking passenger planes circling New York, and Anne
Dudley's in-your-ear music making us wonder how she ever got that Best
Original Score nomination for "The Full Monty," let alone won it.  But I,
for one, wasn't ready to walk just yet.
        So quickly we descend into a tightly-edited air traffic controllers
montage which screams to us in large capital letters THESE PEOPLE HAVE A
DIFFICULT JOB, YES, what with their frantic, mile-a-minute instructional
personas, juggling planes and passenger's lives like some huge, real,
mid-air video game.  Hip, cool, demonic auctioneer Nick "the Zone" Falzone
(Cusack) is the best in the biz.  Of course.  Until some hipper, cooler,
leather-clad flyboy assist in the guise of Russell Bell (Thornton) shows up
to challenge Falzone's finite air space.
        Boys will be boys and some heavy duty testosterone starts exuding,
then the macho one-upmanship begins.  It doesn't stop with seeing who can
juggle three 747s within a cat's whisker of each other.  Oh no.  There are
some broken hoop dreams, some wanna-see-how-fast-I-can-drives, and then the
ultimate showdown: was that my wife I saw you with last night?
        Director Mike Newell ("Four Weddings and a Funeral") must have read
a different draft of this script because the one that's being acted out up
there between Newark, JFK, and La Guardia doesn't have an ounce of
subtlety, and Newell has made some awfully good-and funny-movies before.
The antics of these air traffic controllers will make you cringe.  They'll
make you frown in disbelief.  They'll have you constantly looking at your
watch.  But wait!  There's still 100 minutes to go!!
        The film's only saving grace is Blanchett, whose Connie Falzone is
a spunky, brash, Long Island housewife who wants to better herself by
taking art classes.  This is a wonderful accomplishment for the fine
actress who has previously played a red-headed Australian gambler ("Oscar
and Lucinda") and a tempestuous British monarch ("Elizabeth").  But she's
not enough to save the picture.  Thornton looks terrific and performs
solidly but his character is a joke.  Jolie (as Russell's knock 'em dead
wife) isn't bad, but the up-and-coming actress disappoints by allowing
herself to be displayed like a plaything.  Cusack cracks gum, dons shades,
and acts hip throughout but, like everything else in the film, his
performance is forced.
        In the last ten minutes or so, for some inexplicable reason, things
start coming together and you begin to get a sense of how this film might
have been, like the trailer teases.  But it's too little too late.  A fine
cast aside, "Pushing Tin" is nothing more than an embarrassment.

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
        It seemed wholly appropriate that at a weekend screening of "The
Horse Whisperer," the start of the film was delayed some twenty minutes due
to "projection difficulties."
        Robert Redford's film version of Nicholas Evans' best-selling novel
was supposed to have been in theaters last December, going head-to-head
with "Titanic," but is only now making its much anticipated debut.  This
(strategic?) delay has allowed "The Horse Whisperer" to compete, sans
fanfare, against some smaller, unassuming movies during a relatively slower
time at the box office.
        No matter.  Redford's film stands head and shoulders above James
Cameron's ocean-going tragedy, especially in the writing and acting
departments.  Whatever the reasons for its postponement, "The Horse
Whisperer" supports the old adage "better late than never."
        Redford has taken Evans' book and given it the big screen
treatment.  While parts of "The Horse Whisperer" are epic in scope and
vision, especially the aerial "travelogue" that maps out this great country
of ours, its real strength lies in the subtleties it uses to paint the
fragile alliance between man and beast.
        When her daughter, Grace, is involved in a terrible riding
accident, hard-driven fashion editor Annie MacLean (Kristin Scott Thomas)
devotes herself to rehabilitating both Grace and Grace's beloved horse,
Pilgrim.  Refusing to have the hideously disfigured animal put down, Annie
researches every possible source of information about equine cures before
discovering an article about a faith-healing cowboy of sorts called Tom
Booker (Redford), who has a way with horses and, perhaps, with people too.
        Undeterred by Tom's initial reluctance to get involved, Annie
drives Grace and a sedated Pilgrim across country to meet him, and finally
persuades Tom to work with the uncontrollable animal.
        Redford's film unfolds slowly and lovingly, echoing the patience
required in healing both physical and psychological wounds.  The film's a
little long and, even if you haven't read the book, it's pretty obvious
where it's heading--but these are minor complaints.  Redford and Thomas are
strong and convincing as the couple drawn by a mutual affection for the
great outdoors and each other, but it's Scarlett Johansson as Grace who
shines in a more difficult role.  Dianne Wiest, Chris Cooper ("Lone Star"),
and Sam Neill--better than I've seen him before--round out the respectable
supporting cast.
        And the director's respect for horses is clearly in evidence.  One
word of warning, however: while brilliantly shot, the accident scene,
involving an out-of-control truck, is extremely disturbing.
        Redford's canvas is huge and exquisite.  He doesn't hesitate to
incorporate vast, sprawling vistas of the American northwest: spectacular,
snow-capped mountain ranges, azure skies, and shimmering fields of
wheat--all are resplendent in cinematographer Robert Richardson's
viewfinder.
        Veteran English composer John Barry was originally signed to score
the film but left the project which is a pity, since "The Horse Whisperer"
is "Dances with Wolves" by way of "Out of Africa" (Oscar winners both for
Barry).  Fortunately, Barry's replacement, Thomas Newman, contributes a
fine score that nicely balances the majesty of Montana with the delicate,
human conditions--sonorous, string-laden passages that swell with pride
playing counterpoint to more poetic, introspective movements ripe with
nuance.
        "The Horse Whisperer" is that rare kind of movie: it looks good, it
feels good, and by golly it does you good.  The wait, it turns out, was
well worth it.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
        Lauded as a genius by many, Stanley Kubrick commands a superlative
filmography that includes such critically-acclaimed films as "2001: A Space
Odyssey," "A Clockwork Orange," "Lolita," and "Dr. Strangelove, or: How I
Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb."  Now, sadly, he's added "Eyes
Wide Shut" to that impeccable body of work and his final film is the first
and only blot on his near-flawless copybook.
        This much-publicized psycho-sexual tease-a-thon, with its star
billing of real-life marrieds Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman, is nothing more
than one long (two-and-a-half hours long) boring exercise that features
Kubrick operating with talent wide shut.
        Kubrick, faithless to Arthur Schnitzler's 1926 novella "Dream
Story," has confused eroticism with nudity.  He has confused
intellectualism with talking slowly.  He has confused profundity with
pretentiousness.  In addition, the director has made some strange casting
choices, leaving Sydney Pollack in and leaving accomplished performers
Harvey Keitel and Jennifer Jason Leigh out.  Pollack, the director of such
box-office hits as "Tootsie" and "Out of Africa," is normally solid in his
occasional acting stints but here he's miserably out of his depth ... and
there isn't much depth to begin with!  Unhappily, there's not likely to be
a director's cut of this film to determine whether the decision to exorcise
Keitel and Leigh was the right one.
        In fact, with the exception of the stark black-and-white credits,
snatches of baroque music on the soundtrack, and many, many grainy tracking
shots down lavishly-decorated corridors, there's none of Kubrick's
trademark brilliance in this film.
        Cruise and Kidman, who bring little more than marital torpor to the
project, play well-to-do New Yorkers Bill and Alice Harford.  He's a doctor
and she's an unemployed art gallery director and they share a Central Park
West address.  At an opulent party hosted by their friend Victor Ziegler
(Pollack), Alice gets a little tipsy and starts dancing with a Jeremy
Irons-like Hungarian, who's singularly determined to get her in the sack.
Bill, too, is seen arm-in-arm with a couple of models before he's pulled
away to deal with an overdoser.
        Back home, Bill and Alice smoke a little pot before Alice's
aggressive jealousy kicks in.  As retribution, she confesses to her husband
that she once had deep feelings for a naval officer she eyeballed at a
hotel where she and Bill once stayed.  This hurtful admission sends Bill
into a tailspin; he pounds the streets of the Village in his heavy black
overcoat struggling with black-and-white images of Alice in the grip of a
horny midshipman.  It's all way too much for him.
        For revenge, Bill almost has sex with a hooker.  He almost has
feelings for a underage girl he sees in a costume store.  Then he almost
does the hooker's roommate.  And he's almost involved in an overblown
rococo orgy when an old college chum of his tips him off to a mysterious,
password-protected party where everyone wears masks and "the women are
incredible" (i.e., naked).  This "erotic" set piece, a cult-ish bacchanal
complete with chanting, incense, and lots of strategically-placed
partygoers covering up the dirty, might impress the likes of Hugh Hefner,
but it's a lot less shocking than it's intended to be.
        What's the big deal?  Bill doesn't exactly *do* anything (other
than throw his money and credentials around), and Alice only ever lusted in
her heart.  Whoop-dee-doo.  Still, they make up at the same agonizingly
slow pace--was Kubrick, notorious for multiple takes, paying them at an
hourly rate?
        Even geniuses have their bad days.  "Eyes Wide Shut" just happens
to be Kubrick's bad day, an unerotic, disappointing, and altogether
pointless end to an otherwise memorable career.

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
French director Luc Besson's films ("La Femme Nikita," "The Professional")
have often favored style over substance.  With "The Fifth Element," Besson
does his previous entries one better, sacrificing narrative coherence for
a visually remarkable future world that leaves you breathless, if a little
confused.
It's no surprise that the film looks so good.  French comic book creators
Moebius and Jean Claude Mezieres guided Dan Weil's impressive production
design, and iconoclastic fashion designer Jean Paul Gaultier is
responsible for the outrageous costumes (although one might argue that the
carrot-haired Milla Jovovich displays a strategic *lack* of costume in
several of her scenes).
The story, on the other hand, is one that Besson himself threw together
as a teen.
Bruce Willis plays Korben Dallas, a New York cabbie who's reluctantly
recruited to save the world by securing the mysterious fifth element.
Part of the puzzle emerges in the form of Jovovich's bio-engineered
supreme being, Leeloo, who drops into Dallas' airborne taxicab and
provides new definition to the phrase "a perfect fare."
In this classic and classy Good vs. Evil yarn, ubiquitous British bad-guy
Gary Oldman plays corporate despot Zorg.  Oldman churns out yet another of
his puffed-up madman roles, sporting an American drawl that renders most
of his dialogue unintelligible.  Zorg's lizard-like alien henchmen vie
with Dallas to unearth four sacred stones--representing earth, wind, fire,
and water--which, when brought together with a fifth element, can either
save the world or destroy it, depending on what side of the universe you
woke up on.
This 23rd-century actioner culminates at Fhloston Paradise, a
intergalactic cruise ship of sorts, emceed in living color by Chris
Tucker's effeminate Prince-ly pop diva, Ruby Rhod.  How Besson worked him
into this script is anyone's guess, although his hysterical mincing and
shrieks of "Oh my God!" get funnier with age, especially during one of the
bigger shoot-em-up sequences.
Ignore the hokum that is at the center of this film and marvel at its
eye-popping sets, outrageous costume designs, and down-to-earth
performances from Willis and Jovovich.  While the logic of the storyline
leaves a lot to be desired, "The Fifth Element" satisfies as sheer
spectacle.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
        Something not of this world is gestating in Charlize Theron's
tummy, and methinks not-what-he-seems hubby Johnny Depp--who just returned
from deep space with a weird look on his face--is the responsible party.
        That's all you really need to know about "The Astronaut's Wife," a
silly and inconsequential little thriller about some icky alien space spawn
insinuating its way into the lives of two very attractive people, causing
them to re-evaluate their lives as human beings.  It begs the best bits of
the "Species" series and borrows the worst bits of the "Alien" series; in
between, there's some stuff worth watching and there's a lot of stuff that
isn't.
        If you've seen the trailer, you've seen the film.  In retrospect,
the trailer is actually more satisfying than the full-length feature, since
it gets to the point much more quickly and omits the dumbbell finale, which
to appreciate fully requires an understanding of electrical conductivity.
        Nevertheless, Depp and Theron have never looked so attractive on
screen, each sporting short-cropped blond hair and an endless wardrobe of
fancy duds.  So alike are our two leads that at times it's hard to tell
which one's the astronaut and which one's the wife.  But as we've learned
time and time again (the most recent example being "Eyes Wide Shut"),
good-looking performers do not a movie make.  Since Depp will soon co-star
with a headless horseman (Thanksgiving's "Sleepy Hollow") and Theron
recently shared top billing with a large gorilla (Disney's "Mighty Joe
Young"), the allure of going head-to-head with some yucky space issue must
have been irresistible.
        Joe Morton, typically so reliable, overdoes it as a government
shirt who cottons on to Depp's identity crisis following the two minutes
NASA lost contact with him.  An unrecognizable Samantha Eggar has a brief
scene as Theron's gynecologist.
        But perhaps the film's most bizarre moment occurs when Theron's
character, relieved that her husband's antique radio isn't blasting out
those secret alien transmissions, flips up her collar and goes into a
gratuitous salsa grind, heading for the refrigerator and downing the
Redi-Whip faster than you can scream "wanton product placement!"
        "The Astronaut's Wife" could have been a better movie had the
commitment Depp and Theron brought to the project been imitated by
writer/director Rand Ravich, whose uncreative screenplay can't decide
whether to be a horror show, plain and simple, or something deeper.  As it
is "The Astronaut's Wife" is predictable and uneventful, despite the
valiant attempts of its pretty players.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Trolösa (2000)
Even though I attended film school in the early '80s, I'm loath to admit
that I never saw an Ingmar Bergman until *after* I graduated (odd really;
works by the great angst-focused Swedish director--"Cries and Whispers,"
"Persona," and "Wild Strawberries" to name but a few--would tend to
populate most film studies curricula).  That movie was "Fanny and
Alexander" and I loved it.  Yet to this day, for similarly inexplicable
reasons, it remains the only Bergman movie I've seen (I've seen a few Woody
Allen Ingmar Bergman movies but that's not quite the same thing).
As it happens, "Fanny and Alexander" was the penultimate theatrical film
to be directed by Bergman.  The 82-year-old filmmaker is still alive,
living a semi-reclusive life on a remote island in the Baltic Sea and
winding down his days with the occasional stage and television directing
stint and, I daresay, long walks on the beach.
"Faithless" is the latest film to bear Bergman's name, but he didn't
direct it, and he doesn't even turn in a cameo (although he wrote it and
*is* in it, so to speak).  Erland Josephson plays Bergman as a whiskery,
white-haired old gentleman who, as the film opens, is summoning up a muse
to provide inspiration for a story he wishes to relate.  A difficult
chapter from Bergman's own life, it seems--how the legendary director once
had an affair with an actress, and how that affair, like a lie once told,
spread like a cancer through his private life. 
Bergman asked Liv Ullmann, with whom he had worked many times, to direct
"Faithless" and the actress-turned-director's take on the story is deep and
delicately crafted.  In the film, Lena Endre plays Marianne, a 40-year-old
woman who begins a casual affair with her husband's best friend, David
(played by Krister Henriksson).  Since Marianne's husband Markus (Thomas
Hanzon) is a world-famous classical conductor and therefore often on
different continents, things start out easy and carefree--"perfect"--but
soon enough the deceit and the duplicity start to take their toll.  Adding
another level of complexity to the situation is the fact that Marianne and
Markus have a young daughter, Isabelle (Michelle Gylemo).
"Faithless" is a characteristically fine piece of filmmaking with all of
the actors excelling in their roles (especially Endre, who plays a women
put through the emotional ringer).  Rather than choosing a straightforward
narrative, however, Bergman uses the somewhat contrived plot device of
having Endre's character (as an apparition) help the filmmaker reconstruct
scenes from a marriage, and the result is a dilution of the honesty that is
served up so well in the central story.  It's not enough to spoil one's
"enjoyment" of the film, but the structure is occasionally at odds with the
emotional core of the drama. 
Hats off to the film's screenwriter, however.  Bergman's words, even via
translated subtitles, are powerful and uncompromising and seem to sidestep
many of the clichés found in your standard tale of infidelity.  Clearly
this is a filmmaker who understands the raw range of emotions that
accompany guilt and dishonesty.  Once Markus discovers the cheating lovers
(since, like the perfect crime there is no perfect affair), he sets in
motion a harrowing series of events that test the mettle of Marianne,
David, and we, the audience.
I've still only seen the one Ingmar Bergman movie but, after watching the
shattering "Faithless," I now feel as though I've seen two.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
        In his previous outing, "Phenomenon," the director proved guilty of
beating us about the face and neck with heavy-handed metaphors.  For his
latest film, a psychological thriller with the curiously unmemorable title
"Instinct" (perhaps "The Silence of the Gorillas in the Mist" would have
been more appropriate), Turteltaub has toned the meaningful allusions down
some, but he still doesn't miss the opportunity to close in on his actors
the minute their eyes well with tears.  This happens not once but twice in
"Instinct," and by the second time it's clear that Turteltaub still favors
sledgehammer manipulation over nuance.
        That's not the only problem with "Instinct."  Perhaps its biggest
failing is that it's just not very interesting.  Whatever potential there
was in Daniel Quinn's book remains unrealized by the director, the writer,
and the actors--hard as they may try.
        Dr. Ethan Powell (the reliable Anthony Hopkins) is an
anthropologist who disappears for two years after studying gorillas
(courtesy Stan Winston) in the African bush.  He surfaces in a Rwandan
jail, found guilty of killing two game wardens and injuring three others.
Following Powell's transfer to a Florida penitentiary, an ambitious
University of Miama psychiatry resident called Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding,
Jr.) takes a crack at evaluating the intriguing primatologist, who hasn't
spoken a word in over a year.
        Caulder's goal is to determine what turned Powell into a killer,
but the deeper he digs into his patient's psyche, the stronger becomes his
determination to win the man's freedom.
        One of the catches behind Caulder's assignment is that he's
required to serve as the staff psychiatrist at the ironically-named Harmony
Bay Correctional Facility for the duration of his appraisal.  Imagine a
sharp-dressed Cuba Gooding, Jr. surrounded by the scum of society and you
might anticipate some humor in the situation.  The filmmakers, however,
choose to milk this situation of its "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest"
parallels, with the stubborn Caulder fighting to change the maximum
security prison's rules by giving the mild-mannered felons a fair shot at
privilege against the big gorillas holding all the aces.
        It's hard referring to the film as a thriller since what few
thrills there are culminate in a real bonehead of a revelation.  In
addition, the prison officials are depicted as one-dimensional
caricatures--the brutal cell guard, the insensitive warden, etc.--and the
inmates are even more clichéd.  This subtracts from the drama, and provides
an embarrassing backdrop to all the anthropological philosophizing.
        Hopkins, however, does a fine job as the troubled "ape man."  With
his flowing white hair and disheveled appearance, our first sighting of him
is a throwback to Sean Connery's character in "The Rock," shuffling,
manacled, and badly in need of a barber.  Or, come to think of it, Anthony
Hopkins' character in "The Mask of Zorro"!  Over the years, the 61-year-old
Hopkins has fine-tuned his ability to exhibit power and emotional depth
simply with his eyes and his softly-spoken delivery.  This isn't a
performance on a par with, say, Hannibal Lecter, but it's got its
fascinating moments.  Gooding, Jr. proves a satisfying complement to
Hopkins, but Maura Tierney ("Forces of Nature"), who plays Powell's
estranged daughter, isn't given much to do.
        Rather than dealing with serious psychological or celestial issues
like those in "Instinct" and "Phenomenon," Turteltaub might do better by
returning to lighter, "While You Were Sleeping"-type fare.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
If you saw Ben Affleck and Sandra Bullock cavorting hysterically during 
a recent "Access Hollywood" interview, you have a fairly accurate 
picture of what they're like together in their latest film, a romantic 
comedy called "Forces of Nature."
Bullock is, of course, the sassier of the pair.  In fact, her character 
Sarah (why didn't they just go ahead and call her Sandra?) has a 
personality of about a six on the Richter scale.  All that Ben Holmes 
(Affleck) wants to do is to get to Savannah in one piece and marry the 
love of his life, Bridget.  Well, at first.  But everywhere he turns 
there's someone telling him that marriage is a mug's game.
Ben first bumps into Sarah at the airport.  When their plane crashes, 
not very badly, on takeoff (a seagull gets sucked into one of the 
engines), they're forced to hitch a ride with a guy named Vic, since all 
of the rental cars are spoken for (oh, there's a hurricane kicking up a 
bit of a fuss off the east coast, canceling virtually every flight out 
of the city).  Well, Vic doesn't exactly work out and before you know it 
Ben and Sarah are hopping on a train.  Not separately, but together.
The thankless role of Bridget goes to Maura Tierney (the wife in "Liar 
Liar"), who can't understand why it's taking her fiancé so long to get 
down there.  While she's waiting, she's hit on by her old flame Steve, 
which doesn't seem to bother her father (Ronny Cox, the fourth canoeist 
that no-one remembers from "Deliverance"), since Steve is a successful 
lawyer and Ben simply writes copy for dust jackets.  Bridget's Mom is 
played by Blythe Danner (real-life mother of Gwyneth Paltrow) with lots 
of hair and organization skills.
Scenes of the family dealing with escalating frustration give us a 
breather from the madcap adventures of Sarah and Ben, who are finally 
forced to pose as husband and wife.  This so that they can snag a free 
bus ride, having used up virtually every other mode of transportation 
imaginable.  It's at one of the tour's stopovers that Ben's best man 
(Steve Zahn, the stoner in "Out of Sight") and his girlfriend (Meredith 
Scott Lynn, the girl friend in "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss") show up, 
throwing about the eighteenth monkey wrench into the works.  Ben's a 
brain surgeon at this point.
Throughout all this, Ben and Sarah are thrust together constantly, and 
Ben finally cracks when Sarah storms out of their hotel bathroom, 
yelling up a storm in her lacy lilac undergear (which proves to be 
surprisingly unflattering--Ms. Bullock's agents take note).
Ironically, Sarah is probably Bullock's most annoying character yet 
she's at her least annoying playing her (that's always been my main 
problem with Bullock's earlier roles--cute but irritating).  I think 
that's because Bullock really seems to be having fun with this part.  If 
not, she's a remarkable actress.  Affleck is a terrific foil to 
Bullock's high energy, and has many moments of his own, including a 
crowd-pleasing sequence in a bar.  And I particularly liked his 
despairing line "I think I'll just sit here and wait for the locusts."
"Forces of Nature" is cute, cute, cute all the way.  The ending is not 
at all pat, and makes exquisite use of the Sarah McLachlan song, "Fear."  
If Bullock and Affleck had any more chemistry, we might have witnessed 
spontaneous combustion onscreen.


Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
        The great American philosopher Ralph Waldo Emerson once said that
"war educates the senses," and that statement has never been truer than
when applied to Steven Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan."
        Nothing can quite prepare you for the opening thirty minutes of
this remarkable film.  Following a brief, present-day exposition, the film
takes us back to June 6, 1944; American troops are preparing to land on
Omaha Beach.  Taking full advantage of today's digital sound and sound
effects editing techniques, Spielberg doesn't allow for a casual witnessing
of the invasion from afar.  Instead, he plunges you headlong into it,
forcing you to become a sensory participant in the incredible, cataclysmic
męlée.
        The explosions are deafening.  Bullets whistle through the air,
zinging off metal, fizzling through water, thudding into human flesh.
Mortars pound.  Magazines empty.  Machine guns rattle at ferocious speed.
The cacophony of sound is overwhelming.
        "What the hell do we do now, sir?" yells a young Ranger during a
rare lapse in the chaos, plainly confused and confounded.
        Hemmed in, pinned down, under fire and out of options, men drop
like flies.  Arms and legs are blown off every which way.  Huge wounds rip
open.  Blood pours with the exuberance of a vintner uncorking his newest
vintage.
        By the time this amazing, uncompromising sequence is over, the tide
flows red with blood, and thirty-five men under the command of Captain John
Miller (Tom Hanks) are dead.  The camera tracks down the beach riddled with
corpses, body parts, and dead fish, finally resting on the pack of a slain
soldier bearing the stamp "PVT. RYAN."
        No other film so immediately captures the intensity, the brutality,
and the utter senselessness of war.  The opening establishes the mood for
the rest of the film; the audience cannot relax for one minute.  A walk
across a pretty, open cornfield, for example, could result in sniper fire,
a land mine, or a Panzer attack.
        Before he can catch his breath, Capt. Miller is given another, more
critical assignment: round up a handful of men to locate and bring back
Private James Francis Ryan of Iowa.  His three brothers have all recently
been killed in action and the State Department has decreed that their
mother receive some good news along with the bad.
        Hanks gives a wonderfully focused performance at the film's core
and is more than ably assisted by a solid supporting cast that includes Tom
Sizemore, Edward Burns, and Matt Damon as the title character.
        But the picture is Spielberg's all the way.  It is the work of a
master craftsman at the very top of his game; the director manipulates and
pushes the medium of film to its limits.  "Saving Private Ryan" comes
closer than any other film to graphically depicting the harrowing
experience of military combat.  It renews respect and admiration for those
who fought, and those who died, for freedom.

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
"Breakdown," a top-notch thriller in which the protagonists act sensibly
and responsibly throughout.  Credit goes to director Jonathan Mostow, who
wrote the compelling story that never lets up, draws a terrific performance
from leading man Kurt Russell, and gives this tale a sensational,
white-knuckled ending.
When Jeff (Russell) and Amy's (Kathleen Quinlan) car breaks down in the
vast, desolate landscape of America's southwest, a friendly truck driver
Red (J.T. Walsh) offers them a ride into town.  Jeff is reluctant to leave
the vehicle, so Amy goes on ahead, arranging to meet her husband at the
local diner.  However, when Jeff discovers the problem with the car (a
loose wire under the hood) and next meets up with Red, the trucker claims
never to have seen him before.
To reveal any more of the plot would be irresponsible.  Suffice it to say
that the twists and turns of the script mirror those of the road ahead for
Jeff and Amy.
The film has many strengths yet perhaps its greatest is that, at its core,
it's extremely believable.  What befalls this hapless couple, who are
driving across the desert as part of a West Coast relocation, and how they
react to the situations, ring true.
Russell, who often plays swaggering, larger-than-life macho figures (in his
work with John Carpenter, for example), tones things down considerably
here.  His Jeff is an everyday Joe, clearly scared by increasingly bizarre
and frightening circumstances.  These circumstances do eventually drive him
to boiling point, yet it's understandable when he's forced to fight for his
and his wife's survival.
An example of the film's maturity is a scene in a bank.  Russell's
character, desperately trying to find a way out of his predicament, digs
around in a janitor's closet looking for a weapon.  The best he can come up
with is the handle of a sink plunger.  Jeff throws it down in disgust; the
search has come to nothing, but we can clearly relate to Jeff's frustration
and growing anxiety.
Superior acting, writing, and directing:  keys to an excellent movie.  And
"Breakdown," a smart, compelling, and absolutely plausible road thriller,
has got all three.

Title
Review for God Said 'Ha!' (1998)
Were Julia Sweeney not such a gifted comedienne, listening to her 
uncompromising account of her brother Michael's struggle with lymphatic 
cancer would be unbearable.
Over the course of some nine stressful months, Sweeney attended to her 
ailing sibling in her small Los Angeles bungalow along with her 
distraught parents, who shared the same cramped living space for the 
duration of their son's losing battle with the disease.
Shortly before her brother's death, Sweeney herself was diagnosed with 
a rare form of cervical cancer that, among other things, required the 
"Saturday Night Live" alumnus to undergo a hysterectomy.
This poignant chapter in Sweeney's life forms the basis of "God Said, 
'Ha!'," a one-woman monologue originally devised as a stage show by the 
woman best known to "Saturday Night Live" fans as the androgynous Pat.  
First a theatrical production, then a book, then a CD, "God Said, 'Ha!'" 
finally arrives in its latest and, as promised by its creator, final 
form, a major motion picture.
"Major" might be a bit of a stretch, since this 87-minute version is, 
at least cinematically, a fairly static and uninspired filming of 
Sweeney's two-hour, one-woman show--imagine what someone like Jonathan 
Demme could have done with this material.  But it's the version that 
writer/director Sweeney considers to be the best, and it's certainly the 
version that gives us the best seats in the house to the whole 
heart-wrenching experience.
The set is simple and non-threatening: a sofa and matching armchair, 
separated by a small table, form a comfortable, L-shaped haven.  Sweeney 
is dressed conservatively in a dark brown suit.  She stands for the most 
part, choosing to sit on occasion.  Sometimes she stands to the left, 
backed by a plush velvet curtain.  Sometimes the lighting paints the 
backdrop behind the couch a variety of mood-enhancing hues--yellow, 
blue, orange.
The simplicity of the setting, coupled with Sweeney's restrained 
physical delivery, focuses our attentions on her words, on the story she 
has chosen to tell.
With humor that ranges from sublime to ridiculous, Sweeney parodies her 
eccentric mother (complete with voices) and her National Public 
Radio-obsessed father.  Yet in the film's most moving moment, she offers 
up her genuine belief that family, no matter how bizarre, will do just 
about anything for those they love.
Early in the film I felt a little seasick from the constantly moving 
camera and wished, just for a moment, it would let up.  Some close-ups 
are out of focus, and Sweeney elects, on more than one occasion, to 
allow the camera crew into the frame.  Also, she has difficulty making 
transitions from each punchline to the next story thread, but the more I 
got into the piece, the less distracting these minor deficiencies 
became.
"God Said, 'Ha!'" is an uplifting record of a courageous woman who used 
the gift of laughter to transcend an incredibly difficult time in her 
life.  With this film, Julia Sweeney appears to have stared God himself 
in the face and said, with nothing less than triumph in her voice, "Ha 
yourself!"
Get Your Private, Free Email at http://www.hotmail.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
        The opening, very deliberate minutes of "The Sixth Sense," Bruce
Willis' latest retread, sets up the oft-seen
marital-celebration-interrupted-by-dangerous-threat situation, in which
child psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Willis) and his wife Anna ("Rushmore"'s
pretty but here pretty ineffective Olivia Williams) are toasting their
success.  Buzzed on red wine, the couple are admiring a plaque presented to
Crowe by the mayor of Philadelphia when suddenly there's a crash in their
bathroom.  The frightened couple investigates to find a scary-looking man
standing there dressed only in a pair of dirty y-fronts, very uninvited and
very upset.
        For a moment I was reminded of a Michael Winner horror film from
the mid-'70s called "The Sentinel" in which Christina Raines' father
appears also uninvited in her bedroom looking just like that, right before
Christina slices off his nose with a kitchen knife.
        In Philadelphia's own M. Night Shyamalan's psychological drama,
Willis confronts the intruder a little less violently, but it soon becomes
clear from the man's rantings that this is a former patient of Crowe's
who's not very satisfied with his treatment.  Crowe thinks he can end this
standoff without bloodshed, but the crazy is having none of it and pulls a
gun and shoots Crowe in the stomach before taking his own life.  Crowe is
left, quite literally, with blood on his hands.
        Referred to by appreciative city officials as one of
"Philadelphia's sons," Crowe is assigned to monitor an eight-year-old boy
who, his crib notes tell him, has divorced parents and suffers from acute
anxiety.  Cole (convincingly portrayed by Haley Joel Osment) has a history
of emotional problems, as well as some physical scarring, and Crowe sets
out to try and help the boy.  Oh, and Cole claims he can see dead people
too.
        Since that film, with its all-star cast, had difficulty in making
its paranormal horror credible, it threw in a number of gross-out scenes to
try and compensate.  And that's exactly what proves to be "The Sixth
Sense"'s undoing.
        My "favorite" scene in the film comes when Cole is once again
hiding in his tent, shining a flashlight under his chin for the best
possible horrific effect, and the camera suddenly pans to the right to
reveal a pale young girl with bloodshot eyes who vomits up her morning
oatmeal.  Why worry about all that thoughtful, serious psychological stuff
when you can cheat your audience with cheap shock scenes like that.
        Toni Collette ("Muriel's Wedding") plays Cole's hardworking South
Philadelphian mother and, alongside Osment, she's the best thing in the
picture.  Collette can't quite manage a "sarf filly" accent, but her
look--from her floozy attire to her garish fingernails--is spot on.  After
many long, uninvolving scenes of Crowe trying to bond with the child
punctuated by all those unwelcome scare tactics, Crowe finally tells Cole
to confront his fears rather than be afraid of them, and Shyamalan wraps
this rather obvious medical advice up with a nicely-loaded metaphor (Cole
plays Arthur in his school's adaptation of "The Sword in the Stone").  That
happens right before the film's spurious "gotcha!" ending.
        Willis is no Olivier, but he's often fun to watch.  Unfortunately,
most of "The Sixth Sense" isn't.  Even with its potentially interesting
supernatural bent, it's still largely schlock footage.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Mépris, Le (1963)
Jean-Luc Godard's 1963 film "Contempt" ("Le Mépris") has been hailed by
many as one of the greatest films ever made.  Others have referred to it as
one of the greatest films ever made about the actual process of filmmaking.
Few if any have called it the best film to illustrate that the Trojan War
was "just a good excuse for Odysseus to get away from his wife."
Most of Godard's films are experimental in nature, but with "Contempt," his
experimentation is on a different level from that which defined his film
school texts, the iconoclastic delights of "Alphaville," "Pierrot le Fou,"
or "Weekend."  "Contempt" sees Godard experimenting with another
medium--big stars, a big budget, and big expectations.  The result might
have satisfied the critics but it didn't satisfy the filmmaker, and he
returned to making seminal, evocative anti-films, from the sublime (1983's
"First Name: Carmen," for example) to the ridiculous ("Hail Mary" two years
later).
The re-released "Contempt" follows the trials and tribulations of Paul
Jamel, an aspiring screenwriter (Michel Piccoli) who is hired by a vulgar
producer, Jerry Prokosch (played, on the edge, by Jack Palance) to
resurrect the script of an adaptation of "The Odyssey."  The film is
currently being shot by famed director Fritz Lang (played with gusto by the
German filmmaker himself), who wants to remain faithful to Homer's vision.
Jerry, a yes/no man who quotes from a little red book ("the wise man does
not oppress others with his superiority"), likes Greek gods and claims to
know *exactly* how they feel.  He wants to spice up the production with
"not just sex, but more!" but you get the feeling he means "more sex."
Further conflicts arise when Paul suspects that his wife Camille (a
dazzling Brigitte Bardot) has designs on the producer, which leads to a
marital argument that unleashes the contempt of the title.
Greeks and Trojans apart, this central struggle is clearly the most
interesting aspect of the film.  Godard frames Paul and Camille's discord
in their apartment like a documentarian, panning from room to room as their
pathetic dialogue unfolds.  (This is just one reason why you should see
this CinemaScope version; who knows how this sequence would look on video.)
Paul and Camille interact wrapped in towels like nervous new lovers, not
comfortable old friends.  It's totally involving: pitiable, sad, and true.
Visually the film is a treat.  Run down, rust-colored storefronts splashed
with posters for "Hatari" and "Psycho" form an art deco backdrop.  Jerry's
villa on Capri is an outrageous wedge-shaped residence set high atop a
cliff overlooking the cool blue Mediterranean.  The little we see of the
film-in-progress is reduced to rotating alabaster statues with their
features colored in.  It's Godard the stylist in top form.
An early comment in the movie is that cinema represents a world that
conforms to our desires.  While Godard's motives might have differed from
those of his producers, "Contempt" is still a fine film about the pressures
of filmmaking.  And it's an even finer film about the tragedy of marital
dissolution.

Title
Review for Backdraft (1991)
     In what might already be one of the "hottest" films of the summer,
BACKDRAFT does for firefighters what GOODFELLAS did for gangsters -- it
elevates its protagonists to a level bordering on the heroic.  Only in
this case, the firefighters in Ron Howard's latest film are truly
deserving of that praise.
     Viewers expecting a turgid retread of THE TOWERING INFERNO will be
in for a surprise (unless their idea of a good time is watching Fred
Astaire spontaneously combust).  For the effects in BACKDRAFT are indeed
special, visual pyrotechnics that would make even George Lucas' head
spin.
     But BACKDRAFT is less an Irwin Allen-style disaster film than it is
a human drama consumed by fire, a film about the motivations of men that
risk their lives to save others.  Audience members are likely to feel
more sensitive about firefighters after seeing this film.  For
Philadelphians at least, this film comes hot on the heels of the Center
City fire that claimed the lives of three firefighters, making this film
all the more poignant.
     Twenty years after witnessing the death of his firefighter father
in a rooftop blaze, Brian McCaffrey (William Baldwin) returns home to
the firefighting business after a series of dead-end jobs have left him
feeling empty and alienated.  His brother Stephen (played by Kurt
Russell in a powerful and sweaty performance) has followed directly in
his father's footsteps and is now a Lieutenant in the Chicago Fire
Department.  On more than one occasion in this film is Stephen McCaffrey
referred to as "The Best."
     The sibling rivalry between these two brothers is played out
against a backdrop of danger, destruction and death.  As one of the
film's characters observes, it's the firemen who run into the burning
building while everyone else is running out!  And Stephen himself tells
his younger brother, who admits to having a bad day on the job, "You
have a bad day, and someone dies."
     Stephen believes that Brian cannot cut it as a firefighter yet
Brian sets out to prove him wrong.  However, Stephen's suspicions turn
out to be correct, and Brian ends up taking a job with the city's top
arson investigator, Donald Rimgale (Robert De Niro).
     Rimgale's world is one of smoke-eaters (firemen), crispers (fire
victims) and torches (arsonists).  Their investigations into who is
setting these fires and causing these "backdrafts" (explosions triggered
when air enters an oxygen-free room) lead them to Ronald Bartel (Donald
Sutherland).  In a scene straight out of THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.
Sutherland, white haired and rolling his eyes a lot, has never been more
maniacal on screen.
     Away from his work, Stephen constantly battles with his estranged
wife Helen, played by Rebecca DeMornay (RISKY BUSINESS) in a quiet,
understated performance.  Not that he is away from his work for long.  
Russell's character seems to prefer putting out fires at the office
rather than those at home.
     But neither of these two sub-plots are as arresting as the actual
scenes of fire itself, which range in intensity from spectacular to
downright amazing.  Director Howard -- whose previous film was the 1989
domestic comedy/drama PARENTHOOD -- admits that to make a film about
firefighters with the sophistication of today's audiences would require
effects over and above the norm.  
     And to his credit he has accomplished that.  No gas jets under the
camera lens here.  Howard's film personifies fire as a physical entity,
a force that the firefighters must first stalk, and then kill, like a
wild animal.   As Robert De Niro's character says, "It's a living thing.
It lives.  It breathes.  It hates.  The only way to beat it is to think
like it.  The only way to kill it is to love it a little."
     BACKDRAFT is a first rate action yarn - dirty, loud and full of
explosive special effects.  It is also a well crafted personal drama,
replete with uniformly fine performances.  But perhaps it's greatest
triumph is that it bestows a renewed respect on a profession all too
often taken for granted.

Title
Review for When Brendan Met Trudy (2000)
After "The Commitments," "The Snapper," and "The Van," Roddy Doyle's "When
Brendan Met Trudy" is a real disappointment from the Irish novelist and
screenwriter.  Compared to those smart, snappy screenplays, Doyle's latest
is a minor work indeed.  It tries too hard to be quirky.  It tries too hard
to be hip.  And all too often it winds up committing the greatest crime of
all: it's boring.
With its fanciful tale of a mild-mannered (read: feeble) schoolteacher
(Peter McDonald) who forms an unlikely relationship with a free-spirited
(read: rude) petty thief (Flora Montgomery), the film has its moments but
labors under Doyle's insistence on cramming his screenplay chock full of
cinematic references.  Brendan (McDonald), who moonlights as a choirboy, is
also an avid movie buff so these film references come thick and fast.
There are nods towards Godard, John Wayne, Polish films (especially the
one made in color!), "Sunset Boulevard," film noir, Leone's spaghetti
westerns, "Rocco and His Brothers"--even the film's title is a rather
obvious play on "When Harry Met Sally..."
By the time this longer-than-it-need-be film is over, all this forced and
frantic cleverness feels rather obvious too.
McDonald, who played opposite Brendan Gleeson in the splendid Irish
gangster flick "I Went Down," is required to sleepwalk his way through his
milquetoast role.  Montgomery (as the carefree, abrasive Trudy) is
accommodating, but her character is a strangely unappealing one.  The end
result is a character-driven story with two lackluster leads: not your best
of combinations by a long chalk.
Brendan and Trudy meet in a pub (where else; this is Dublin!) where Trudy
is taken by Brendan's singing ability.  Brendan is attracted to Trudy's
insouciance (which justifies her standing him up on their first date,
naturally).  They meet; they get the hots for one another; they take it
from there.  But where do they take it, exactly?  Not very far.  The sex
scenes are good though (in a natural, awkward, non-Hollywood way).
Reportedly Doyle specifically asked Kieron Walsh to direct the project
(the two had worked together in television but Walsh had never directed a
feature film before).  Walsh's rookie handling of the material might be
somewhat responsible for the film's lack of charm, but when you come right
down to it Doyle has done much, much better.
Let's hope McDonald and Montgomery are given a better vehicle than "When
Brenda Met Trudy" next time out.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for One Eight Seven (1997)
Since his star-making turn in 1994's "Pulp Fiction," Samuel L. Jackson has
been slowly leveraging himself into the forefront of the American
moviegoers' consciousness.  Therefore it's something of a surprise that his
latest vehicle, "187" ("One Eight Seven"), a sincere yet cookie-cutter look
at how hard it really is to be a teacher, has crept into the
back-end-of-summer releases with very little fanfare.
Jackson's performance is typically commendable, but there's nothing new to
be learned from this seen-it-all-before movie experience.
When Trevor Garfield (Jackson), a high-school science teacher in the
Bedford-Stuyvesant neighborhood of New York, flunks one of his students,
the kid takes it personally, perforating Garfield in the back with a nail
the way one would tenderize a nice flank steak.  Fifteen months later, a
recovered Garfield transfers to L.A., but quickly learns that academic
achievement is not a high priority for the underprivileged youths of John
Quincy Adams High, where he signs on as a substitute.
Stubbornness and a passion for teaching compel Garfield to stand his
ground, winning the affection of Computer Science instructor Ellen Henry
(Kelly Rowan) and the ire of many a disenfranchised student, including one
particularly confrontational punk, Cesar (convincingly played by Clifton
Gonzalez Gonzalez).  In an environment where staying alive takes precedence
over educational excellence, Garfield soon finds himself a man on the verge
of breaking point.  Again.
The number 187 (police code for homicide), by the way, shows up at the
beginning and end of the film, first scrawled threateningly throughout one
of Garfield's textbooks ("When a student says they're going to kill you,
you believe them") and lastly scratched in his car's paintjob, when events
lead to a contrived and over-the-top finale that is every bit as
uncomfortable as it is stupid.
Director Kevin Reynolds, whom many thought wouldn't work in this town again
after the much-maligned "Waterworld," displays some creativity in his
burned-out depiction of an East L.A. scorched by apathy and hate.  It's
like a brick-red, jump-cutting Pepsi ad, with students literally coming
into focus as the lightbulbs spark in their tiny minds.  But where the film
fails is in its writing.
"One in nine teachers," the statisticians choose to inform us at the onset
of the film's end credits, "are attacked in their schools.  Ninety-five per
cent of those attacks are by students."  But perhaps the most jarring
statistic is this: "A teacher wrote this film."
Screenwriter Scott Yagemann, although having spent seven years teaching in
the Los Angeles public school system, presents a viewpoint so devoid of
originality that it makes you wonder how this film ever got financed.  An
insider should have shown us something we haven't seen before, not a pale
imitation of such standout films as "The Blackboard Jungle" or "Stand and
Deliver."  True, the casting of Jackson in the lead might draw a crowd (as
at one of Philadelphia's few remaining Center City movie houses, where
audience participation is on a par with "Let's Make a Deal").  But while
Jackson gets a B+ for his solid, dominating performance, "187" should have
been held back.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Meet Melvin Udall, a misanthropic, racist, homophobic bigot with an intense
dislike of dogs.
Well, one dog in particular, perhaps--Verdell, a button-cute Brussels
Griffon from across the hall.  Melvin's had about all he's gonna take from
this pint-sized urinating machine and, in a scene we've all seen in the
three month's worth of previews, shoves him down the trash chute.  Given
that old stalwart "no animals were mistreated during the making of this
motion picture," Verdell shows up again a little rumpled--doggie dignity
included--but none the worse for wear.
This initial man vs. beast confrontation in "As Good As It Gets" does
little to endear Melvin to us.  After disposing of the furry little critter
this reclusive writer of romance novels holes himself up in his Manhattan
apartment (turning the lock five times very deliberately) and proceeds to
wash his hands in scalding water, wasting two entire bars of Neutrogena in
the process.
Melvin, you see, suffers from a chronic obsessive-compulsive disorder, and
it's not long before we witness further outrageous behaviors on his part:
Melvin insulting Jews, blacks, and Panamanians alike with vicious,
political incorrectness; Melvin twisting himself pretzel-like along a busy
street in order to avoid stepping on the cracks in the sidewalk.  And so on.
Later still we realize that Melvin isn't someone to be hated, however.
Misanthropy isn't a choice for him; it's a disease.
When Verdell's owner Simon is badly beaten during a robbery, Melvin is
"entrusted" with caring for the cow-eyed canine.  (Simon, a neighboring,
almost-successful artist is affectionately played by Greg Kinnear.)  During
Simon's convalescence, Verdell has an extraordinarily humanizing effect on
the antisocial author.
It's hard to imagine anyone but Jack Nicholson playing Melvin.  He's
terrific, in that Jack Nicholson kind of way, and is likely to garner an
Oscar nomination for his ebullient, eyebrow-centric performance.  Helen
Hunt plays Carol, a struggling single mother with an asthmatic son at home.
She's the only waitress in the coffee shop that Melvin frequents who can
stand him for more than a few minutes.  Hunt's puffy-cheeked nervous
fidgeting isn't much of an extension of her Jamie Buchman character on TV's
"Mad About You."
Things clunk, rather than click, between the two of them.
James L. Brooks, the successful producer of both big and small screen
projects--last year's "Jerry Maguire" and TV's "The Tracey Ullman Show" and
"The Simpsons" to name a few--has only a small list of directing credits.
Clearly he chooses his directing assignments carefully and clearly he likes
to employ Nicholson, who won an Academy Award for his supporting work in
"Terms of Endearment," and provided "Broadcast News" with a wonderful,
uncredited cameo.
As is typical with any Brooks production, the writing in "As Good As It
Gets" (by the director and Mark Andrus) has a depth that's rare by
Hollywood standards but, at 138 minutes, the film stumbles along and at
times seems contrived.  That Carol should settle for someone as
beyond-her-years as Melvin seems more a product of casting than it does
story construct.
That said, "As Good As It Gets" is decent, if not vintage, James L. Brooks,
made all the more palatable by that man Jack Nicholson.

Title
Review for Van, The (1996)
These passions enrich the lives of the Irish residents of Barrytown, a
fictional working-class Dublin neighborhood realized by writer Roddy Doyle.
His "Barrytown trilogy" of films began with "The Commitments" (a slick,
Alan Parker-helmed musical production), then continued with "The Snapper"
and now "The Van," both directed by Stephen Frears.  "The Van" continues
the hilarious tone of number two, this time with a story of two good
friends making a go of a lunchtruck business.
Contemplating a potential product, Larry (Colm Meaney) brings a
batter-dipped, deep-fried sausage to his wife in bed and asks her how they
make them.  "I don't think they make them," Mary (Caroline Rothwell)
replies, squinting at the grizzled, yellow piece of matter that
approximates a corndog on a really bad day.  "They just find them."
Frears is very much at home with the material.  An interesting director who
has graduated from gritty British beginnings ("My Beautiful Laundrette,"
"Sammy and Rosie Get Laid") to high-gloss Hollywood costume dramas
("Dangerous Liaisons," "Mary Reilly"), Frears still finds the time to work
on smaller projects that interest him.  With "The Van," the director
confidently guides Doyle's daffy tale, capturing all of the writer's
delightfully colorful language.  "Hey, you with the head," Larry says to
one customer.  "What do you want?"  "World peace," kids the young slouch.
"You're barred!"
Eric Clapton also contributes to the film's production, co-writing and
playing guitar on the evocative score.
"The Van" opens with Bimbo (Donal O'Kelly) finding himself "made redundant"
from the baking job he's held all his life.  Not content to simply pick up
a weekly dole check like his friend Larry, Bimbo seizes an opportunity to
be his own boss in the form of a run-down, engineless, grease-encrusted
"chipper" van that, on inspection, "looks like the inside of a leper."
Bimbo convinces Larry to go into business with him, and after several
hosings, scrapings, and coatings of paint, "Bimbo's Burger's" is born.  The
film then centers on the relationship between Bimbo and Larry, previously
men of leisure, and how their partnership presents new challenges to these
fast--and fast food--friends.
Larry and Bimbo don't subscribe to our American values of hygiene and
health consciousness, overlooking various code violations such as kicking
raw chipped potatoes into buckets and accidentally tossing Pampers into the
fry-o-lator.  "The Van" is so in-your-face greasy that you can almost feel
the whiteheads puckering under your skin while you're watching it--it's
easy to see why deep-fried Snickers bars were once a big hit across the
water!  Meaney's pickled beetroot complexion adds to the experience, and
many times in the film its spattered with hot lard.  "Jay-sus!"  (The swear
box is always full in Larry's house.)  Meaney is at his best playing
blustery, blood-vessel bursting Dubliners like Larry.  When Larry is forced
to wear a suit and tie, either for Christmas dinner or to go out to a wine
bar, he looks like a garden gnome.
"The Van" has ample opportunities for melodramatic subplots but sticks to
its guns.  Every time the two men fall out and heaviness threatens, they
resolve their differences over pints (make that imperial gallons) of stout.
The relationship between Larry and Bimbo is fresh and genuinely touching;
this is a film as much about friendship as it is about working class values
(Bimbo has a work ethic; Larry has an attitude).
In a deeper vein, both men have marriages that are uncommonly important in
their lives.  The wives' roles, while secondary in the film, provide depth
and charm to the project.  While the men faff and fuss, Mary and Maggie
(Ger Ryan) look on, providing a calming and steadying influence.
While the ending of "The Van" may seem a little anti-climactic, the journey
to that point is very funny, with just a smattering of real poignancy.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
        It's March 1991, George Bush is in the White House, the Gulf War
has just ended, and nobody--least of all the weathered U.S. forces who roam
the arid, alien landscapes of Iraq--has a clue as to why it even started.
        Prior to the ceasefire, Saddam Hussein has appropriated and
stockpiled anything of value, creating mountains of limousines, Cuisinarts,
and mobile phones.  Into this scene come four downtrodden GIs (played by
George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, and Spike Jonze; I guess "Four
Kings" didn't quite have the same biblical bent) who are about to see their
first real taste of action.
        Thus begins David O. Russell's "Three Kings," a post-Persian War
war satire framed around a hunt for stolen Kuwaiti gold that would have
John Wayne shifting uncomfortably in his army fatigues.  Unlike the Duke's
'rah-'rah action films, there's an innate pessimism that pervades "Three
Kings"; Russell's screenplay (from an original story by John Ridley) is
most effective in chronicling the randomness of war and the absurd
situations it creates, much in the spirit of Mike Nichols' splendid
"Catch-22" from 1970.
        Take the surreal scene in which NBS reporter Adriana Cruz (a
surprisingly effective Nora Dunn) laments over the ecological aftereffects
of man's absolute folly at a watering hole littered with helpless,
oil-soaked pelicans.  Although deftly played for laughs, it's a difficult
scene to stomach.
        That's true of a lot of the film.  In his thirst for satire,
Russell will occasionally go overboard in his graphic depiction of the
brutality of war--witness Wahlberg's torture at the hands of a Republican
Guardsman.  But for the most part, Russell's sleeve-worn political
viewpoint and disturbed visual style--a frenzied motif of grainy, hand-held
camerawork that's almost monochromatic in its starkness--cuts to the core.
        "Three Kings" further showcases the director's ability to work
something uniquely rich and extraordinary from material that has been
visited many times before.  In a number of ways this film shows a logical
maturation over his previous two directorial efforts, "Spanking the Monkey"
and "Flirting with Disaster."  He's certainly working with a much bigger
budget this time around, but continues to wring strong performances from
his leading players.
        Ultimately it's the director's confidence behind the camera that
makes "Three Kings" a powerful piece of filmmaking--as dry, bleak, and
brutal as the barren Iraqi desert.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
        The first preview for "Lake Placid," cleverly edited so that you
weren't exactly sure what kind of large creature was terrorizing a
wonderful cast of Bill Pullman, Bridget Fonda, Oliver Platt, and Brendan
Gleeson, gave me reasonably high hopes that this might be one of the
summer's better creature features.  But soon the print ads were ablaze with
words like "funny" and "witty," words that made me nervous.
        As it turns out, "Lake Placid" works much better as a comedy than
it does a horror flick, and that's the biggest surprise here.  In fact,
it's often extremely funny, and credit has to go to writer David E. Kelley
(creator of "Ally McBeal"), director Steve Miner (who's come a long way
since cutting his teeth on a couple of early--and very unfunny--"Friday the
13th" movies), and that afore-mentioned foursome of terrifically able
performers.  I've said it twice now but I'll say it again: this is a *very*
nicely cast movie.
        Although all four play stereotypical characters, the acting is at
such a level that each of the archetypes work.
        Gleeson, the least familiar of the four (he was in the little-seen
indie hit "I Went Down" and, more recently, in John Boorman's "The
General"), is first on the scene, chaperoning a beaver-tagging diver in a
Maine lake.  His Sheriff Keough is sensitive to sarcasm and a little bit
slow on the uptake.  Anyway, something attacks the lone swimmer and
Gleeson's character winds up pulling him into the boat and finding him half
the man he used to be.  Gross-out scene #1.
        They call in Jack Wells from Fish and Game (Pullman) and he's soon
joined by big city paleontologist Kelly Scott (Fonda), who doesn't want to
be there.  Kelly is an Emily Post-type who sprays Raid about her person and
is shocked to hear that there aren't any toilets.  Jack doesn't want her
there either so you know they'll wind up sharing a tent and, perhaps, a
toothy encounter or two.
        Finally, expert tracker/millionaire Hector Cyr (Platt) shows
up--and *nobody* wants him there--but he suspects they're dealing with a
30-foot migratory crocodile and he knows a thing or two about catching
them.  Not soon after, something tips over their boat and it's gross-out
scene #2.  That's pretty much it for the gross-out scenes, unless you count
a severed head and an amputated toe, each crawling with worms.  The latter
elicits a dialogue that best exemplifies the kind of humor found in this
movie.  "Is this your deputy?" asks Hector, offering the detached appendage
to Sheriff Keough.  "He was taller..." gulps Keough with a delightful
deadpan.  Platt is hysterical, with Gleeson ever his match.
        Turns out it *is* a croc ('odile, that is), and it's pretty
convincing looking in the water.  However, Stan Winston ("Jurassic Park")
must have worked on this film during his lunch break, because the
larger-than-life reptile is not very realistic once it gets up on land, and
two shock scenes of the beast attacking on terra firma are quite obviously
computer generated.
        Fortunately, there's humor to spare in a film that doesn't even
pretend to be another "Jaws" (that dishonor goes to Renny Harlin's "Deep
Blue Sea," due out at the end of the month).  No, "Lake Placid" is a
different fish altogether.  It's got it's scary moments, that's for sure.
And it's got a few gory scenes.  But best of all it's got Pullman, Fonda,
Platt, and Gleeson and it's very, very funny.

Title
Review for Cold Comfort Farm (1995) (TV)
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1996 David N. Butterworth/The Summer Pennsylvanian
On paper, to use a decidedly British turn of phrase, the movie version of
Stella Gibbons' 1932 novel COLD COMFORT FARM had all the potential for a
wickedly funny comedy of manners: a splendid ensemble cast, delightful
source material, and an accomplished director at the helm (John
Schlesinger, who made MIDNIGHT COWBOY and MARATHON MAN).  On screen,
however, this made-for-British-television adaptation falls flat on its bum.
With the current rash of Jane Austen translations making the movie circuit,
American audiences are especially receptive to Anglophilic period
pieces-the COLD COMFORT crowd at the Ritz were in hysterics!  While not in
the Austen mold, Gibbons' novel was a classic comedic send-up of the
larger-than-life romantic dramas penned by Thomas Hardy and D.H. Lawrence,
and Malcolm Bradbury's screenplay is peppered with Gibbons' deliciously
deranged dialogue.  But ultimately the ruin lies in the production's
attempt to turn dry satire into broad farce.  What went wrong is not
exactly clear, but at the very least a comedy of manners should be funny.
Someone should have told the Channel Twelvers that a British accent isn't
enough.
The story starts out with our meticulously proper heroine Flora Poste (Kate
Beckinsale, the ingenue in Kenneth Branagh's MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING)
recently orphaned and left to subsist on a pittance.  This strong-willed
London sophisticate is forced to turn to her rural Sussex ancestors for
support, the dark and dingy Starkadders of Cold Comfort Farm.  This
unglamorous assortment of singularly British eccentrics go about their
business quite without the social graces to which Miss Poste is accustomed.
No problem there, though; Flora-a young woman obsessed by "higher common
sense" and zealous tidiness-simply spreads her influence to educate and
modernize the occupants of this cursed homestead, wherein lies the bulk of
our story.
The able-bodied performers do what's expected of them with, as British
humor dictates, endless repetition: the gloom-laden Ada Doom (Sheila
Burrell) gets excess mileage out of her "I saw something nasty in the
woodshed" mantra, which has kept her attic-bound since childhood; Adam
Lambsbreath (Freddie Jones) makes full use of his reference to Flora as
"Robert Poste's child."  And everyone, regularly and in unison, reminds
each other that "there have always been Starkadders at Cold Comfort Farm."
Rounding out the cast is Eileen Atkins as Judith Starkadder (who looks like
she might be Lou Reed's mom), and Ian McKellen as Amos, a
fire-and-brimstone preacher whose sermons invariably include "something
about burning."  Joanna Lumley (best known for her role as Patsy in the
acerbic British television import, ABSOLUTELY FABULOUS) plays Flora's
socialite friend, Mrs. Smiling, tsk-tsk'ing and raising her eyebrows at
everything bucolic.  And the ever-affected Stephen Fry (PETER'S FRIENDS)
puts in a token appearance as Flora's unrequited love interest, the smitten
Mr. Mybug.  As hamming it up down on the farm goes, this movie gives BABE a
run for its money!
And then there's Beckinsale, pretty and charming and unflappable as the
influential Flora amidst all this chaos.
=46lora wishes to learn about Real Life, collecting material for the novel
she is writing.  She labors over her humorously clich=E9d prose-"The golden
orb had almost disappeared behind the interlacing fingers of the
hawthorne"-while around her the bumpkin cousins spout poetry
unconsciously-"I expect there'll be a little beetle soon now that the
sukebind is flowering."  For Flora, even natural orders such as pregnancy
seem "untidy."
It seems harsh to criticize a film as amiable as this one, especially with
the incessant spate of mean-spirited, violent excuses for entertainment
that arrive at one's Octoplex each weekend (Schlesinger's career is no
exception; his last picture was the egregious vigilante thriller, EYE FOR
AN EYE).  But when the sum total of big laughs fails to make up for all of
its contrivances, COLD COMFORT FARM remains as it started out: a good idea
on paper.

Title
Review for Last Action Hero (1993)
     On one of the muggiest days of the year, on the opening weekend of
one of the summer's most eagerly awaited movies, the theater was eerily
empty.  By the time the lights went down, there couldn't have been more
than a dozen people in the auditorium.
     Why was the movie-going public staying away in droves?  Could the
word-of-mouth on LAST ACTION HERO have been that bad?  Two excruciating
hours later the answer was obvious.
     LAST ACTION HERO, this summer's big ticket attraction starring
that pumped-up action star Arnold Schwarzenegger, makes HUDSON HAWK
look like a Bergman classic.  It's a stupefying mess of a movie as big
as the cigar-chewing Schwarzenegger himself.  All the thought, wit and
skill that went into the exhilarating trailer are missing from the
finished product--a parody of action pictures that is neither funny nor
exciting.
     Sadly, the film has potential written all over it, and its premise
is actually quite good. Danny Madigan (Austin O'Brien) is addicted to
Jack Slater (Schwarzenegger) movies.  At a private midnight screening
of JACK SLATER IV, Danny is transported into the film by the power of a
magical ticket.  Here the young cineast grapples with the reality of
living in a fiction, helplessly trying to convince the celluloid Slater
that his charmed existence is all just make-believe.
     Not a bad idea, and certainly one that provides a great
opportunity to lampoon movie-making conventions.  But the treatment is
so poorly handled that self-parody quickly deteriorates into
self-consciousness.  There are some laughs in a video store where Danny
tries to prove to Slater that this is only a movie--everybody's phone
number begins with 555, for example--but for the most part the humor is
labored and uninspired.  Even jokes that should have been funny lose
their impact due to poor timing and delivery.
     The biggest jokes in LAST ACTION HERO are the bad guys.  Charles
Dance plays Benedict, a deranged sharpshooter with a traveling case of
glass eyes.  His performance is embarrassingly over-the-top; witness
the scene in New York when he guns down an auto mechanic just to get
attention.  There's one funny sight gag involving him and his pack of
drooling rottweilers, but as the heavy, he's about as menacing as a box
of cereal.
     Many memorable showdowns are suggested, such as Benedict's threat
to unleash moviedom's powers of darkness (Dracula, Freddy Krueger, et
al), but these never materialize.
     Anthony Quinn appears as a "spaghetti-slurping cretin" called
Vivaldi whose manglings of the English language are played for big yuks
(he says things like "fourth wheel" instead of fifth wheel, or "in
front of the 8-ball" instead of behind it).  The audience isn't likely
to giggle at his sophomoric linguistic butchery to begin with, and
Benedict's endless explications guarantee it.
     These villains aren't odious, they're tedious. 
     It's hard to believe that a solid action director like John
McTiernan (who made the exceptional DIE HARD and THE HUNT FOR RED
OCTOBER) could be responsible for this turkey. The editing is choppy,
the effects are surprisingly fake, the stuntwork isn't particularly
spectacular, the music is horrendous, and the writing is mind-numbingly
poor ("If God were a villain, he'd be me" smirks Benedict to the
camera).  Some scenes are completely gratuitous--such as the one in
which Danny's apartment is burglarized--and others flounder desperately
for intent.  LAST ACTION HERO is so sloppily put together you'd swear
it didn't even *have* a director.
     You can tell the movie's in trouble from the very first scene,
which is distinctly lacking in firepower.  Hundreds of squad cars
surround a building atop which a facially-disfigured maniac holds a
bunch of kids hostage.  Enter Jack Slater, from the snake boots up.
Big cigar.  Big frown.  Big problem.  Macho mockery at its cheesiest.
"Focus!" yells Danny, as an image of Slater pumping "The Slasher" full
of lead blurs beyond recognition.  Perhaps he was referring to the
direction.
     In a summer that has already seen disappointing returns on some
potential box office hits, you might be tempted to check out LAST
ACTION HERO.  Big mistake.  There's not even a guarantee that kids will
enjoy it--the two ten-year-olds down front were bored out of their
skulls.  LAST ACTION HERO is a poorly executed in-joke where everyone
in the audience-- Schwarzenegger fans included--feels left out.


Title
Review for Afterglow (1997)
        Alan Rudolph has such an uncanny ability to establish mood that it
often doesn't seem to matter just how excessively stylized his sets are,
how overwritten his dialogue is, or how inconsistently his actors perform.
His latest film, "Afterglow," has some problems in each of these
departments yet there's something about the film--and Rudolph's body of
work in general--that affects you emotionally, leaving how much you might
actually enjoy the experience a secondary consideration.
        "Afterglow" focuses on two couples who are on the outs.  Marianne
and Jeffrey Byron (played by Lara Flynn Boyle and Jonny Lee Miller) are in
conflict over the decision to have a child.  Phyllis and Lucky Mann (Julie
Christie and Nick Nolte) share a mutual dissatisfaction because of
complications surrounding having *had* one.
        Lucky is a handyman whose job often finds him flat on his back
checking out some frustrated housewife's plumbing (pun intended).  He's
recommended to Marianne, who wants a room remodeled for the kid she hasn't
quite conceived yet.  Marianne's coquetteishness in Lucky's presence is
understandable; what woman watching Nick Nolte ripping down drywall
wouldn't want to bear his child?
        Jeffrey, a successful executive, still seems interested in
women--he's always telling his middle-aged, French-speaking secretary how
attractive she looks--just not in the diaphanous Marianne.
        When Jeffrey suspects Marianne of infidelity (it's pretty obvious;
she scrawls details of an illicit rendezvous with Lucky on her calendar) he
heads to the hotel bar to confront her, only to stumble upon Phyllis--there
to spy on her philandering husband for purely masochistic reasons--and
their brief, mismatched flirtation begins.  The foursome eventually wind up
at the Byron's beyond-mod Montreal apartment in a finale that would make
Mike Leigh proud.
        Nolte and Christie sparkle in "Afterglow," the latter in that very
dry, British way.  A faded star of B-movies, Phyllis lounges on the sofa
all day watching her awful films on television with a large gin at the
ready.  Weary, pathetic, and depressed, Phyllis seeks solace for a pain she
can't erase.  This is a plumb role for Christie; her recent screen
performances have been few and far between but when she does accept a part,
it's usually worth seeing (she received an Academy Award nomination for
this one).  Nolte has hardly made a bad movie (well, let's say that he's
hardly turned in a bad *performance*) and he and Christie easily overshadow
Boyle and Miller, who seem out of their depth compared to the two veterans.
        Boyle displays the same kind of mousy petulance she demonstrated in
Rudolph's "Equinox" and TV's "Twin Peaks."  Perhaps Rudolph simply asked
for "more of the same."  He got it; Marianne is more annoying than
alluring.  Miller's role seems to call for two modes of operation--awkward
and stiff--which limit the actor's emotional range.  He looks the part, and
downs scotch with all the elegance of a youthful corporate climber, but
when it comes to his Big Scene, awkward and stiff just don't cut it.  No
wonder Phyllis trots off to bed.  Alone.
        Uneven in the acting department, "Afterglow" is nevertheless worth
recommending.  It's not as well written as "Welcome to L.A." or "Choose
Me," and it's not as atmospheric as "Trouble In Mind" or "The Moderns"
(Rudolph pictures all).  But as a showcase for Nolte and
Christie--especially Christie--it's splendid, and carries an emotional
punch right to the bitter end.

Title
Review for Orphans (1997)
        While watching "Orphans," a Scottish film from 1997 currently being
shown as part of the Shooting Gallery film series, I was reminded of a
sketch by Derek & Clive, the fictitious--and excessively profane--duo
conceived by comedians Peter Cook and Dudley Moore.  The sketch is one in
which Derek delights in telling Clive (or vice-versa) how he kicked the
crap out of a bloke who had the unmitigated temerity to say "Hello" to him
one day.
        "Orphans" often times parallels that conceit, with one of its leads
on such a violent bender that you flinch every time a minor character
approaches.  The crude language in the film, too, is as constant and
difficult-to-stomach as it is in a Derek & Clive skit: "Orphans" features
working-class stiffs from Glasgow, after all, and few niceties are spared
when it comes to telling it like it is.
        John, the "college boy" who flips out when a taxi soaks him to the
skin, flips out when a bus almost runs him over, and flips out when a bunch
of scruffy teenagers call him rude names, is bent on revenge Big Time.
Why?  To avenge the recent stabbing of his big brother, Michael.  And how
come Michael took a shiv to the ribs?  Well, he started a brawl in a pub
when some of the locals started laughing at his big brother, Thomas.  And
why were they laughing at Thomas?  Because he burst into tears while
singing a Hollies' song he'd dedicated to their recently-departed mother.
        "Orphans" often--and always--comes back to their recently-departed
mother.  In the film's opening scene, the three lads and their paraplegic
sister Sheila bestow their respects by cutting off locks of their hair and
laying them in their mother's coffin.  In the film's final act, Thomas
places flowers on her grave before trotting off with his sibs to grab a
curry.  Sandwiched between these, the insurmountable horror of finding
themselves motherless, alone in this lonely Scottish city, on the eve of
their mother's funeral, hits each grown family member and hits them hard.
        Thomas (Gary Lewis) insists on keeping vigil by his mother's side,
even if it means ignoring everything about those left living.  Michael
(Douglas Henshall) finds escape in the bottle.  John (Stephen McCole) looks
to a psychotic friend for a gun and bullets--they share a tortuous scene
that recalls the rape in "A Clockwork Orange" without the Ludwig Van.  And
Sheila (Rosemarie Stevenson), tired of waiting by Thomas' side, heads home
in her mechanized wheelchair only to encounter a cheerful girl with a smile
and a party invite.
        Sheila's is about the only good fortune to be found on a night in
which a gale force wind tears the roof off the parish church.
        "Orphans" is the feature directing debut of Peter Mullan.  If that
name sounds at all familiar it's because Mullan made a bit of a splash
playing the title character in Ken Loach's 1998 drama, "My Name is Joe."
While "Orphans" avoids Loach's rabid political agenda, it does bear some
gritty similarities to the British director's work--the pessimistic,
working-class protagonists; the attention to detail afforded its
characters; and above all, the accents of its cast of unknowns, accents
thick enough to require subtitles.  To be fair, the dialects aren't as
heavy as in Loach's "Riff-Raff," for example, but the on-screen
translations add an appreciable level of comfort.
        There *are* moments of humor in this dark, disturbing "comedy" but
they are few and far between.  "Orphans" may be brutal in its unfailing
depiction of the pain of loss but it's also brutally honest; these are
tortured, tormented souls who, for no other reason, just want their Mammy.
And that's what makes sitting through the film worthwhile, even if the
getting there isn't always easy.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
        The Sonny and Cher vehicle "Good Times" notwithstanding, William
Friedkin's directorial career started strong, with such distinguished
movies as "The French Connection," "The Exorcist," and "Sorcerer" (although
many critics hated that one) highlighting his résumé.  Then began the big
decline: "Cruising" and "Deal of the Century," followed by a brief return
to form with "To Live and Die in L.A.," and then a spate of films no-one
ever heard of--"Stalking Danger," "Rampage," and "Python Wolf."  The '90s
weren't good to him either: "The Guardian" (a "'Hand That Rocks the Cradle"
rip-off), "Blue Chips" (A "Hoosiers" rip-off), and "Jade" (a "'Last
Seduction" rip-off).
        Genre-wise, Friedkin has been all over the map, but for his latest
effort he's settled on the post-Vietnam military courtroom drama "Rules of
Engagement," and one can only hope this fine accomplishment is the
beginning of an upward trend.
        The film is a cross between "Platoon," "Three Kings," and "A Few
Good Men" (call it "A King, His Platoon, and a Few Really Bad Men").  It
follows the checkered career of Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson),
a decorated military officer who, after his successful part in the Vietnam
war, is given command of a special operations force off the coast of Yemen.
        Dispatched to provide evacuation assistance to the U.S. Embassy
under siege by hostile anti-American demonstrators, Childers finds himself
in the middle of a volatile situation in which three of his men are killed.
With pressure mounting, Childers orders his marines to open fire into the
crowd and after the dust has settled, 83 Yemeni men, women, and children
lie dead.  Charged with murder and facing a military court martial for his
role in the botched withdrawal, Childers calls upon his old friend retired
Colonel Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) to defend him.
        Childers saved Hodges' life during a Vietnam ambush so Hodges, a
self-confessed "weak lawyer," owes him.  "I'm a good enough lawyer to know
you need a better lawyer than me" Hodges tells Childers.  Nevertheless he
takes the case.
        There's a nice, easy-going chemistry between Jackson and Jones that
keeps this film engaging.  In addition, Childers' moral dilemma of shooting
into an unarmed crowd when his men are dying all around him is given an
interesting treatment by screenwriter Steven Gaghan.  For the first half of
its running time, "Rules of Engagement" paints this situation jet black,
and then turns full circle and paints it entirely white, leaving the
pivotal "guilty or not guilty" outcome a true nailbiter.
        As loud and violent in the courtroom as in its combat sequences
(the latter try to out-muscle "'Private Ryan" but don't quite make the
grade), "Rules of Engagement" is a tense and gripping thriller buoyed along
by uniformly fine performances.  Complementing the splendid Jackson and
equally impressive Jones are Guy Pearce ("L.A. Confidential") as
prosecuting attorney Major Mark Biggs (he's tough as nails), Ben Kingsley
as the impotent U.S. Ambassador to Yemen, Bruce Greenwood as National
Security Advisor Bill Sokol (Greenwood plays Sokol with an oiliness of
Exxon Valdez proportions), and Blair Underwood as one of Childers' captains
who's called as a witness.  The only disappointment is Anne Archer, who's
once again subjected to playing The Wife (this time Ben Kingsley's) without
much more than that job description to work with.
        This fine cast and credible story is pulled together by the sure
hand of director Friedkin who, with this film, has given his sagging career
a much-needed shot in the arm.  For all of its familiar military scenarios,
"Rules of Engagement" is a much better film than anybody might have
expected.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
        "The Blair Witch Project" sees an innovative idea marred by poor
execution.
        This low-budget film, now in wide release, uses a familiar
documentary approach to bring a heightened realism to its subject matter.
Since the movie is a good old-fashioned horror film (although
splatter-free, the film retains an uncertain "I Spit on Your Grave"-type
quality), the producers felt that this technique would result in some
genuine scares.
        Is it scary?  Yes.  But scary in that constantly looking outside
the corners of the screen to avoid jumping out of your skin way, not the
identifying with--and caring about the fates of--our leading players way.
        Here's the good idea that went a wastin'.  In October of 1994, a
trio of student filmmakers descended into the woods near Burkittsville,
Maryland in order to shoot a documentary about the legendary Blair Witch.
They were never seen or heard from again.  Their "discovered footage"
serves as the basis for the film that is about to unfold, "The Blair Witch
Project."
        Here's how its execution let it down.  Heather, the documentary
director (played by newcomer Heather Donahue), is a bit of a bossy boots
with a dictatorial approach to the project that begins to irritate early
on.  She quickly starts annoying her fellow filmmakers, Josh (newcomer
Joshua Leonard) and Mike (newcomer Michael C. Williams), and alienating her
audience.  Heather insists she knows where they are at all times but soon
enough it becomes clear they are lost.  In addition, Heather is obsessively
true to her medium, and refuses to turn off their color video camera, their
b/w 16mm camera, or their digital tape recorder.  So that when things start
to get scary--read on--Heather's right there with one of the cameras stuck
in a crew member's face, often while she's screaming "What the heck is
that!?" or more colorful words to that effect.
        If the circumstances in which our protagonists find themselves are
as horrifying as suggested then it defies all rational and logical behavior
for Heather to keep her camera rolling, no matter how dedicated an auteur
she may be.
        Donahue, Leonard, and Williams are clearly all amateurs and when
the going gets tough, their collective acting talents disintegrate.  The
supporting characters who play the Burkittsville (formerly Blair) yokels,
and provide interview-styled accounts of what they know about the Blair
Witch, are also unconvincing.  For a film like this to work, they need to
be absolutely believable as real people.
        After a while, the film becomes frustrating in its repetitiveness.
During the day, the threesome constantly bitch and moan about how lost they
are, whose fault it is, and what happened to the damned map.  They head due
south for a day and wind up in the same spot as when they started, all the
time following their compass.  At night, they hear strange noises all
around them and go rushing out of their tent screaming "Oh my God!" lit
only by a dim camera bulb, the black-and-white trees positively encroaching
on their frightened persons.  In the morning, there are little piles of
stones or twigs surrounding their camp.  If you're afraid of little piles
of stones or twigs then I guess this is one heck of a scary movie!
        This cycle then repeats itself over and over again.  Whine whine,
scream scream, stones twigs.
        "The Blair Witch Project" relies heavily on the power of implied
horror, meaning it's something of an anomaly in today's day and age, yet as
a result it's the kind of movie you can really only see once to appreciate
(or not).  Whereas I can truly understand what filmmakers Daniel Myrick and
Eduardo Sánchez were trying to achieve with this film, they made too many
mistakes along the way.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at 'http://members.dca.net/dnb'

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
If you're a teenaged girl, then "Varsity Blues," which stars "Dawson's 
Creek" mega-heartthrob James Van Der Beek, might well be the greatest 
film ever made.
If you've never seen a high school football drama before, you're likely 
to enjoy it too, since the film packs in just about every ingredient of 
the genre, including all those tight ends and late-breaking touchdowns.  
Middle-aged men who've already caught "All the Right Moves" and its many 
imitators on late-night television aren't going to find a whole lot in 
"Varsity Blues" to recommend it.  But the film is a pleasant enough 
diversion, highlighted by some well-choreographed gridiron sequences and 
a handful of intelligent performances, James! (as the teen rags refer to 
him) included.
Van Der Beek stars as Jonathan "Mox" Moxon, second-string quarterback 
for the Coyotes of West Canaan, a small Texan community that lives and 
breathes their commitment to varsity football.  The Coyotes' coach is 
the-win-at-all-costs Bud Kilmer, played with permanent gum-chewing 
ferocity by Jon Voight.
The veteran star of such acclaimed films as "Midnight Cowboy" and 
"Coming Home," Voight has taken to playing one-dimensional unsavory 
characters in recent years, and his Bud Kilmer is no exception.  
Voight's performance might not be subtle, but his take-no-prisoners 
approach to the character gives the high-spirited "Varsity Blues" much 
of its drama.
With a spectacular record of 22 division championships under his belt, 
Coach Kilmer isn't going to let a little thing like an injured player 
jeopardize number 23.  That's what painkillers are for, after all.
Mox, on the other hand, is one of the few people in town who has his 
sights set on something higher than winning the state pennant: an Ivy 
League education.  As smart as he is cute, the brains-before-brawn 
quarterback challenges Coach Kilmer's unethical tactics, which leads to 
a lot of shouting in the locker room and some creative disrespect on the 
field.
In addition to the Mean Coach, the film has its fair share of Underage 
Drunks, Horny Jocks, Frisky Cheerleaders, Funny Fat Guys, Quirky Little 
Brothers, and Dimwitted Parents.  Plus, in this particular case, there's 
that man James! to drool over if you're so inclined.
Truth be told the film makes no excuses in catering to the talents of 
the "Dawson's Creek" regular; he's virtually in every scene.  With that 
kind of pressure, the 21-year-old handles himself surprisingly well, 
especially when going head-to-head with the far more experienced Voight.  
Van Der Beek gives Mox a vulnerable side too; the scenes between him and 
his girlfriend Jules (Amy Smart) are especially well played.
Some scenes come across as contrived, of course, most notably the sex 
ed class in which Van Der Beek offers a litany of colloquialisms for the 
male "condition" (I bet those adoring fans just died during that one!).  
And if you can't predict the outcome of the closing Big Game five 
minutes into the film, well... perhaps you wandered into "Hilary and 
Jackie" by mistake.
"Varsity Blues" isn't likely to win any awards, but as a star vehicle 
for the up-and-coming James Van Der Beek, it goes the whole ten yards.


Title
Review for Friday the 13th Part VIII: Jason Takes Manhattan (1989)
     Followers of the ever popular "Friday the 13th" series, i.e., those warped
enough to have suffered through the previous seven chapters, won't want to miss
this latest installment.  It's certainly no worse than those earlier entries --
just as mind-numbingly awful, just as irritatingly stupid as all the rest.  
     With the possible exception of relocating the hockey-masked assailant to
New York City, FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII -- JASON TAKES MANHATTAN follows the
same exact plotting as its seven predecessors: 1) bring Jason back from the
dead; 2) knock off teens; 3) leave finale open-ended.  
     Right on cue, the film opens with Jason Voorhees -- who by now must hold
some kind of underwater breath-holding record -- being revived from his watery
grave.  He boards a vessel upon which a libidinous bunch of graduating seniors
are about to set sail on a celebratory cruise to New York.  The scene is set
for mayhem of an ocean-going nature.  Call it Camp Crystal Lake at sea, if you
will, or "The Love Boat," splatter style.  
     As with previous films in this interminable series, there has to be some
catalyst, some connection between Jason and the current short list of soon-to-
be dead teenagers.  The link here is Renny (Jensen Daggett), haunted by visions
of a facially disfigured boy from her past.  However, it is revealed that the
Camp Crystal Lake killings took place over thirty years ago.  Isn't Renny a
little young, therefore?  Don't expect anything in this film to follow any kind
of logic.  
     These would-be hackees are chaperoned by Barbara Bingham (as Mrs. VanDusen,
whose role is simply that of excess baggage) and the familiar Peter Mark Richman
(who plays Renny's uncle and legal guardian Charles McCullough).  For a guy who
doesn't believe in walking corpses, Richman gives a pretty lifeless performance.
     Actually, the film's title is somewhat misleading as Jason and his quarry
don't hit the Big Apple until about two-thirds of the way through the movie.
And, even then, they predominantly frequent the dark back alleys and sewer
systems of Times Square.  We might as well be back in the woods at Crystal Lake
for all the audience cares.  The producers wasted a great opportunity to parody
New Yorker's acceptance of bizarre looking outsiders.  The closest the film
comes to lampooning itself is when a bemused Jason notices a billboard
advertising an ice hockey game, replete with appropriate headgear of course.  
     In the nine years since the original -- and best -- film in the series,
the audience appears to have changed somewhat.  Mothers with an entourage of
five- and six-year-old children seem to have replaced necking teenagers.  In
earlier films, the on-screen characters habitually stripped off before being
macheted or axed to death and the killings were always inventive, with an
emphasis on the graphic.  One could always go to these movies first to be
titillated, then grossed out.  
     But now the characters don't even have to take a shower before being
sliced or diced.  Jason disposes of his victims so matter-of-factly these days
that it's hard to determine what the real attraction is.  
     But, like it or not, there's something about this series that cannot be
dismissed.  Successive films have reputedly made more money at the box office
than their predecessors, and the string of hits has even spawned a television
series.  Not only that, but no best-dressed Halloween party attendee would be
seen dead without his or her hockey mask.  
     Maybe we're all missing the point here.  Maybe Jason is a self-appointed
champion, combatting adolescent promiscuity -- notice how any sexually active
teen is permanently laid to rest?  Or maybe he's an anti-drug proponent -- not
one but two abusers in this film are efficiently done away with shortly after
indulging.  Or maybe it's simply a question of the bigger the body count, the
bigger the box office bucks...  .
     It's no coincidence that FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII -- JASON TAKES MANHATTAN
is labeled a "Horror, Inc." production for the film is about as pre-packaged
as they come.  As shrink-wrapped slaying goes there is no equal and, until
moviegoers demand otherwise, the uninspired trail of blood and body parts will
continue.  


Title
Review for Return of Swamp Thing, The (1989)
     Just when you thought it was safe to venture back into the bayou, along
comes THE RETURN OF SWAMP THING, part monster movie, part parody, wholly (if
not intentionally) awful.  Not since King Kong and Godzilla first slugged it
out atop Mount Fuji has there been a more laughable -- or more ludicrous --
man-in-a-monster-suit movie.  
     The first film of the summer season to be based on a character from a D.C.
Comic, THE RETURN OF SWAMP THING plays it strictly for laughs.  In Wes Craven's
original 1983 horror flick, Swamp Thing was portrayed as a sad, tormented
creature, the hideous result of research gone awry.  In this, its purported
sequel, Swamp Thing has been transformed into a superhero, ridding the swamp of
botched genetic experiments and rushing to the aid of damsels in distress.  
     One such damsel is the exquisitely untalented Heather Locklear.  
Locklear, who should stick to making health spa ads, is cast as Abby Arcane,
stepdaughter of scientist-gone-mad Anton Arcane (played once again by Louis
Jourdan in the scenery-chewing role of the century).  
     Abby visits her creepy stepfather in his heavily guarded Louisiana mansion
in order to discover what really happened to her mother all those many moons
ago.  Arcane isn't telling, but somehow you get the feeling that she didn't
pass away under normal circumstances!  Realizing that Abby's rare blood type
holds the key to his fountain-of-youth elixir, Arcane and his beautiful
henchwoman Dr. Lana Zurrell (played with campy panache by Sarah Douglas)
immediately have diabolical designs on the ditzy blonde, family ties or no
family ties.  
     From the opening scene, we learn that Abby has a very special relationship
with plants.  Not only does she call her succulents down-to-earth names like
"Jimmy" and "Mary," but she holds entire, one-sided conversations with them.
This is, I guess, just so we know that, come the time when she and Swamp Thing
inevitably meet, she's going to be able to relate to him, woman to vegetable.  
     Sure enough, this encounter takes place when Swamp Thing rescues Abby from
a pair of lecherous moonshiners.  Barely batting a false eyelash at this living
lump of lichen, Abby immediately senses the "soul of a wonderful human being"
beneath that mossy exterior.  Extraordinary as it might seem, it's love at
first sight.  
     To pad out its ninety-minute length, the film introduces a stereotypically
pudgy, twinkie-eating white kid and his precocious black pal, who are in the
movie to try and photograph the fibroid avenger for commercial gain.  In actual
fact, they're in the film to be laughed at, even though they do get to say some
real neat lines like "Swamp Thing's kicking some butt!"  They also get to give
the leafy fellow complimentary thumbs up from time to time, just so we know who
the good guy is.   Everybody in the film overacts like crazy, and these two
obnoxious youngsters are no exception.  
     It's hard to dislike a film as good-natured as this one is, especially in
an industry rife with gratuitous sex and violence.  Sure, the film does have
its explosive moments (courtesy the five-and-dime "special" effects), but ne'er
a drop of blood is spilled throughout.  And there are ample opportunities for
nudity -- Locklear and Douglas weren't employed solely for their acting
abilities -- but none ensue.  Abby and her new found beau do get to express
their love for each other, but it's tastefully done, if in a slightly silly
manner (as is everything else in the film).  
     From the very beginning you realize that this is not a film to be taken
seriously.  Though harmless enough, it does tend to be rather smug and a little
too cute for its own good, and you end up laughing at the film rather than with
it.  If it weren't so badly acted, so deliberately self-mocking all around, then
it might have made for better entertainment.   As it is, THE RETURN OF SWAMP
THING remains strictly for the grade Z crowd.  The only thought that appears to
have gone into the making of this movie is that the producers decided not to
call it SWAMP THING 2.  


Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
        Big marquee names--Travolta, Stowe, Cromwell, Hutton.  Big Men
Shouting.  A big name director.
        A highly-decorated general with political aspirations.  His lovely
daughter, a career officer, dead--brutalized, raped, and murdered on a
backwoods Georgia army base.  Possible corruption and cover-ups at the
highest echelons of the military.  A CID investigation led by a couple of
warrant officers who, it transpires, were once an item.  And James Woods.
        With ingredients like these, you could be excused for writing off
"The General's Daughter" as a foregone conclusion long before the first few
feet of film pass through the projector.  It's true: the latest film by
"Con Air" director Simon West is very by the numbers, and there aren't a
whole lot of outcomes you won't figure out ahead of time if you've seen
this type of picture before.
        What makes "The General's Daughter" work, however, is a combination
of things which land the film in that eminently satisfying category of
"better than expected."
        First off, John Travolta and Madeleine Stowe, who play
investigators Paul Brenner and Sarah Sunhill, are very good together.
There's a nice equilibrium to their chemistry: they're both tough yet have
a goofy, playful side to their natures, they can spar with the best of
them, they're convincing and likable and very strong.  Brenner's a military
cop with the power to arrest anyone, no matter how high their rank, and
Sunhill's a rape counselor who's thrust together with her former partner to
investigate the brutal murder.
        James Cromwell plays the general, Clarence Williams III is his
chief advisor (spouting lines like "There are three ways of doing things:
the right way, the wrong way, and the Army way"), and Leslie Stefanson
("Flubber") is the eponymous Elisabeth Campbell, an attractive Psychiatric
Operations adviser who helps Brenner change a tire shortly before her
untimely--and truly grisly--end.  All three actors are uniformly solid.
        The writing, too (by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman,
based on Nelson DeMille's novel), is very sharp.  Brenner makes innumerable
wisecracks throughout the picture but, surprisingly, many of them hit the
target.  Brenner's initial head-to-head with Liz's "mentor" Colonel Robert
Moore (Woods), in which the two men try to outsmart each other, is almost
charming.
        The only miscalculation on the writers' part is having Sunhill
chide Brenner for "not understanding women," but provide "insights" that
are offensive and absurdly out of character.
        Unlike his fellow Jerry Bruckheimer protégé Michael Bay
("Armageddon"), director West realizes that constant camera movement
doesn't equal drama.  "The General's Daughter" is a much subtler piece of
filmmaking than "Con Air," for sure, and only once does West introduce a
hail of the bullets into the proceedings.  He seems to like his helicopters
though...
        Don't go with your instinct to avoid "The General's Daughter"
because you'll miss out on a polished, professional production.  You could
almost call it an enjoyable experience were the central crime not so
monstrous.

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
        The opening, very deliberate minutes of "Mercury Rising," Bruce
Willis' latest retread, sets up the oft-seen hostage situation in which a
bunch of raggedy bank robbers negotiate with police.  For a moment I was
reminded of that film-within-a-film finale of Robert Altman's brilliant
"The Player," in which a pumped-up Willis caricatures himself, busting in
at the last possible minute and rescuing a frail Julia Roberts with an
apologetic "traffic was a bitch."
        But in Harold Becker's action thriller, undercover FBI agent Art
Jeffries (Willis) is already inside the bank and doing a little negotiating
of his own.  Jeffries thinks he can end this standoff without bloodshed,
but the impatient cops move too soon and Jeffries is left, quite literally,
with blood on his hands.
        Said to have lost his magic touch, Jeffries is assigned to "sit on
a wire" from hereon out.  But shortly after one of the film's secondary
characters repeats the transit metaphor--"traffic was like mud; I oozed
home"--a couple of shots are fired and a nine-year old boy is suddenly left
parentless.  Enter Jeffries stage left.
        Of the thousands of scripts a major studio reviews each and every
year, only about a dozen are so are produced.  One wonders, therefore, why
the executives at Universal chose to greenlight this particular project.
"Mercury Rising" is certainly no worse than any half dozen Bruce Willis
shoot-em-ups.  It's just not any better.
        The film's "hook" is that the kid in danger here is autistic.  The
filmmakers go to great lengths--and I mean *great* lengths--to show us what
that means, exactly.  Simon (convincingly portrayed by Miko Hughes) stares
off into space, presses doorbells very deliberately, repeats things by
rote, and acts afraid in the presence of strangers (unless they happen to
be *cute* strangers, like the one played by Kim Dickens, for example).
        Simon also enjoys puzzles, and this proves to be his undoing, as he
inadvertently deciphers a matrix of seemingly random characters in a
"geek's puzzle magazine," placed there by two National Security Agency
compududes to see if anyone human out there could crack a two billion
dollar chunk of code known as "Mercury."
        My favorite scene in the film comes when one of these nerds tells
Jeffries that he'll leave him an e-mail message in an account called
"einstein."  Jeffries has a savvy librarian do a Web search for "FBI" and
"einstein," instantly locating the address, and logging in.  "Try Arthur"
Art suggests for the password, but that's not it.  "How about E=MC2?" and,
as an afterthought, "all caps."  He's in!
        Why worry about some juvenile savant puzzledoer posing a threat to
national security when you've got Bruce Willis: SuperGuesser to contend
with?
        One of the interchangeable Baldwin brothers plays Lt. Colonel
Nicholas Kudrow, creator of the NSA code, who wants Simon erased (er, why
exactly?).  You know he's a bad guy because he talks in a very loud
whisper.  Kudrow and Jeffries eventually duke it out atop a skyscraper that
looks a little too like the Nakatomi building in "Die Hard," with the
autistic kid wandering around on the ledge to increase the tension.
        Willis is no Olivier but he's always fun to watch.  Unfortunately,
the rest of "Mercury Rising," even with its autism bent, is simply stock
footage.

Title
Review for Dangan ranna (1996)
        Murky and confused, the Japanese import "Non-Stop" ("Dangan Ranna")
is a pale precursor to Tom Tykwer's exhilarating "Run Lola Run" from 1998.
Both films share a central premise of a shady deal gone awry resulting in a
pivotal figure--in "Non-Stop" it's actually three protagonists--run, run,
running for their life/lives.  And there's also the intriguing plot device
of learning more about our leading player(s) as time elapses, through
flashbacks and fast forwards.
        "Non-Stop" was actually made in 1996 but is only now seeing a US
release thanks--but not many--to those indie promoters over at Shooting
Gallery.  So it's more likely that, if anything, Tykwer borrowed from
writer/director Hiroyuki Tanaka (typically credited as Sabu as he is here).
If Tykwer did draw his inspiration from "Non-Stop," then he improved upon
the original no end.
        Tomoro Taguchi plays a would-be bank robber who, as the film opens,
is plotting one big score.  Forgetting his mask, he ducks into a local
convenience store and ineptly shoplifts one, which is when the chase
begins.  Hurtling along, the thief's pursuer (the store clerk, played by
Daimond Yukai) clumsily collides with a local Yakuza (Shinichi Tsutsumi
plays the gangster) who subsequently takes up the pursuit.
        Much of the film's scant 82-minute running time is made up of these
three grown men dashing through the streets of downtown Tokyo, all keeping
an oddly safe and equal distance from each other.  These men share a common
bond in that they are losers: Yasuda (Taguchi) cannot hold down even the
most menial of jobs as a kitchen aide, and his planned robbery is partly an
attempt to impress his girlfriend; Aizawa (Yukai) is a would-be rock star
with a heroin habit; and Takeda (Tsutsumi) is living with the stigma of
letting his mob boss take a fatal hit.
        Whereas "Run Lola Run" was an adrenaline rush from start to finish,
"Non-Stop" is just plain silly.  Tykwer's film was smart and kinetic, its
heroine alive and ablaze, its real and imagined situations by turns
creative and absurd, pulsing with portent and unpredictability.  "Non-Stop"
is none of these.  It feels amateurish and uneven.  Even the subtitles are
often times poorly translated.
        Likewise the film is supposed to be a black comedy but there are
few laughs to be found among the shattered lives and machismo violence.
One Asian family in the audience, who perhaps detected some culturally
significant reference, was laughing uncontrollably during a sequence in
which the runners pass an attractive woman who has stooped to pick
something up.  Momentarily distracted from their ultimate fate, all three
men have similar (sexual) fantasies as they breeze on by.
        While more clever than amusing, this scene is one of the few in
which the director actually appears to be in control of his material,
taking full advantage of the inventive gimmick at the center of his film.
Otherwise, "Non-Stop" is a long haul, a never-ending marathon of good
intentions marred by missed opportunities.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
        That appears to be a guiding principle in Hollywood: look in any
movie guide and you'll find literally hundreds of films cross-indexed under
the categories "Alien Beings, Unfriendly" and "Space Operettas."  Ridley
Scott's "Alien," arguably the best of these, started a trend in 1979, but
even *it* was based on a B-movie from the '50s called "It! The Terror from
Beyond Space."  Essentially, Hollywood has been telling the same old story
over and over again.
        Next up is "Supernova," the latest science-fiction adventure to
feature a ragtag band of space derelicts who answer a distress call and
bring onboard some malevolent extra-terrestrial lifeforce that starts
picnicking on them.
        I suppose there's a certain cathartic pleasure in witnessing one's
fellow man being stalked and eaten by nasty aliens: rather them than us,
eh?  But why have so many of these recent movies assembled an intriguing
cast and then made them nothing more than creature kibble?  Whereas
"Supernova" isn't much better than "Event Horizon" (a well-cast film from
1997 that got very silly very quickly), it didn't put me to sleep.
Although the details leading up to the inevitable moment when the bad guy
is forced into the airlock escape me, so perhaps it did.
        Aboard medical rescue vessel Nightingale 229, this week's
intriguing cast of James Spader, Angela Bassett, Robert Forster, Robin
Tunney ("End of Days"), Wilson Cruz, and Lou Diamond Phillips (remember
him?) answers the obligatory distress call somewhere in the 22nd century.
The distressee, it turns out, is not some freaky two-headed, one-eyed
drooling monster thing, but an attractive male specimen called Troy Larson
(Peter Facinelli).  This proves to be fortunate because the crew in
"Supernova" has been getting it on like nobody's business.  I guess it's
pretty boring out there in deep space, but this is a PG-13 rated movie
after all, and there's a lot of coupling going on...at least until there's
nobody left to couple with.
        In addition to bringing Troy onboard, the crew also discover an
eerie lifeform on his shuttle that looks like a magenta-colored lava lamp.
They only have an eleven-minute window to get the heck out of there after
the Nightingale's crippled engines recharge since that star down there is
about to go supernova, by the way.
        What raises "Supernova" a little--and I do mean a little--above the
rest is its script by David Campbell Wilson, which is lightly peppered with
clever dialogue, some of it throwaway biblical.  Bassett, as the
Nightingale's chief medical officer, is fascinating as always; her
character is easily the most interesting, with the possible exception of
the ship's breathy-voiced computer--did someone say Mother!?  Spader
("Crash") gives a good accounting of himself, especially whenever he's
around Bassett.
        Unfortunately, the menace in "Supernova" is strictly
one-dimensional, even with that big bang threatening, and the special
effects too run of the mill to make any serious headway.  In addition, the
film seems surprisingly short--when the end credits snuck up on me I was
still anticipating a third act, or a twist, or both.  I suspect this has
something to do with the fact that "Supernova" was set to open Christmas of
last year but some post-production tinkering kept the film out of theaters
until now.  Why would respected director Walter Hill be credited as Thomas
Lee, for example?
        If the filmmakers weren't happy with "Supernova," then why on earth
should we be?
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
        So preaches a very cool-looking Laurence Fishburne to a befuddled
and bewildered computer hacker played by the equally cool-looking Keanu
Reeves.  That observation serves as an apt commentary on the film itself:
it's better to see "The Matrix" than to have someone describe it to you.
Since it's my job, however, I'm obligated to try.
        Reeves' character (Neo to his online chums) is being "recruited" by
this guy Morpheus (Fishburne) who believes Neo to be The One.  The One who
can save Morpheus' rebel brigade from falling further down the existential
rabbit hole, so to speak.
        The One?  Rabbit holes?  The film is packed to the rafters with
these kinds of allegorical and literary allusions yet, surprisingly, the
end result is a totally original motion picture that grabs you by the
throat and doesn't put you down until the end credits.  It's all very weird
and confusing but it's great looking and moves at such a pace that you
won't notice the anomalies in the pre-programmed realities it stirs up.
        Morpheus and his "ragtag" band of space pirates (think Ridley
Scott's "Alien") are being pursued by Rayban-loving agents who sure look
like Feds but speak so slowly and deliberately (e.g., pronouncing the "n"
in environment) that you suspect they're not what they appear on the
surface.  Fortunately the good guys have this neat ability to travel down
telephone lines the minute danger threatens, as Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss)
ably demonstrates in the film's striking opening sequence.  Fortunately she
knows something about ju-jitsu--and defying gravity--too.
        Trinity finally hooks up with Neo and brings him to Morpheus, where
the psychobabble gets really heavy.
        After choosing a red pill (to learn what The Matrix is) over a blue
one ("you wake up in your apartment not knowing whether or not any of this
really happened"), Neo is reborn in a creepy futuristic world, immersed
cocoon-like in some serious glop, his head shaved and umbilical appendages
attached to almost every part of his quivering, naked body.
        First the Coens, then the Hughes, next the Farrellys, and now the
Wachowskis--the latest in a successful line of brother-directors keep this
visually stunning sci-fi thriller on the boil for well over two hours,
saturating their palette with dark and dingy hues, only rarely allowing
anything resembling color to engage the senses.  The writing is very smart,
if at times overly arch and occasionally bordering on the portentous, but
Andy and Larry have dreamed up an exhilarating vision in which reality, it
seems, is not what it seems.
        What is The Matrix?  It's a surreal, icky, post-apocalyptic
cyberpunk hacker mind-trip of a movie.  And a very good one at that.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1999 David N. Butterworth
        Austin Powers has lost his mojo all right.  And so, unfortunately,
has Mike Myers.
        In this much-anticipated follow-up to 1997's "Austin Powers:
International Man of Mystery," Myers and his co-conspirators have missed a
wonderful opportunity to improve upon the original film and given us
instead a wildly uneven romp which misses about twice as much as it hits.
        The dark forces in "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" draw
consistently bigger laughs than the swinging secret agent and his latest
shag-pad material, CIA operative Felicity Shagwell (a stunningly awful
Heather Graham).
        Dr. Evil (Myers) is back, hysterically so, as is his right-hand
woman, the Rosa Klebb-styled Frau Farbissina (Mindy Sterling, still having
a blast).  They're joined by Dr. Evil's delinquent son (Seth Green, also
terrific) and an obese Scot with the catchy moniker of Fat Bastard.  Played
by Myers under what seems to be three metric tonnes of makeup and
prosthetics, Fat Bastard is a repulsive cross between Monty Python's Mr.
Creosote (from "The Meaning of Life") and Charlie MacKenzie's father in "So
I Married an Axe Murderer."  Myers has the accent down perfectly and his
Fat Bastard is a welcome, if gross, addition to the film's eccentric roster
of villains.
        Also in tow in "The Spy Who Shagged Me" is a one-eighth-the-size
version of Dr. Evil.  "I shall call him  Mini Me."
Mini Me (played by Verne Troyer) is another brainstorm; too bad they
couldn't have come up with a kitten-sized version of Mr. Bigglesworth.  And
last but not least there's Rob Lowe as the young Number Two, who does a
better Robert Wagner than Robert Wagner.
        Whenever the bad guys are on screen, especially Dr. Evil, the film
is a hoot.  One of the film's funniest lines comes when Dr. Evil is going
through his "zip it" routine with his son Scott.  But the writers don't do
anything with Austin except to land him with the great-looking but
hopelessly-afloat Graham.  A brief but satisfying appearance by the
original film's Elizabeth Hurley only reinforces just how bad Graham is.
        Austin flashes his bad teeth and growls "groovy baby, yeah!" but
his character is becoming very repetitive and Myers himself doesn't seem to
know how to extend his creation.  So the film settles for a lot of
unwelcome bathroom and bodily orifice humor.  And I mean a lot.  Austin
Powers accidentally mistaking a stool sample for coffee?  Felicity
"retrieving" things from Austin on all-fours in silhouette?  You have to
believe that Myers and his co-writer Michael McCullers can do better, much
better, than that.
        "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" has some terrific sight
gags, several outrageously funny product placements, a bunch of inspired
cameo performances (Burt Bacharach and Elvis Costello *not* included), a
cleverly-edited sequence in which various people comment on the phallic
nature of Dr. Evil's spaceship, and a wonderful throng of evildoers who ham
it up at every possible opportunity.
        But for those of us who expect a little more from the extremely
talented Mike Myers, the psychedelic love machine in his Carnaby Street
duds is--at least for the time being--all shagged out.

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
As "Living Out Loud" opens, Judith Nelson's 16-year marriage to a
wealthy, Fifth Avenue cardiologist is about to go kaput.
She's dining with her husband (Martin Donovan), whom a friend has
seen arm-in-arm with another woman.  "Why couldn't you have told me
yourself?" asks Judith, whose bleached blonde hair can't conceal the fact
that she's not as young as she used to be.  "She's probably about thirty,"
she muses.
"She's thirty-four" concedes her husband, with shame reverberating
in his voice.
That "thirty-four" hangs in the air like a lead balloon waiting to
drop and crash through the floor of the restaurant, dragging Judith and
everything she thought she believed in down with it.  As if the humiliation
of losing one's husband to a younger woman isn't enough, a
thirty-four-year-old "younger woman" only adds insult to injury.
Finding herself alone and disconnected in her swank, Upper East
Side co-op, Judith yearns for human contact.  She ventures out to a jazz
club where a chance encounter with a stranger (Elias Koteas, briefly
reunited with the actress after their sexual collisions in "Crash") gives
her a new way of looking at life.
Judith is played by Holly Hunter, an actress who has proven time
and again, with her disparate roles in "Broadcast News," "The Piano," and
"Raising Arizona," that she has talent to spare.  She plays Judith to
perfection, expertly balancing physical and verbal humor with the pain of
sadness, loss, and loneliness.  She's paired with Danny DeVito as Pat, a
divorced, debt-ridden elevator operator who is also struggling with a
recent loss.  Judith and Pat might sound like an odd couple on paper, but
Hunter and DeVito breathe life into these characters, turning them into
believable people with real problems and emotions.
Steering all of this is writer/director Richard LaGravenese, who
wrote "The Fisher King" and adapted "The Bridges of Madison County" and,
more recently, "Beloved."  "Living Out Loud" is his first directorial
effort and he directs with as sure a hand as he writes.
LaGravenese knows when to use words and when to let silence carry a
scene.  He knows when to cut, and when to let a scene run on to its natural
conclusion.  He includes just the right amount of soul searching, and just
the right amount of fantasy--the film's crowning moment is a wonderfully
choreographed sequence of such pure delight that I almost stood up and
applauded.  And he solicits rich, textured performances from Hunter,
DeVito, and rap queen Queen Latifah, who plays a sultry lounge singer who
befriends Judith.
Earlier this year a film called "As Good As It Gets" gained Oscar
nominations for its three leading actors.  It's not too much of a stretch
to think of "Living Out Loud" as a reworked version of that film, with
Hunter in the part realized by Helen Hunt, DeVito in the Jack Nicholson
role, and Latifah filling in for Greg Kinnear.  The key difference,
however, is that "Living Out Loud" has everything that "As Good As It Gets"
was missing: warmth, credibility, and a refusal to succumb to tired,
conventional plotlines.
Not that we should expect anything less from a movie that has the
resourcefulness to encourage Holly Hunter to dance, Danny DeVito to sing,
and Queen Latifah to act.

Title
Review for Pope of Utah, The (1993)
     A bleak Utah landscape, a Kentucky-fried land of porno booths, gin
joints and mustard refineries, fizzles into bursts of static and a
fuzzy kaleidoscope of mutated video images blip, pop, and crackle their
way onto the screen.
     Thus begins THE POPE OF UTAH, a wacky, colorful and savagely funny
movie debut from Philadelphia filmmakers Chaim Bianco and Steven
Saylor.
     Welcome to "Mustardville," a world a-buzz with television
imagery--TV dinners, TV talk shows, TV evangelism--home of Utah's
Heartland Television, Home of the Voice of God. A sort of Home Shopping
Network meets the 700 Club.
     KTRI-TV's prime minister and product plugger extraordinaire is
Melvis Pressin (Tom McCarthy), a flamboyant and monochromatically-
attired televangelist, part Jimmy Swaggart, part Crazy Eddie.  "Plant
your seed money in me, people" pleads Melvis during one of the
station's many pledge drives.  "Place your nest eggs on my face."
Consumerism takes it on the chin during Mel's frequent and flashy
solicitations, and there's always a push for Lords Hot Mustard.
     By contrast, Del Shandling is a has-been, an ex-stand-up comic who
is stuck in a dead-end job as KTRI-TV's staff censor.  This is a long
way from being the former "toast of North Jersey," that's for sure.
Del (played by Lee Golden) is a bug-eyed, embittered wannabe whose
dream is to have his own TV show.  This guy looks a lot like Mr.
Potatohead, right down to the tacky wardrobe.
     Del's wife Faye (Ginny Brown Graham) sits transfixed by the
television screen, happily pledging hundreds of dollars to Melvis'
"Lonely Hearts Happyhour."  This creates a certain amount of animosity
between Del and Mel, and Del hatches an outrageous blackmail scheme in
the hope of finally freeing himself of Faye's constant naggings.
     Shot in and around the Philadelphia area, THE POPE OF UTAH is very
much a home-grown product.  The filmmakers take advantage of a lot of
native talent, and sharp-eyed viewers might recognize some of the
locations used for the film.  Phoenixville's popular Vale Rio Diner
provides the backdrop for a pivotal scene between Mel and Del.  The
massive, industrial junkyard down by the Walt Whitman bridge plays host
to Mel's 2nd Annual Weenie Roast.  And the seedy, neon-lit facades
along Admiral Wilson Boulevard double for a Nevada porno strip.  It's
also fun to see Philadelphia's own Gary Papa pop up in a brief cameo as
KTRI-TV news anchor Rod Pilsbury--"Lordy, that's Hot Mustard!"
     Although televangelists are an easy target, it's the presentation
of the material that sets THE POPE OF UTAH apart.  The garish color
schemes--from Melvis' voluminous yellow suit to the blue of the
KromaKeyed set to the bright orange smog surrounding the mustard
factory. The in-your-face visual style--with the two leads often
photographed from the nostrils up, creating a pastiche of obnoxious
caricatures with big heads.  And the accomplished blend of film and
video animation techniques, replete with in-jokes for movie lovers ("I
coulda had class.  I coulda been a ... Minister!" dubs Del) and
computer buffs alike (FaceFitter 2.1, for example).  Despite the film's
shoestring budget, it's very well put together.
     THE POPE OF UTAH will inevitably draw comparisons to Martin
Scorsese's THE KING OF COMEDY, with its biting observations about the
high price of stardom.  But this film's tone is more cornball than
cynical, and its humor more mustard-colored than black.
     Bianco and Saylor's most thought-provoking insight is that cameras
are what turn reality into dreams, and it's clear that the camera of
these two Temple University film grads has done precisely that.  This
is a film about the have-it-alls and the have-nots, a video-aged
potpourri of crass commercialism, TV censorship and couch-potato-dom.
Nothing in the industrialized landscape of the future appears to have
changed much, give or take an in-car television or two, but maybe
that's the point.  We are what we consume, high-energy doses of white
noise and static electricity.
     Ironically, as one Philadelphia enterprise takes off, another's
future is uncertain.  Temple Cinematheque, where Bianco and Saylor's
film receives its first public screening, is threatened with closure
next month.  Help support this local institution by getting on down to
TUCC to see THE POPE OF UTAH, a dark, funny and irreverent
deconstruction of the American Dream.  You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
        Remember Tom Cruise and Brian Brown as rival bartenders juggling
bottles of booze in "Cocktail"?  Remember how stupid that looked?  And
remember the scantily-clad dancers of "Flashdance" getting doused with
buckets of water?  Well, "Coyote Ugly" does those films five better (or six
better if you count John Goodman), since here we have Piper Perado, Maria
Bello, Tyra Banks, Melanie Lynskey, and Izabella Miko doing the Absolut
spinning and jiggling thing while pouring pitchers of Perrier all over
their semi-naked torsos.
        No, Goodman doesn't flip Jim Beams or wear anything particularly
risqué in the film but he *does* get up on the bar and start gyrating with
the rest of them.  And the central character's love interest, played by an
Australian actor named Adam Garcia, proves *he* can get up on that bar and
start shimmying along with the rest of them too.
        What seems to have started life as a Victoria's Secret photo shoot
quickly deteriorates into one heck of an embarrassing movie.  Violet
(Perado) is a South Amboy hopeful who tries to make it big as a songwriter
(not a welder) in New Jack City.  As naďve as they come, she's fobbed off
by music producer's receptionists by the scorn-ful and has her apartment
robbed hours after touching down in Chinatown.  And, like her mother before
her, she gets stage fright whenever she tries to do the open mike night
thing.  When she sees a trio of babe-a-licious barkeeps thumbing through a
stack of $20s in an all-night diner, Violet simply has to check out this
bar they call Coyote Ugly.  Lil (Bello), the no-nonsense owner, agrees to
give Violet an audition but Violet blows it.  Still, Lil gives Violet
another chance.  A riot breaks out (riots are the order of the day at
'Ugly's, since the staff are relentless in flaunting their sexual wares,
flambeeing the bar, and soaking the patrons with diet Sprite--this is
certifiable behavior in case I didn't mention it) but Violet successfully
subdues the crowd by singing along to Blondie's "One Way or Another" on the
jukebox.  She's hired!  And cured, since this little episode gives her the
confidence to sing in an amateur talent contest where her Dad (Goodman),
the junk food-eating, laundry-impaired toll collector, comes to see her and
is as proud as punch.  The End.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Twin Falls Idaho (1999)
        At a cursory glance, "Twin Falls Idaho" looks like it might have
originated from the fractured and highly-volatile imagination of David
Lynch, director of such surreal indulgences as "Wild at Heart," "Lost
Highway," and the television series that started it all, "Twin Peaks."  But
this odd little film adds an element completely alien to Lynch's cinematic
arsenal of weirdness and weirdos: it adds empathy.
        It's an element that pushes "Twin Falls Idaho" beyond the
experience of just another freakshow.
        The feature--and starring--debut of striking-looking identical
twins Mark and Michael Polish, "Twin Falls Idaho" does not exploit its
subject matter.  Far from it: it bathes its conjoined siblings in a loving
and sympathetic light, and the result is a sad, fascinating, and profoundly
moving portrait of two individuals who have learned, not by choice, to live
together.
        There's not much of a story; it's your typical tale of "girl falls for
(Siamese) boy."  Instead, the film draws its power from the superlative
performances of its male leads, whose contributions in front of the camera
are equaled only by their skills as writers and, in Michael's case,
director behind it.  With genuine sensitivity, the film ably demonstrates
the easily imagined logistical difficulties of, say, sharing three legs, a
breast bone, and other vital organs.  There's only one "effects" shot in
the entire 110-minute film; the physicality of Blake and Francis'
relationship is expressed through the brothers' unique fraternal bond of
love and communication, rather than of skin and bone.
        Throughout the film the very separate Polish brothers stand extremely
close together, whispering softly in a beautiful didactic contrivance.
While one sleeps, the other remains awake.  When one is sick, the other
remains strong, steadfast.  When one is propositioned by a hooker (played
by Michele Hicks, a model-turned-actress whose talents, no doubt, were
previously better employed), the other reaps the benefits.
        Gorgeously photographed by M. David Mullen (and, since most of the
drama
takes place in a grungy hotel, amazingly so), the deliberately and, I
daresay, ambiguously-titled "Twin Falls Idaho" recalls Peter Greenaway's
masterly "The Falls."  Among its 99 violent, unknown biographies,
Greenaway's feature debut included identical twins played by the brothers
Quay.  Shortly after seeing "Twin Falls Idaho" I learned of conjoined twins
from Poland (Polish, don't you see) who were here in Philadelphia
undergoing the first of many surgeries in an attempt to separate them.  Of
course my mind did a double take.
        "Twin Falls Idaho" is indeed an oddity but, unlike a circus
sideshow, it's one that you should have no moral compunction in paying to
see.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Matador (1986)
     MATADOR is a film about sex.  Not sex as even the most liberal of us would
admit to knowing it, but obsessive sex -- palpable, intoxicating, self-
destructive.  The sexual images in this film are sweaty and engrossing and all
encompassing.  MATADOR may be in Spanish with English subtitles but sex -- on
any level -- is a universal language.
     Diego Montes, played in the film by Nacho Martinez, is the matador of the
title, El Maestro, retired from bullfighting after having been savagely gored
by a bull in the ring.  He walks with a limp, drives a Mercedes and his
chiseled features remind one of a Latin Jeremy Irons.  Women would kill for
him, if not on account of him.
     Reduced to teaching his art to Spain's young and impressionable, Diego
hopes to mould a young trainee toreador, Angel Gimenez (played with gusto by
Antonio Banderas).  Angel reminds him of how he once was, passionate and
altogether fearless.
     Diego is surprised at Angel's lack of experience with women, however, and
casts casual aspersions as to the young man's sexuality.  Incensed by the very
suggestion, Angel promptly rapes Diego's girlfriend Eva Soler (played by Eva
Cobo in a sensitively understated role) in an attempt to regain his pride and
indirectly punish his mentor.
     Concerned by his subsequent brooding, and that he might have done wrong,
Angel's overtly religious mother insists that he tell all in the confessional.
Instead, Angel heads directly for the local police station where he not only
confesses to the rape, but falsely admits to a number of recent murders.  If
this is his way of proving his manhood, well ... talk about major
psychological problems!
     A pretty young defense attorney, Maria Cardenal (the vivacious Assumpta
Serna), takes on Angel's case.  "Four murders are enough to begin with," she
tells him.  But we later discover that her interests are less with Angel than
with his tutor.  She sees her involvement with the young prodigy as a way of
getting closer to Diego, a man with whom, we learn, she has more than a passing
interest.  The interest is mutual, however.  Diego follows her into a movie
theater showing King Vidor's DUEL IN THE SUN.  While the two barely acknowledge
each other's presence, the resulting scene is a classic of flaring nostrils and
heavy breathing.
     Maria, we discover, is a lot like the character in Erica Jong's FEAR OF
FLYING.  She, too, is in search of the ultimate orgasm, that which transcends
all others.  She has followed Diego's bloody career in the arena from afar,
collecting his memorabilia, adoring his very being.  She admits that, at the
moment of sexual climax, she imitates him, using a stiletto-shaped hairpin as
her picador's lance.
     When it becomes apparent that Angel's connection to the murders was a
complete fabrication, the film's emphasis shifts to Diego and we discover that
not only are his hands less than clean, but neither are those of his fervent
admirer Maria.
     Other than the videotaped recording of his final day in the ring, a morbid
reminder which Diego watches with curious fascination, there are no scenes of
actual bullfighting in this picture.  Human beings become, in effect, the bulls
of Diego's trade.  "Women are like bulls," he instructs Angel.  "Once you close
in on them, it's easy."  And sex, if it is to be exciting, must lead to death.
     Maria gets her kicks from skewering her unsuspecting sexual partners in
the throes of passion.  And, similarly, Diego has found that he cannot hang up
his sword upon leaving the ring.  He still finds the nape of the neck between
the shoulder blades a wondrous place, a place where life ends and death begins.
These are two people obsessed by the same sick fantasy.  They are not the kind
of people you would want to take home to meet your mother!
     This obsession with the marriage of sex and death has never been made more
apparent than in this film.  That director (and co-screenwriter) Pedro
Almodovar keeps these dark and dirty dealings amusing throughout is a credit to
him and his craft.  Almodovar, whose previous credits include last year's
Academy Award nominee WOMEN ON THE VERGE OF A NERVOUS BREAKDOWN, draws a fine
line between acceptability and poor taste.
     The film is never sordid, however, always upbeat and attainable, and the
director's ability to handle such primal themes with comedic resourcefulness is
most invigorating.  This is not something one would expect from a film which
opens with a scene of its leading character masturbating to video images of
women being tortured, beheaded and mutilated.
     The only disappointment in the film is its reliance on a somewhat hokey
denouement concerning psychic phenomena and an eclipse of the sun.  This film
is, after all, a murder mystery and these clues, placed at the very end, help
the police solve the bitter crimes.  However, this ending seems jarring and out
of place in a film full of bizarre characters and less-than conventional
images.  But if you're in the mood for a stylish piece of erotica, then MATADOR
should leave you panting for more.


Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
        Its storyline reads like one of those "Plot or not?" slides shown
before the main feature: "In 1847, a cowardly soldier is exiled to a remote
Californian compound where a Scottish cannibal drops in uninvited for
lunch."
        As far as original story ideas go, "Ravenous" is truly unique.
It's best described as a period cannibal horror comedy, or thereabouts.
Whether or not you can stomach its grisly subject matter for 100
fascinating minutes, one thing is clear: the folks who made this picture,
especially in today's "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer" climate, had
guts.
        Cannibalism on any level is never an easy topic, but director
Antonia Bird ("Priest"), screenwriter Ted Griffin, and an absorbing cast
(among them Guy Pearce, Jeffrey Jones, Jeremy Davies, David Arquette, and
"The Full Monty"'s Robert Carlyle) give "Ravenous" a depth that belies its
jocular "you are who you eat" promotional campaign.  A successful campaign
nonetheless--the preview for this movie, with its blaring soundtrack, has
been running for months, and I was hooked the very first time I saw it.
        A word about that soundtrack.  Co-composed by Michael Nyman
(usually associated with filmmaker Peter Greenaway) and Damon Albarn, the
score for "Ravenous" is one of the most disconcerting I've heard in a long
time.  With its jangling, jarring rhythms and bumpkin levity, the music is
loud when it should be delicate, whimsical when it should be brooding, and
fractious when subtlety would have been the obvious way to go.  Frankly,
it's amazing.  Like director Richard Lester once said: "You've done
everything I wouldn't have done, but it works!"
        Guy Pearce ("L.A. Confidential") plays Capt. John Boyd, a military
officer who feigns death in order to escape an American-Mexican War
offensive.  Castigated by his commanding officers, Boyd is transferred to
Fort Spencer, a desolate outpost in the western Sierra Nevadas where a
party of six dig in for the cold winter ahead.
        One day a disheveled stranger called Colqhoun (Carlyle) appears at
their door, spinning a horrific tale of a terrible storm, a subterranean
refuge, dwindling supplies, and an unthinkable source of fresh meat.  Boyd
and a small company of men return with Colqhoun to the cave and it's then
that the film's supernatural hijinx, and copious bloodletting, kick in.
        That its cannibal theme is played so beautifully straight gives
"Ravenous" much of its substance, its psychological as well as visceral
horror.  Straight, but with a sly sense of humor.  The trailers may stress
the film's comedic element but don't be fooled: the gore quotient in
"Ravenous" is extremely high.
        On the surface, "Ravenous" could easily be dismissed as nothing
more than hocum, yet the quality of the production grants it an eerie
resonance.  Either way, the film deserves high praise for its startling
originality.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
        When I first heard that Rene Russo appears topless in "The Thomas
Crown Affair," I lost a lot of respect for the actress I had first noticed
and admired in 1993's "In the Line of Fire."  Surely you take your top off
first and then you get your big break in Hollywood, Rene, not the other way
around?  But no, "these scenes are in keeping with the storyline and don't
seem cheap or in any way gratuitous" I had been told.  Yeah, right.  Well
surprise surprise, that critic was right on the money and my respect for
Rene is restored!  The two sequences in question are a very steamy sex
scene with Pierce Brosnan, and an almost throwaway shot of Rene lounging on
the beach sans halter.  Perfectly reasonable, perfectly natural you say.
And that sex scene, while pretty darned hot, is one of the most
delightfully playful I've seen.  Self-conscious it is not.  Yet in "The
Thomas Crown Affair," Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo are at their glamorous,
sexiest best even with their clothes well and truly on (and boy do they
wear some stellar-looking duds).  For example, there's a super sexy gliding
sequence that'll put butterflies in your stomach: none of that
joystick-between-the-legs innuendo here.  Well, maybe just a bit...  Pierce
plays a hyper-rich tycoon type with a penchant for Monets (and perhaps a
little petty larceny too) and Rene's an insurance investigator out to nail
him.  Pierce plays it absolutely straight, without 007's knowing wink, and
that makes him one sexy devil, and Rene has this extremely cute character
trait of always nibbling on something (yeah yeah, sometimes it's Pierce),
and that makes her moreish.  Denis Leary, in an effective piece of casting,
plays the cop with the thankless task of trying to keep everything--and
everyone--in perspective and he, Leary, is very good.  In fact, it's all
very good--this is a smart, sophisticated, and if I didn't say it already,
SEXY caper film classily directed by John McTiernan ("Die Hard," "The Hunt
for Red October").  Oh yes, and Faye Dunaway (who co-starred with Steve
McQueen in the original film) has a small part as Pierce's shrink.  The
song that everybody remembers from the 1968 version, "The Windmills of Your
Mind," is here given the jazz-fusion treatment during a window
shopping/falling-in-love montage and also provides a smoky, end-credits
closeout by Muzak's own Sting.  Were it not for the fact that it's such a
bubblegum flick on the surface, despite its stunning ode-to-Dada
denouement, then "The Thomas Crown Affair" might rightly have been regarded
as one of the best films of 1999.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Orlando (1992)
     In ORLANDO, a 17th Century nobleman journeys four hundred years,
from the courts of Elizabethan England through the battlefields of
World War I, and along the way perceptions of gender, status and
longevity are turned on their head.
     As conceived and presented by British director Sally Potter,
ORLANDO is a charmingly outrageous yarn.  Based on Virginia Woolf's
1928 novel, it's a lavish period piece that questions the differences
between men and women in a context that is absolutely disarming.
Potter's handling of this material is remarkably assured, rivaling that
of established countrymen Peter Greenaway and Derek Jarman, directors
recognized for their sumptuous and unconventional costume dramas.
     Orlando, played by actress Tilda Swinton, is bequeathed a country
estate by the elderly Queen Elizabeth I on the condition that he (yes,
he) never grow old.  Quentin Crisp, the "uncrowned queen of England"
according to Potter, plays Elizabeth in a stroke of casting genius.  A
deliciously kinky ambiance suffuses a scene in which Swinton,
portraying a handsome youth, is coddled by Crisp, playing an aging
matriarch.
     After the queen dies, Orlando romances a pouty young Cossack named
Sasha, played by Charlotte Valandrey, for whom he claims he'd "hunt
wolves instead of rabbits, drink vodka instead of whisky."  The skating
sequence on a frozen, misty river Thames is astonishing; these
Muscovites "smear themselves with candle wax to keep warm," and wear
tall, tall hats.
     Next the Lord Orlando has a disastrous brush with poetry, entering
into philosophical debates with the Michael Palin-esque Mr. Greene
(playwright Heathcote Williams in an amusing self-parody).  "Society is
full of dangerous individuals--wits and poets," Orlando is warned, but
he fancies himself a writer nonetheless.
     And then this worldly young man is given an ambassadorial
appointment in a far-off Eastern land where, repelled by the inhumanity
of war, he conveniently switches gender.  Standing naked in front of a
full-length mirror Orlando observes, "Same person, just a different
sex."  Upon her return to England, she finds her former friend, the
fatherly Archduke Harry (John Wood), exhibiting designs on her
new-found femininity.  Unfazed by her dramatic transformation, Harry
refers to her as "the pink, the pearl and the perfection of her sex."
     It is true that Swinton is stunning as Orlando, even as a boy.
She dominates every scene she's in (and she's in virtually every
frame).  Potter takes every opportunity to photograph Swinton's
porcelain features against exquisite backdrops of silk and lace and
finery, her striking red hair set against a reddening fire, deep rich
tapestries and fields of golden corn.
     ORLANDO is a very sensuous film, a feast for eyes and ears.
Alexei Rodionov's gorgeous cinematography is the stuff of epic fantasy,
as is Ben Van Os' staggering production design.  And the haunting
modern score, co-written by Potter and David Motion, contributes a
vibrant inner energy.  In addition, Potter employs some creative visual
techniques, especially during some of ORLANDO's more literary passages,
slowly panning from side to side with a languorous, fluid motion that
enhances the narrative.  She also has Swinton make occasional wry
asides to the camera--"the treachery of women," Orlando comments when
betrayed by one and later, for comic effect, "the treachery of men."
     Billy Zane, who's given top billing with Swinton, makes little
more than a cameo appearance towards the end of the film as
Shelmerdine, a dashing, long-haired Daniel Day-Lewis type whose
smoldering passion sweeps Orlando off her feet.  Their brief affaire de
coeur is fresh and invigorating in contrast to Orlando's recent dolor,
confirming her contention that "Nothing thicker than a knife's blade
separates melancholy from happiness."
     Potter has said she was drawn to the story because it paralleled
her belief that, deep down, it's only conditioning that separates the
sexes.  Whether or not that's an opinion you favor, there's much more
to this film than polemics.  ORLANDO cleverly juggles issues of
identity and sexual ambiguity in an enchanting story that is totally
preposterous yet, "because this is England, no-one tends to notice."


Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
        The town of Mumford is filled with so many cranks, oddballs, and
eccentrics that it requires the services of not one but three licensed
psychologists to keep all that angst in check.  Actually, "licensed" is a
bit of a stretch since the intriguing premise of Lawrence Kasdan's ("The
Big Chill," "Silverado," "Grand Canyon") latest film is that one of these
professionals is not exactly certified.  So much for the drama; that
"revelation" is out on the table simply from reading a twenty-five word
synopsis.
        "Mumford" strives for that same multi-character ensemble chic so
glowingly realized by the likes of Robert Altman and Alan Rudolph.  The
feel of Kasdan's film, however, is more like an extended episode of
"Northern Exposure," where the good doctor gets to do his thing and say his
piece and everyone around him grows a little in the process.
        The characters who frequent the couch of Dr. Mumford (peculiarly
the psychologist bears the same name of the town, but nothing really comes
of that) are a wacky bunch it's true.  There's a sexually-frustrated
pharmacist (Pruitt Taylor Vince) who fantasizes in the style of those '50s
dime-store paperbacks with names like "Sucker Bait"--"all I needed was a
stiff drink, a cold shower, and a hot dame."  There's a skateboarding head
of a multi-national modem conglomerate, played by "Chasing Amy"'s Jason
Lee.  And there's a shy, delicate woman who's probably suffering from
chronic fatigue syndrome (Hope Davis).
        These are among the better-developed characters.  Ted Danson, Mary
McDonnell, and Alfre Woodard try to get inside their less-well developed
roles and have a tougher time of it.
        For a movie with so many recognizable stars, Loren Dean is an odd
casting choice as Mumford.  Dean's filmography is interesting--"Billy
Bathgate," "Gattaca," and "Enemy of the State" to name a few--but he
certainly isn't a household name.  In "Mumford," Dean doesn't so much act
as re-act; his dialogue is peppered with a great many hmms and uh-huhs as
he takes stock of his clients' odd little quirks and preoccupations.
Perhaps being a good listener is key to being a good psychologist, but it's
a risky personality trait with which to saddle your leading man.
        After some impressive opening achievements (director of "Body
Heat," screenwriter of "Raiders of the Lost Ark" and a couple of early
"Star Wars" sequels), Kasdan's work has slumped into mediocrity and below.
His recent turns at bat have been potentially interesting yet ultimately
futile affairs--"French Kiss," "Wyatt Earp," and "I Love You to Death"
spring to mind.
        "Mumford," alas, is no exception, a film bogged down by
fair-to-middling writing, uninspired direction, and a central conceit that
never really takes off.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
        Do you remember that scene towards the end of "Raiders of the Lost
Ark," when the Nazi's jimmy open the Ark of the Covenant and those
screaming, smoke-like furies emerge, melting the bad guys' flesh right off
the bone and leaving large puddles of goo on the floor?
        Well, that's pretty much the tone of "The Mummy," a
just-in-time-for-Mother's-Day update of one of those old Universal horror
films of the '30s in which a dusty old geezer in bandages staggered around
scaring the bejeebers out of well-meaning archeologists and late-night TV
watchers like you and me.
        1999's "The Mummy," which stars Brendan Fraser, Rachel Weisz, and a
tombful of special effects, falls somewhere between "Romancing the Stone"
and "From Dusk Till Dawn," a far cry from the original series of films
about an embalmed Egyptian looking to reincarnate his lost love.
        Let's just say that the unintentional humor in the Boris Karloff
version was a lot funnier than the intentional stuff here.
        As if the tongue-in-cheek approach isn't trying enough, the
134-minute film eventually wears you down with its non-stop assault on the
senses once high priest Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo, the only person playing it
straight in the movie) is reawakened some 3,000 years after being buried
alive for getting it on with his pharaoh's mistress.  With only a bucketful
of flesh-eating scarab beetles for company, no wonder he's in a bad mood!
        Those responsible for Imhotep's reemergence are an unlikely bunch
of 1920's gravediggers made up of a charmless librarian (Weisz), her
unctuous brother, and a death-row legionnaire called Rick O'Connell who
claims to know the location of the treasure-laden City of the Dead.  For a
brief spell they're joined by a corrupt prison official who agrees to free
O'Connell for an appreciable percentage of the spoils, but he makes the
mistake of complaining about hating bugs...
        The longer the film goes on, the more the chills give way to
slapstick.  Since there's so much silliness to contend with, you can't help
but chuckle every now and again.  John Hannah (as the brother) serves up
some decent laughs, but it's Fraser who seems to be having the most fun
with his role of O'Connell, even if his character seems closer to George of
the Jungle than Indiana Jones.  Weisz's character is pretty lifeless so
it's just as well that her relationship with O'Connell takes a back seat to
all that mummy-busting dering-do.
        If you go in expecting "The Mummy" to be a straitlaced adventure
flick or even a horror film, you'll be disappointed.  But if you anticipate
a dopey "Raiders" wannabe with some occasional scares, numerous gross-out
scenes, and enough special effects and inane attempts at humor to overload
three movies, you'll probably enjoy it a whole lot more.

Title
Review for Bully (2001)
        If you're into watching near on two hours of bored, foul-mouthed Florida
teens having sex, doing drugs, having sex, listening to Eminem, having sex,
playing video games, having sex, and killing one of their peers, then
"Bully"'s for you.
        Based on Jim Schutze's novelization of a true-life event, "Bully" charts
the story of a handful of disenchanted teenagers who, in 1993, murdered
their high school bully in cold, calculated blood.  The film could have
provided fascinating insights into what turned these aimless kids into
premeditated killers.  In the hands of controversial director Larry Clark
("Kids"), however, it has less to say about its subject matter and more to
say about the filmmaker's pornographic proclivities.
        In terms of the incident and what provoked it, "Bully" stirs up nothing
new.  The high schoolers are presented as a uniformly screwed up lot--bored
with life, not much ambition, promiscuous, profane.
        The bully in question, Bobby Kent (Nick Stahl), is certainly an unpleasant
piece of work but he doesn't exactly tower over his colleagues in the
pathological department.  He hounds and harries and humiliates his "best
friend" Marty (played by Brad Renfro) and Marty's girlfriend Lisa (Rachel
Miner) doesn't care for it at all and comes up with the idea of killing
Bobby.  Simply remove him from the equation.  Marty and Lisa and a handful
of their promiscuous, profane, and stoner friends, plus a recruited hit man
(?), lure Bobby to a swamp one night, stab him, beat him over the head with
a baseball bat, and dump him into the canal where the sand crabs and the
gators, presumably, finish him off.
        There's no remorse--the next day they're talking about it as openly as a
homework assignment.  They did it because they wanted to, and because they
could.
        What's most troubling about the film, however, isn't the unsettling
subject matter and the matter-of-fact way these young people go about
eliminating one of their own but the way in which Clark is constantly
distracted by his own material.  Not only is the nudity plentiful and
graphic in "Bully" but there's also an uneasy, exploitative feel to it.
Gratuitous crotch shots abound (one of which makes the zipper cut-away in
"There's Something About Mary" look like the height of subtlety!).  Clark
is so pre-occupied with his female (predominantly) leads that you forget,
at times, what this movie is supposed to be about.  The stripping bare,
literally and figuratively, of these actors (who are, after all, playing
underage teenagers) becomes harder to watch over time, as you begin to feel
for them and question the motives of the man behind the camera.
        The conclusion of "Bully" offers up literal snapshots of information about
the sentences imposed on each of the protagonists for their involvement in
the crime.  It's a short sequence of stills--Heather: 7 years; Ali: 40
years; Lisa: life imprisonment, for example--but it's infinitely more
telling than the 110 minutes of rampant unpleasantness that precedes it.
        "Bully" aims for truth, exploits it shamelessly, then bludgeons it to death.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
        There's something about Ben Stiller that makes him a popular choice
among casting directors these days.  Stiller currently has three projects
in circulation, and what other actor can lay claim to that?  He's in
"There's Something About Mary," which I *still* haven't seen.  And he's in
the acerbic "Your Friends & Neighbors," playing a talkative,
sexually-frustrated drama coach called Jerri.
        Now there's "Permanent Midnight," in which Stiller plays another
Jerry, this one a heroin-addicted television writer, last name Stahl.
        There's also something about this industry that pushes bankable
stars like Stiller into doing drug-addiction pictures the minute they've
proved themselves commercially.  Ewan McGregor springs to mind who, after
successful turns in "Emma" and "Brassed Off," received greater respect and
admiration for his mind-blowing realization as Renton in Danny Boyle's
transatlantic junk-fest, "Trainspotting."
        "Permanent Midnight" is based on the true life experiences of Jerry
Stahl, a successful Hollywood writer who, in the mid-eighties, had a
$5,000-a-week job churning out plotlines for disposable TV sitcoms and a
$6,000-a-week heroin habit.  A habit, in Stahl's own words, "the size of
Utah."
        As Stahl, Stiller contributes a commanding performance.
        Unlike "Trainspotting," which was successful in having it both ways
by chronicling both the highs and the lows of heroin abuse, "Permanent
Midnight" instead focuses on the concept of drug addiction as maintenance.
One of the earliest observations in the film is a casual reference to
"Naked Lunch" author William S. Burroughs who, when asked why he shoots up
first thing in the morning responds, "so I can shave."
        Stahl rarely appears to be puncturing veins for the thrill of it
all in "Permanent Midnight"; it's so he can talk to his mother on the
phone, show up for work on time, even pay his bills.
        While the film itself occasionally wobbles around along with Stahl,
the writing (adapted from Stahl's autobiography by director David Veloz) is
controlled and pointed.  "Permanent Midnight" shows how Stahl moved from
New York to L.A. to--again in the author's words--"escape the drug scene"
(yeah, right); why he entered into a convenient marriage with a British TV
exec (Elizabeth Hurley, so impossibly polite you'd swear her single
profanity was dubbed); and that he conceived a child in between his random
hirings and firings.
        Stahl narrates all this in a motel bedroom to a sympathetic lover
called Kitty (Norristown's own Maria Bello) with whom he spent some rehab
time.  Janeane Garofalo is wasted--and miscast--as a heavily-bespectacled
Hollywood talent agent who fails to get her hooks into the doped-up
wordsmith, and that's Stahl himself playing a jaded clinic counselor.
        Stiller, unshaven (Burroughs take note) and with lots of mascara
around the eyes, has Stahl stumble through the film looking like a train
wreck but, to his credit, never once pushes his pill-popping,
needle-jabbing performance over the top.
        The ubiquitous Stiller is the reason to see "Permanent Midnight"; a
dark, comic, and strangely absorbing study of assisted living.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
STAR WARS: EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1999 David N. Butterworth
        It was an overcast, muggy Tuesday afternoon, the day before the
eagerly-awaited "Star Wars" prequel was slated to blast into theaters.  I
walked up to the bored-looking ticket seller at my local multiplex
(twenty-four screens to be precise) and asked "So what's the deal with
"Star Wars" tickets?"  Anticipating a long, drawn-out answer about nothing
being available until the 27th and having to wait "over there," the
lethargic teenager simply asked me what show I wanted to see.  "When's the
first one?" I asked.  "10am."  "And you still have tickets?"  "Yes."  "Then
I'll take one for the ten o'clock show please."
        At 9:30am the next morning the parking lot was already pretty full,
and you can bet people weren't there for the new Jet Li movie.  The ticket
taker told me to hang onto my stub at all times, and to sit as close to the
middle as possible, as the show was sold out.  For a sold-out show there
were a lot of empty seats, but by that point all I could think about was my
hankering for some gummi sourpatch nightcrawlers.
        If you go to see "Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace," as
it's correctly called (and I suspect you will), I recommend you get there
early.  Not just in case your particular show happens to be sold out too,
but to listen to "Star Wars" junkies complaining about this, that, and the
other.  My favorite comment came halfway through the film when some
numskull whispered reverentially "Shmi Skywalker's the Virgin Mary!"
        I saw the original "Star Wars" back in 1977 when it first came out.
A lot of hoopla surrounded it at the time and for the most part it was
deserving.  The special effects were light-years ahead of their time and
the story was a classic case of good vs. evil, beautifully realized, and
inspired by Akira Kurosawa's "The Hidden Fortress."
        That blast from the brass section as the "Star Wars" insignia
appears from out of nowhere and slowly pushes its way into the starry
screen still gives me goosebumps.
        A little context for you.  Although I can't tell a bantha from a
Grand Moff Tarkin, I do believe that Harrison Ford can't act his way out of
a brown paper bag.  I believe that Mark Hamill didn't even try.  I believe
that Carrie Fisher is a better novelist than she is an actor, I believe
that Chewbacca was the series' best character and they should have brought
him back for "Episode I," and I believe that the Ewoks were a big mistake
(their TV series spin-off an even bigger one).  I believe in the twin moons
of Tatooine, the golden orbs of Unrath, the curve of Natalie Portman's
back, and I believe in long, slow, deep, soft, wet kisses that last three
days...
        We've been so deluged by special effects-laden movies in the 1990s
that we take a lot of today's technical wizardry for granted.  The new
"Star Wars" film is purported to contain some 2,000 "effects shots"
(compared to the 800 or so in "Titanic"), the most in any one movie, but
all that stuff seems like overkill at times.  We miss what we're supposed
to be looking at because there's just too much of it.  "Star Wars" did
exponential things with technology.  Relatively speaking, "The Phantom
Menace" would have required special footwear, probably, to have had the
same impact.
        Nevertheless there are some glorious paintings, models, and
backdrops in the film.  These cities and civilizations really come alive.
The craftsmanship is top-notch, state-of-the-art, exquisite.  The costumes,
not to mention Natalie Portman's hairdos (she plays Queen Amidala of Naboo)
are breathtaking.  That's right, breathtaking hairdos.  The Jedi commission
is made up of a bunch of funny-looking characters ... and Samuel L.
Jackson!  Terence Stamp is barely in the film.  The baddie, Darth Maul, is
appropriately named because he looks like some WWF spokesperson in a monk's
habit.  He's pretty cool.
        On the other hand, the Federation's computer-animated droids can't
hold a light saber to those imperial storm troopers.  Ewan McGregor (as
Obi-Wan Kenobi) is as stiff as a post and I hate to say it but the film
actually gets a bit boring at times.  The need to explain connections to
the original trilogy results in a lot of talky sequences and deja-vu, some
of it welcome and some of it not.  Jar Jar Binks, a walking, wisecracking
Rasta duck-billed platypus whose catchphrase is "How rude!" provides much
of the comic interest but after a while he tends to blend in with the rest
of the lop-eared platypi.
        One of the film's big set pieces is a "pod race" featuring the
young, fatherless Anakin (Jake Lloyd), an homage to "Ben Hur"'s famous
chariot race.  The point of all this spectacle is so that Jedi master
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) can win a bet to pay a winged muppet called
Watto for spare parts to fix a crippled spaceship.  I know Jedi knights
must have some code of ethics but couldn't they have found an easier
solution to their problem (like, maybe, steal the hardware, or at least
borrow it?).  Similarly, part of the deal is to have the enslaved future
Chosen One freed but unfortunately our heroes are forced to leave the boy's
mother behind.  "I tried to win her freedom but Watto wasn't having any of
it," says Neeson's character, or words to that effect.  Sounds rather
pathetic from a Jedi, doesn't it?  "I wanted to kill Darth Vader, but when
I got to the Death Star, he wasn't home."  Puleez.
        The dialogue and plot elements aren't the reason to see the film,
of course.  You expect the general good-guys-have-to-stop-the-bad-guys
scenario (here, taxation plays a key role).  It's all those brave new
worlds, intergalactic shoot-'em-ups, strange reptilian and mechanical
creatures, and characters with funny names you can either cheer or hiss,
that matters.
        And "The Phantom Menace" has got 'em by the score.  It's a frenetic
visual feast indeed; there's nothing quite like it in the galaxy.  Let's
just hope that Episodes II and III spend a little more time on character
development, that's all.

Title
Review for Guilty as Sin (1993)
     All too often in the movies we're presented with a tough,
professional woman who, at the very first opportunity, acts both weak
and unprofessional.
     The latest example of this annoying trend is GUILTY AS SIN, a
glossy yet run-of-the-mill courtroom drama from director Sidney Lumet,
whose previous successes with this genre (12 ANGRY MEN, THE VERDICT,
etc.) have been anything but routine.  Although the film is
entertaining despite its inconsistencies, your enjoyment of it will
largely depend on your tolerance of logic loopholes.
     GUILTY AS SIN is a drama very much in the JAGGED EDGE vein.  In
fact, as far as characterizations go, it's almost identical: we've got
the hotshot, no-nonsense criminal lawyer who likes to win; we've got
her experienced confidante and leg man who's a little rough around the
edges; and we've got the charming accused, a handsome playboy who may
or may not have murdered his wife.  The only character missing from
GUILTY AS SIN is the antagonistic prosecuting attorney.  While this
gives the film more time to concentrate on the relationship between the
two leads, it leaves the cross-examination sequences a little
top-heavy.
     Rebecca De Mornay (THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE) plays Jennifer
Haines, the successful defense attorney who knows what it takes to get
her clients acquitted.  She's well-dressed and confident, with a ballsy
courtroom demeanor.  De Mornay carries herself well in this picture,
but in the courtroom scenes she's definitely guilty of bad posture.
     When murder suspect David Greenhill asks her to defend him, she is
inexplicably drawn to this suave and sophisticated womanizer (or is
that ladykiller?).  After some coy game-playing, Haines agrees to take
the case.
     Greenhill is played by Don Johnson, who's still trying to prove
he's a "serious" actor since his big break on TV's MIAMI VICE.
Greenhill comes across as a smarmy pig in GUILTY AS SIN, yet somehow
the women in this film seem to be attracted to him.  His patronizing
badinage may be played for laughs, but it doesn't help explain why
Haines is interested in this outrageous flirt.
     As Greenhill begins to reveal less-than-desirable character
traits, Haines finds herself trapped in a nightmare of attorney/client
confidentiality, having to defend a man she suspects might be ... well,
check out that title!
     Jack Warden (THE VERDICT) plays Haines' longtime friend and
investigative ally Moe Plimpton.  Warden's presence is a constant
reminder of just how good THE VERDICT was, and how good this movie
might have been given a better script.  Writer Larry Cohen, better
known for his schlock horror screenplays, fails to give the characters
any credibility, too often thrusting them into unbelievable situations
and having them act inappropriately therein.
     And for a thriller, there just aren't enough plot twists.
     When Greenhill starts prying into Haines' personal life, she moves
to drop the case.  For a tough, experienced lawyer, severing this
client relationship should not present a problem, yet Haines' handling
of the situation is laughable.  And later in the film, when it's clear
why Greenhill has visited Plimpton in his dingy, flammable office, Moe
fails to see that this ain't no social call.  It's when the
protagonists behave stupidly and out-of-character like this that GUILTY
AS SIN really falls down.
     As an actress, De Mornay is somewhat of a lightweight, but you can
hardly blame her when the script calls for her to start blubbering and
trembling whenever Johnson threatens.  Johnson is actually quite good
in his role, but again--decent acting is defeated by indecent writing.
     For all its flaws, GUILTY AS SIN still manages to be entertaining
in a trashy sort of way thanks to the enthusiastic performances of De
Mornay and Johnson.  The high production values also contribute to the
film's appeal.  But for all the dramatic possibilities inherent in the
attorney/client relationship, there's not much to recommend here.
There's not even a good sex scene (we do get to see De Mornay's legal
briefs, but that's about it).
     A year or even a week from now you won't be able to tell this film
from any number of JAGGED EDGE clones--BODY OF EVIDENCE, GUILTY BY
SUSPICION, SUSPECT, etc.  GUILTY AS SIN is probably worth seeing on a
slow night, but only if you want to keep things that way.


Title
Review for Titanic Town (1998)
        Of all the films about The Troubles, Northern Ireland's 25+ year
politico-religious struggle with its neighbor from across the Irish Sea,
the newly-released "Titanic Town" brings the day-to-day horrors of a family
forced to cope with British occupation to the fore better than any other.
        Less intent on airing its own political views, the focus in Roger
Michell's film is on the McPhelimy's--mother Bernie (Julie Walters), father
Aidan (Ciarán Hinds), and their growing family of four.
        And it's the daily difficulties of raising children under such extreme
conditions that makes this true-life saga so powerful.  British troops run
rampant through their West Belfast housing estate, conducting nightly
raids; Saracen tanks and armored vehicles carve huge furrows across their
lawns; and the sounds of gunfire, explosions, breaking glass, and screaming
neighbors are a constant.
        Michell made "Notting Hill" and here's another fine film that looks a
foregone conclusion on the surface yet proves to be surprisingly potent
once it starts to get inside the means and motivations of its central
characters.
        The Irish Republican Army's claim that they are "for the people" is
questioned in this story of a naďve yet courageous Catholic woman who
challenges both the Provisionals and the British government by forming a
peace movement.  All that Bernie McPhelimy wants, at least initially, is to
establish a normal living environment for her family.  Normal in the sense
of "no shooting during daylight hours," that is.
        Walters is a knock-out as the attention-seeking Bernie who puts her family
in the frontline by expressing her views publicly, in town meetings and
later on television.  Walters' Irish accent is impeccable and her
performance truly dominant; this is easily the actor's best role since
"Educating Rita" (in fact, she might well have bettered herself here).
        Hinds is no less impressive in a more subdued role.  With a look of Alan
Bates, his Aidan is a scared, powerless man whose ulcer causes him to
double up in pain every time a mortar shell cracks or a brick comes
crashing through the dining room window.  A particularly telling scene
shows him watching from an upstairs bedroom window while his wife grapples
with an armed demonstrator on their front stoop.
        In addition to the film's absorbing central theme, there's also a
well-developed subplot in which Annie, the McPhelimy's teenage daughter (an
outstanding Nuala O'Neill), fosters a relationship with a young medical
student (nicely played by Ciarán McMenamin).  Their introduction on a
double-decker bus is a stunner: before they've exchanged so much as a
couple of words, the bus is stoned and firebombed by demonstrators in the
Falls Road, a particularly volatile section of the city.
        It's scenes like these in which "Titanic Town" (named for the place in
which they built the ill-fated liner) hits home time and time again.  For
all the false hopes and promises of a ceasefire, for all the political
rhetoric, those affected the most are the living, breathing inhabitants of
the city of Belfast.  And in this gritty, realistic, and excellently acted
film, those daily horrors are uncompromisingly brought to life.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
        At the ripe old age of 68, Sean Connery still has what it takes to
carry a motion picture.  Not only is his name still prominent up there on
the marquee, but in "Entrapment," the elegantly aging Connery is asked to
do more than a bivouac of actors half his age and he *still* gets the girl
(even if this one happens to be 40 years his junior).
        While some might take affront to the age difference, I didn't,
simply because Catherine Zeta-Jones ("The Mask of Zorro") has never seemed
much of a push-over on camera.  In "Entrapment," Connery and Zeta-Jones
click, and their relationship is one of two reasons to see the film.  The
other is sitting back and enjoying what is essentially an old-style heist
picture, aided and abetted by some new-fangled technical gadgetry.
        "Entrapment" is the kind of film that re-awakens interest in those
classic caper films of the sixties and seventies, with their rare artifacts
encased in glass, sophisticated surveillance systems, and invisible webs of
laser beams criss-crossing museum floors like an elaborate cat's cradle.
If you've seen the trailers, you'll have seen Zeta-Jones gyrating and
contorting her spandex-clad body under, over, and through the red security
rays.  I guess the producers felt the scene wouldn't have had the same
oomph with Connery in the catsuit.
        Zeta-Jones plays Gin Baker, an insurance investigator who suspects
that the recent theft of a Rembrandt painting from a seemingly impenetrable
skyscraper is the work of master art thief Robert MacDougal.  In order to
prove it, she sets up a similarly impossible heist, with an antique Chinese
mask as the bait, and convinces "Mac" to work with her.  She has the code;
he has the know-how.  Inevitably, their cat-and-mouse antics lead to
discovery, but then Gin dangles an even bigger carrot in front of the
charismatic Scot.
        In a brilliant piece of "casting," the world's tallest
building--Kuala Lumpur's Petronas Towers--provides the international
banking setting for Gin's latest scam.  Her plan is to "stall" time for ten
seconds on the eve of the millennium when computer security is temporarily
shut down, allowing her to download $8 billion dollars into her private
account.  Is this the time to try, or to trust, as our leading players like
to ask.
        Director Jon Amiel keeps a tight lid on the proceedings, focusing
the camera as much on his two principals--and their busy stunt doubles--as
possible.
        Ving Rhames is underutilized as MacDougal's shady associate, but
that's just as well since his character is an atypically unpleasant one.
Maury Chaykin almost makes up for Rhames' disappointing appearance by
providing a small but entertaining role as an ultra-affected Malaysian art
lover.
        There are high-rise thrills and spills and a well-grounded
relationship that rarely steps outside of its "let's not get personal"
confines.  "Entrapment" is good, clean, escapist fun.  "Welcome to the
rock, Miss Moneypenny."

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
        If the image of Adam Sandler screaming "SOMEONE GET THIS KID A
HAPPY MEAL!!" at the top of his lungs makes you snicker, then "Big Daddy"
is definitely for you.
        Sandler's latest film (following his recent mega success with "The
Wedding Singer" and "The Waterboy") isn't much of step up from those
previous encounters, but it retains all of their good-natured affability.
Heck, I even enjoyed "Bulletproof," most notably because of the lively
pairing of Sandler and former "In Living Color" frontsman Damon Wayans.
        Here, Sandler is ably supported by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse,
who play the post-diaper-wearing kid adopted by Sandler's character.  For
those who might be apprehensive about the film's adoption theme, fear not.
The film isn't in the same league as the detestable "Problem Child"
(ironically also directed by "Big Daddy"'s Dennis Dugan) and its equally
offensive sequel.  Similarly, for those who feel that the only decent child
actors are European, fear not again.  The Sprouse twins may be as
indistinguishable as Mary-Kate and Ashley Olsen, but they differ from those
obnoxious little automatons by being both cute yet not precocious.
        In "Big Daddy," toll-booth collector Sonny Koufax (Sandler) is
having some difficulty with his girlfriend Vanessa (played by Kristy
Swanson, the original Buffy the Vampire Slayer).  Just when things are at
their worst, a strange package is delivered to Sonny's door: a
five-year-old orphan called Julian.  Julian arrives with a note attached
that explains how he's purportedly the son of Sonny's roommate Kevin (Jon
Stewart), who's currently heading out of the country.  Like the
all-around-good-guy he is, Sonny phones Kevin at the airport, explains the
little problem, and volunteers to take care of Julian, at least for the
time being.
        Before you know it Sonny starts bonding with the little tyke (who
has a real difficulty containing his bodily fluids), seeing his new-found
parenthood as a way to prove his commitment to Vanessa.
        Although Sonny has a law degree (perhaps the first Sandler
character with brains), his parenting skills are limited at best, and the
film goes all out to create funny scenarios involving Sonny showing Julian
the ropes: teaching him to pee on buildings, eat junk food to excess, wear
ridiculous outfits, use bad language, etc.
        In the course of all this inanity (helped along by the redoubtable
Steve Buscemi as a homeless wino and Rob Schneider as an Eastern Block deli
deliveryman), Sonny falls for a corporate lawyer played by Joey Lauren
Adams ("Chasing Amy").  In "Big Daddy," Adams finally lays to rest the
rumor that she's a terrible actress.  She proves it!  The film culminates
in a "Judge Judy"-styled courtroom sequence that piles on the
sentimentality and would be a total embarrassment were it not for Sandler's
playful, puppydog persona and a strong turn by Joe Bologna as Sonny's
disapproving father.
        Although I enjoyed "Big Daddy," I wouldn't take my pre-teen
daughters to see it, since the profanity is endless and unnecessary.  In
addition, they don't need incessant Hooters' (the restaurant and beyond)
references forced down their impressionable young throats.  Adam Sandler
should stick to yelling about Happy Meals.  McDonalds is our kind of place.

Title
Review for Hudson Hawk (1991)
     The marketers of HUDSON HAWK obviously have a lot more talent than
the filmmakers.
     Misguided and miscalculated on every conceivable level, HUDSON HAWK
is the most lame-brained, stupefyingly awful movie to have come around
in a long time.  Director Michael Lehmann (HEATHERS) has taken a
promising idea and turned it into a mind-boggling misfire, a sorry
spectacle of a film that even the most die hard Bruce Willis fans will
abhor.
     The movie's wooden and empty-headed plot revolves around master cat
burglar Eddie "Hudson Hawk," played by Willis.  He's hired to steal
three priceless da Vinci artifacts by a variety of odious villains --
the Mario brothers, George Kaplan and the Candy Bars, and a pair of
kinky and colorful miscreants, Darwin and Minerva Mayflower (played to
the hilt by Richard E. Grant and Sandra Bernhard).
     The plan is to unlock the secrets of Leonardo's puzzle, three
Rubik's Cube-like crystals which, when put together correctly, are said
to provide instant wealth and gratification.  Pity the same couldn't be
said of the film.
     The Hawk is aided and abetted by long time partner-in-crime and
confidante Tommy Five-Tone (Danny Aiello of DO THE RIGHT THING).  They
get to perform a couple of gratuitously surreal musical numbers
together, which shows you just how low this film will sink in order to
get a laugh.
     Andie MacDowell (SEX, LIES AND VIDEOTAPE) plays Willis' love
interest, Anna Baragli.  Lovely, yes, but interesting?  Not in this
movie.
     You know where the film's heading when it manages to poke fun at
Asians, the handicapped and overweight people all within the first five
minutes.  By its long overdue conclusion, everyone else in between --
including the audience -- has been insulted.
     The best thing in the film are the Mayflowers, who resemble
characters in a John Waters movie.  Bernhard has a field day in her role
as Minerva, a garishly outfitted, rubber-faced dominatrix who gets off
on psychologically ridiculing the mawkish Hawk.  Her performance is
hideously over the top, but that's what makes it all the more fun to
watch.
     And Grant's despotic Darwin delivers what few funny lines there are
in the film.  Waters, the director of such sleazoid epics as PINK
FLAMINGOS and POLYESTER, has said that bad taste is what entertainment
is all about.  But in HUDSON HAWK, Lehmann abuses the privilege.
     Apparently the film had more than its fair share of production
problems, discernible from the opening credits.  Willis -- who must take
a large part of the blame for this embarrassment -- co-wrote the story
with Executive Producer Robert Kraft.  Kraft, in turn, shares screen
credit with composer Michael Kamen (DIE HARD and the "Lethal Weapon"
series).  Kamen was supposedly still working on the score days before
the film was released.  And it shows.
     The sound, too, is so bad you can't often hear what the characters
are saying.  And the film is poorly edited -- some snatches of footage
are so short you're not quite sure what you are supposed to have seen.
All this in a movie reputed to have cost upwards of $75 million!
     If it's supposed to be a slapstick farce, then how come nobody has
anything funny to say or do?  One wonders if dialogue like "If da Vinci
were here today, he'd be eating sushi, naked, in the back of a Cadillac
with both of us" is meant to raise a chuckle or two.  And after the
second or third pratfall, the film's heavy-handed and juvenile attempts
at physical comedy grow increasingly tiresome.
     If it's supposed to be a caper film, then how come the camera
spends more time pandering to Willis' trademark muggings than it does
detailing the planning and execution of the robberies themselves?
Whatever happened to those dapper jewel thieves of the '30s and '40s,
the Ronald Colmans and the David Nivens with all their wit, charm and
sophistication?  Smug is definitely one thing Cary Grant was not.
     If you're in the mood for a sparkling heist movie, check out RIFIFI
or the splendid TOPKAPI.  Or if you're simply looking for a Bruce Willis
vehicle, then you can do no better than DIE HARD or its sequel.  But
don't -- as the ads would have you -- "Catch the Hawk."  For when you
actually do nab the bird, this "Hawk" turns out to be a turkey.

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
        It's a fact: teenage girls are just as obsessed with female breasts
as teenage boys, and Drew Barrymore has a huge following of teenage girls.
It makes perfect sense, therefore, that as the co-producer and shrewd
marketing force behind "Charlie's Angels," Barrymore would insist that the
film feature, first and foremost, her breasts.  Better yet, Barrymore has
employed the talents of Cameron Diaz and Lucy Liu and since her co-stars
have breasts too, the pulchritude on parade here is disturbingly unreal.
        Now this a PG-13 rated film so we're not talking full-frontal
nudity or, to be fair, even casual toplessness.  But "Charlie's Angels," a
post-feminist update of the cheesy '70's TV show about three crime-fighting
babes employed by a speakerphone, is one sexual tease-a-thon from start to
finish.  Hardly a minute goes by in which one of our heroines doesn't flash
some thigh, unbutton her shirt, or waggle her bum at the camera.  The T&A
in this film is truly amazing, as if Russ Meyer served as creative
consultant.  I lost count of how many times an Angel shakes out her hair in
slow-mo like a Keeshond wicking rainwater from its pelt.
        The sexual innuendo and double entendres don't come as thick and
fast as in, say, a James Bond movie, but they're there all right.  "You
should be on my staff" an appreciative Tim Curry tells Liu's character,
who's working undercover as a masseuse.  "My hands are going nowhere near
your staff" is Liu's sly response.
        There's a scene in the film in which Barrymore hangs from a window
wrapped in nothing but a bed sheet.  The squeals of delight when the sheet
rips and Barrymore--or more likely her stunt double--plunges (safely, of
course) to the ground below confirm what the largely 13-year-old audience
had come to see.  Likewise the scene in which the Angels emerge from the
surf in their skin-tight scuba gear.  Now Diaz already has her suit
unbuttoned to the naval when she sashays up on the beach but she unbuttons
it some more.  And when all three actresses peel out of their wetsuits
tastefully (?) shot from behind, well... the Q102-loving crowd went wild.
        If you can take your eyes off the naughty bits for a moment you'll
notice that "Charlie's Angels" is actually better than this summer's
overhyped "Mission: Impossible 2" because it doesn't take itself too
seriously.  Like that Tom Cruise vehicle its plot is rather silly, although
"Charlie's Angels" only features the one rubber mask removal.  "Charlie's
Angels" is fast moving, slickly edited, and features a pulse-pounding
score.  It never flags for a minute.  Many of the action sequences are
sensational--Barrymore, Diaz, and Liu have clearly trained with the best.
One of the best fight sequences comes early in the film in which the Angels
face off with a thin henchman, played by Crispin Glover (oddly absent from
the screen since 1996's "The People vs. Larry Flynt").  It's kinetic,
balletic, a sort of "Bodacious Ta-Ta's" meets "The Matrix" by way of John
Woo!  Diaz leaps through the air, appears to hang there for several
digitally-enhanced seconds as she bicycles her long, sinuous legs into
position and delivers a stunning blow to the bad guy's chest--KERBLAM!!
Talk about being touched by an Angel.
        The film is competently directed by a first timer with the
mysterious moniker of McG.  It will come as no surprise to anyone that Mr.
McG's claim to fame is as a former rock video director; watch for an
association with producer Jerry Bruckheimer Real Soon Now.
        Barrymore plays Dylan--she has killer red hair.  Diaz plays
Natalie--she's effervescent, loves to dance, and has a killer smile.  Liu
plays Alex, she of the killer freckles.  All three are stunning in that way
that destroys our young girls' self-image.  Bill Murray plays the comic
interest, Bosley, and he's funny yet woefully underutilized.  The villain,
a voice-recognition software mogul called Knox, is played by Sam Rockwell
but he's just not very villainous.  More menacing is his henchwoman, played
by Kelly Lynch.  Bonus breasts!  Killer.  There are more costume changes in
"Charlie's Angels" than in an entire season of "Are You Being Served?"
        From its well-crafted Bond-ian opening sequence, "Charlie's Angels"
is, for the most part, a fast and fun-filled 90-minute entertainment.  And
if you think "Baywatch" provides good role models for your teenage
daughter(s), then you shouldn't have the slightest problem with it.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Train de vie (1998)
        In "Life is Beautiful," a concentration camp victim pretends the
horror is all an elaborate game (and the winner gets a tank!).  In "Jakob
the Liar," a Polish Jew pretends that a hidden radio broadcasts encouraging
news from the front line.  And in the latest go-round, the French film
"Train of Life" ("Train de Vie"), an entire village pretends to be deported
by train.
        That's a lot of comic situations borne out of unmitigated hardship
and a lot to ask of audiences.
        "Latest" is, perhaps, not strictly accurate in terms of "Train of
Life"'s chronology since Radu Mihaileanu's film was conceived prior to
either of those aforementioned features.  In fact, Roberto Benigni was
actually offered the lead role of Shlomo in the film but he turned it down
before going on to write, direct, and star in the similarly-themed "Life is
Beautiful," a maneuver which caused much controversy at the time.
        In some ways that short-lived controversy is all but irrelevant
given how vastly different these two films are ("Jakob the Liar," a
derivative, schmaltzy cross between "Schindler's List" and "Good Morning,
Vietnam," is hereafter dropped from the discussion).  "Life is Beautiful"
is a comic masterpiece that successfully transcends its difficult subject
matter by Benigni's brilliant ability to find laughter in the most
harrowing of circumstances.  "Train of Life" is an often amusing parody
that more closely resembles "Hogan's Heroes" than it does the film which
garnered Benigni an OscarŽ for last year's Best Foreign Language Film.
        "Train of Life" follows the fortunes of the inhabitants of an
Eastern European shtetl who, after learning that the Nazis are at hand,
come up with the brilliant idea of deporting themselves before the führer's
advancing troops can do the honors.  The individual who dreams up this
outrageous scheme, that of buying a train, bit by bit, and dressing up some
select villagers as German soldiers to make it look authentic, is none
other than Shlomo, the village idiot.  "After all, deporting ourselves
isn't exactly normal," observes one of the elders when Shlomo's credentials
are called into question.
        This all works very well in the broad sense (think: French farce),
especially when those playing the Nazis get a little too into their
characters, but it's not nearly as poignant or sophisticated as it tries to
be.  Except, that is, for the film's final shot, an image so potent it
effectively silences all the levity that has preceded it.
        Lionel Abilanski, who plays Shlomo, is oddly peripheral (village
idiots don't exactly foster empathy, unless they're played by Jim Carrey I
suppose), but a fine French actor with the unlikely name of Rufus gets
exceptional mileage out of his character of Mordechai, the person entrusted
by the community's rabbis to lead their people to "the Promised Land,"
another metaphor which is handled somewhat heavily.
        Daft and daffy, "Train of Life" rumbles down the track with much
silliness and a lot of cute scenes to its credit.  Compared to "Life is
Beautiful," however, Radu Mihaileanu's film has a long way to go.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Roozi khe zan shodam (2000)
        The Iranian film "The Day I Became a Woman" ("Roozi Khe Zan Shodam") is a
promising trifle.  It's comprised of three vignettes that highlight the
plight of women during various stages of life.  It starts out with a story
about a nine-year-old girl, follows it up with a story about a married,
middle-aged woman, and closes with a story about an elderly grandmother.
        The final chapter is the most intriguing of the three--it has a creativity
and levity that's missing from the first two chapters.  But even it
contains some of the same distracting elements which plague its
predecessors: a naďveté of viewpoint, a sledgehammer approach to metaphor,
and a pacing that tests both physical and mental limits.
        For all of its shortsightedness, however, "The Day I Became a Woman" often
hints at a future fine filmmaker at work.
        In the opening vignette, Hava is about to turn nine.  In Iran, this
signifies entry into womanhood, a time Hava will no longer be allowed to
associate with boys.  This is particularly hard on Hava, who wishes to hang
out with her best friend, Hassan.  As it turns out, Hava doesn't become a
woman until noon, so she has one more hour to play with Hassan--her
grandmother gives her a stick and tells her that when its shadow
disappears, her time is up.  Hassan, unfortunately, isn't allowed to play
with Hava because he has homework to do.  Hava buys some candy and they
share a lollipop through the bars of a window which, given how long
first-time director Marzieh Meshkini lingers on this scene, no doubt breaks
all sorts of taboos in her homeland.
        The second story focuses on a bicycle race.  It's not obvious it's a race
at first, just two dozen women, all dressed in black, billowing chador, out
for a ride on their flashy, ergonomically-designed racing bikes.  It's a
nice image.  Then two men on horseback ride up and begin insisting that one
of the women, Ahoo, dismount.  She refuses, adamantly.  As the race
continues, the situation escalates to the point where the tribe's elders
become involved and the woman's husband threatens to divorce her if she
doesn't concede to his tyrannical demands.
        The third and final segment features an old woman who returns from a trip
and begins to spend her large inheritance on "everything she never had
growing up."  With the help of some willing boys, she turns a beach into a
veritable IKEA--tables, chairs, and a four-poster bed litter the sandy
stretch, as do home appliances of every size and kind.  As the grandma buys
something new, she removes a knotted reminder from one of her fingers yet
by the time she's done, there's still one red ribbon left.  Even though she
asks a number of the boys if they would like to be her son, she cannot
remember what the final ribbon represents.
        In this way, all three stories are rather unsubtle in their presentation
of the underlying themes of the restrictions placed on women in Iranian
society.  While Hava's tale is slow and uninvolving, the second story is,
perhaps, the most interesting culturally but its significance is hampered
by the repetitive nature of the race itself and the conflicts it generates.
 In the film's closing segment, Meshkini mostly gets it right with a nice
balance between poignancy and humor.  The film is short--a mere 74
minutes--but the bicycle race sequence in particular drags it out for much
longer (or so it seems).
        Although certainly pretty to look at--all three stories take place
alongside the mint green Persian Gulf--"The Day I Became a Woman" is not
wholly successful, but it does have enough intriguing elements to warrant a
viewing.  Hang in there and stay until the end, though.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
        Being pulled from his north of England boarding school and forced
to work in a factory to support his family; watching his best friend die
before his eyes, hung like a side of mutton on a barbed wire fence during a
Great War skirmish; interred in a prisoner of war camp; and, throughout all
this, having to shoulder what was then the burdensome stigma of
homosexuality.
        It was certainly enough to turn this particular man towards
Hollywood, where he attempted to unleash his demons, his "electrical storms
in the brain," through the creative and cathartic process of film making.
        By the time he took his own life in 1957, James Whale, the
legendary director of "Frankenstein," "The Bride of Frankenstein" and other
classic movies from Hollywood's Golden Age (including, believe it or not,
"Show Boat"), was seriously ill.  He had also fallen from grace from the
studio system that had created him, living out his years as a painter of
portraits and still lives.
        "Gods and Monsters" is a speculative account of the last days of
this iconographic filmmaker.  It entertains the notion that Whale, who was
slowly losing his mind, might not have acted alone and that his final act
may have included more than a walk-on for his gardener, Clayton Boone
(Brendan Fraser).  While this idea is certainly an imaginative one, the
journey to that point as envisioned by writer/director Bill Condon, is less
intriguing, unfolding like a Playgirl magazine-styled hybrid of "Ed Wood"
and "Love and Death on Long Island."
        The ailing, disillusioned Whale is brought to life by that great
English thespian, Sir Ian McKellen.  McKellen conveys more with a raised
eyebrow than Fraser does with his entire body.  It's an authoritative
performance, much like Ian Hurt's was in "Love and Death...," but the film
suffers the same fate of spending entirely too much time focusing on the
not terribly fascinating theme of a lustful, aging queen salivating over an
unsophisticated, impressionable boy-toy.
        With the more interesting background material left underdeveloped,
we're given to assume that any gay war veteran with a rough childhood would
opt for a career making horror movies.
        For all of the interesting possibilities inherent in Condon's
source material, the single most important thing one learns about James
Whale, according to the film, was that he was a dirty old man.  His
Germanic, longtime domestic help Hanna (Lynn Redgrave, who steals every
scene she's in) stands by dutifully yet disapprovingly as Whale talks the
sweaty, muscular Boone into posing for him.  "Just your head," he tells him.
        And it certainly is a great head.  During one fantasy sequence,
Whale and Boone, silhouetted as they stagger across a barren, war-torn
landscape, are uncanny in their resemblance to Colin Clive and Boris
Karloff as Frankenstein's monster and it's at times like these, when Condon
takes the time to parallel scenes from Whales' movies, that "Gods and
Monsters" comes alive.  More of this, and less of the idle sexual entendres
(take that dueling cigar sequence for example), would have made for more
engrossing cinema.
        Neither the temptations of the flesh nor the final seduction of
death paint a compelling portrait of the multi-talented James Whale.  "Gods
and Monsters" makes that abundantly clear, but it misses an opportunity to
tell us more about the true father of Frankenstein.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
        The Disney studios has its formula for annual, full-length animated
features down so pat that it's hard to remember which one you're watching
at any given moment.
        Once again we have a tale focused around a strong central character
(female as usual; Disney is one of the few studios whose heroines--Ariel,
Belle, Pocahontas, and now Mulan--get equal screen time with their heroes
in recent years).  Add the requisite love interest and a wise-cracking
sidekick or two, pep up the soundtrack with a handful of strategically
placed show tunes (an introspective number by a pool or looking in a
mirror, a rousing anthem, a cutesy, montage-backed crowd pleaser), pose a
few threats to our engaging lead, and tie things all up neatly by the
closing credits.  Bob's your uncle!
        Kids will no doubt go ga-ga over "Mulan" (or at least the fast food
tie-ins), but familiarity can, after a while, leave grown-ups--this
reviewer included--wishing for a little more.  Maybe an animated feature
without--shock! horror!--the songs, for example?  Or maybe a film in which
a cheeky Chihuahua called Pepe longs to become a matador from Trinidad??
How about simply ditching the sidekicks altogether?
        Like Disney's previous entries, "Mulan" is slow to make its mark.
The animation tends to suffer from some slackness in the early going and
the humorous element, a madcap dragon wannabe (in the guise of a loquacious
lizard with a case of dry mouth, courtesy Eddie Murphy's animated vocal
talents), plays like an inappropriate if necessary (formula-wise)
afterthought.  However, after about an hour everything comes together and
the formula, like it or not, clicks.
        Highlights include a spectacular cavalry charge on a snow-covered
pass (which, due to the sophistication of today's computer-generated
imagery, is hard to tell from the real thing), a memorable, show-stopping
musical interlude ("I'll Make a Man Out of You," penned by Matthew Wilder
and David Zippel), and last but not least, Mulan herself.
        Voiced by Ming-Na Wen, Mulan is Disney's strongest female character
to date.  When hordes of Huns pour over China's Great Wall and threaten to
overthrow the Imperial Palace, the emperor decrees that every family in the
land dispatch one man to serve in the Imperial army.  Since Mulan's father
is infirm, but proud, the high-spirited Mulan steals her father's armor
and, incognito, signs up to face the Mongolian menace.
        Attracted to, but not distracted by, her commanding officer Shang
(B.D. Wong), Mulan outmatches her fellow combatants in smarts, wit, and
physical ability.  She's a woman of the '90s a couple of millennia ahead of
her time.

Title
Review for When Harry Met Sally... (1989)
     If imitation is the sincerest form of flattery, then Woody Allen should
feel sincerely flattered by WHEN HARRY MET SALLY..., Rob (THE PRINCESS BRIDE)
Reiner's latest romantic comedy.  The comparisons between this film and Allen's
ANNIE HALL are inevitable -- Reiner almost seems to be inviting them in fact.  
But, whilst it doesn't quite match that film stylistically, it does come
awfully close on occasions.  
     The film stars Billy (RUNNING SCARED, MEMORIES OF ME) Crystal and Meg
(INNERSPACE, D.O.A.) Ryan in the title roles.  They are two mismatched
individuals -- she an aspiring journalist, he a successful political consultant
-- who meet and fall in love, yet don't fully realize it until twelve years
afterwards.  
     Prior to that revelation, the two of them bump into each other on two
separate occasions and end up discussing love, sex, and marriage.  Harry's
philosophy on life is that a man can never be friends with a woman to whom he's
attracted because "the sex thing always gets in the way."  Nevertheless he
finds Sally "empirically" attractive.  What follows is a love/hate relationship
in which the hate often outweighs the love.  
     When Harry and Sally meet for the third time in twelve years, it's in a
book store.  "There's a man staring at you in Personal Growth," comments
Sally's girlfriend Marie.  She's played by Carrie Fisher of Princess Leia fame
and, together with Bruno Kirby as Harry's best friend Jess, provides the two
leads with staunch acting support.  
     The screenplay, by Nora (HEARTBURN) Ephron -- who also serves as the
film's Associate Producer -- is well-structured but misses some of the insight
and astuteness which garnered ANNIE HALL an Academy Award back in 1977, the
year this new film opens, ironically.  Nevertheless, it remains consistently
funny, with writing of the "In a city of 8 million people, I have to run into
my ex-wife!"  calibre.  
     But the nicest surprise is Meg Ryan's performance as Sally.  Frankly, it's
a gem.  Although not known for her comedic talents, director Reiner certainly
brings them out in this movie.  Working shoulder-to-shoulder with Crystal, a
comedian of considerable skill, Ryan is never out of her depth and often
outshines him.  
     Crystal's rendering of the smug, know-it-all Harry often drifts into some
of the characterizations which populate his stand-up routines, and it's
distracting at times.  His character doesn't develop much throughout the course
of the movie.  In fact, one of the few things that does change about Harry is
the length of his sideburns.  
     Sally, on the other hand, develops significantly.  The scene in which she
learns that her ex-boyfriend has recently married is a joy to watch.  Ryan's
red-eyed, rag doll hysterics are spot on and beautifully realized.  And there's
a scene in a sandwich bar which is an absolute riot.  
     WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... opens with a bouncy, nostalgic jazz tune
reminiscent of Woody Allen's later films.  Reiner also intersperses the action
with documentary-style interviews -- a common Woody Allenism -- between married
couples.  Seated against a pastel backdrop, they discuss how they met and how,
after all these years, they're still together.  And the film's subject matter
itself -- New Yorker's neuroses about sex, marriage and relationships -- is
prime Woody Allen territory.  
     Moviegoers who don't particularly like Woody Allen, but enjoy his brand
of humor, might get a big kick out of WHEN HARRY MET SALLY....  At its worst,
the film is simply derivative.  But at its best, it holds its own against some
of that director's finest work. 

Title
Review for Sliver (1993)
     The first problem with SLIVER is its title.  Sliver.  What, like a
sliver of glass?  Or maybe it's like slaver (as in saliva).  Or maybe
it's just a typo (silver, slither, livers?).  And why is the "L"
italicized in the print ads like that, anyway?
     The title is a reference to New York's upscale Sliver Building
from which, at the film's outset, a striking blonde--who Just So
Happens to bear an uncanny resemblance to Sharon Stone--steps out for
some fresh air.
     It's an opening that screams "flashback," but wait!  That's not
Sharon Stone after all.  It's just someone who looks like her.  Maybe
there's more to this movie than meets the eye.  Too bad.  There isn't.
     Stone plays book editor Carly Norris, who moves into the same
fashionable East Side apartment from which her hapless lookalike took
that fatal plunge.  Faster than you can say "character exposition,"
here's Stone, straight-haired, serious and stylish, coming to grips
with a failed marriage.  Stone's Norris takes liberties with the term
schizophrenic; she's hip (preferring Pearl Jam to Pavarotti), she's
insecure, she's tough.  She's a self-confessed putz, mousy one minute,
vavavoomish the next.  And, as we'll soon find out, she's not the kind
of woman who minds getting her hair mussed.
     Within minutes of moving in, she's hit on in the lobby by icy
computer geek Zeke Hawkins (William Baldwin, he of the piercing
stare).  Zeke offers to carry her packages for her.  Of all the
characters in this film, Baldwin's has the most depth.  He's kinda
likable ... in a dopey, grinning, psychopathic kind of way.
     Tom Berenger plays washed-up writer Jack Landsford, who's
introduced to Norris by her boss (the serviceable Martin Landau).
Landsford wants to know all her secrets.  Norris doesn't appear to be
on the make, but every time a man makes a pass at her in this movie,
she's making dinner reservations.  But she pays the price in a
restaurant strip poker scene with Hawkins that's particularly
embarrassing.
     Stone may try her best, but she doesn't have much to work with.
This is surprising considering novelist Ira Levin's reputation for
clever, complex thrillers.  Screenwriter Joe Eszterhas, who penned
Stone's last film, the notorious BASIC INSTINCT, doesn't add much to
the puzzle with his paper-thin adaptation.  For all its bestseller
status, SLIVER's plot leaves more than a few loose ends hanging
around, and whatever happened to suspense?  This is the kind of movie
in which tension is created by characters never finishing their
sentences.  "You were there when she...?," etc.
     Polly Walker (star of last year's ENCHANTED APRIL) plays Norris'
fast-talking neighbor Vida Warren.  Imagine Tracey Ullman playing
Elvira, Mistress of the Dark, and you'll understand what a change of
pace this is for the versatile British actress.  It's a pity she's
given so little screen time.
     So, do we get to see Sharon in the buff?  You bet.  Her early
bathtub masturbation scene is an obligatory, stylized mishmash that
plays like an outtake from a Madonna video.  Stone and Baldwin go at it
a couple of times it's true, but because there's no real chemistry
between the two stars (Berenger plays it safe and keeps his pants on),
there are few sexual fireworks here.  And this from a film that bills
itself as a kinetically-charged piece of eroticism.
     SLIVER's best scene is an accidental encounter between Carly
Norris and two unwilling and unknowing participants in her recent
initiation into high-tech voyeurism.  Stone's nonverbal display of
discomfort is about the only subtle touch in the film.  The impact of
that scene is heightened by its proximity to Sharon's earlier Big
Montage of Human Emotions. Here she watches--and (over) reacts to--the
private images on the closed circuit television screens: the funny, the
sad, the sexy, the frightening, Real Life for the MTV generation, 52
channels and everything on.
     There's a lot of talent behind this film--aforementioned writer
Eszterhas, cinematographer Vilmos Zsigmond (with additional photography
by Lazslo Kovacs), director Phillip (PATRIOT GAMES) Noyce--but
somehow it doesn't show on the screen.  If you *really* like to watch,
try renting PEEPING TOM, Michael Powell's 1960 classic of sex,
violence and voyeurism.  It's everything SLIVER tries to be, and more
so.
     Silly title aside, SLIVER does have, at its best, one of the
most unconventional endings in recent memory.  At its worst, it's just
not very interesting.


Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
        "Best in class."  "More bark than bite."  "Christopher Guest's film
has gone to the dogs."  It would be all too easy to make these kinds of
obvious asides about "Best in Show," director Guest's latest mockumentary
(or dog-umentary--there's another one), but if the performer has learned
anything since his "Saturday Night Live" days it's the art of subtlety, and
"Best in Show" is far from being a droll exercise of owners who look like
their pets.  The film follows the pampered pooches and their persnickity
owners in competition at Philadelphia's Mayflower Dog Show intercut with
that mock-interview style which Guest does so well (see: "Waiting for
Guffman").  Going for the blue ribbon are the two left-footed Gerry Fleck
(co-writer Eugene Levy) and his wife Cookie (SCTV's Catherine O'Hara)--her
randy ex-boyfriends keep showing up; a bickering yuppie couple supercharged
on Starbucks (Parker Posey and Michael Hitchcock) whose weimeraner holds
them in high contempt; Guest himself as Carolina fly fisherman Harlan
Pepper (his skills include ventriloquism and naming many varieties of
nut--peanut, pine nut, macadamia nut); a flamboyantly gay couple (Michael
McKean and John Michael Higgins) with their hyper-coiffed Shih Tzu; and,
rounding out the field, a win-at-all-costs lesbian handler and her lover
(Jane Lynch and Jennifer Coolidge).  Outside the ring these able performers
are given an additional boost by Ed Begley Jr. as a hotel proprietor, and
Fred Willard and Jim Piddock as, respectively, a doltish ringside
commentator and his despairing, stiff-upper lipped British counterpart.
Guest's attention to detail is uncanny and that makes the deadpan "Best in
Show" remarkably assured.  You could almost call it the best of its breed.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
As a faithful screen version of "Starship Troopers," Robert Heinlein's
classic 1959 science fiction novel, Paul Verhoeven's latest film might find
more than a few detractors.  But as a brainless bubblegum movie, it's an
exhilarating adrenaline rush.
Advances in digital technology have allowed "creature effects" supervisors
to bring monsters out of the darkness and expose them in plain
sight--gazillions of them, in fact.  Visual stylist Phil Tippett's dinosaur
stampede in "Jurassic Park" was jaw-dropping enough, but on the open,
desolate landscapes of "Starship Troopers"' Klendathu and planet P, his
team of brilliant technicians have raised the bar even further,
computer-generating an army of ferocious, insect-like aliens that are
nothing less than astonishing.
"Starship Troopers" is a film of two distinct halves.  Its first hour
concentrates on plot and character development, with the second hour almost
entirely dedicated to what amounts to one big Bug Hunt (the script's
working title).  This is just as well, because the war is so exhausting, so
relentless, that two plus hours of this would have left even the most
resilient viewer a little shell-shocked.
In a future world dominated by Federal Service campaigning, three high
school hopefuls are eager to enlist.
Johnny Rico (newcomer Casper Van Dien) wants to become a "citizen" in order
to impress his girlfriend, Carmen (played by Denise Richards).  Carmen
aspires to pilot her own spaceship some day.  And Dizzy Flores
("Dragonheart"'s Dina Meyer), who has the hots for Johnny, schemes to
follow him into military school and create a little triangular friction in
the process.  "Mobile infantry and Fleet don't mix!" we also learn.
"Starship Troopers" isn't afraid to poke fun at itself, and this is largely
what makes the first half watchable.  There's also some predictable boot
camp sadism that we've all seen before (only better), but once the kids
graduate and start kicking some bug heiney, there's no stopping these
troopers.
After the disastrous "Showgirls," director Verhoeven has returned to more
comfortable terrain and an opportunity to re-deploy his highly visceral
style, as one might expect from the man who made "Robocop" and "Total
Recall."  "Starship Troopers" is big on gore--very big--with pretty boys
and girls being torn limb from limb at the slightest provocation.  But it's
so over the top that most viewers will become desensitized to it early on.
Verhoeven's casting of bit players from television's "Melrose Place" and
"Beverly Hills 90210" works surprisingly well.  Even with its R-rating (for
extreme violence, and for some language and nudity), "Starship Troopers" is
clearly aimed at the teen market, who should have no trouble relating to
all those fresh young faces and jutting jaws.
Few in this generation are likely to have read Heinlein's book, or even
realize the film's screenplay is based on material from another medium, but
if taken at face value, "Starship Troopers" is an effects-laden thrill ride.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
        "American Pie" does for deep dish baked goods what "There's
Something About Mary" did for styling gel.
        Ever since Cameron Diaz first put *that* stuff in her hair,
filmmakers have been trying to out-vulgar the Farrelly Brothers' runaway
hit of last year.  With its story of four high-school seniors forming a
pact to lose their virginity before they graduate, "American Pie"
screenwriter Adam Herz has devised a fertile proving ground for doing
precisely that.
        While it's not subtle (not that anyone could accuse the Farrellys
of subtlety either), it sure is funny, and its fine young cast keeps the
film humming along even if, as with "'Mary," the vulgarity is often way
over the top.
        The four high schoolers who form the core of this juvenile sex
comedy aren't your typical teenage stereotypes.  In fact, they're all
pretty normal, right down to the burning desire to cross that line into
manhood.
        Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) has the advantage over his three
friends in so much as he actually has a girlfriend.  And he's even made it
to third base with her which, he tells his friend Jim (Jason Biggs, with a
'macadam geek cut), is like warm apple pie.  But Vicky (Tara Reid) is
looking for the L-word (not to mention perfection) for her first time and
Kev isn't quite ready for that.  Vicky's girlfriend is played by Natasha
Lyonne who, unfortunately, fails to live up to the promise she showed in
"Slums of Beverly Hills."  She simply follows Vicky around making off-color
remarks.
        Jim has an understanding father (played by Eugene Levy, the only
"star" name in the picture) who tries to educate his son in the sexual
reproduction arena, much to Jim's obvious embarrassment.  Finch (Eddie Kaye
Thomas) is also girlfriend-less, perhaps because of his unusual habit of
heading home from school every time he needs to use the bathroom.  And Oz
(Chris Klein), the sensitive one of the bunch, is an affable big lug of a
lacrosse player (Klein played an affable big lug of a football player in
"Election") who joins a singing group in order to stake his claim on an
unsuspecting vocalist.
        The "action" tends to center at the home of the loudest, most
abrasive guy on campus, who throws the kind of wild parties at which most
kids get drunk, get sick, get laid, and pass out.  Stifler, expertly played
by Seann William Scott, is a spot-on personification of the jock we've all
had the misfortune to know at one point during our pubescent years, but
it's Stifler's Mom (Jennifer Coolidge) who gets one of the film's biggest
laughs.
        Although director Paul Weitz has a real knack for conjuring up
outrageous scenes (which include such props as a tube sock, the
afore-mentioned lattice tart, the Internet, and everybody's favorite, a
bottle of laxative), he's not quite as adept at pacing the scenes for
maximum effect.  Often the punch line is staring us right in the face for
several minutes while Weitz waffles around with the set-up.  Fortunately
Herz makes up for Weitz's poor timing by cramming his script with enough
raunch and risqué humor to sink a battleship.
        "American Pie" has already knocked "Wild Wild West" off the top
spot and word of mouth will assure it of a huge box office return.  For all
of its crudeness and lewdness, the film does provide something of a public
service: it teaches us that sex is as wholesome, natural, and all-American
as apple pie.

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
        Now that "Boogie Nights" has made disco respectable again (well,
fashionable at least), we shouldn't be surprised to see more films
glorifying that dubious era.
        The latest art house interpretation is Whit Stillman's "The Last
Days of Disco."  Stillman, who made "Metropolitan" and "Barcelona" using
some of the same actors, uses disco's final hours to highlight what is
another conversation-heavy movie that benefits from typically astute
writing from the director.
        The young, upwardly-mobile professional (don't call them yuppies!)
men and women of "The Last Days of Disco" frequent a prestigious New York
City nightclub pulsating to the bass-pounding rhythms of Earth Wind and
Fire, Amy Grant, and Andrea True Connection.  Here they talk and talk and
talk, intellectualizing about such things as dating, success, and being
liked, accepted, and admired.  If talk is cheap, "The Last Days of Disco"
must surely have been an extremely inexpensive movie to shoot.
        What makes the film so entertaining is that this preppie,
Harvard-educated jet set actually have something to say and say it with
wit, perception, and style (including, at one point, a riotously inventive
deconstruction of "The Lady and the Tramp").
        Naďve Alice (Chloë Sevigny) and sophisticated Charlotte (Kate
Beckinsale) are recent college graduates who work as assistant editors for
a New York publishing house.  Charlotte is confident and outspoken--perhaps
a little too outspoken; Alice is shy and introverted, "like a kindergarten
teacher."  The two friends often doll themselves up and head out to the
nameless nightspot, looking good and looking for excitement (and that Ms.
Beckinsale sure looks good on a dancefloor!).
        Here they meet, or re-meet, a variety of eligible men, many of whom
they knew in college.  Des (played by Stillman favorite Christopher
Eigeman) is one of the club's managers whose job is on the line for
sneaking his ad agency buddies in the back.  Des has reached a crisis point
in his life: he just found out--last Wednesday, in fact--that he's gay.
Whether it's true or not, it makes for a convenient excuse to dump his
latest girlfriend (Jennifer Beals in a small but soul-baring turn).
Charlotte observes cattily that the only gay thing about Des is his mouth.
        Jimmy (MacKenzie Astin) is the advertising exec who, by the end of
the picture, winds up heading for a new job opportunity in Spain (visions
of "Barcelona"?).  Josh (Matt Keeslar) is an assistant district attorney
who dreams of being able to say, just once, "book this clown!"  And Robert
Sean Leonard plays another one of Alice's revolving suitors; the two have
an amusing exchange about the true definition of virginity.  Any film that
can make Robert Sean Leonard palatable is worthy of respect in my book.  In
fact, the entire ensemble is appealing in that well-spoken Stillman way.
        While the eschewing of "ferocious pairing" is a favored topic of
conversation in the film, the protagonists tend to slip in and out of love,
lust, and trouble with each other in an emotional merry-go-round that
cleverly develops its characters through the "preferred" dynamics of social
group interaction.
        More mature than Stillman's previous two films, "The Last Days of
Disco" is as consistently droll as it is stimulating.  It's a movie you
should definitely get on down to.

Title
Review for Regarde la mer (1997)
        What could be more idyllic a vision than a mother and her
ten-month-old daughter vacationing together amid the sun, the sand, and the
sea?  And what could be more threatening to the beauty and innocence of
that natural harmony than a creepy, malevolent loner insinuating herself
into their tranquil lives?
        That's what François Ozon's brief yet chilling "See the Sea"
("Regarde la mer") is all about, and it's generally effective in its
sometimes subtle depiction of escalating malice.
        Sasha Hails is convincing as Sasha, the lonely mother on holiday
with her infant daughter.  Into their lives comes a nomad-like traveler
called Tatiana, who happens upon their ocean-front property and asks to
pitch her tent on their land.  Sasha is reluctant at first but, stimulated
by the prospect of someone to offer her temporary companionship since her
husband has been waylaid in Paris, she finally agrees.
        As effective as Hails is Marina de Van as the stranger who preys on
Sasha's vulnerability.  With her bloodshot eyes, ripped clothing, and
dirt-ingrained fingernails, Tatiana is not the kind of person one would
normally invite over for dinner.  Sasha, with the best of intentions, does
and Tatiana becomes a guest in her home.
        This is where the film, unfortunately, defies a certain logic.  Who
would go trotting off to town leaving their baby daughter in the care of a
total stranger, and one with questionable personal hygiene habits at that?
Perhaps it's because Tatiana claims to have once been a nanny, but her
scatological dinnertime repartee--focusing on epidurals and
episiotomies--should have tipped off the most accepting of xenophiles.
        Nevertheless, Ozon's film succeeds as any good horror film should
by making the threat of violence more prominent than the violence itself.
The mood is heightened by including a toddler as one focus of the danger:
the little girl (credited as Samantha) is extremely natural in front of the
camera, blithe and innocent to the advancing disquiet.
        She cries incessantly for her mother throughout the film and it
doubles the existing tension--her plaintive wailing is enough to push even
the most well-meaning of psychopaths over the edge.
        Many films can be accused of being overly long but that isn't the
case here.  At just fifty-two minutes, "See the Sea" is, if anything, not
quite long enough to completely establish the tension required for its
heart-stopping finale.  Ozon is guilty of adding some distracting scenes,
such as the surreal one in which Sasha leaves the calm and serenity of the
brick-red beach to join the libidinous men who walk the shaded woods like
zombies.
        It's a rare observation that a film needs to be 15-20 minutes
longer in order to be more effective.
        Showing with "See the Sea" is Ozon's 1996 short "Summer Dress"
("Une robe d'été").  This fifteen-minute film is an appropriate precursor
to the main feature with its similar beachside setting and portentous
homoerotic subtexts.  Not only that, but it makes embarrassingly full use
of the Sonny Bono-penned ditty "Bang Bang," fervently delivered on the
soundtrack by a French chanteuse called Sheila.

Title
Review for Pillow Book, The (1996)
Let me get one thing straight from the outset.
In "The Pillow Book," eclectic British director Peter Greenaway's exotic
tale of calligraphy and eroticism, you get to see Ewan McGregor's thing.
McGregor, the hot young import of "Trainspotting," "Emma," and this
summer's "Brassed Off!," has proven a bankable commodity in a few short
years, so "Ewan McGregor...  Penis!" might seem an unusual summation of his
career to date (this is how one audience member economically previewed his
latest film to a fellow viewer).  Penises come in all shapes and sizes,
from intimidating, turkey neck monsters to little doggy do-shaped
squigglers, and such is the preponderance of penises on parade in "The
Pillow Book" that sitting through it feels like watching "Multiplicity"
with Harvey Keitel in the lead.
While some might not find the flaccid male organ particularly attractive,
Greenaway's fearlessness in displaying it so flamboyantly does satisfy a
sense of equality.  With all too many actresses--talented ones
included--being required to bare all to secure even the leanest of parts in
a mainstream movie, Greenaway provides the rare opportunity for male
performers to show us what they're really made of.  McGregor, if for
nothing else, should be commended for his willingness to stand around naked
for the sake of Art.
Or in the case of "The Pillow Book," body Art.
Challenging, irritating, but always sumptuously decadent, Greenaway's films
are about as far removed from traditional cinema as you can get.  He's also
controversial; his "The Cook, the Thief, His Wife & Her Lover," clearly the
work of a truly gifted and original filmmaker, helped usher in the NC-17
rating.  Another reason to get excited by a Greenaway movie is that they
don't come along all that often.  His last movie to open in Philadelphia
was the stylish, sleepily Shakespearean "Prospero's Books" in 1991.  For
some reason--and it wouldn't be the first time this has happened to the
filmmaker--his 1993 film "The Baby of Macon" seemed to have trouble finding
a distributor.
This time around, Greenaway's elaborately ornate work draws its origins
from a pillow book (diary) of a 10th Century Japanese courtier called Sei
Shonagon.  Her writings focus on lists of "things which make the heart beat
faster"--plum blossom covered in snow or all things indigo-colored, for
example.  As the story switches to modern-day Japan, we find Sei Shonagon's
journal being read to Nagiko (played in adulthood by Vivian Wu) by her aunt.
"God makes a clay model," her father (Ken Ogata), a renowned calligrapher,
explains to the young Nagiko on her birthday while painting elaborate
greetings on her face.  "He paints in the eyes, the lips, and the sex.
Then he paints in the owner's name lest he should ever forget it.  When he
approves of his creation, he signs his name in order to bring it to life."
After witnessing her father involved in a sexual situation with his
publisher (Yoshi Oida), Nagiko carries these teachings forward in her adult
life, seeking out the ideal lover-calligrapher, one who can not only
fulfill her obsession with writing on human skin, but assist her in
exacting revenge on the publisher.  In this way she can honor her father.
McGregor's naive translator/scribbler Jerome provides Nagiko the foil she
needs for both endeavors.
Greenaway constructs his story about "flesh and the writing table" with an
experimental barrage of mattes, overlays, and subtitles, switching from
black and white to color and back again.  Words pour like rain.  Excess is
always a good word to describe his style, yet with "The Pillow Book,"
Greenaway's obsession with language, both written (the bold brushstrokes of
the Japanese characters) and spoken (Wu's stilted yet effective narration)
complement the visual imagery superbly.
The director has himself admitted that his process of making films is
actually more rewarding than watching them.  With "The Pillow Book," Peter
Greenaway explores a subject that provides an ideal medium for his peerless
technique.  For this reason, the watching is reward enough.

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
        Those behind "Ever After" have taken an enormous gamble.  In
perhaps the boldest piece of counter-programming this summer, 20th Century
Fox is pitting its disarming Cinderella story against earth-threatening
meteorites, swashbuckling Mexicans, soldiers of both the small and saved
variety, not to mention that mean green lizard who's still stomping around
out there.
        But judging from the reaction of a largely youthful Monday night
crowd--and a pretty voluminous one at that--"Ever After" seems to be well
on its way to becoming a surprise hit.
        What screenwriters Susannah Grant, Rick Parks, and Andy Tennant
(who also serves as the film's director) have done here is to come up with
a slightly different take on the classic Cinderella fairy tale.  Only--and
this is what's most intriguing about the film--it's not really all that
different.  You can't call it a "modern" adaptation of the story, since
most of the film takes place in 16th-century France.  And simply referring
to it as a "live action" version doesn't quite cut it either.
        Perhaps the film's closing voiceover explains things best: "It's
not that they lived happily ever after, it's that they lived."
        The story is the standard riches-to-rags tale of a young girl
forced to live and work for her unsympathetic stepfamily and falling for a
handsome prince in the process.  There are some nice enhancements to the
yarn, like the stepsisters not being particularly ugly (one even turns out
to be an ally), and the prince not wanting "those certain obligations that
come with privilege."
        But the true pleasure in watching "Ever After" is believing that
this fairy story (attributed to the Brothers Grimm) actually happened to
real people.
        The film is a big step up for Tennant (whose previous turn at bat
was the Matthew Perry/Salma Hayek romantic comedy "Fools Rush In") and he
rises to the occasion.  While more functional than inspired in the
production design department, "Ever After" nevertheless features some
impressive French chateaux, "Babe"-inspired rustic settings and, to back
all that prettiness up, a George Fenton score that makes more than a casual
nod to Mark Knopfler's lyrical musings for The Princess Bride.
        Drew Barrymore is the cinders-encrusted Danielle and she continues
her stilted acting style that served her well in "The Wedding Singer"
(that's two enchanting films for two this year from Barrymore).  Her
popularity among teenage girls is clearly evident, yet Barrymore manages to
win the entire audience over with her genuine smile and plucky joie de
vivre.
        Dougray Scott, looking partly handsome and partly like Oliver
Platt, plays the charming prince Henry, and Anjelica Huston, who appears to
have learned a thing or two from the raised eyebrow school of acting
courtesy former beau Jack Nicholson, pulls out all the stops as Danielle's
wicked stepmother, the Baroness Rodmilla.
        "Ever After" might also be one of the few films to feature Leonardo
da Vinci solely for comic relief.
        Finally, a side note for parents.  The film is rated PG-13, but the
rating is ludicrous.  Save for Danielle's father suffering a heart attack
early on in the film, which is no worse than anything in most of Disney's
G-rated features, and da Vinci once referring to manure by a more colorful
term, there's nothing in "Ever After" that couldn't be seen--and thoroughly
enjoyed--by young children.

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
Appealing actors alone do not a romantic comedy make.  The genre defines a
film that is light, charming, and cute.  While "Addicted to Love" is
certainly all of those things to a degree, and *does* offer the charismatic
Meg Ryan and Matthew Broderick, for some reason it's missing that magical
spark that puts it in the same league as, say, "When Harry Met Sally..."
When his girlfriend Linda (Kelly Preston) jilts him for a French
restarauteur, Sam (Broderick) heads for the big city to try and win her
back.  Sam, an astronomer by profession, holes up in an abandoned building
across the alley from his ex and rigs up an elaborate camera obscura to spy
on her.  This fantastical device, constructed from bits and pieces from the
office, projects fuzzy images of his former lover's comings and goings onto
the whitewashed walls of his hideout like a big screen TV.  Clearly he made
the wrong career choice somewhere down the line; few private investigators
get this good a look at their quarry.
When an unwelcome visitor, Maggie (Ryan) drops in on Sam's stakeout, it's
soon clear why.  This guy Anton (Tcheky Karyo) that Linda is, er, seeing,
is Maggie's ex.  Et voila!  Maggie's contributions to the surveillance
operation include a cactus--quirky--and a number of strategically-placed
microphones, which pick up every sigh, gasp, and moan from the neighboring
love loft.
Sam and Maggie's voyeuristic goals are very different, however.  Sam is
gathering data in a scientific attempt to chart Linda and Anton's
inevitable break-up.  For the star-struck Sam, Linda's condition is just a
passing phase, like a new moon.  Maggie, on the other hand, simply wants to
exact revenge.
The contrivances of the script are mostly predictable (letting cockroaches
loose in a restaurant, for example), although it is amusing hearing Anton
explain to Linda why he smells like expensive perfume, or has lipstick on
his collar.  "Why would I have sex with ze hamburger when I can make love
to ze steak?" gasps Anton in his defense.  Maggie and Sam grimace more than
usual during that interpersonal exchange.
At one point the film turns into "Mystery Science Theater 3000," with a
tipsy Ryan and Broderick sitting in for the wise-cracking robots, dubbing
the muted lines of their rivals with much wit and pathos.  Less charming is
Maureen Stapleton's character, who shows up for five minutes simply to tell
Ryan "your tits look like rocks."  And frankly, Broderick is starting to
lose some of that puppy-ish charm that has worked so well for him in the
past.
"Love can sometimes be a very difficult thing," begins Linda's 'Dear John'
letter to Sam early on in the picture.  Watching "Addicted to Love" can be
occasionally tedious, but it's not without its moments.

Title
Review for Hands on a Hardbody: The Documentary (1998)
        These may seem like mighty powerful reasons why an outspoken cowboy
called Benny would enter the annual, tortuous "Hands on a Hardbody" contest
in the sleepy Texan town of Longview, but Benny has an even better one.
Benny won the first ever contest, sponsored by Longview's Jack Long Nissan,
back in 1992.  After an incredible 87 hours, Benny was the last person to
have his hands still firmly planted on the body of a brand-new Nissan
flatbed truck as his remaining few opponents fell, walked, or were carried
away.
        In S. R. Bindler's remarkable documentary, "Hands on a Hardbody,"
the year is 1995 and Benny is back to try his luck a second time.  This
time around there are 24 competitors and, as in previous years, the rules
are simple: contestants must stand with at least one gloved (to avoid
scratching the paint) hand on the vehicle at all times; there must be no
leaning on the vehicle, and no bending of the knees to stretch the legs;
there will be five-minute breaks every hour, and 15-minute breaks every six
hours.
        The last man (or woman, since men hardly dominate this contest)
standing wins.
        In a decade of "real" TV, this might appear a less-than-riveting
study of the lengths to which people will go to win something big (in this
case a $15,000, fully-loaded pickup).  But what makes the film so
compelling is Bindler's confident technique, the poignant theme (in the
tradition of "They Shoot Horses, Don't They?"), and the memorable array of
characters who congregate under the large tent on the Jack Long parking lot.
        Characters like Norma, who listens constantly to religious music on
her walkman and is supported by a prayer chain of several hundred people.
And Angie, who claims that she doesn't think she could ever do something
like this again (only to return the following year).  And the toothless
husband who claims to have "conditioned" his equally toothless wife for the
event.
        And there's Benny himself, of course, who commands center stage
with his attempts at highbrow pontificating.  He's been here before, so he
knows what it takes.  "It's not about stamina, it's about sanity.  It's
mind over mind, it's about having the metal.  It's not a contest, or a
competition, it's a real human drama."
        Bindler's bargain-basement approach--"Hands on a Hardbody" looks
like it was shot on a Fisher Price kiddiecam and transferred to Standard 8
film--adds to Benny's so-called "human drama."  By the end of the
competition, the last two contestants hug each other long and hard, one in
congratulations, the other in commiseration.  It's at that moment you
realize that everything Benny has said, no matter how ridiculously clichéd
it first sounded, is true.  This feat of physical and mental endurance is
as much about kinship in adversity as it is about winning a truck.
        And with blood, sweat, and tears--and a lot of humor--"Hands on a
Hardbody" brings that reality home.  It might be "a work by S. R. Bindler,"
but it's an absolutely fascinating one.

Title
Review for Goodbye Lover (1999)
        "Goodbye, Lover" sat on the shelf for almost a year since its
lukewarm reception at the Cannes Film Festival last May, and one look will
tell you why.  It's a mess.  And that's *way* before Ellen DeGeneres shows
up.
        The film is one of those torrid double-indemnity crime stories
that, in this case, required the services of three screenwriters.  I
suspect that one wrote a sexy thriller, one wrote a murder mystery, and one
wrote a comedy, then director Roland Joffé tried to piece it all together
in the editing room while scratching his head in bewilderment.
        I didn't laugh at Ellen DeGeneres much (I think I was supposed to).
DeGeneres is horrible and her character is even worse, a tough-talking
vulgar cop with a bad wardrobe and bad hair.  Either DeGeneres is wearing a
wig--as most of the actors appear to be--or she doesn't yet have enough
clout to secure a hairstylist.  Every single word out of her mouth is
supposed to be racy and hip, but her incessant wisecracking is
poorly-written and merely stupid.  Her reaction to the brutal killing of a
jogger is "at least she died healthy."  And that's one of her wittier
asides.
        DeGeneres' Sgt. Rita Pompano is called in to investigate the
allegedly accidental death of...wait.  To give away too much of the plot
would all but ruin a film that has very little going for it outside of its
numbing plot twists and multiple triple-crosses.  It's best described this
way:
        Sultry sexpot/real estate agent Sandra Dunmore (Patricia Arquette)
is married to Jake, a "creative yet unfocused" (and alcoholic) advertising
rep, played by Dermot Mulroney.  Sandra likes to act out her deep-seated
sexual fantasies and Jake's brother Ben (the suave-as-ever Don Johnson)
likes to help.  Ben is also coming on to his petite, mousy co-worker Peggy
Blaine (Mary-Louise Parker) and someone, somewhere, is planning to cash in
on that huge life insurance policy of his.
        The film is ripe with cheating lovers cheating on each other and
back again.  Although there are some genuine surprises, the plot twists get
too contrived too quickly.  Probably around the time DeGeneres' gumcracking
gumshoe appears.
        At least the former "Ellen" star is going for something a little
different.  Arquette turns in Yet Another of her stiletto-heeled, platinum
blonde bombshell roles (see: "Lost Highway," "True Romance") while quoting
embarrassing lines like "I'm not wearing any underwear."  I hope she got
paid a lot of money to do this.
        Here's an example of some of the film's flat-out stupidity.  Sandra
purchases a used car and disguises herself in a red wig prior to stalking
two of the film's duplicitous lovers.  She drives the motorbiking couple
off a cliff while blaring her favorite "The Sound of Music" on her car
stereo, intent on identifying herself to her hapless victims.  So what was
the point of the wig and the car?
        "The Sound of Music" stuff might be a reference to "The Wizard of
Oz" allusions in David Lynch's "Wild at Heart," but if so Joffé must have
forgotten that "Wild at Heart" was a despicable movie.  It's hard to
believe that "Goodbye, Lover" was directed by the same person who made "The
Killing Fields" and "The Mission."  It's not, however, hard to see why it
sat on the shelf for so long.  It should have stayed there.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
        If there's anything to be learned from "Mission: Impossible 2" it's
that, contrary to popular belief, machine guns really aren't all that
dangerous.
        I can't for the life of me remember how many times magazinefuls of
bullets are unloaded at our spry hero Ethan Hunt, yet he simply ducks,
dodges, grins, and returns fire as if there were no tomorrow.
        Unfortunately there IS a tomorrow, and it's arrived in the form of
a very unnecessary follow-up to a very poor big-screen version of a great
'60's television series, aka "Brian De Palma mucked up the first one; now
let's watch John Woo muck up the second."
        Woo, the man responsible for such masterful Hong Kong actioners as
"A Better Tomorrow," "The Killer," and "Hard-Boiled," has style--that
cannot be denied.  But substance?  "Mission: Impossible 2" contains some of
the most inane dialogue ever uttered on the silver screen.  How about "I'm
not going to lose you" sobbed to a cute one-night stand?  And remember the
fantastic cleverness of the original TV series so blatantly absent from the
first "MI" movie?  Well it's even more absent here.  Second time around,
the only plot twist is the ol' rubber mask removal trick which happens at
least five times until, frankly, it's lost ALL of its appeal.
        Of course, Tom Cruise is super dreamy even though his incessant
grinning grates on the nerves of not only the arch villain (played by
Dougray Scott, the handsome prince to Drew Barrymore's Cinders in "Ever
After").  In fact, Tom grins throughout the ENTIRE first act until his
boss, played by the gracefully-aging and uncredited Anthony Hopkins, makes
some crack about this not being Mission: Difficult.  Harrumph!
        But come on.  This film has NOTHING whatsoever to do with "MI"-the
television series.  Bruce Geller's creation boasted intricate,
sophisticated plots that wowed you with their gadgets and complex
ingenuity.  Once the facts were on the table, the mission--should Jim
Phelps (now Ethan Hunt) and his allies choose to accept it (they invariably
did)--truly did seem impossible to pull off.  The mission in "M:i-2" is to
hire three people, make sure one of them is Thandie Newton, and recover a
stolen virus named Chimera.  Now how impossible is that?
        Newton, of course, provides the sexy love interest and she performs
this task admirably.  The other two agents are Ving Rhames, who knows how
to use a computer, and some Australian guy who knows how to fly a
helicopter.  So far this sounds like Mission: Piece o' Cake.  Scott, as the
villain, is refreshingly wholesome--and perfectly decent--but even he gets
stuck in too many obvious situations.  How many films have you seen in
which the bad guy threatens to neaten the tip of someone's pinkie as if it
were a slim Cuban panatela?
        If the only problem with "M:i-2" were its sparkling lack of
originality, then audiences might still find some enjoyment in the
interminable action sequences.  But even these are lacking Woo's trademark
sophistication.  There's gunfire a-plenty, but it all seems rather noisy
and unchoreographed.  Tom and Dougray engage in a motorcycle showdown in
which they race at each other at 100mph, leap from their mounts, collide in
mid-air, wrestle each other to the ground, and STILL find the energy to
kick each other in the head for fifteen minutes.  This was easily the
film's funniest scene, according to my pre-teen daughters.
        Likewise, the scariest scene is when Thandie injects the virus into
her own arm--"I just wasn't thinking!"--and the dumbest scene is when
Dougray shoots his own henchman without first checking to see if he was
wearing a Tom Cruise mask.  And to think Robert Towne ("Chinatown") wrote
this screenplay.
        It's never boring, but "Mission: Impossible 2" might well be the
silliest movie you'll see this summer.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Ride with the Devil (1999/I)
        If you compare "Ride with the Devil" to such American Civil War
epics as "Gettysburg" and "Glory," then Ang Lee's film is always going to
come up short.  Although already touted as an epic, the only epic aspect of
the latest film from the director of "Eat Drink Man Woman," "Sense and
Sensibility," and "The Ice Storm" is its length, and that's only 134
minutes.  That's not much of a showing alongside "Gettysburg"'s staggering
four hours plus.
        So one really needs to look at "Ride with the Devil" on the
strength of its individual merits.  Fortunately it has one that stands out:
strength of character.
        The story here is one of a small band of renegades caught in the
middle of an escalating civil conflict.  The war they wage on the
Missouri-Kansas border is not one of North vs. South, Blue vs. Gray, but a
smaller, more intimate struggle--that of friend against friend, neighbor
against neighbor, father against son.
        Jake Roedel ("Pleasantville"'s Tobey Maguire), together with his
longtime friend Jack Bull Chiles (Skeet Ulrich), George Clyde (Simon
Baker-Denny) and George's "freed" black slave Daniel Holt (Jeffrey Wright),
form a band of bushwhackers after Chiles' family is slaughtered by
marauding Unionist jayhawkers.  These genteel Southern gentlemen, their
long hair flowing like lions' manes, take it upon themselves to rid the
surrounding countryside of anyone they suspect of being a Yankee
sympathizer.
        Jake and his fellow mercenaries hole up for the winter in a
makeshift shelter they've dug out of the side of a hill on the property of
a pro-Southern landowner.  The landowner's daughter Sue Lee Shelley (pop
ingenue Jewel, appropriately subdued) visits them on her mule, bringing
them vittles, her prim and proper presence making them all feel a little
uncomfortable in their ramshackle, muddy environs.
        From time to time there are bloody skirmishes in which nameless,
faceless Federals are massacred, young or old it doesn't seem to matter,
but the film finds greater strength in focusing its efforts on the men and
their inevitable waiting games.  This allows for some wonderful character
development, especially between Roedel and Holt, whose relationship up
until this point has been of the "what are you looking at?" type.  Maguire
and Wright have exactly what it takes to make their relationship--and
resulting friendship--believable, such as the scenes in which Roedel reads
letters aloud from a Union-confiscated mailbag to the illiterate Holt.
Maguire, typically, does some fine work here.
        Writer/producer James Schamus, once again collaborating with
director Lee, draws fine Southern sensibilities in a very personal story
that treats the Civil War (in the words of Daniel Woodrell's adapted novel
"Woe to Live On") as "an open wound."  This makes the long, thoughtful
"Ride with the Devil" less a history lesson than a richly rewarding
character study drawn from a historical perspective.
        With any luck the film will be marketed appropriately because with
its questionable title and Jewel buttoning down the credits, moviegoers
might be excused for expecting "Young Guns 3."  "Ride with the Devil" is
far better than that.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
In "Phenomenon," John Travolta stars as George Malley, a big-hearted,
small-town auto mechanic who goes from everyman to einstein overnight.
This ersatz drama strives for depth and meaning but instead drips like corn
syrup.
There's a birthday party for George at the local watering hole.  All his
best friends are there.  During a chess game, George steps outside for some
air.  It's late.  He's alone.  He's had a few to drink.  There's a blinding
flash, a starburst, some celestial bolt of energy.  George is knocked flat
on his back.  When he comes to he wanders back into the bar.  Checkmate!
George's first miracle.  From thereon, George acquires an insatiable
appetite for knowledge.  Suddenly he's a 2-3 books a day man.  By the end
of the film he's a 4-5 books a day freakshow.  He can perform telekinetic
party tricks with pens and pencils and other paraphenalia.  He can break
mirrors, predict earthquakes, and feel other people's pain, but he can no
longer sleep at night.  George's newfound skill set unbalances the
equilibrium of the sleepy market town.  He alientates his friends with his
cosmic powers.  They're scared of what he can do, but they're much more
interested in what the UFO looked like than in his brilliant new ideas and
inventions.  Naturally enough, George is soon picked up by the FBI which
considers him a security risk.  They want to poke him and prod him, have
him crack codes and name as many mammals as he can in sixty seconds (he
does so alphabetically, which I suspect most people can).  A Berkeley man
is also interested.
George might be able to unravel high-speed morse patterns but he can't
decipher women.  Lace (Kyra Sedgwick) is a case in point.  It's clear she
has some humongous bug up her butt.  About men, generally.  About her
husband, specifically, who walked out on her.  Sure, she has every right to
spurn George's advances.  Once or twice, maybe, or even a dozen times.  But
after about fifty or so you wonder if they had to make a **movie** about
it!
Sedgwick is pensive and furrowed and a little bit dour.  Hers is
essentially a non-part; we learn more about Lace's kids than we do about
her.  She makes artistically-challenged chairs but that's about it.
Travolta's George tries to win her over with that irresistible teddy bear
grin of his: "I'd love to get my hands on your carburetor" he tells her.
Yes, he actually says that.
Travolta is as darling as ever; Forest Whitaker (as George's pig-farming
friend Nate, who carries a torch for Diana Ross) and Robert Duval (the
town's crusty general practitioner) are typically solid in support;
Sedgwick, as discussed, is wasted.
"Phenomenon" is occasionally cute and mostly inoffensive but its soundtrack
is truly grating.  Not so much Thomas Newman's high fructose score, but
more the preponderance of "hit" songs that conveniently punctuate the
visuals just when the movie starts to drag.  Peter Gabriel's "I Have the
Touch," for example.  Duh!  Another bonehead ballad underscores a
haircutting sequence that's about as close to "Ghost" as you're gonna get,
with scissors and shaving cream standing in for potter's wheel and wet
clay.
Billed as a feel-good movie, "Phenomenon" coddles the viewer for near on
two hours with picturesque scenes of rolling farmland, heartfelt human
situations, poignancy, expectation and hope.  It observes for long periods
of time without muscling in on anything.  It bides its time.  Then,
finally, it beats you about the face and neck with its message about the
human spirit in some revelatory denouement that is at once flagrant and
unnecessary.
Cut the songs, beef up Sedgwick's role, don't sit the fence between fantasy
and reality, and you've got yourself a better movie already.  Failing that
re-edit, "Phenomenon" should be avoided by anyone with an intolerance to
saccharine.

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
Some British phenomena, like the Beatles, have crossed the Atlantic with
resounding success.
Others, such as prawn-flavored crisps, warm beer, and Cliff Richard,
haven't fared so well.
TRAINSPOTTING is the latest box office smash in the U.K.--an in-your-face
look at a group of Scottish wankers who are about as unfabulous as the Four
were Fab.  It's unlikely to appeal to Ma and Pa back home in Iowa.  Because
of its language--by degrees very adult, artsy, and acutely accented.
Because of its endless parade of hypodermics slipping in and out of pasty
flesh.  Because of its scatological excesses.  Maybe simply because of its
obscure title.
But TRAINSPOTTING manages to be hip, happening, graphic, tragic, violent,
cool, filthy, sick, and very funny, and the tragically hip arthouse crowd
on this side of the ocean are going to eat it up.
Writer John Hodge's adaptation of Irvine Welsh's kaleidoscopic novel
follows the highs and lows of a bunch of down-and-out heroin addicts who
lie, cheat and steal their way through a series of tragicomic
misadventures.  These "so-called friends" are excellently played by a
largely unknown cast.
As the film's central voice, Renton (a mesmerizing realization by Ewan
McGregor) narrates TRAINSPOTTING with all the buzz and the beauty of
Welsh's highly-stylized, antagonistic poetry.  Renton is forever aching for
just one more hit, and the lengths to which he will go are best exemplified
by the scene in "the worst toilet in Scotland."  Heroin may be a thousand
times more potent than any orgasm but in the gospel according to Renton,
Archie Gemmill's goal against Holland in 1978 ranks right up there.
Renton's "we're ruled by effete arseholes" speech in the Scottish highlands
gets the film's biggest laugh, but there's true emotion here: he half wants
to believe there are better things than the needle, but "choosing life" is
painful and damn near impossible for him.  Although Renton cynically admits
that "nothing really matters if you have a junk habit," perhaps his
greatest fear is that nothing really matters if you don't.
Then there's Spud (Ewen Bremner), a moronic, four-eyed git who draws the
obligatory sympathy vote.  His speed-induced enthusiasm at a job interview
makes for memorable cinema.
Sick Boy (played by Jonny Lee Miller), with his shock of white hair, is a
better-looking version of Jim Jarmusch.  He idolizes fellow countryman Sean
Connery, ruminating on the actor's career with an overabundance of facts
and opinions.  He's likable and interesting for the first third of the
movie, but then fades out.
Tommy (Kevin McKidd) starts out straight until his girlfriend dumps him,
then slides quickly downhill to life as a doss house smackhead and a
toxoplasmotic end.
The villainous Begbie (an unnerving performance by Robert Carlyle) is a
nasty piece of work.  His friends agree "he's psychotic, but he's a mate."
Skag deals turn sour, quiet evenings down the pub aren't, and shared living
quarters become unlivable whenever Begbie's around.
The women here are either slags, knocked up, or underage.
Massively hyped in the U.K., TRAINSPOTTING has clearly been targeted at the
youth market.  At times it feels more like a 501 jeans ad than a movie, and
its soundtrack was designed to sell: Renton raves to the pulsating sounds
of Sleeper, Blur, and Elastica; he sinks into the carpet in a drugged-out
stupor to Lou Reed's "Perfect Day"; and his dingy bedsit is described to
perfection by Pulp's "Mile End."
Director Danny Boyle (SHALLOW GRAVE) is somehow able to inject his film
with a smart sense of humor, pathos, and keenly observed characterizations
amidst unrelenting scenes of junkies shooting shite.  TRAINSPOTTING is both
offbeat and downbeat, difficult to watch at times but ultimately worth the
trip.

Title
Review for Tropic of Cancer (1970)
        Director Joseph Strick is not one to shy away from tough literary
adaptations.
        In 1967 his camera wandered the streets of Dublin, following Milo
O'Shea as Leopold Bloom, the central figure of James Joyce's masterful
"Ulysses."  A dozen years later Strick took another stab at adapting an
immortal Joycean tome for the screen, the author's first novel, "Portrait
of the Artist as a Young Man."
        Like those two unassailable works, Henry Miller's once-banned,
now-legendary "Tropic of Cancer" was considered "unfilmable" by many but in
1970 Strick took a shot at translating it too, and the film is now seeing a
re-release paired with Bernardo Bertolucci's once-banned, now-legendary
"Last Tango in Paris."  Both films are rated NC-17 today and while the
nudity is prevalent yet tame by modern standards, the sexual explicitness
of the situations (and, especially in Miller's case, the language) sets
both "Tropic" and "Tango" apart.
        Miller's 1934 semi-autobiographical novel about a bawdy expatriate
in Paris during the Great Depression was referred to by Ezra Pound as "a
dirty book worth reading," and Strick's film version, updated and told
mostly in unrelated vignettes, supports that observation by keeping most of
the author's brilliantly shocking passages--and imagery--intact.
        It stars a startlingly handsome Rip Torn as Miller and a flagrantly
nude Ellen Burstyn as his estranged, revolted wife.
        The film opens abruptly, a roman candle of golden sparks pouring
forth from a bidet under the stark, matter-of-fact titles: "Tropic of
Cancer by Henry Miller."  Cut to Miller on a Paris sidewalk, bumming
change.  French francs to feed his habit--prostitutes.  Miller wanders city
streets, past huge abandoned oil refineries, and over the Seine, talking to
himself, in his head, that inner Miller voice, that voiceover narration
that quotes huge chunks of Miller's unprintable dialogue, dialogue that
alternately worships and condemns the exposed female form.  He hooks up
with friends, associates, and lots and lots of women.  He boozes, he bleeds
a little (metaphorically speaking), he beds the women all.
        While the tone and temperament of Miller's tale is retained,
"Tropic of Cancer" is really a book to be savored at the turn of each page,
not viewed as a cinematic treatment or interpretation.  Nevertheless, it is
fun watching Torn (who's very good: a raised eyebrow here, a boisterous
belly laugh there) drink and whore and sleaze his shabby way through life
with equal amounts of good humor and worthlessness.  Burstyn's
contributions are brief but memorable.  Credited as Ellen McRae, "Tropic of
Cancer" was an early film role for her (hence, presumably, her rare display
of nakedness), one which came right before her big break as the female lead
in Peter Bogdanovich's "The Last Picture Show."
        Whereas Burstyn's hair and makeup date the then 38-year-old
actress, the film itself doesn't seem dated at all simply because the
colors of Miller's worlds coupled with his colorful expressions of desire
make the experience a timeless one.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
"In the old days, you just had to introduce a man and a woman and nature
did the rest."
So laments Jackson (Delroy Lindo), an angelic bounty hunter of sorts who,
along with co-operative O'Reilly (Holly Hunter), has been ordered back to
earth by "Chief of Police" Gabriel (Dan Hedaya) to help unite an unlikely
couple in "A Life Less Ordinary."
Robert (Ewan McGregor) is a janitor who has just lost his job to
automation.  Celine (Cameron Diaz) is the needs-to-be-indulged, spoiled
little rich girl who also happens to be the boss' daughter.  When Robert
bursts into Dad's (Ian Holm) office demanding his job back, Celine provides
for some spontaneous kidnapping material.  Robert, a bit of a dreamer,
hasn't thought this out very well, but he'll be damned if he'll be replaced
by a bloody robot, and the chase is on!
Sounds like something from the Coen brothers you're thinking.  Well, funny
you should say that...  "A Life Less Ordinary" contains a scene of a car
parked by the side of a freshly-plowed field with our protagonist
scrambling for his life in a ditch (see: "Blood Simple").  It's got a man
being walked through a thicket of silver birches to an imminent, grisly end
(see: "Miller's Crossing").  And it's got an attractive, slightly wacky
couple being hounded by some not-of-this-earth malevolence (see: "Raising
Arizona").
Could the casting of Coen alums Hunter and Hedaya simply be coincidental?
As it happens, the team that made "A Life Less Ordinary" isn't Joel and
Ethan Coen but rather the British threesome responsible for the black
comedy "Shallow Grave" and last year's transatlantic junkie hit,
"Trainspotting" (both of which starred McGregor): producer Andrew
MacDonald, writer John Hodge, and director Danny Boyle.  For their first
foray into the American mainstream, if you can call it that, what better
way to pay homage to the Coens' wild and whacked-out style than to try to
duplicate it?
For a good proportion of the film, they succeed.
The film is not as satisfying as it might be, however, due to some basic
miscalculations.  Diaz has already proven she can't sing (in "My Best
Friend's Wedding"), and the remarkably similar "dream sequence" in a
Karaoke bar just doesn't work.  The soundtrack, so well synchronized in
"Trainspotting," is all over the map here, with some songs actually
drowning out the actors' dialog in places.  Lindo and Hunter are oddly
peripheral in this picture, with Hunter resembling a strung-out Sarah
Jessica Parker, adding to her increasing roster of eccentric, unstable
women you'd be afraid to take home to Ma.  And what's with that cutesy
claymation bit over the end credits?
In "A Life Less Ordinary," writer Hodge does comes up with some very funny
scenarios, especially those involving the honest, naďve Robert hopelessly
attempting to pass himself off as a ruthless tough guy.  His love for
Celine might turn out as obvious as the trashy novel he plans to write, but
that's a cracked American romance for you, even as envisioned by a trio of
Brits.

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
        Like a rock pool left by the retreating tide, "Waking Ned Devine"
is charming, full of life, and not very deep.  This year's answer to "The
Full Monty" (not that anyone asked the question), the film even includes a
scene of a couple of grown men (make that *old* grown men) stripping down
to their birthday suits.
        While that particular sight gag provokes an inevitable comparison,
"Waking Ned Devine" is closer to "The Full Monty" in its overall tone and
temperament--this is an amiable little film with a lot of big laughs.
        "Waking Ned Devine" is set in the small Irish community of
Tullymore where one of the locals, Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen), learns that
a resident of the village has just won the national lottery.  Since
Tullymore sports a grand population of 52, Jackie believes it shouldn't be
too hard tracking down the lucky sod who correctly guessed the six numbers,
all with an eye to encouraging the individual to share his or her millions.
        And so with his dear friend Michael O'Sullivan, Jackie sets out on
his quest, convincing many of the townsfolk that *he* is the one to have
come into some money in the process.  Michael is played by David Kelly,
well known to English audiences for his television roles as Albert Riddle
the one-armed chef in "Robin's Nest" and his single yet notable turn as
O'Reilly in the "Fawlty Towers" episode 'The Builders.'
        Kelly and Bannen make for a happy-go-lucky, Laurel and
Hardy-inspired twosome with an Irish twist.
        The big lotto winner, it turns out, is a lonely old man without any
heirs named, as the title would indicate, Ned Devine.  Upon realizing he's
become an overnight multi-millionaire, Ned has expired out of shock.  This
forces Jackie and Michael into conceiving a not-too-well executed plan to
impersonate their late countryman in order to get their greedy mitts on his
winnings.
        Although this sounds like a mean, exploitative reaction to
another's good fortune, "Waking Ned Devine" doesn't handle it that way.
There are those who may interpret newcomer Kirk Jones' film as a cautionary
tale of "money changeth the man" proportions but it never pretends to be
anything more than a goofy, upbeat comedy.  Why else would there be scenes
of our heroes riding around naked on a motorcycle, futile attempts to put a
smile back on Ned's aged face, and a finale in which the village's "wicked
witch" is sent packing?
        It's nice to see Scottish character actor Bannen back in the
limelight after a handful of lackluster assignments (including a leper in
"Braveheart").  I liked Fionnula Flanagan's accomplished performance as his
wife, Annie, giving the film a grounding voice (much as the wives did in
Roddy Doyle's "The Van").  I didn't like the fact that the producers went
with an overused title structure in that "Feeling Minnesota"/"Leaving
Normal"/"Raising Cain" vein, and I thought that some of the supporting
pairings--the pastor and his skeptical young apprentice, the pig farmer and
his sweetheart--could have used a little more development.
        But overall I enjoyed "Waking Ned Divine" for its lightness, its
brightness, and its infectious zest for life, as breezy as the uilleann
pipes on its soundtrack.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
        That's the question I asked myself when venturing nervously into
"The Wedding Singer," the latest film to star the Saturday Night Live
alumnus.
        Does he draw laughs from his sad, puppy dog expression and
don't-hate-me-for-being-a-simpleton observations?  Or do fans giggle when
he screams at the top of his lungs at people?  Or is it just the fact that
he sings songs with silly lyrics that bowl audiences over?
        Well, there's a little bit of all of that in "The Wedding Singer"
and while I exited the theater still not one hundred percent sure of Mr.
Sandler's thing, I did have a surprisingly good time.
        That's because, in a nutshell, "The Wedding Singer" is one of the
sweetest movies you're ever likely to come across.  That's right.  Sweet.
The humor in the film runs the gamut from dumb to mildly amusing to
laugh-out-loud hysterical but the tone?  Well, it's just lovely.  I have to
admit I was half-expecting farting armpit humor, gratuitous nudity,
superfluous, cloying subplots, and some nasty, unnecessary violence.
Instead?  Well, I've said it before.  Sweet.
        The year is 1985 and Sandler plays Robbie Hart, the eponymous
wedding singer, a job aspiring rock stars often settle for.  When Robbie's
fiancée dumps him at his own altar, Robbie gets depressed and turns to a
plucky waitress called Julia (Drew Barrymore) who has some problems of her
own (she's marrying a hunky junk bonds dealer who, unbeknownst to her,
isn't that big on monogamy).  It isn't giving anything away to say that
Robbie and Julia fall in love.  Aww...
        Sandler and Barrymore are a good match and they're assisted by some
terrific cameo appearances, including Steve Buscemi and Jon Lovitz, whose
individual scenes are perhaps the funniest in the film.
        Writer Tim Herlihy (with uncredited assistance from Carrie Fisher)
keeps the story bubbling along to its predictable conclusion.  It doesn't
all work but it's handled with such light-heartedness that Robbie and Julia
coming together generates more smiles than groans.  Herlihy and director
Frank Coraci have done a great job of recreating the sights, sounds, and
affectations of the 1980s.  The soundtrack--an ever-present force in the
film--is packed with wall-to-wall hits of the period, new wave upon new
wave of songs from Billy Idol's "White Wedding" to The Smiths' "How Soon Is
Now?" to Culture Club's "Do You Really Want to Hurt Me?"
        The mix of music and fashion would make "The Wedding Singer" a
great double feature with "Boogie Nights."
        If you grew up listening to The Cure and A Flock of Seagulls and
The Psychedelic Furs, then "The Wedding Singer" is bound to put a nostalgic
hop in your stride.  If you're a fan of the lovable, laughable Adam
Sandler, well...  Let's just say that "The Wedding Singer" might well be
the only film in recent memory to make *me* want to rent "Happy Gilmore."

Title
Review for Rising Sun (1993)
     RISING SUN does for Japanese businessmen what THE FIRM did for
American lawyers.  However, it didn't do much for me.  I mean, it's not
a *bad* film or anything--it's sufficiently stylish and the
performances are decent, kinda like THE FIRM in that respect (another
film based on a best-selling novel).  But there's nothing particularly
*special* about it.  And when all is said and done, it goes on way too
long.
     What it *does* have going for it is bullet-proof casting,
especially of its two leads, Sean Connery and Wesley Snipes.
     LAPD special services liaison Web Smith (Snipes) is called in to
investigate a homicide at the grand opening of the Nakamoto
Corporation's multi-million dollar skyscraper in downtown Los Angeles.
Connery plays Detective John Connor, a mysterious figure knowledgeable
in Japanese relations, who's lured out of semi-retirement to assist
him.  Snipes plays reluctant *kohai* (junior partner) to Connery's
*sempai* (guide), and the two of them hit the ground running, forming a
congenial on-screen rapport.
     Hampered by negative attitudes towards the Japanese on all sides,
Connor and Smith become embroiled in a murder investigation where the
sale of advanced technology to one of the United States' biggest
competitors becomes a central theme.  There's plenty of
finger-pointing--at an easily-influenced U.S. senator, a yuppie
facilitator, and a smooth, winsome playboy to name but a few--but by
the end of RISING SUN, it's not totally clear whodunit.
     Part of the problem with RISING SUN is that we never get to know
the woman who's body is found on the boardroom table--she's bumped off
pretty early on.  Okay, so she's just a pawn, a call girl, but the film
could have been more interesting had we known
something--anything--about her.
     "Get this body out of here before it starts smelling like sushi!"
yells insensitive police officer Tom Graham (Harvey Keitel).  It's one
of many dumb sushi jokes, and another lather-rinse-repeat performance
from Keitel. Here he's cast as a bigoted bad lieutenant with a penchant
for a little Japan-bashing of his own.  He's played this kind of role a
hundred times before but if he hadn't, he wouldn't be so good at it.
Anyone who can steal a scene from Connery *and* Snipes can't be too
shabby.  On a rant about racism, Graham rails "Whatever happened to
good and evil?  Whatever happened to '*He* did it'?"  This guy's
xenophobic blusterings are laughable, and Keitel's performance is one
of the few pleasures of RISING SUN.
     Tia Carrere (WAYNE'S WORLD) plays Jingo Asakuma, a genius hacker
who helps unravel the mystery on her computer.  Although she looks
great in all that black spandex, the scenes of her manipulating videoed
images of the murder are repetitive and not particularly enlightening.
There are hints that her character is more interesting than her late
night, desktop activities would imply, but these are never developed.
     The film is badly in need of an editor.  There are too many scenes
that go nowhere and one, in which Connor and Smith are chased into the
'hood, is superfluous (and as an attempt at role-reversal humor,
embarrassing beyond belief).  And everything culminates in an awkward
final scene between Smith and Asakuma that makes you wanna scream
"Cut!"
     Director Philip Kaufman (THE RIGHT STUFF, THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS
OF BEING) has taken Michael Crichton's politically-charged novel about
corporate and cultural intrigue within the Japanese-American business
world and de-sensitized it, turning it into a slick yet pedestrian
thriller.  RISING SUN has been called a cautionary tale by many, but
Kaufman's overly diplomatic approach to this material is itself too
cautious, robbing the volatile story of its fire and passion.  His
intent may have been to downplay the tensions between two world super
powers, but RISING SUN is a long way from cultural detente.


Title
Review for 8˝ Women (1999)
        In his brilliant feature debut "The Falls," 92 biographies of the
survivors of a violent, unknown event are outlined with meticulous and
loving detail.  In "Drowning by Numbers," the integers 1 through 100 flow
through the film, pinned to trees and tin baths, painted on buildings,
cows, and passers-by.  In "The Baby of Mâcon," Julia Ormond's character is
raped 217 times.
        Numerology is just one of the eclectic British director's many
obsessions and here, for perhaps the first time, the numerical allusion
isn't oblique--it's a direct reference to Federico Fellini's "8 1/2."  "How
many film directors make films to satisfy their sexual fantasies?" queries
one of the film's leading men during a screening of Fellini's masterpiece.
It's a rare and telling admission from Greenaway--if only "8 1/2 Women"
were *his* masterpiece.  Unfortunately, the director's latest cinematic
put-on leaves a lot to be desired.
        Just as Robert Altman was able to convince Madeleine Stowe, Frances
McDormand, Julianne Moore (and Huey Lewis!) to bare all in his 1993 film
"Short Cuts," so too does Greenaway have Toni Collette, Amanda Plummer,
Polly Walker (and John Standing!) parade around in the altogether in "8 1/2
Women."  Few filmmakers are as successful in celebrating the naked human
form than Greenaway, since the director--a classically-trained painter--has
always compared the nudity in his films to the role of the nude in Art.
Think Walker as a Botticelli angel.
        In "8 1/2 Women," there's room and then some for Greenaway's
elaborate detailing, intellectual hypothesizing, and preponderance of
naughty bits.  A Swiss banker's wife dies leaving him emotionally paralyzed
and sexually unfulfilled (Standing plays the banker).  Inspired by a
screening of "8 1/2," the banker's cocksure son (an irritating Matthew
Delamere) convinces his father to populate his lavish Geneva estate with
concubines to bring his dreams to life.  This the banker does--among the
women a mother, a whore, a nun, and a legless paraplegic (the half of the
title)--yet he soon comes to recognize the darker, more disturbing side to
fantasy.
        "8 1/2 Women" is a Greenaway film through and through--intriguing
to fans and maddening to the uninitiated--but the pieces of his latest
puzzle never seem to come together in any satisfying way.  The writing is
too obviously designed to shock, the sexism too overt (this might well be
Greenaway's most misogynistic film since 1985's "A Zed and Two Noughts"),
and the structure too self-consciously convoluted.  There are hints and
reminders of greatness, such as the overlays introducing each sequence,
bird calls on the soundtrack (a throwback to the ornithological excesses of
"The Falls"?), and a kinky scene in which our protagonists sniff handfuls
of Toni Collette's recently shorn hair.
        But the picture feels incomplete, rushed, and half-hearted--for
every wonderfully constructed scene and priceless interchange of dialogue
there are awkward moments and stilted sequences which go nowhere.
        A mediocre Greenaway film still stands head and shoulders above
your standard Hollywood fare, but as films of this talented filmmaker go,
"8 1/2 Women" proves a huge disappointment.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Midnight Run (1988)
[Reviewers note: I originally saw this movie after a particularly bad
dining experience at a Chi-Chi's restaurant--over an hour wait for a nachos
appetizer!--and some of that frustration was reflected in this review.  I
have seen the movie twice since then and have developed more of an
appreciation for it.  db]
Hollywood has always been quick to cash in on popular trends in the movies.
One recurrent theme is the "buddy" picture, in which two mismatched
personalities collide, often with comic results.
The latest example is MIDNIGHT RUN in which, it appears the producers felt,
Robert De Niro's grittiness, coupled with the sensitivity of Charles
Grodin, would make for a winning combination.  Unfortunately, the film
misfires by not having enough faith in its own convictions.  Rather than
developing the obvious camaraderie between its two leads, it settles
instead for high speed action sequences and low brow theatrics.
Robert De Niro plays Jack Walsh, a disillusioned ex-Chicago cop turned
bounty hunter.  He is assigned by bail bondsman Eddie Moscone (Joe
Pantoliano, doing a good Martin Scorsese impersonation) to find and deliver
to Los Angeles an accountant named Jonathan Mardukas (Grodin).  If
Mardukas, worth a million dollars to Moscone, is returned before the 72
hour deadline expires, Walsh will earn $100,000.
Mardukas, also known as "The Duke", has embezzled $15 million from crime
boss Jimmy Serrano, a role played by TV's Dennis Farina (CRIME STORY).
Privy to incriminating evidence against Serrano, it is not suprising that
the FBI want to get their hands on Mardukas before the mob does.  As if
this isn't enough, Eddie contracts out another bounty hunter, Marvin
Dorfler (John Ashton), to complete the job, if and when Walsh fails.
Walsh develops an early animosity towards federal agent Alonzo Mosley,
played with a smoldering intensity by Yaphet Kotto.  After starting what
turns out to be a running gag concerning government issue sunglasses, Walsh
manages to steal Mosley's ID.
This makes apprehending Mardukas relatively easy.  However, delivering him
to L.A. is not as simple as Walsh had first thought.  Mardukas tells Walsh
that he is afraid to fly, as well as suffering from a string of phobias.
Walsh's response is that if he doesn't shut up, he'll end up suffering from
"fistophobia".  Such is the level of humor in this movie.
So they board a train, then a bus, and finally several cars and trucks, in
an attempt to out run their pursuers.  For all the modes of transportation
in this film, it could easily have been called PLANES, TRAINS AND
AUTOMOBILES, TOO!  In any event, all are led on a merry chase across
country as Walsh attempts to deliver the "merchandise" on time and collect
his one hundred grand.
As one would expect from a movie by the director of BEVERLY HILLS COP, an
obligatory car chase is thrown in for good measure.  A multitude of police
cars race across the Arizona desert, almost as an afterthought, and the
chase ends about as quickly as it began.
By the film's conclusion we are expected to believe that Walsh and Mardukas
have developed such mutual respect along the way that Walsh's integrity has
been renewed, causing him to renege on his contract.  It just doesn't hold
water.
It is good to see De Niro in a meatier role for a change, as opposed to his
recent larger-than-life walk-ons (notably as The Devil in Alan Parker's
ANGEL HEART and, more recently, as Al Capone in THE UNTOUCHABLES).  His
cheeky schoolboy grin certainly contribute to some of the film's lighter
moments.
Grodin, too, makes the most of his endearing qualities and at times the
chemistry between the two blossoms.  This pairing is especially effective
in the scenes in which Grodin acts as De Niro's conscience, endlessly
bugging him about his smoking and eating habits, asking him personal
questions about his private life, even talking him into visiting his
ex-wife and daughter after nine years of separation.
And the film does have its amusing moments.  For instance, when De Niro
shows his obvious lack of mathematical skills on the train and, later, when
Grodin mimics his captor in a box car.  And there's a scene in which
Pantoliano tells his right hand man that Walsh is bringing in "The Duke",
thereby saving his livelihood, to which the guy responds "This calls for a
celebration.... I'll get the donuts!"
But you have to wade through a quagmire of hackneyed and implausible
plotting in order to reach those moments, and it's too much like hard work.
Most of the laughs in this film are telegraphed way ahead of time.  Those
that are not predictable are either pretty lame or simply unfunny.  De Niro
and Grodin's subtlety is wasted in a film which would have better suited
the comedic talents of, say, Eddie Murphy.  In fact, this film bears more
than a passing resemblance to Murphy's 48 HOURS, yet it lacks that film's
wit and style.
Before boarding the plane for Los Angeles, Walsh tells Mardukas "If you
don't be quiet, this will be the worst trip of your life."  This journey
proves to be no pleasure cruise for the audience, either.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
        When you find yourself with a monster hit on your hands, as did the
producer/director team of Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich a couple of years
back with their summer smash "Independence Day," the biggest problem you
have to face is what to do for an encore.
        How do you top something as huge as "ID4"?  Do you call Will Smith
back for a sequel?  (Last summer the Fresh Prince was riding another
mid-year high with "Men in Black," so *someone* had the right idea.)  Or do
you shift gears completely, going for something smaller, more intimate
perhaps, a character study with the emphasis on acting, rather than on
action?
        Or do you do what this dynamic duo did: take a legendary screen
monster, tart him up for the nineties, and let him take a sizable bite out
of the Big Apple?
        "Godzilla" is the latest product of Devlin and Emmerich's
blockbuster machine.  Not the most inspirational of ideas one might say
(the gigantic, fire-breathing lizard from the fifties has already been the
subject of countless sequels in its homeland Japan).  But, at twenty
stories high, this "Godzilla" was big enough a concept to secure a
mega-million dollar budget and the go-ahead from TriStar Pictures.
        Borrowing conveniently, if not necessarily intelligently, from
"Jurassic Park" and countless other creature features--"Alien," "Jaws,"
"King Kong," etc.--"Godzilla" is like Steven Spielberg's movie in a number
of ways.  First and foremost, "Jurassic Park"'s dinosaurs outclassed the
human elements in terms of acting ability, and that's pretty much the case
with "Godzilla."  Nothing much has been learned or even attempted in terms
of making the pint-size humans running around underfoot the remotest bit
interesting.
        But c'mon.  Nobody goes to see "Godzilla" for the performances.
This is "Raging Lizard," not "Raging Bull."
        "Godzilla"'s unambitious writing is assisted by the
budget-conscious casting of Matthew Broderick (who plays a "worm guy" from
the Nuclear Regulatory Commission) and bit-player Maria Pitillo--who's
terrible--in the leads, with Jean Reno ("The Professional") and Hank Azaria
(Nat the dog-walker on TV's "Mad About You") along for the ride.
        All four are upstaged, perhaps deliberately so, by the rampaging
reptile.
        Like "Jurassic Park," "Godzilla" is bone-crushingly loud,
destructive, and headache inducing.  It's also dumb as nails; no surprises
where the money got spent.  Spielberg's 1993 film set a new standard in
computer-generated animation and creature effects, and "Godzilla" has
surely taken advantage of some of those advances.  However, what's
disappointing about the film is that most of the mayhem takes place under
cover of darkness, and in a torrential rain storm, which feels like, well,
a cheap shot.  New York still gets trashed--the radioactively-mutated,
French Polynesian lizard finds Manhattan a good place to build a nest--but
it would have been nice to have seen a little more of it.
        Early criticisms of the film have pointed out the mindnumbing
aberrations of logic in the film's central plotting.  This is true enough
but no matter how brainless, "Godzilla" is still an enjoyable Crunch 'n'
Munch spectacular.  It does remain prudent to point out to Mr. Devlin and
Mr. Emmerich, however, that as far as box office word of mouth is
concerned, sighs *do* matter.

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mars (2001)
        John Carpenter makes B-movies.  Always has ("Halloween," "Escape from New
York," "The Thing") and, by the looks of it ("They Live," "Escape from
L.A.," "Vampires"), always will.
        Carpenter's latest horror opus with a science fiction bent (or science
fiction outing with a schlock horror bent) is the aptly-titled "John
Carpenter's Ghosts of Mars" (in case, I suppose, you went looking for
someone else's "Ghosts of Mars").  Like all those films prefixed by the
very possessive "John Carpenter's," "Ghosts of Mars" is an unashamed
B-movie punctuated by a B-movie plot, B-movie actors, and B-movie special
effects.
        In category one, above, we have a storyline that borders on idiotic (and,
at times, chaotic).  Dormant Martians (i.e., swirling red gases) awakened
by meddling humans possess the souls of hapless mining colonists rendering
them testy Marilyn Manson lookalikes.  All this explained (in flashback) to
some grand Pooh-Bah counsel by Martian Police official Melanie Ballard
(Natasha Henstridge, from the sub-"Species" films), the only returnee on a
silly-looking train.  Officer Ballard went in to bring back incarcerated
felon James "Desolation" Williams; what she found was not a pretty picture.
        In the second category we have Ms. Henstridge, her blonde hair pulled back
tightly and awkwardly into a ponytail, Ice Cube (as the appropriately-named
"Desolation"), Pam Grier (briefly, oddly--who wanted to work with whom I
wonder?), and a host of extras all assuming that the story and special
effects were going to carry this film and therefore they didn't need to try
too hard.
        In category number three we have, in addition to those swirling red gases
and the silly-looking train, a couple of bird's-eye-view shots of a
sprawling Martian metropolis (reddish also).  State-of-the-art special
effects have never been a Carpenter trademark and once again the
writer/director (who seems to have no problem finding work, however)
doesn't waste any of the film's budget in that department.
        "Ghosts of Mars" is lock, laughing stock, and barrel all your standard
Carpenter fare: dingy interiors, cluttered exteriors, inane dialogue, lots
of leather, scarred, crazed-looking aliens, and lots and lots of weaponry.
The film often and always explodes into warfare without
warning--spontaneously, stupidly.  Carpenter might like to think he's made
a western here but it's a western without any real heroes, villains, or
border conflicts.  It's just the shootouts minus a hissing Snake Plissken.
I never thought I'd miss the guy but I do.
        It's not *all* the same, however.  Dubbed the "one-note wonder" for his
minimalist music soundtracks, Carpenter seems to have graduated from
simplistic (yet effective) scoring by highlighting his action with loud,
screeching guitar work.  Fortunately this drowns out a lot of the dialogue.
 The final exchange between Henstridge and, er, Cube though is both audible
*and* priceless.
        Mars has proven an infertile breeding ground for Hollywood in the last
year or so, what with the stillborn "Mission to Mars" and "Red Planet"
(with Val Kilmer).  "Ghosts of Mars" sadly adds to those disappointing
returns (in its opening weekend it was overshadowed by a bunch of sequels,
among them "American Pie 2" and "Rush Hour 2").  The irony is that the Mars
in Carpenter's film feels sadly absent.  There are occasional references to
the red planet, of course, but the film might as well have been set in
Perth Amboys than on earth's closest neighbor.
        Two things keep "John Carpenter's Ghosts of Mars" from getting a huge slap
upside the head.  1. Henstridge keeps her top on (miraculously), and 2. the
film doesn't pretend to be anything it's not.  What that means, however, is
that fans of superior, intelligent, grade A sci-fi/horror are singularly
out of luck.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
It's hard to disassociate Michael Richards from Kramer, the role (for those
of you who've been in a plastic bubble this past decade) he plays on TV's
"Seinfeld."  Richards has defined Kramer's personality--every slap happy,
pratfalling, wildly gesticulating character trait--so completely that his
recent forays into big screen roles have smacked of Kramer, albeit on
varying doses of medication.
Wise-acre critics have already dubbed Richards' latest movie "My Cousin
Kramer," as the film is directed by Jonathan Lynn, whose previous courtroom
comedy "My Cousin Vinny" made Marisa Tomei a star.  However, "Trial and
Error" has a lot more going for it than just Richards' typically ebullient
performance.
Richards plays Ricky Rietti, an unemployed actor who throws his best
friend, attorney Charles Tuttle (Jeff Daniels), a humdinger of a bachelor
party the night before Charlie's career-making court case.  With Charlie
incapable of showing up for work the next day, Ricky steps in, using his
improvisational skills to try to establish a defense.  In a cut-and-dried
case of fraud (Rip Torn's Benny Gibbs is accused of selling pennies as
"copper engravings of Abraham Lincoln" for $17.99), all Ricky needs to do
is get a continuance.  Instead, he makes matters worse.
Austin Pendleton, as Judge Graff, presides over Ricky's ad-libbed antics
and neatly depicts the deterioration of a confident authority figure to a
blubbering imbicile over the course of the trial.
Daniels is wonderful at playing straight man to the likable Richards, and
gets a good number of laughs himself.  Positioning himself as Ricky's
assistant, Charlie attempts to guide Ricky through the legal proceedings,
with whispered directions, cue cards, even a nursery monitor (after he's
finally removed from the courtroom babbling demands for a recess).
In a sweetly-handled subplot, Charlie courts a hotel waitress, Billie (the
fetching Charlize Theron).  Their blossoming relationship is played out
against a spectacular Nevada backdrop of snow-capped mountains and bright
blue skies.
"Trial and Error" is a nicely balanced blend of zany comedy and touching
romance.
With "Seinfeld"'s Julia Louis-Dreyfus and Jason Alexander currently making
the movie circuit with roles in "Father's Day" and "Love! Valour!
Compassion!" respectively, Richards' central performance in "Trial and
Error" further underlines that show's prime time popularity.  (What next?
Jerry starring in a Hollywood version of "Sunday in the Park with George"?)
If you're a dyed-in-the-wool Kramer fan, then "Trial and Error" is likely
to appeal to your sense of slapstick.  If you're not, it's a lot of fun
anyway.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
        From its opening frames of a fallen leaf settling on a pool of
water, it's clear that "A Bug's Life" is no ordinary kiddie cartoon.  The
attention to detail in this scene is extraordinary and, fortunately for the
viewer, that level of detail is maintained throughout the entire
production.  Not just in terms of the animation which--from Pixar, the
studio that previously brought us "Toy Story"--is nothing less than
amazing, but in terms of the writing, the characterizations, the music--in
fact, the whole kit and caboodle.  "A Bug's Life," no more a kid's film
than "Toy Story" was a kid's film, has it all: a clever story (a misfit ant
tries to save his colony from despotic grasshoppers by rounding up some
"bad bugs" but accidentally recruits a bunch of inept circus performers
instead); strong characters voiced by skilled performers (Kevin Spacey is
perfect as Hopper, the evil grasshopper leader, Julia Louis-Dreyfus is
Princess Atta, and Dave Foley (TV's "NewsRadio") plays the hapless Flik); a
rousing musical score by Randy Newman; a wry, irreverent, and often-times
hilarious script by John Lasseter and Andrew Stanton that caters to
grown-ups as much as it does children; and unsurpassed computer animation.
In fact, there is so much to take in on a first viewing that "A Bug's Life"
is the kind of film that benefits from its home video release, with the
opportunity to rewind and replay favorite bits (no doubt including the
end-credit "bloopers").  "A Bug's Life" also features the vocal talents of
Phyllis Diller, Denis Leary, Bonnie Hunt, Roddy McDowall, John Ratzenberger
("Cheers"), "Fraser"'s David Hyde Pierce, and the late, great Madeline
Kahn, to name a few.  Highly recommended.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Chacun cherche son chat (1996)
Leave it to the French to take an idea as simple as a young woman searching
for her lost cat and turn it into an evocation of life, love, and the big
city.
More specifically, credit first-time writer/director Cedric Klapisch, his
leading actress Garance Clavel, and a fine assortment of non-actors who
give "When the Cat's Away," above all, a true heart.  Oh, and let's not
forget Arapimou who plays Gris-Gris, the missing feline at the center of
this largely improvisational piece, who's credited above most of the real
life performers!
Clavel plays Chloe, a "small, slightly pale brunette who wears tight
jeans."  Twentysomething and sick to the nines of her workaday job as a
makeup artist, Chloe longs for a vacation, but there's a snag--her beloved
cat, Gris-Gris.  No one is willing, or able, to catsit him for the week.
Including her gay roomate, Michel (Olivier Py), who jokingly suggests she
"chuck him out of a car."  Including a friend for whom Chloe watered the
plants at Easter.  In fact, no one.  (If you've ever had pets, you'll
understand the difficulties in offloading them during the holidays.)
Finally Chloe finds relief in the form of a batty old lady, Madame Renee
(Renee LeCalm), who runs a cathouse of a less lascivious kind.  When Chloe
returns from her trip, however, Gris-Gris is "perdu," and the hunt for the
inappropriately named animal (Gris-Gris is unquestionably black) is on.
What began as a short subject has been expanded by director Klapisch, who
uses the storyline as a springboard for showing us the changing face of
Paris.  Gentrification is hitting the city and hitting it hard.  Cafes that
sell cups of coffee for four francs are being knocked down to make room for
coffeehouses that sell them for ten.  Music stores are being replaced with
high-priced boutiques.  Small, family-run businesses are giving way to
large, impersonal supermarkets.  Tenants are being evicted every which way
in order to accomodate unchecked urban growth.
The metropolitan landscape might be succumbing to the wrecker's ball but
the inhabitants are harder to displace.  Klapisch weaves a colorful
tapestry in his depiction of Chloe's neighbors, colleagues, and cat-lovers,
from the dotty old women who form a cross-city network of concerned persons
(including the head of "Cats Are People, Too"), to Michel's revolving
lovers, to a mysterious drummer who catches Chloe's eye.  In addition,
there are the rough-edged inhabitants of the local watering hole, including
the dim-witted Djamel (Zinedine Soualem, who resembles an emaciated Tom
Jones), who accompanies Chloe on most of her circuitous adventures.  He
even offers to take her to the seaside...but that's how she got into this
mess to begin with.
Newcomer Clavel is tremendous as Chloe, convincingly portraying a woman
battling a sense of loss and loneliness.  Her attempts to find true love on
the streets and in the nightclubs of a pulsating Paris are marked both by
sadness and humor.  "When the Cat's Away" is most successful at blending
these elements in a way that resists easy interpretation: with whom should
Chloe ultimately wind up, and is her cat really partner enough?  That said,
the film's final image of a joyous Chloe running down the street is
remarkable.  It's likely to stay with the viewer for a long, long time.

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
        Although this weasel-y character actor has over 70 movies to his credit
he's still not a household name.  His face, however, is instantly
recognizable, a cross between Willem Dafoe and John Waters on a good
day--arched brow, thin hair, slightly crooked teeth.  Buscemi almost always
improves any movie he's in, whether it's an uncredited turn in an Adam
Sandler comedy ("The Wedding Singer," "Billy Madison") or a classic Buscemi
creation itself: Chet the Bellhop in "Barton Fink," Mr. Pink in "Reservoir
Dogs," Map to the Stars Eddie in "Escape from L.A.," Garland "The Marietta
Mangler" Greene in "Con Air," and now simply Seymour in "Ghost World."
        Buscemi is never likely to be mistaken for a leading man, but he's come
about as close as it gets in Terry Zwigoff's film.  Zwigoff's previous
feature was the 1994 documentary "Crumb" (about the underground artist
Robert Crumb) and with "Ghost World" the director has once again gone
thumbing through the world of comic books for his cinematic inspiration
(the film is based on the popular underground rag of the same name).
        Seymour isn't exactly the star of "Ghost World" but he's the catalyst at
its very special center, a social misfit who greatly affects the
relationship between two high-school outcasts (played by Thora Birch--the
daughter in "American Beauty"--and Scarlett Johansson--the daughter in "The
Horse Whisperer").  Birch and Johansson fulfill the promise they showed in
their earlier work and the character of Seymour is, perhaps, Buscemi's best
work to date.
        And that's saying a lot given the many memorable characters he's given us
over the years.
        Enid (Birch) and Becky (Johansson) are best friends who have just
graduated from high school.  Whereas Becky is responsible and quickly finds
a job to pay for the apartment she hopes to share with her "neo cool"
friend, Enid--a counter-culture rebel through and through--has different
ideas.  As a prank, the girls respond to a personal ad by arranging a bogus
meeting in a tacky diner with a middle-aged loser (Buscemi), but Enid soon
becomes so obsessed with the man, a self-deprecating collector of old blues
78s, that it begins to threaten her friendship with Becky.
        "Ghost World" is slow moving and thoughtful and worth savoring, as
director Zwigoff (together with Daniel Clowes, creator of the original
comic book) unearth the frustrations and discontentedness experienced by
individuals--here two teenage girls--reluctantly forced to face reality.
The performances in the film are all excellent, from the three leads to
almost all of the supporting players (including Bob Balaban as Enid's
ineffectual father, Illeana Douglas as an art teacher with pretensions, and
Teri Garr--in a scene not much longer than the one in the trailer--as Maxine).
        These are indelible, finely-etched characters that, together with Enid,
Becky, and Seymour (especially Seymour), stick with us long after the film
is over.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
With its fondness for slick Armani wardrobes, Caddies with ample trunk 
space, and Italian family restaurants, the Mob is a prime target for 
parody.  Filmmakers willing to make a mockery of organized crime have a 
relatively easy task, but it takes a certain skill to rise above the 
ordinary.
Recently, "Jane Austen's Mafia!" used the gag-a-minute technique (first 
unleashed on the unsuspecting public in "Airplane!" by the team of 
Zucker, Abrahams, and Zucker) to lampoon "The Godfather" and its many 
cinematic wannabes.  In "Analyze This," director Harold Ramis 
("Groundhog Day") and his screenwriters have found their own secret 
weapon to ridicule the Mafiosi in Robert De Niro.
De Niro, himself an alumnus of the influential "Godfather" series, has 
played a mobster on innumerable occasions.  Yet with "Analyze This," 
Hollywood's most prolific of actors proves that, even after all these 
years, he's still capable of something a little different.
De Niro plays mob boss Paul Vitti and at times in the film you'd swear 
you were watching a sequel to "Goodfellas": De Niro is unsparing in his 
portrayal of a ruthless, tough-as-nails gangster, from his dress sense, 
to his Brooklyn patois, to his everyday behavior (not all of it good).  
But Vitti has a problem.  He's starting to go soft.  He worries a lot, 
and is experiencing these so-called panic attacks.  Oh, and he bursts 
into tears at the slightest provocation.  Not something someone in his 
profession would be wise to admit.
But when he does confess to needing help to his bodyguard, the 
terrifically dumb Jelly (Joe Viterelli) just happens to be carrying an 
appropriate business card.  Earlier that evening psychiatrist Ben Sobol 
(Billy Crystal) rear-ended Jelly's limo and was quick to provide 
insurance information.
Vitti meets "da shrink" and realizes, much to Sobol's chagrin, that 
he's the man to solve all his problems.  Soon to be married (to 
"Friends"' Lisa Kudrow, who fails to add much to the proceedings), Sobol 
tries valiantly to sever his blossoming relationship with Vitti, but 
instead succeeds in winning the confidence of the uncompromising 
mobster.  Winning in the sense of:
Vitti: "Do you know who I am?"
Sobol: "Yes."
Vitti: "No you don't."
Sobol: "No I don't."
Vitti, sporting De Niro's knowing wink and pointing an appreciative 
finger at his analyst: "You...  You...  You're good."
Sobol: "Well, I wouldn't..."
Vitti (voice raised threateningly): "You're good!"
Crystal *is* good, but he's a comedian first and an actor second, which 
causes him to exhibit some annoying smirkiness in "serious" scenes.  De 
Niro, on the other hand, is an extraordinarily versatile actor who can 
nail comedic roles, and that's the significant difference between the 
two performers.  The script does require Crystal's character to stand in 
for De Niro's during the big meeting of the mobs, thus allowing Crystal 
to deliver his virtuoso gangsta shtick in the face of Vitti's rival, 
played with well-dressed menace to society by Chazz Palminteri.
Unfortunately, the film's subject matter necessitates some large doses 
of violence in and amongst the couch trips, but De Niro and Crystal work 
so well together that the inevitable whackings seem almost forgivable in 
context.
A slightly bent cross between "Midnight Run" and "What About Bob?," 
"Analyze This" is a successful product of casting.  The movie 
overreaches its conventional "*You* try telling him his 50 minutes are 
up" promotional campaign by delivering two deft, on-the-money 
performances that bring down the house.  Crystal is good, and De Niro is 
even better.


Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
Last year around this time, moviegoers were treated to a loud, explosive,
big budget summer blockbuster called "The Rock."  Produced by Jerry
Bruckheimer and Don Simpson, the film featured some big-name stars, a
no-name director, and a plot concerning a bunch of terrorists making life
difficult for our hero, Nicolas Cage.  This summer, following the death of
partner Simpson, Bruckheimer is flying solo, bringing us a loud, explosive,
big budget action flick that features some big-name stars, a no-name
director, and a plot concerning a bunch of convicts making life difficult
for our hero, Nicolas Cage.
Sounds like a can't-lose formula, doesn't it?
Whereas "The Rock" was an intelligent, exciting, noisy piece of
entertainment, "Con Air" is just plain noisy.
What "Con Air" is missing, first and foremost, is Sean Connery, whose
dignified presence grounded "The Rock."  "Con Air" has an impressive
line-up of stars, but not one of them can fill Connery's shoes.
John Cusack, as U.S. marshal Vince Larkin, tries his best, but his
character--an "annoying, wise-ass bookworm creep"--is too fresh faced and
frantic to bring this picture home.  Colm Meaney plays a real meaney of a
D.E.A. agent, Duncan Malloy, whose sports car license plate reads "AZZ
KIKR."  Both want to bring the plane down, Larkin safely, Malloy with
extreme force, so there's plenty for them to bicker about on the ground.
Then there's the fleshed-out roster of killers, rapists, and general
threats to society onboard the massive C-123 transport plane that's
transferring them all to a maximum security prison:
John Malkovich, as Cyrus "The Virus" Grissom, the leader of the piece, who
likes to brag that he's killed more men than cancer.  It takes more than a
shaved head and a few snappy one-liners to play the embodiment of evil.
Malkovich plays it for laughs, but his obvious asides ("Welcome to Con Air"
and "Thank you for flying Con Air," for example) grow tiresome quickly.
And after all, Connery's often-imitated "Welcome to the Rock, gentlemen"
sounded so much better with a Scottish brogue.
Ving Rhames ("Striptease," "Rosewood"), as the militant Diamond Dog,
doesn't have much of a role.
The hatchet-faced Danny Trejo is Johnny 23, so named because of the number
of women he's raped.  He's featured in a particularly vile scene, in which
he threatens to make Rachel Ticotin's prison guard number 24, all in the
name of cinema.
And last but not least, Steve Buscemi plays the Hannibal Lecter-inspired
sociopath Garland Greene, replete with leather face mask and ironic
observations.  Buscemi actually gets the most frequent flyer mileage out of
his character simply by playing it straight (if you're familiar with
Buscemi's work, you'll know that's not easy).  As the cargo plane crash
lands on the Vegas strip, Buscemi's character is singing "He's Got the
Whole World in His Hands," proving beyond a doubt his psychotic tendencies.
Yes.  For Buscemi, that's pretty straight.
As someone in the film astutely observes, this motley crew of undesirables
makes the Manson family look like the Partridge family.
Then there's Cage, as parolee Cameron Poe.  Poe's heading home to meet his
wife and daughter after serving an eight-year sentence for manslaughter,
the result of some necessary roughness outside a bar and a feeble defense
lawyer.  Poe gets to stow his carry-on luggage with Grissom's gang, and you
just know he'll have more to worry about than "stale peanuts and a little
turbulence."  (Speaking of "Turbulence," the smug "Con Air" arrives even
later at the gate than that absurd '96 flightfest.)
Cage has an interesting filmography, including a recent Oscar-winning
performance in "Leaving Las Vegas."  He's had his greatest moments playing
oddball characters such as H.I. McDonough in "Raising Arizona"; the bitter,
passionate baker in "Moonstruck"; and a cockroach-eating bloodsucker in
"Vampire's Kiss."  Although his flagrant shirtlessness in "Con Air" proves
that he's buff-enuf to play an action hero, it seems a pity to waste his
unique talents on this kind of pap.
In "Con Air," a lot of things blow up, and blow up some more.  After about
two hours, the explosions, shootings, explosions, wise-cracks, explosions,
and intrusive sentimental interludes get very boring.  While assuredly
market wise, "Con Air" is significantly less than Rock-solid.

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
        He moves through the night with the lumbering bulk of the grizzly
bear and the stealth of the sleek panther.  He cruises the urban NYC
streets in stolen luxury cars listening to his favorite gangsta grooves on
the surround sound.  He worships at a makeshift altar with incense and
oranges.  He sleeps with the pigeons.
        When he strikes, his hits are swift, effortless, and final.  He is
Ghost Dog and his ways are those of the Samurai.
        He, Ghost Dog, is played by Forest Whitaker in a lumbering, sleek
performance and he, Whitaker, is directed by Jim Jarmusch, the decidedly
inventive filmmaker of such oddball classics as "Stranger than Paradise"
and "Night on Earth."
        Whether or not you're a Jarmusch fan, it's hard to deny that his
films--quintessential indie successes all--have all paid strong attention
to casting.  Think John Lurie's laconic, deadpan turn in the melancholic
"Stranger than Paradise," or Screamin' Jay Hawkins as the larger-than-life
concierge of "Mystery Train," or Johnny Depp in "Dead Man."  And let's not
forget Roberto Benigni's star-making role in "Down by Law."
        Ghost Dog is a professional killer who lives the life of an 18th
century Samurai.  His bible is the "Hagakure," a little ivory book which
contains the ancient rites and rituals of the Japanese warrior and from
which Whitaker narrates, in voiceover, accompanying the film's periodic
title-boards.  Ghost Dog is devoutly loyal to his Lord and Master, a
small-time mobster called Louie (John Tormey), who once saved his life.
Unfortunately, Ghost Dog's latest contract now has its "complications" and
the bosses who ordered the hit want Ghost Dog whacked.
        With his hooded fleece pulled up high above his head like a monk's
habit, Ghost Dog moves from hit to hit with a briefcase full of guns and
gadgets and a brooding look on his benevolent face.  Although his
reputation is that he speaks to no-one and has no friends, Ghost Dog shares
some literary advice with a young girl he meets in the park, and
"converses" with his best friend, a French-speaking Jamaican ice cream
vendor who understands no English.  (Odd.  Jarmusch himself appeared as an
ice cream vendor in Billy Bob Thornton's accomplished "Sling Blade."  But
anyway...)
        This is a thoughtful, compelling performance from Whitaker--would
that they gave awards for this kind of film.
        In truth, Jarmusch's latest outing doesn't have much more than a
"mysterious contract killer hounded by disloyal crime syndicate" plotline
at its center but, as in all of his films, the writer/director embellishes
a simple storyline with richly drawn characters, evocative music (here
provided by hip-hop artist THE RZA), lush photography (Ghost Dog is shot
from end-to-end by veteran cinematographer Robby Müller), and a wicked
sense of humor.  There's a scene in which Louie tries to explain to a trio
of crime lords (Cliff Gorman, Henry Silva, and Victor Argo, fantastic faces
all) just how little he knows about Ghost Dog that is truly hysterical.
        From its evocative, pigeon's eye view opener to its closing high
noon showdown, "Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai" is another offbeat gem
from the offbeat, irreverent genius of Jim Jarmusch.  And it's the latest
in a long string of excellent performances from Forest Whitaker.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Moll Flanders (1996)
No discussion of MOLL FLANDERS would be complete without the use of the
word "bawdy."  But the latest big screen version of Daniel Defoe's
picaresque novel, about the life and times of a young woman with an
unconquerable spirit, is just plain bore-dy.
Strong female roles are hard to come by, and writer/director Pen Densham
deserves credit for fashioning Moll's story for the screen.  His casting of
Robin Wright (FORREST GUMP) in the title role is, however, a major
liability.  Between her wooden voiceovers and awkward grasp of an English
accent (she goes from ribald commoner to gentrified aristocrat in the same
scene), Wright may be reduced to playing cocktail waitresses after her
contributions here.  She just doesn't have the emotional strength or
physical screen presence to carry the weight of the multi-faceted Moll.
Defoe's classic work is filled with material that cries out for epic
cinema, a vast tableau of life and lust in 18th century England.  The
story, curiously altered by Densham, chronicles Moll's miserable life, from
birth in London's Newgate Prison hours before her mother is hanged, to less
than exemplary positions as charity house scullery maid, beleagured
prostitute, and painter's wife, to name but a few-lateral moves all.
Densham's liberal rewrite is in keeping with the grim tone of the original,
but he shapes it into something that is melodramatic when it should be
dramatic, dull when it should be moving.
The film opens with Mr. Hibble (a stoic performance by Morgan Freeman,
looking bitchin' in braids) unearthing Moll's daughter Flora (Aisling
Corcoran) in an orphanage.  Hibble has been instructed by "a wealthy
benefactor" to recite Moll's salty memoirs ad nauseum to the child, with
some vague moralistic intent.
Talented child actors are few and far between, and newcomer Corcoran
epitomizes the worst of what's out there.  She's bratty, obnoxious, and
can't act for tuppence.  You feel terrible for Freeman in their early
scenes together; he's calm and collected in the face of objectionable
precociousness, but you wish he'd knock her into the middle of next week.
Corcoran's scenes grow thankfully fewer as this interminable film
progresses but by that time you'll be too busy looking at your watch to
notice.
Likewise, Stockard Channing is an embarrassment as unscrupulous madam Mrs.
Allworthy.  All that's missing from her realization of the character is the
eyepatch she wore in SMOKE; she plays Allworthy like a pirate, pillaging
and plundering the hearts--and pockets--of men.  "Life's terrible short
girl.  Give yourself some pleasure," she tells Moll.  Never having felt
love or tenderness or physical closeness of any kind, Moll justifies
prostitution as "making friends with eligible gentlemen."  Having said
that, she opts to misappropriate her soul for one hundred guineas to a
disgusting old man, then "hundreds" of clergymen, scientists and insurance
salesmen, until Mrs. Allworthy's enterprise is closed down by "the
guardians of morality."
One of Moll's clients (played by Irish actor John Lynch) turns out to be a
starving artist, and he pays Moll a regular commission to pose for him.
Love blooms in a soft-core cornucopia, and Wright's narration is cringeable
at this point: "He willed his soul into me.  We were one fusion of passion,
and unspoken knowledges.  We were a united force, pushing back the darkness
in each others lives."  As he keeps large slabs of meat around his
apartment, it's not surprising when The Artist finally catches something
nasty and dies.  Lynch is saddled with the same kind of obsequious dialogue
as Wright so we're grateful when he passes on.
"Moll Flanders was, by her own account, a murderess, a whore and a thief,"
explains the film's opening monologue.  Unless I was sleeping at the time
she didn't actually kill anyone, but it's the lackluster performances that
kill this film.  The only saving grace is Morgan Freeman, whose dignified
performance is the glue that keeps MOLL FLANDERS from coming apart at the
seams.  Wright, it so happens, is all wrong.

Title
Review for Monty Python and the Holy Grail (1975)
With several Hollywood releases grounded in the wake of the September 11th
terrorist attacks on New York and Washington (one film in particular, "Big
Trouble," featured hijacking and carry-on nuclear weapons among its many
plot devices), it is indeed timely--yet purely coincidental--for an
inspired bit of lunacy known as "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" to be
reissued to theaters.  Well, just the one theater that is.
This 2001 re-release of the Python's first full-length feature film (if
you discount 1971's "And Now for Something Completely Different" which was,
after all, a loosely-edited series of television sketches) features a brand
new negative, stereo soundtrack, and 25 seconds of missing footage!
More focused than their future work (and looking less dated now than ever
before, surprisingly), "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" is a medieval romp
filled to the pink curly edges with your typically irreverent and extremely
silly Monty Python humor (if you've been in a time capsule these last few
decades, Monty Python was the collective name of a bunch of terribly
talented comedians--Graham Chapman, John Cleese, Terry Gilliam, Eric Idle,
Terry Jones, and Michael Palin--who got together in the summer of 1969 to
produce a ground-breaking (and terribly silly) TV series called "Monty
Python's Flying Circus" for the BBC).  Set in England 932 A.D. (but
actually filmed in Scotland), "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" follows
King Arthur of Camelot (Chapman) on a mission to round up his knights of
the round table.  In the process he is given a quest by God (courtesy Terry
Gilliam's typically outrageous cut-out animation) to seek out the Holy
Grail, that magical chalice that floats aloft over various
impressive-looking Scottish castles (one of which, we're told, is fake).
The silliness kicks in from the opening credits (with Swedish subtitles
and spurious moose references a plenty) and never lets up.  These knights
don't actually ride noble steeds, for example.  Instead, they prance around
as if on horseback with a long-suffering serf trotting behind them knocking
two coconut shells together.  Glancing down a list of some of the
characters our valiant fellows encounter upon their journey gives you a
pretty good idea as to what to expect: Second Soldier with a Keen Interest
in Birds; A Quite Extraordinarily Rude Frenchman; Sir Robin the
Not-Quite-So-Brave-as-Sir Launcelot; Roger the Shrubber (A Shrubber);
Leader of the Knights Who Say "Ni!"; The Page Crushed by a Rabbit; Patsy
(Arthur's Trusty Steed); and so on.
As with most of their work, the Pythons don't skimp of the details.  What
makes "'Holy Grail" such a delight is that not only is the humor thick and
fast but so is the medieval muck--the laughs are made even stronger by a
heightened level of authenticity (with, perhaps, the exception of the furry
keeper of the cave of Aaargh and all that blood spurting from severed
limbs--a black knight who stands in Arthur's way is reduced to a
name-calling torso, for example).  The writer/performers play multiple
roles, of course (to keep the costs down?), and it's great fun watching
each one show up as somebody sillier than the first.  Crammed with acres of
quotable dialogue, the film ploughs along from one inspired bit to the next.
To this day, "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" still "makes Ben Hur look
like an epic" (to quote one of the film's original tag lines) but in the 26
years that have elapsed since the film debuted, those lines seem to have
blurred considerably.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
It's the early 1950s and the lure of Tinseltown brings the hapless and the
hopeful to the City of Angels.  Maybe to make it as a Hollywood movie star.
Or maybe just to see one.
But beneath the glitz and the glamour and the celebrity lies a dark and
dangerous underbelly--crooked cops, mob rule, corruption, homicide, vice.
The L.A.P.D. have their hands (or pockets) full.  The relationship between
three officers--men with very different agendas--forms the fascinating core
of "L.A. Confidential," writer/director Curtis Hanson's stylish, handsome
adaptation of James Ellroy's noir novel.  It's a story about the good, the
bad, and the beautiful.
Ed Exley (Guy Pearce) is young, college educated, and politically astute.
He does things by the book, refuses to take payoffs, and snitches on fellow
officers, all in the name of justice (and career advancement).  Exley is
not the most popular policeman on the force.
Bud White (Russell Crowe), on the other hand, believes that the quickest
way to get a confession out of a suspect is to beat it out of him.  He's a
muscle guy who uses violence as "a necessary adjunct to the job."  His
sense of justice isn't much different from Exley's, but his methods are.
Then there's Jack Vincennes (the terrific Kevin Spacey), a flashy,
showbiz-influenced crimestopper who acts as technical advisor for a
Dragnet-style television show.  Vincennes also scams for a sleazy tabloid,
getting front-page notoriety nabbing potheads in the act by Hush Hush
huckster Sid Hudgeons (Danny DeVito).
Sparks fly as Ed, Bud, and Jack's distinctly differing styles come into
conflict--and out again--as they investigate the Nite Owl Massacre, a
six-person bloodbath in a coffee shop that took one of their own.  Adding
pudding to the mix is an icy cool millionaire pornographer pimp (David
Strathairn), whose hookers are cut to look like movie stars.  These include
the Veronica Lake-inspired Lynn Bracken, played by a smoldering Kim
Basinger in some great-looking, gravity-defying gowns.
Curtis Hanson has taken a significant step forward with this film,
displaying depth and detail that was lacking in his previous psycho-bound
thrillers, "The River Wild" and "The Hand That Rocks the Cradle."  Lovingly
photographed by Dante Spinotti, "L.A. Confidential" is sleek and
satisfying, full of complex characters expertly played by a fine cast.
While the plot's intricate twists and turns pay homage to noir films of the
'40s and '50s, the film maintains a 1990's sensibility with some extreme
bloodletting, so be warned.  Otherwise, "L.A. Confidential" is a solid,
confident thriller.

Title
Review for Equinox (1992)
     In EQUINOX, the new film from chic director Alan Rudolph, Modine
models two different styles--a layered, flowing number in his role as
timid auto mechanic Henry Petosa and a brushed back, heavily-moussed
job as bad penny Freddy Ace.
     Separated at birth, Modine's twin brothers Henry and Freddy live
and work in the same fictional city, unaware of each other's
existence--and each other's hairstyle choices.
     But this is not your typical Hollywood production.  EQUINOX
extends the tradition of many of Rudolph's previous films (TROUBLE IN
MIND, CHOOSE ME, THE MODERNS, etc.), with highly-stylized, atmospheric
visuals; a refreshing sense of humor; and occasional excursions into
the surreal.  It successfully marries themes of identity and destiny in
a fantasy dressed as reality; it's a straight-faced fable that's also
slightly twisted.
     Of course, no Rudolph project would be complete without a diverse
cast of quirky, offbeat characters.
     Henry is a quiet, nerdy recluse who holes himself up in his poky
apartment, watching self-defense TV shows and eating junk food.  When
the local kids bully him and steal his groceries, he seems pleased to
escape with anything--even if it's only a videotape and tin of talcum
powder.  As Henry himself points out, his life seems to be taking place
without him in it.  He's afraid of the real world, afraid to speak to
his girlfriend, Beverly (Lara Flynn Boyle), with whom he's hopelessly
in love.
     Beverly is similarly shy, mousy, and insecure.  She reads Emily
Dickenson aloud to herself, dances with pillows, and takes occasional
slugs of cooking sherry.  It's no coincidence that she lives in an
apartment building called "The Sheltering Arms"--her character is so
fragile that anything firmer than a kiss seems likely to break her into
a thousand tiny pieces.  When Henry forces her to make a decision, she
responds uncertainly "You can't do this to me, Henry.  Can you?"
     By contrast, Freddy Ace is a tough, heartless thug, a driver for a
protection racket headed by crime boss Mr. Paris (Fred Ward).
Ironically, Freddy has a home life with a wife and two kids (although
his idea of a bedtime story is Field Marshall Rommel's biography!).
His ditzy blonde wife Sharon (played by Lori Singer) fawns all over
him, constantly referring to him as "The Best."  "That's very
superficial, Sharon," Freddy comments dryly, "...but true."  Their
scenes together are punctuated by Rudolph's trademark snappy dialogue.
     Supporting characters are equally well developed.  Beverly's
brother and Henry's best friend Russell (Kevin J. O'Connor in an
energetically nervous performance) is obsessed with a waitress in a
local restaurant.  Henry's father Pete (played by the versatile
character actor M. Emmett Walsh) is an aging garage owner, full of
vaudeville shtick and nonsense.  And Henry's neighbor Rosie (Oscar
winner Marisa Tomei), a prostitute with a kid in tow, is also
charmingly flamboyant.
     While the brothers' separate-but-linked stories unfold, the
mysteries of their origins are gradually revealed through the
investigations of an aspiring writer, played by Tyra Ferrell (who can
currently be seen upstaging Janet Jackson in POETIC JUSTICE).  This
exposition, involving grand romance and a blind trust fund, is more
mainstream than one might expect from Rudolph, and therefore less
interesting--Ferrell's Sonya Kirk is well played but she's undoubtedly
the straightest character in the film.
     Matthew Modine's skill at bringing two diametrically opposed
characters to life is commendable.  He's not your typical actor playing
two roles aided by deliberate costume changes, makeup, or vocal
manipulations.  Henry and Freddy are two complete personalities, one
vulnerable, one hardened, both evoking empathy.  Reverse sides of the
same coin.  When light and dark come together and are equal (the film's
title defined), Henry is finally given the opportunity to confront
himself.
     After two disappointing films (LOVE AT LARGE and the
production-troubled MORTAL THOUGHTS), Alan Rudolph has reestablished
himself as a director with a flair for writing moody, colorful
characters into inventive situations.  EQUINOX should not only satisfy
his fans, but garner him some new ones.


Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
        In "The Straight Story," 73-year-old Alvin Straight learns that his
brother Lyle, with whom he hasn't exchanged a civil word in almost ten
years, has had a stroke.  Determined to pay his estranged brother a visit,
Alvin drives across Iowa and into Wisconsin on a John Deere riding mower.
        That unusual set-up makes for a very interesting road movie as the
ailing Alvin (OscarŽ probable Robert Farnsworth) heads out across America's
heartland against the better judgment of his grown daughter Rose (Sissy
Spacek).
        For much of the film we're treated to colorful vistas of cornfields
stretching far and wide towards the great Mississippi, their symmetric
lines fazed occasionally by a lone combine kicking up dust.  And Alvin,
unfazed by everything around him, dogged and determined like a mangy old
cur worrying a bone.
        It would be nice if this amiable, heartfelt little film could be
remembered for its simple and straightforward storyline and the power of
its performances.  After all, if you're going to be watching a
septuagenarian trekking cross-country on a lawnmower, engaging those he
meets along the way in candid conversation, then whose better company to
share than Farnsworth's?  Unfortunately, "The Straight Story" is more
likely to be talked about as "that G-rated picture David Lynch made for
Disney" rather than for the notable contributions of Farnsworth and Spacek,
who's longtime husband Jack Fisk is responsible for the distinctive
production design.
        Scary storms, road-kill, teenage pregnancy, moving violations, a
semi-naked man with liver spots who, later, downs a beer--ask yourself how
this movie got a G-rating when all those other, harmless, inoffensive
G-rated films were slapped with a "PG."  It would seem that the promoting
of this film has once again revealed the inconsistency--and the
hypocrisy--of the MPAA.
        Calculated marketing ploys aside, "The Straight Story" is a
worthwhile investment of your time, although--action fans take note--about
as slow moving as Alvin's curious mode of transportation.  The lone
traveler seems genuinely surprised when a fleet of cyclists pass him by.
"What's the worst thing about getting old?" one of them asks him at camp
later that evening.  "Remembering what it was like to be young."
        The film is filled with these kinds of observations; none of them
particularly awe-inspiring but all of them genuine and from the heart.
Like the time Alvin tells a hitchhiker who's running away from home that a
warm bed and a roof over one's head sound a lot better than sharing a
wiener on a stick with an old geyser who's traveling by lawnmower.
        In that vein, "The Straight Story" concerns itself first and
foremost with the strength of family: unlike a single twig, a cluster of
sticks cannot be easily broken.  It's a simple yet effective metaphor that
mirrors the simplicity and effectiveness of the entire film.  And we can
thank the Motion Picture Association of America for allowing General
Audiences to see it.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Princess Diaries, The (2001)
        How could a G-rated Disney film based on Meg Cabot's novel "The Princess
Diaries" be anything but cute, harmless fun?  Easy.  Take all the cute,
harmless fun out of it.  And while you're at it make it borrr-ring.  That's
what director Garry Marshall, screenwriter Gina Wendkos and, not to be
outdone, producer Whitney Houston have done with the G-rated Disney film
"The Princess Diaries."
        You couldn't tell it from the audience though, a Braintree, Mass. of
growing, glowing pre-pubescent girls (and the odd parental, popcorn perched
about their persons), who positively cheered when the end credits rolled
(ah the film had struck a lovely nerve with them but not with fuddy-duddy
old me).  Well, I might have cheered that the utter tripe was now well and
truly over, but that would have been too obvious.
        Too obvious is the least of the problems with Marshall's film (Garry made
a couple of other "princess" movies--"Pretty Woman" and "Runaway
Bride"--but this one's way without Julia Roberts so maybe *that's* its
problem).  In addition to being predictable as molasses, "The Princess
Diaries" has hardly got a laugh in it (it's a comedy), could bore the pants
off an Abyssinian for long, long stretches, and is so sloppily edited the
principals refer to scenes we haven't even seen yet (and probably never
will except, perhaps, in the DVD edition).
        Marshall should take virtually all of the blame here, since he's been at
this for some time and should know when a scene or two isn't working ...
and hardly *any* of "The Princess Diaries" works ("works," alas, implies
cleverness and there's none of that here either).
        Newcomer Anne Hathaway stars as Mia Thermopolis, a bright but socially
invisible San Franciscan teen who learns that her single mom (a wacky
artist played by the likable Caroline Goodall) had a bit of a fling with
some royal member of some miniscule European country nobody ever heard of
(the filmmakers go out of their way *not* to call it Serbia, which is
pretty much what all miniscule European countries are called in the movies
mark my words) and now she, Mia, is next in line to rule "Genovia" (hence
the headphones/tiara combo in the print ads).
        Julie Andrews, with the luminous factor cranked to 11, plays Mia's
grandmother (aka Queen Clarisse Renaldi), who shows up out of the royal
blue and lends Mia much advice and direction in the eating, talking, and
looking like a princess department (although Mia's big makeover simply
transforms her from ugly duckling to ugly swan).
        Also on stereotypical hand are a brainless jock, an evil cheerleader, a
dorky-looking best friend ("Welcome to the Dollhouse"'s Heather Matarazzo),
a sensitive auto mechanic/musician, and Marshall mainstay Hector Elizondo
as Joe the driver, imparting wit and wisdom from the front seat of Mia's
chauffeur-driven limousine at every intersection.
        A non-animated G-rated movie is a rarity these days but the rating here
reflects the fact that all the guts, all the good stuff, has been exorcised
from the finished product.  Lame, labored, and lamentable, "The Princess
Diaries" is recommended for eight-and-a-half year olds of the feminine
persuasion *only*; all others would do well to avoid it (like potholes, the
plague, and "The Perfect Storm").
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Towards the middle of "The Sweet Hereafter," a crowded school bus skids on
an icy road surface as it rounds a bend, careens through the steel guard
rail, and disappears out of sight.  Then, in long shot, we see the vehicle
slowly sliding across what looks like a snow-covered field.  It pauses for
a moment before the "field" cracks under the bus' weight and the bright
yellow vehicle vanishes in an effortless moment, a single smooth second of
time.
Compare that scene, if you will, to the last eighty minutes of "Titanic,"
when the behemoth sinks slowly and spectacularly to its watery demise, and
you'll appreciate the futility of comparing greatness in films.
The scene in "The Sweet Hereafter" epitomizes all that's right with
independent Canadian director Atom Egoyan's film.  It's not sensational.
We don't see the inside of the bus with its payload of screaming, terrified
children being bloodied and battered about.  The bus doesn't explode or
break into a thousand tiny pieces.  It simply leaves the road and silently
slips beneath the surface of a frozen lake.  It's a horrifying sequence
made all the more so by calm and distance.
Using a non-linear approach to his narrative, Egoyan shifts back and
forward in time, connecting us with the inhabitants of the small British
Columbian town who have been severely affected by this tragedy.  Fourteen
children died in the accident, leaving their parents and the town itself
paralyzed with grief.
The catalyst at the center of the film is ambulance chaser Mitchell
Stephens (a wonderfully moving performance by Ian Holm), who comes to Sam
Dent to persuade the townsfolk to engage in a class action suit.
Stephens, who "doesn't believe in accidents," functions as a concerned,
involved observer, scribbling details in his notebook and providing the
parents with an opportunity to reach some kind of closure in the harrowing
aftermath.  While Stephens' initial drive may be financial (one third of
the total settlement if he wins), his involvement provides him more with an
outlet to come to grips with his own loss.  His self-destructive,
drug-addicted daughter has been in and out of clinics, halfway houses and
detox units for years.
Egoyan's attention to detail and ability to establish mood are so
impeccable that even the sound of a kettle boiling resonates like a
plaintive cry.  Mychael Danna, who composed the shimmering music for "The
Ice Storm," contributes another memorable score that shivers and tingles.
Equally impressive is Paul Sarossy's cinematography, capturing the imposing
Canadian mountainsides and low-hanging fogs as splendidly as his shadowy
interiors--in one scene a bright wall calendar serves to illuminate
portions of a room.
"The Sweet Hereafter," while undeniably grim, urges the viewer to grab onto
life with both hands and not let go.  It's a film of generous subtlety and
emotion.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
"Alien Resurrection" feels less like another episode in the popular Alien
series and more like a predictable, visceral walk down memory lane,
reminding us--with its almost casual approach to brainless humans being
gored by big nasty monsters--what made the first three films much more
memorable.
Fans of the series are strongly divided between two camps: whether Ridley
Scott's original was better than James Cameron's sequel (it's a debate that
seems senseless, given how different these two films are in terms of
style--Scott's played like a classic monster movie set in deep space;
Cameron's was a testosterone-laden, hardware-heavy shoot-em-up).  On the
less successful end of the scale, David Fincher's 1992 "Alien3" was
unanimously dismissed out of hand as the bleakest and weakest chapter, but
with "Alien Resurrection" there's finally new hope for Fincher's effort.
This time around we get the typical rag-tag band of heavily-armed space
derelicts who happen onboard a scientific research vessel.  Here they mess
with an equally rag-tag band of covert military operatives engaged in some
not-for-prime-time experimentation with--you guessed it--those drooling
skeletal creatures with the stainless steel teeth.  Head of the group is
General Perez, played in flamboyant fashion by Dan Hedaya, whose furry
shoulders are probably the scariest thing in the film.
Sigourney Weaver is back as Ripley, even though her character died in the
third Alien picture.  Watching Weaver in a bad Alien movie is always more
interesting than watching her in a good, non-Alien movie ("The Ice Storm,"
for example) so whenever she's on camera, there's hope.  But perhaps
because her character is a clone (like everything else in the film), Ripley
is lacking a vibrancy and passion the film badly needs.  We can't blame
Weaver, since the Ripley character has been genetically mutated, but her
new spiritual relationship with the aliens just doesn't drive "Alien
Resurrection" as effectively as her tough, human compassion did in the
earlier films.
Call, a space pirate with very much her own agenda, displays some of the
emotions missing from Ripley, but as played by a miscast Winona Ryder,
she's too wimpy and simpy to be of any real value.
The aliens are as slimy and single-mindedly menacing as usual but with no
audience empathy for the crew members, the buffet can't start fast enough.
"Alien Resurrection" is directed by the provocative Frenchman Jean-Pierre
Jeunet ("City of Lost Children," "Delicatessen") but you'd hardly know it.
The film has a very standard look, as if the production team used leftover
sets from "Event Horizon" (another disappointing science fiction thriller
that wastes a decent cast).  200 years on, we're still looking at the same
old grungy, mechanized interiors with lots of escaping steam; the only
notable technological advance appears to be breath recognition!  Jeunet
should have given us something a little more surreal or at least
imaginative.  Writer Joss Whedon's script is definitely lost in space.
Although "Alien3" wasn't the most satisfying end to the trilogy, "Alien
Resurrection" reminds us that sometimes the kindest thing you can do is let
the dead rest in peace.

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
        Tomb Raider.  Fun?  Exciting?  Challenging?  Given the unprecedented
popularity (especially among teenage boys) of the video game that sports an
uber-buff, pistol packin' babe who raids, well... tombs, you have to
believe it's these three things and more!
        "Lara Croft: Tomb Raider," the big screen variant of said video game,
which features a pumped-up Angelina Jolie (the OscarŽ winner for "Girl,
Interrupted" no less) in the title role is, however, none of these things.
It isn't fun, it isn't exciting, and the only challenge is seeing how long
you can stay in your seat (I suffered through to the bitter, bitter end;
the wife opted for Barnes & Noble at the 45-minute mark).
        Directed by Simon West with the same subtlety he brought to "Con Air,"
"Tomb Raider" is an empty-headed, big budget bore.  The story borrows
unintelligently from that mother of all turkeys "Hudson Hawk" (the same
hokum about planetary alignments and sacred stones that, when brought
together, well... who the heck cares?) and it makes "Super Mario Bros."
(Bob Hoskins' ill-advised career move) look like "Rocco and his Brothers"
(that classic of Italian neo-realism).
        I'll go out on a limb here and say I suspect there's actually more
character development in the video game than the movie proper.
        This is where the Jolie defenders/video game nuts jump in and say this
movie isn't about character development it's about kicking serious butt (or
bum, since Ms. Croft hails from England's green and pleasant).  With lips,
breasts, and biceps all inflated to the max, Lara Croft is all about
posturing, and Jolie has a hard time simply standing still without trying
to look tough.
        OK, let's forget challenging.  Shouldn't "Tomb Raider" be, at the very
least, fun and exciting?  Shouldn't our butt-kicking heroine also encompass
the sophistication of, say, James Bond with the wit of Indiana Jones?
There's no humor to be found anywhere in "Tomb Raider," even though it
tries hard from time to time.  Even "The Mummy Returns" didn't take itself
too seriously.  The villain here is noticeably lacking, the special effects
are ridiculously overblown and unnecessarily complicated, and the script is
non-existent.
        To liven things up (perhaps), Jolie's live father Jon Voight puts in a few
minutes as Lara's dead father Lord Croft; talk about a stretch.  One thing
I hadn't expected from the film is that Jolie affects a slightly better
English accent than her Pa (although I suspect that thin-looking moustache
he's forced to wear gets in the way some).
        Unsuccessful?  Not entirely.  If anything, "Lara Croft: Tomb Raider" makes
you want to check out the video game itself to figure out exactly what all
the fuss was about.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
        If you've been following automotive trends as of late you'll know
that, probably around the year 2009, every single car on the road will look
like the Jeep Grand Cherokee.  A similar feeling washed over me while
watching "Mickey Blues Eyes" the other night.  "Er, didn't I just *see*
this movie?"  Of course, I did.
        "Mickey Blue Eyes" is a mob-related comedy that stars Hugh Grant.
It shouldn't be confused with "Analyze This," a mob-related comedy without
Hugh Grant, or "Notting Hill," a Hugh Grant comedy that has nothing
whatsoever to do with organized crime.  But after about thirteen
middle-of-the-road comedies in a row, the lines begin to blur some.
        This one (I think) stars Grant as a Manhattan-based auctioneer with
"floppy hair" and all those other endearing Hugh Grant mannerisms.  He's
about to pop the question to the love of his life, high-school teacher
Jeanne Tripplehorn.  Jeanne has been cozy ("The Firm") and sexy
("Waterworld") before but here's she's just plain old Jeanne, neither cozy
nor sexy and just a wee bit boring.  Think what they could have done with
Julia Roberts or, come to think of it, Robert De Niro in the Jeanne
Tripplehorn role.
        Jeanne is nervous about getting engaged to Hugh because her father
(a surprisingly under-the-top James Caan) is, well, "connected."  "Once
you're family, you're Family" she cautions Hugh, but the twitchy Brit
remains committed to her.  Before Jeanne can say "I told you so," Hugh's
making notes to rent "GoodFellas" and "The Godfather" trilogy, and learning
how to say "forgedabouddit."
        Grant is cute, as is "Mickey Blue Eyes" (co-produced by Elizabeth
Hurley no less), but I liked the Jeep a whole lot more before they made it
look like every other stinkin' SUV on the planet.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
        Whether it's a caustic indictment of yuppie Wall Street do-nothings
with more money than they can shake a platinum American Express card at, or
an equally derisive put-down of popular music (think Robert Palmer,
Genesis, Huey Lewis and the News), "American Psycho" delivers its
message--blam!--like a nail gun to the back of the head.
        Some critics have damned Mary Harron's film--she made the indie hit
"I Shot Andy Warhol" with Lili Taylor--as being nothing more than an
upscale version of "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre."  But that comparison
proves accurate for reasons opposite those intended.
        Tobe Hooper's influential horror masterpiece from 1974 succeeded by
showing a true face of horror without catering to excessive gore and
bloodshed.  And in "American Psycho," Harron has, with almost eerie
confidence, done the same.  Save for one sensationalistic scene in a
stairwell (featuring that old staple a chainsaw no less), "American Psycho"
bottles up its horror in the mind and contradictions of its central
character, leaving the graphic realization of his actions as much
off-screen as possible.
        Based on Bret Easton Ellis' satirical novel, "American Psycho"
centers on one Patrick Bateman (played with wild abandon by Christian
Bale).  Bateman is a wealthy, white-collar executive for the
Manhattan-based firm of Pierce and Pierce which specializes in mergers and
acquisitions (or "murders and executions" as Bateman cynically refers to
his trade).  Since Bateman's father virtually owns the company store,
Bateman spends most of his workday listening to tunes on his walkman and
reading pornography, while his nights are spent schmoozing in the flashiest
New York restaurants, where it's deadly important to get a dinner
reservation even if you're not particularly hungry.
        Bateman obsesses about everything: his wardrobe, his toilette
(which he dictates in great detail like an Esparce waiter describing the
daily specials), his physique (and it's some physique), right down to whom
at the office has the finest business card.  Bale mugs his way through the
role splendidly, as if his Bateman were Chevy Chase possessed by Travis
Bickle.  Because this smart, mannered sophisticate has a tendency to allow
the fervor inside him to erupt in homicidal bursts of rage.
        Chloë Sevigny ("Boys Don't Cry") plays Bateman's beleaguered
secretary Jean in a nicely subtle turn.  There's a point in the film at
which Bateman invites Jean back to his West 81st Street penthouse and
things quickly start to turn sour.  "You'd better go now" he advises.  "I
might hurt you if you stay."  Delicate, knowing moments like these make
"American Psycho" an extremely effective thriller, since we are privy to
Bateman's depraved excesses long before the other characters discover them,
usually after it's too late.
        But the film isn't all doom and dismemberment.  It has a lighter,
brighter side too.  There's something gleefully subversive about the way in
which Bateman whips two hookers into shape while espousing the merits of
Whitney Houston's debut album, backed by Phil Collins singing "Susudio,"
for example.  Sick and twisted yes, but darkly comedic just the same.
        "Killer looks" reads "American Psycho"'s tagline.  Killer looks
indeed.  And one stone-cold killer performance from Christian Bale.  Add to
that Harron's tight direction and a creepy Bernard Herrmann-esque score
from John Cale and you've got a stylish exercise in modern-day sociopathy
that bears strong comparisons to some of the best comic horror films around.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1996 David N. Butterworth/The Summer Pennsylvanian
Demi Moore is proud of her body and, in her latest movie STRIPTEASE, it shows.
She has every right to be proud--this thirty-three-year-old mother of three
obviously works hard to stay in shape.  But there's little of her in
STRIPTEASE that we haven't seen before, and only hardcore Demi-lovers and
voyeurs are likely to savor this crummy piece of entertainment.  It is
sleazy and humiliating while half-heartedly attempting to present strippers
in a kinder light.
Moore "burns up the screen" as Erin Grant, a former FBI clerk who is forced
to work as an exotic dancer (read: stripper) in order to raise money to
appeal a custody decision that placed her seven-year-old daughter Angela
(Moore's real-life daughter Rumer Willis) with her small-time crook of a
husband (played by Robert Patrick).
Surely Erin could have found another job as an executive secretary.  Or
flipped burgers at McDonalds.  Or even applied for a loan!  But no.  Exotic
dancing (read: stripping) it has to be.  The money is much better--novelist
Carl Hiaasen, on whose book the film is based, claims that there are
waiting lists for these jobs--but it seems a peculiar career choice for a
single mom trying to impress a conservative judge.
The "action" takes place at the Eager Beaver, a topless bar (read: strip
joint) in Fort Lauderdale where Erin bumps and grinds the night away in a
variety of easy-off outfits.  One night, an intoxicated Congressman David
Dilbeck (Burt Reynolds, unashamedly gleeful in a degrading role) staggers
onto the stage where Erin is being admired a little too closely by one of
the customers.  The senator swings a champagne bottle, a flashbulb goes
off, and all of a sudden you've got more peripheral plot than you care to
deal with, with blackmail, murder and sugar cane politics fleshing out the
unfolding domestic drama.  And you just came to see Demi nekkid!
After last year's disastrous NC-17 SHOWGIRLS, the advance press for
STRIPTEASE made damaging comparisons.  Believing that American audiences
were not ready for another sleaze-o-rama, the publicity machine for
STRIPTEASE switched gears, suddenly promoting the film as a wacky comedy.
The film does have it's amusing moments, often involving Shad, the
nightspot's beefy bouncer (played by the appealing Ving Rhames), or
Reynolds' over-sexed Congressman Dilbeck who, with his bleached white rug
of hair, is confused for "the guy from F-TROOP" and "the guy from THE PRICE
IS RIGHT" by characters in the film.
These moments of humor aside, STRIPTEASE remains a choppy, schizophrenic
mess.  The tone jackknifes from tear-jerking mommy melodrama to Ace
Ventura-style slapstick and back again.  Similarly, the "dignity of
stripping" issue is clouded and confused.  On the one hand the filmmakers
want us to believe that stripping is a wholesome occupation, yet their
central character is clearly bitter about having to do this kind of
work--she wants to lead a "normal, fully-dressed life."  The deepest
observation about the objectification of women is a scene in which Erin
tells the Eager Beaver's owner that he needs to get rid of the napkins
which bear the club's logo, a sassy cartoon rodent swinging around a pole.
"It's degrading to women and to beavers," she tells him.  The endless
scenes of Moore going through her paces are more embarrassing than
degrading, but none compare to a titillating topless routine with a hair
dryer-it's somewhere between Annie Oakley and Annie Lennox.
Unlike her character Erin, Demi Moore has no reservations about stripping
for money ($12.5 million in this case) or having her daughter witness the
spectacle.  Moore may be proud of her stretch marks, but the top-heavy
STRIPTEASE gets a double-D for effort.

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
        The Beauty Pageant: an obvious comedic target, yes?  Yet "Drop Dead
Gorgeous" doesn't simply poke fun at the whole superficial, demeaning
affair.  It skewers it.  It incinerates it, smacks it upside the head with
a shovel, shoots it between the eyes, blows it up (not once but twice!),
splatters it with paint and, for its crowning glory, vomits all over it.
        It's the kind of movie in which no one is spared.  The mentally
challenged, bulimic, Asian, fat, lame, Lutheran, hospitalized, adopted,
gay, and Adam West ("TV's Batman") all take it on the chin in the name of
biting black comedy.  It sounds like poor taste, but as poor taste goes
it's remarkably good natured...and unbelievably funny.
        I haven't laughed this hard in a movie since that segment of Jim
Jarmusch's "Night on Earth" in which Giancarlo Esposito struggles to get
across New York in Armin Mueller-Stahl's taxicab.  Come to think of it, I
haven't laughed as *long* as this before--for well over an hour I was
doubled over in pain, my sides cramped from laughing so much.  I was
slapping my knees and roaring with delight.  And the rest of the audience
was slapping and roaring right along with me.
        It's no small admission to say that "Drop Dead Gorgeous" is the
funniest film I have ever seen.
        Is there anything wrong with it?  Yes.  It runs out of steam in the
last 15-20 minutes (but still secures some good belly laughs in the
process).  How could it not?  But that gripe seems inconsequential in light
of all the drop dead gorgeously-realized hysteria that has gone before.
        In the small-town hamlet of Mount Rose, Minnesota ("yah, you
betcha!"), the residents are abuzz.  It's the 50th anniversary of the Miss
Teen Princess America Pageant, sponsored by Sarah Rose Cosmetics, and a
documentary film crew are in town covering the events.  Maitre-d' of the
contest is Gladys Leeman (Kirstie Alley), a former winner with a
win-at-all-costs attitude.  Gladys is convinced that her daughter Becky
(Denise Richards, "Wild Things") will this year walk off with the coveted
tiara.  No one doubts her, since the Leemans are the wealthiest family in
town.  "When one of them goes to the bathroom, it's news."
        If anyone can challenge Becky's claim to the throne, it's Amber
Atkins (a perfect Kirsten Dunst).  Amber lives in a trailer park with her
beer-drinking, chain-smoking mother (Ellen Barkin; fabulous) and works at
the local morgue, doing make-up jobs on the cadavers.  Her talent is tap
dancing and Amber, who has two role models in life (Mom and Diane Sawyer),
"just wants to compete."  Becky is more the "promote world peace" kind of
competitor.
        There are six additional entrants in the pageant and the film is a
casting coup of bright, up-and-coming talent who are asked to endure
humiliating situations.  In spite of performing dog barks, cheerleading
calisthenics, interpretive sign-languaged dance, and heartfelt passages
from "Soylent Green," these young women act flawlessly.
        The dress rehearsals, in-fighting, cringe-inducing choreography,
back stabbing, and interviews with the contestants are all captured by the
film crew as the pageant explodes in ridiculous style.  To spoil any one of
the myriad of jokes would be irresponsible.
        "Drop Dead Gorgeous" is a sophisticated comedy, kind of like what
"Waiting for Guffman" should have been.  Writer Lona Williams (herself a
former Minnesota beauty pageant contestant) and first-time director Michael
Patrick Jann handle things absolutely beautifully and have created a
near-perfect product in so doing; there's subtlety, smarts, and a lot of
sickness going on here.
        Gorgeous isn't quite the word I'd use to describe the film but it
*is* drop dead hilarious.

Title
Review for Bandits (2001)
        Somewhere within the scattershot confines of Barry Levinson's "Bandits"
lies a halfway decent movie struggling to get out.
        There's probably not a whole lot wrong with the film that a decent editor
couldn't fix (cutter Stu Linder appears *not* to be it).  It's got a cute
premise, likable stars, and the potential for many laughs along the way.
But director Levinson seems to have asked Mr. Linder to make sure that
every frame of available footage--funny or not, relevant or not, good, bad,
and indifferent (or not)--wound up in the finished film.  And to heck with
continuity: just throw it together in any old order!
        "Bandits," then, is a caper comedy starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob
Thornton, and Cate Blanchett that flashes back early and often.  Joseph
Blake and Terry Lee Collins are "America's Most Wanted," lovable Robin
Hood-style bank robbers known as "The Sleepover Bandits" by virtue of the
fact that they hold a bank manager hostage the night before a heist.  What
I could never figure out is why they hang around for the tellers to show up
the next morning but I'm sure that's one of the many plot details I missed
during this unnecessarily frenetic and surprisingly clumsy movie.
        There are scenes in "Bandits" that'll leave you scratching your head in
bewilderment.  Like when Blanchett, as a frustrated housewife who winds up
on the lam with Joe and Terry and cannot chose between them, starts
spontaneously lip-synching to a Bonnie Tyler hit while preparing a gourmet
dinner for her unappreciative husband early in the film--where did *that*
come from you ask?  And then the puzzlingly brief montage of her and Bruce
Willis's character cavorting on the beach with those Polaroid snapshots
thrown in to accentuate the positive--what was *that* all about you wonder?
 And the soundtrack: one cringe-worthy pop song after another!
        It's as if Levinson deliberately wanted to cram as many clichés into the
film's overly long two hours as he (or his screenwriter Harley Peyton)
could, not to mention every available style of filmmaking.  Even the film's
tag line, "Two's Company.  Three's a Crime," reeks of the overused.
        Willis and Thornton have a pretty nice chemistry, though.  Joe (Willis),
the charmer, has long hair; Terry (played by the ever-changing Thornton),
the brains, has short hair.  They might be likened to Bonnie and Clyde on
the syndicated TV show that follows (and exploits) their exploits, but with
their seemingly bottomless grab bag of bad wigs and outrageous disguises,
Joe and Terry more often resemble Sonny and Cher.  By contrast, Blanchett's
performance is closer to overwrought than impassioned.
        I take back what I said about the editing of this film (although when
separating the wheat from the chaff one typically tends to keep the
wheat!).  There's probably not a whole lot wrong with "Bandits" that a
decent *director* couldn't fix.  Levinson used to be a decent director
("Diner," "Tin Men," "Rain Man," "Bugsy"), but recently he's been all over
the map, quality-wise, with as many uncomfortable shifts in genre in the
last ten years ("Jimmy Hollywood," "Sleepers," "Sphere," "An Everlasting
Piece") as Leelee Sobieksi has had openings in the last ten days.
        There's a germ of a fine film in "Bandits," some decent ideas and a few
genuine laughs, but nobody took the time to develop these comic situations
into anything beyond obligatory.  Don't go expecting another "Get Shorty"
that's for sure.  In contrast to that film's smart, sharp dialogue and
dynamite performances, "Bandits" feels labored and haphazard, a big in-joke
where the joke, unfortunately, is on us.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Sculptress, The (2000)
        Phaedra Cinema, the distributor of such never-heard-of classics as
"Soft Toilet Seats," "Trailer: The Movie," and "The One Armed Boxer vs. the
Flying Guillotine," has sneaked its latest release, "The Sculptress," into
a few theaters this weekend hoping to cash in on a handful of Halloween
holidaygoers looking for a right good scare.  "The Sculptress" is a scary
proposition all right, but not in the way its producers intended.
        From the outset it's easy to see why some of the larger, more
reputable chains aren't carrying it: the film looks like a
straight-to-video release from the early '80s that's been dusted off (not
very carefully) and re-issued in theatrical format.
        That staple of schlocky Z-movies Jeff Fahey ("The Lawnmower Man")
plays a washed-up Shakespearean actor lacking in some basic people skills.
When he's not reliving his glory days in his ramshackle Nob Hill apartment,
screaming scotch-induced "Hamlet" soliloquies well into the night, he's out
and about on the streets of San Francisco stalking loose women.  Fahey's
Dobie sizes up his victims (actually just one, a peep show performer name
of Sylvie) dressed like one of the guys from Kraftwerk, and approaches them
in the ridiculous attire of a Bavarian Count replete with a cane, dark
glasses, and a false beard (just in time for Halloween!).  "Do you have a
castle?" Sylvie asks Dobie seductively when he flashes the bulging contents
of his wallet outside a coffee shop.  "Jah.  With ze many turrets" is
Dobie's perplexing reply.
        The real "star" of the film (and I use that term extremely loosely)
is Katie Wright, who plays the sculptress of the title.  Sarah is new in
town, studying at the prestigious SF art institute under the mentorship of
a "genius" Frenchman, played by the beret-wearing Patrick Bauchau.  That's
convenient, because Sarah would one day like to live and work in Paris (you
won't believe the film's final shot, with its cheesy Eiffel Tower backdrop
and "Rosemary's Baby"-inspired imagery).  Bauchau's character criticizes
Sarah's work publicly (her clay busts keep turning into gargoyles--perhaps
she's possessed... by an incubus!!?) but he still manages to talk her into
dinner.  Whereas Wright does a decent English accent, her talents pretty
much end there.
        On the other side of the wall, Dobie's troubled past is succinctly
summarized in a scene in which he thumbs through an old scrapbook of
newspaper clippings with headings like "Actor Delivers a Stunning Macbeth,"
Actor Courted By Hollywood Studio," "Actor Renounces Hollywood For
Priesthood," and "Prostitute Fingers Priest in Sex Scandal."  The film's
plot could have been just as easily condensed.  "Artist Moves In Next Door
to Shakespearean Psychopath."  "Yawns Ensue."
        So Dobie rants and raves and Sarah chips away at large blocks of
granite till way past their bedtimes.  Late in the film, their paths
finally cross with mind-numbing results.  Nobody else in the apartment
complex appears to mind all the racket, but one old dear does go ballistic
when Sarah's bathtub overflows.  No, we don't see Wright in the tub (or
Fahey for that matter), and the gore quotient is virtually nil, so for a
horror film "The Sculptress" is surprisingly lacking.  The only thing worth
looking at is San Francisco, and writer/director Ian Merrick manages to
make even it look dreary, windswept, and deserted.
        "The Sculptress" isn't even bad enough to be fun.  Luckily, a
limited release has made it easy to avoid.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Joe's Apartment (1996)
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1996 David N. Butterworth/The Summer Pennsylvanian
Right after I'd seen JOE'S APARTMENT, I was checking out the poster with
its promise of "Sex, Bugs, and Rock 'n' Roll," when some punk kid with a
crew cut came up to me and asked me what I'd just seen.  "That," I said,
motioning towards the advertisement in front of me.  "Was it any good?" the
young scruff persisted.  My immediate response was to roll my hand from
side to side, indicating ambivalence, but then I thought about it for a
moment...  Remembering the film's juvenile humor, broad slapstick, toilet
jokes, squeaky, high-pitched voices, outright silliness and downright
cutesiness, I revised my opinion.  "Yeah," I told him, "you'll enjoy it."
JOE'S APARTMENT is based on an original short subject that aired on MTV in
1992.  As nothing succeeds like success, it didn't take long for creator
John Payson to pull, tug, and stretch his initial concept into a
ninety-minute feature.  Grown-ups might find JOE'S APARTMENT a little
insubstantial as a result of that expansion, but it's not without its
charms.
Not something you'd expect, necessarily, from a film crawling with fifty
thousand cockroaches.
Computer generated roaches, that is, and singing and dancing ones at that.
The movie opens with our farm fresh hero, Joe (an affable lug played with
open-mouthed conviction by Jerry O'Connell), hopping off the bus in New
York City.  Jobless, the first thing he looks for is a place to stay.  But
every damp, dirty, and wallpaper-peeling dive he looks at runs to four
figures.  "Anything for $100 a month?" he asks.  "Try Nebraska!" suggests a
witty slumlord.
Finally Joe stumbles upon a rent-controlled apartment in the East
Village--"the nastiest neighborhood in New York"--and by an opportune twist
of fate becomes the new tenant.  Much to the chagrin of landlords Vladimir
and Jesus Bianco (Shiek Mahmud-Bey and Jim Sterling) that is, who want him
out so that they can work a scam with a local senator (Robert Vaughn) to
raze the property and build a maximum security federal prison on the lot.
But Joe is in and settling down and discovering that he's got a roommate
problem.  Stuff moves.  Food gets eaten.  The place hums with a chorus of
tiny falsetto voices.  Finally, Joe gets to meet his diminutive uninvited
guests, a veritable army of wise-cracking, vaudevillian cockroaches who
form an immediate kinship with their human lodger on account of his
slobbiness.
These beetles have attitude.  And a code of honor.  And talent, belting out
a variety of "roach songs" throughout the film, from rap to gospel to Busby
Berkeley-inspired production numbers, each one sillier and cornier than the
last.  And the singing cockroaches are also on hand to help Joe win the
heart of the senator's daughter Lily (Megan Ward).  Lily, of course, is
unaware of her unscrupulous, fetishistic father's plans for the site, and
instead dreams of turning it into a community garden.
It's a socially-relevant, environmentally-conscious love story with songs
and bugs.  Lots of bugs.
I had guessed that the inquisitive youth outside the theater would get a
kick out of watching grown men pushing old folk down stairs, picking up
poop, and wearing women's undies.  If I was right, then he certainly
enjoyed spending the afternoon at JOE'S APARTMENT.  If not, at least he
couldn't have been offended by this harmless no-brainer.

Title
Review for Sous le sable (2000)
Ask me to name a Charlotte Rampling film off the top of my head and I'd be
hard pressed to come up with one, save for Liliana Cavani's controversial
1974 film "The Night Porter" (in which Rampling made a bit of a name for
herself by playing a concentration camp survivor who resumes the
sadomasochistic relationship with her former SS officer, played by Dirk
Bogarde).  But other titles do not as easily spring to mind.  Strange
really, since Rampling has made over 50 films in her 35-year film career.
One look at her latest film, François Ozon's "Under the Sand" ("Sous le
Sable"), and you'll be wondering why she's not more of a household name.
In the film, which pairs the oceanographics of Ozon's 1997 thriller "See
the Sea" ("Regarde la Mer") with the emotional turbulence of Liv Ullman's
recent marital drama "Faithless" ("Trolösa"), Rampling plays a woman, an
English professor, struggling to come to grips with the (assumed) death of
her husband.
Vacationing in the south of France, Marie Drillon (Rampling's given name
as it so happens) and Jean (Bruno Cremer) head down to the beach one
morning.  While Marie remains sunbathing on the sand, Jean takes to the
ocean, but the next time Marie looks up from her book, Jean cannot be found
and is feared drowned.
Marie is so devastated by the loss that she quickly falls into a pattern
of self-denial, acting as though her husband of 25 years were still alive.
This makes life understandably awkward for her friends, her family, and her
future lovers 
Ozon positively dumps the emotional weight of the film on Rampling's
delicate frame and she's more than up to the task.  Often without words,
the 56-year-old British actress (who's still not afraid to do nude scenes)
is able to convey a woman simply unable to face the loss of her beloved
husband.  Strangely enough, although Rampling's performance is second to
none, the character of Marie, while convincing, remains emotionally remote.
 By denying her husband's demise, she quickly puts up a wall around
herself, making it hard for anyone--and especially the audience--to relate
on an emotional level.
The director does, however, use an interesting technique in showing us
Marie's inability to accept the truth: Jean appears as an entity, a living,
breathing human being in Marie's lonely Paris apartment, even though it's
clear he's merely a figment of his wife's hopeful imagination.
"Under the Sand" is an interesting film in that slow, talky, Mediterranean
way, in which little happens in terms of plot development but a lot happens
in the mind and motivations of its central character.  It's cool and
calculated and rather straightforward but every time Rampling's on display
it seems better, somehow.  "Under the Sand" may be the impetus she needs to
stage a comeback, much like what Terence Stamp did with "The Limey," or
what Ben Kingsley, another "forgotten" actor, seems to be shooting for with
the upcoming "Sexy Beast."
Only time and talent (of which Ms. Rampling appears to have acres) will tell.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
        "Heads will roll" is the campy tagline for the latest film based on
Washington Irving's classic fable about a horseman with a penchant for
rendering his victims headless, but the ratings board figured there were
too many decapitations in Tim Burton's latest extravaganza and slapped
"Sleepy Hollow" with an "R."  That's a bit of a blow to a film which, in
hindsight, might have done better with a Halloween--rather than a
Thanksgiving--release.
        Burton's film is a strange fish regardless.  Although typically
ghoulish and macabre for the director of "Batman" and "Beetlejuice," it's
too bleak for kids, who'll have to drag a seventeen-year-old along with
them to see it.  And it's too relentless for adults, who are likely to grow
tired of its unsparing focus on severed heads bouncing through the
undergrowth.  Still, they might find some comfort in Rick Heinrichs'
Burton-esque production design or Johnny Depp's no-nonsense performance as
New York constable Ichabod Crane.
        Depp, in his third film with the director (following "Edward
Scissorhands" and "Ed Wood"), is deliciously affected as Crane, a dandy of
a policeman circa 1799 who's sent to the town of Sleepy Hollow in the
Hudson Islands to investigate the mysterious slayings of three of its
locals.  "Their heads were...gone?" gulps Depp when the town's
representatives fill him in on the gory goings-on.  Depp has a great way of
speaking in the film: mannered, polite, and with just a hint of the King's
English.
        Sleepy Hollow's spokespersons are an interesting mix of talent
decked out in fascinating period wardrobes that make them look like
characters in a Lewis Carroll novel, among them Michael Gambon, Miranda
Richardson, Jeffrey Jones, Michael Gough, and Richard Griffiths.  Christina
Ricci, who plays Katrina Van Tassel, provides the pulchritudinous love
interest but isn't given much to do and certainly doesn't connect in any
way with Depp's character.  Also on board, albeit briefly, is horror
veteran Christopher Lee, whose Hammer horror films of the '60s "Sleepy
Hollow" most closely resembles.
        The "R" rating is unfortunate because "Sleepy Hollow," like
Hammer's slew of Dracula pictures, is clearly a gothic fantasy and its
bloodlettings more ludicrously camp than graphic (although Burton never
spares us the post-decapitation shot and seems to revel in squirting blood
in Depp's face at every opportunity).  Since Irving's novel is the stuff of
American folklore, however, it's a pity Burton couldn't have done more with
it.  He's dressed it up some, and then painted it depressingly black.  And
he's milked a great performance from Depp but asked him, for the most part,
only to react to lifeless corpses.
        "Sleepy Hollow" never quite finds its footing despite some strong
performances and a great look (including a creepy-looking windmill in the
closing scenes that recalls Burton's debut short, "Frankenweenie").  As for
that tagline, heads are more likely to be scratched, and it's the eyes that
will be doing the rolling during "Sleepy Hollow."
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Deep End, The (2001)
        With three pre- to mid-teen children and an aging father-in-law to care
for--cooking and cleaning and laundry, drop-offs at Little League practice
and pick-ups from ballet practice--Margaret Hall's life is rife with
complications.  And with her naval officer husband stationed somewhere in
the North Atlantic, virtually impossible to reach by telephone, Margaret
leads the crazed life of a single parent.  But Margaret's hectic world is
about to get a lot more complicated.  Her teenage son Beau, a talented
trumpet player with strong prospects of being accepted into Wesleyan
University's music program, has fallen in with the wrong crowd.  His mother
drives from their idyllic, lakeside community of Tahoe City, California to
the sprawling urban metropolis of Reno, Nevada, with its imposing concrete
superstructures and seedy neon-lit nightclubs, to confront the 30-something
man who has befriended Beau.  "Stay away from my son" Margaret warns Darby
Reese.  Her words, however, appear to fall on deaf ears as Reese turns up
drunk at the family homestead later that evening, urging Beau to join him
in the boathouse.  There are words and advances and some pushing and
shoving and Beau runs back into the house, passed his startled mother, as
the crack of a wooden railing giving way breaks the cold blue silence and
an intoxicated Reese tumbles out of sight.  The next day, on her morning
walk, Margaret discovers Reese's lifeless body lying crumpled on the
shoreline, a boat anchor impaled in his chest.  With her maternal instincts
working overtime, Margaret quickly ferries the body out into the lake,
weighs it down, and dumps it overboard.  But Margaret's life is about to
get a lot more complicated.  Soon after the body is discovered, snagged on
a local fisherman's line, Margaret is paid a visit by an attractive-seeming
blackmailer in a red Nova.  Alek Spera threatens to hand over compromising
videotape of Beau to the police unless Margaret comes up with $50,000 by 4
o'clock the next day.  But Margaret's life is about to get a lot more
complicated, for Alek turns out to be something she never expected.
        Based on Elisabeth Sanxay Holding's novel "The Blank Wall," "The Deep End"
is a well-crafted thriller written and directed by Scott McGehee and David
Siegel ("Suture").  It makes the most of a talented but not particularly
well-known cast--Goran Visnjic plays Alek with a suave likeability,
Jonathan Tucker shines as the conflicted Beau, Peter Donat is amusing as
grandfather Hall, and Josh Lucas has an equally small but effective role as
the hapless Darby Reese.  The film is also lovingly photographed by Giles
Nuttgens and features an evocative score, courtesy Peter Nashel.  But it
owes everything to British actress Tilda Swinton.  Swinton, whose
pale-faced ethereal beauty has graced many of Derek Jarman's films
("Caravaggio," "Edward II," "The Last of England"), plays Margaret Hall in
"The Deep End" and, like Charlotte Rampling in this year's "Under the
Sand," turns in a commanding and accomplished performance.  Margaret is a
devoted mother who is willing to risk everything to protect the ones she
loves, and Swinton captures every frustration, every fear, every subtle
examination and every fervent realization and every nervous oscillation of
her being.  The role calls for an extremely wide range of emotions none the
least of which is simply playing a mother beset with a multitude of
domestic responsibilities.  Many can relate to that, of course; it's the
murder cover-up and the blackmail and the fear of losing one's son that
Swinton so gracefully, so graciously, makes resonate with the truest of
colors.  The end is deep all right, and there isn't a single shallow moment
in Tilda Swinton's canon.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Jurk, De (1996)
        Winner of the International Film Critics Award at the Venice Film
Festival, the Dutch film "The Dress" ("De Jurk") is an uneasy mix of
good-humored frivolity and disturbing sexual violence.  It often feels like
two separate and distinct movies stitched together.
        The lighter part of Alex van Warmerdam's film (the multi-talented
director also produced, wrote, and stars in "The Dress") is the unique
concept of having the film chronicle the title article, from its
inspiration and design, to its passage from one hapless owner to the next.
This construct is a clever one and van Warmerdam has a deft eye for social
detail, and an even defter ear for dialogue.
        The darker, unsettling aspects of the film are the incidents which
befall those unlucky enough to possess the eponymous garment.
        In this regard the film is only semi-successful, managing to entice
the audience with a breezy, humorous tone throughout while simultaneously
subjecting them to several unnerving sequences.  Sequences which, for the
most part, feature women at the hands of men with pathological designs on
their bodies.
        The dress in question is a simple summer frock sporting a bold,
eye-catching pattern of gold and rust-colored leaves--actually they look
like fat, tiger-striped leeches--backed by a sea of azure blue.
        A sixty-one year old woman first purchases the passion-inciting
apparel in a ritzy boutique, even though her husband claims it to be a
young girl's dress.  Within minutes of putting it on and suggesting they
engage in some wild sex, their luck begins to change.
        Next, a man with a ZZ Top beard gives the dress to his cleaning
woman, Johanna (the barely-dressed Ariane Schluter) after it drops out of
the sky, tugged from a clothesline by a gust of wind.  His futile attempts
to locate its original owner best exemplify van Warmerdam's wicked sense of
humor.  Johanna hopes to use the dress to seduce her painter boyfriend, but
he seems more interested in paint.  Unfortunately, the dress does catch the
eye of the ticket collector (played by the producer/director/writer) on
Johanna's train home, who follows her back to her place, slipping into bed
with her while she sleeps.
        This scene might be played for laughs--van Warmerdam certainly has
a gift for the absurd--but it's pretty creepy to think of someone
introducing themselves and claiming to love you, as van Warmerdam's
character does to Johanna, in such a private and vulnerable setting.
        That sequence, however, is not nearly as freakily disturbing as a
scene early in the film in which a motorcycle courier delivers a ream of
fabric to the dress designer and witnesses a half-naked woman running
around outside, crying hysterically because she doesn't want to engage in
kinky sex with the designer and his "friend" Tony.
        "Wear and beware" warns the movie's tag line.  Watch and beware as
well; "The Dress" is a funny, skillfully-made film that is often times
jarring.

Title
Review for Lakeboat (2000)
        Written by that poet of profanity David Mamet ("State and Main,"
"Glengarry Glen Ross," "American Buffalo"), co-produced by and starring
Tony Mamet (David's younger brother) and directed by longtime Mamet staple
Joe Mantegna (with music by Bob Mamet, no less), "Lakeboat" is a family
affair from start to finish.
        Adapted from one of the playwright's early autobiographical plays, the
film echoes Mamet's experiences aboard a Great Lakes cargo vessel shipping
freight from Chicago to Canada and back again.  On board the Seaway Queen,
Mamet quietly observes the comings and goings--as well as the comic,
profane, idiotic, and sometimes rather poignant banter--of its blue-collar
crew.  All of this has been lovingly brought to life by first-time director
Mantegna (who, with few exceptions, handles himself admirably) and a
first-class cast.
        The film focuses on grad student Dale Katzman (Tony Mamet), who has opted
to spend his summer working the 10pm-6am shift in the Seaway Queen's
galley, making egg salad sandwiches for a motley crew of seaman who seem to
have very little to do other than talk, talk, talk (in that regard the film
mirrors the very special "Spring Forward" from earlier this year).  These
guys, however, shoot the breeze about sex, booze, and nothing in that
lyrical, repetitive, and very profane David Mamet way.
        With the exception of Tony Mamet, who often looks stranded amid the great
Charles Durning, Peter Falk, Robert Forster and yes, even Denis Leary (in a
pitch-perfect performance as the ship's firemen), the cast is marvelous,
and the situations and vignettes dreamed up by the screenwriter bristle
with wit and inventiveness.
        It's not high drama or fast moving but if you love language (and,
especially, love the way in which Mamet can turn language into music), then
"Lakeboat" is for you.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Simpatico (1999)
        Academy AwardŽ Nominee Nick Nolte.  Academy AwardŽ Nominee Jeff
Bridges.  Academy AwardŽ Nominee Sharon Stone.  What the ads for
"Simpatico" seem to be telling us is that this latest screen adaptation of
a Sam Shepard play is populated by a cast of losers.
        For all the lack of statuettes on their mantels, however, the
problem with "Simpatico" isn't its cast.  The opportunity to see Nolte,
Bridges, and Stone working together is wonderful.  Having said that,
Stone's top billing is ludicrous given that she's essentially in only two
scenes.  One of these scenes requires her to Act, like Jessica Lange in a
Tennessee Williams potboiler--drinking, smoking, hanging around in a flimsy
bathrobe with bloodshot eyes, a gun, and a Southern drawl.  She does this
rather well.  The other scene requires her to ride a horse, the titular
Simpatico, in a fetching red raspberry dress.
        No, it's Shepard's play that's at the heart of the problem.
"Simpatico" might have worked well on the stage, engaging the viewer with
its volatile interactions set against the high-stakes world of the Kentucky
Derby, but it becomes convoluted and disengaging when opened up for the big
screen.  It's hard to follow what's going on, why Nolte's and Bridge's
characters are mysteriously morphing into one anothers over the course of
the picture, and what prompted British theater director Matthew Warchus to
make his screen directing debut with this particular piece.
        Nolte plays a Cucamonga bum (imagine "Down and Out in Beverly
Hills") first name Vinnie, Bridges is a wealthy Lexington thoroughbred
breeder last name Carter, and Stone is his emotionally bruised wife with
whom nobody appears to be sleeping.
        In their youth (via flashbacks), these three perpetrated a major
scam involving a duped horse and a racing commissioner, the fallout from
which begins to resurface as "Simpatico," the film, enters the starting
gate.  Said racing commissioner is sparingly portrayed by Albert Finney, an
Academy AwardŽ Winner at last!  He's credible, but the film's advertised
promise of Love, Betrayal, and Money is never fully realized.  There's
certainly no love to be found anywhere here; perhaps Intercourse,
Photographs, and Blackmail would have been more truthful a sell.
        Catherine Keener ("Being John Malkovich") does her
twitchy-American-female-version-of-Hugh-Grant thing again as an unlikely
Payless supermarket checkout gal.
        If the film's title sounds like the next Corona, it's not
inappropriate.  "Simpatico" comes wrapped in a fancy label--Nolte, Bridges,
Stone--but inside the product is flat and weak.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
        When Sofia Coppola landed the key role as Mary Corleone in the
final chapter of her father Francis Ford Coppola's legendary "Godfather"
trilogy, the cries of nepotism could be heard as far away as the Hollywood
Hills.  Overt familial favoritism notwithstanding, the greater outcry was
that Sofia simply wasn't good enough and for many, single-handedly ruined
the picture.
        In the ten years since "The Godfather: Part III," the 29-year-old
actress has had few film roles--she's appeared as Cindy in "Inside Monkey
Zetterland," as herself in Dad's documentary "Hearts of Darkness: A
Filmmaker's Apocalypse," and as Saché in last year's "Star Wars" prequel to
name the sum-total.  In short, she's done very little and failed to make
much of an impression.
        Switching to behind the camera as both writer and director, Coppola
might well have found her niche.  Skeptics will be quick to question just
how much of the finished product is Sofia's handiwork, given her bloodline
and insider connections, but the film plays very much *unlike* a Francis
Ford Coppola movie and in some ways that's a finer compliment than calling
her a chip off the old block.
        "The Virgin Suicides" is a deliberately-paced (or "slow" if you're
predisposed to cynicism) gothic fantasy about the ill-fated Lisbon
sisters--Cecilia, Bonnie, Lux, Mary, and Therese--told from the vantage of
the neighborhood boys who worshipped them from afar.  It's a fragile and
delicate affair, as fragile and delicate as the teenage female condition it
examines.  The film shimmers, breathes, and moves both on air and with Air,
since it's scored by the French avant-pop duo with a sparing insistence.
        The film is all the better for posing more questions than answers,
since its theme--the universal dilemma of young women struggling with their
blossoming sexuality--is not easily concluded.  The five young actresses,
among them Kirsten Dunst as the bold Lux, are fabulous, as are veterans
James Woods and a surrealistically frumpy-looking Kathleen Turner as their
parents.  Woods, especially, is remarkable since he rarely plays soft and
his Mr. Lisbon is a treasure of paternal quirks and insecurities.
        Behind the lens, Coppola's direction is sure-footed, her pacing
perfect.  And the power, wit, and calculated efficacy of her insightful
screenplay (based on the novel by Jeffrey Eugenides) can best be summed up
by a single line of dialogue.  Shortly after her first failed suicide
attempt, the youngest Lisbon daughter tells a male caregiver who falsely
assumes that everything is OK now "obviously, doctor, you've never been a
13-year-old girl."
        Watching the splendid "The Virgin Suicides," it's quite obvious
that Sofia Coppola has.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Swept from the Sea (1997)
        First and foremost it's a love story, and I'm a sucker for one of
those.  It's also a period romance set in England, land of my birth, with
the northern wilds of Yorkshire (county of my birth) doubling for some of
the bleak, windswept Cornish locales.  And it features a lush, romantic
score by John Barry, the British composer whose music puts the icing on my
proverbial cake.  Heck, one of the dialogue coaches--Sandra
Butterworth--even bears my name.
        That's too bad, because "Swept from the Sea" is far from
unwatchable.  The scenery is quite spectacular--Dick Pope's cinematography
brings the typically wet English locations to life, from surf pounding
against the craggy, desolate cliffs to rain pelting down on the tiny
coastal village.  The actors are equally attractive (I didn't say wet).
Not just the leads, Vincent Pérez and Rachel Weisz, but the supporting
performers too--Ian McKellen, Joss Ackland, and Kathy Bates.  Very
colorful.  And then there's the music, of course.  Full, rich, and
evocative.  Typical Barry.
        Part of the problem is the story.  It's just not much of one.
Based on a short story by Joseph Conrad, "Swept from the Sea" tells the
tale of Yanko, the soul survivor of an immigrant vessel bound for
"A-may-reeka" that flounders off the Cornish coast, and Amy Foster, the
servant girl with whom he falls in love.  Amy is an outcast and the
townsfolk are mean to Yanko because they don't like his "But I've just been
shipwrecked, dammit!" looks or understand his balmy accent.  But that's
about it.   Did I mention it's a *short* story?  There's not enough plot to
flesh out the film's overly long running time.
        Fortunately we've got Cornwall to look at and Barry's score to
listen to.
        Amy is distant and aloof, a spurned free spirit who uses silence as
a defense mechanism.  She likes to dance in the rain and wade through
tidepools looking for stuff for her collection, kind of like Ariel in "The
Little Mermaid."  The locals think she's simple, or simply crazy.  Amy does
a lot of staring and mopes around without saying very much but it doesn't
make for blistering drama.  Yanko, too, is distant and aloof and the silent
type but because he's foreign, a traveler from a remote region of the
Carpathian mountains.  This makes relating to the young lovers a bit of a
challenge since empathizing with or even understanding them is difficult.
        Pérez and Weisz aren't exactly household names and are unlikely to
become such on the strength of "Swept from the Sea."  They both turn in
creditable performances, but the characters they play seem strangely devoid
of passion; their love never really ignites on screen, it smolders a
little, then goes out.  Director Beeban Kidron should have thrust them
together more often; their one erotic scene together--in Amy's secret
grotto--is awkwardly handled, as if the actors themselves felt embarrassed.
        I did enjoy McKellen's role, as the doctor who befriends Yanko and
improves his own chess game in the process.  (Aha!  Yanko must be
*Russian*, Dr. Kennedy explains when Yanko shows him a move or two.
Russians are most excellent chess players.)  Mad.  Russian.  What's the
diff?  Ackland and Bates offer predictably staunch support but, sadly,
there's not much meat here.

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Somewhere between this year's "Absolute Power" and his latest film,
"Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil," somewhere between good and evil
itself, director Clint Eastwood forgot how to make a movie.
That in and of itself is hard to believe; Eastwood has had a successful
career spanning four decades.  What makes it all the more confounding is
what Eastwood had to work with: "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil"
is based on John Berendt's Pulitzer Prize-nominated novel, a work brimming
with intrigue, murder, and colorful Southern characters.  The setting is
Savannah, Georgia--hard to make that town look dull--and Eastwood has both
Kevin Spacey and John Cusack on board, two actors with more charm than the
entire cast of "Fletch Lives."
The plot is a simple one: John Kelso (Cusack) is a New York City journalist
who is hired to cover a swank Christmas party of Savannah's own Jim
Williams (Spacey), a nouveau riche ("it's the riche that counts") antiques
dealer.  Kelso's assignment is to produce a 500 word "literary postcard"
for "Town and Country" magazine but when Williams is suddenly and
surprisingly accused of murdering his sometime lover Billy Hanson (Jude
Law), Kelso's postcard evolves into an investigation that draws in the
town's melting pot of eccentrics.
It's been a long time since someone snoring in a movie theater drowned out
the actors' dialogue but the courtroom scenes are so stultifyingly
somnambulistic you can soon understand why.  The proceedings are
snail-pacingly slow, the star witnesses all seem half asleep, and by
verdict time you've forgotten what Alison Eastwood--who provides Cusack
with some superfluous love interest--is even *doing* in this picture.  Ah
yes...  She's the director's daughter.
In addition, the film surprises with some very shoddy editing (characters
"jump" across the frame) and--something you don't see very often--an actor
flubbing his lines.  Spacey, as usual, is dapper and beguiling as the
accused but the likable Cusack is nothing but jaw-dropping reaction shots.
Savannah, of course, looks lovely, a historical appreciation society's
dream dripping with Spanish moss and Southern hospitality.  It's a town
that has its fair share of weirdos--imaginary dog walkers, voodoo
priestesses, and overstuffed, heavily armed drunks.  ""Gone With the Wind"
on mescaline," as Kelso describes it.
Perhaps the most colorful character of them all is The Lady Chablis, a
transvestite diva played by herself, whose increasingly annoying presence
results in more open mouths from Cusack's character.  For a New York
writer, Kelso seems a teensy bit out of touch when he finally realizes that
she is, in fact, a he.  Chablis' antics at a debutante cotillion ball
seemed designed solely as a showcase for her questionable talents; her
nightclub act, if you can call it that, is a bust (no pun intended).
The film often seems too focused on The Lady Chablis and not enough on the
motivations and ambiguities of its central characters.  For two and a half
"leisurely" hours, "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil" just sits
there on the screen like an overbaked soufflé that has failed to rise.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
        Perhaps I should preface this review by stating, for the record,
that I happen to love Michael Douglas.
        Well, I'm not *in* love with him.  Gwyneth Paltrow is in love with
him.  Well, not Gwyneth Paltrow exactly, but the character she plays in her
latest film, one Emily Bradford.  Well, she *was* in love with him,
presumably at some point (not Michael Douglas per se, but the character he
plays, Emily's husband Steven Taylor).  But now Emily, as the movie opens,
is in love with Viggo Mortensen.  Well, the character *he* plays that is,
emerging--and chronically handsome--artist David Shaw.
        So here we have a problem.  Emily's married to Steven but she's in
love with David.  Steven, who knows it, is set to inherit a tidy sum if his
wife, er, expires.  Hmm...  How are we going to rectify this situation?
Well how about a juicy little murder for starters?
        Yes.  That would certainly resolve a thing or two.  And it's
certainly the least we can expect from a movie called "A Perfect Murder,"
loosely based on Alfred Hitchcock's "Dial M for Murder."
        In Hitch's 1953 film, Ray Milland schemes to knock off his lovely
wife (played by the even lovelier Grace Kelly) in order to bolster his
flagging bank balance.  His cause is also "justified" by the fact that his
wife is guilty of cheating on him.
        In this '90's update, Michael Douglas has similar designs on
Gwyneth Paltrow's cashflow, even though he's filthy rich himself (Douglas
plays yet another one of his classic "greed is good"
banker-broker-commodities-trader-dealer-investor types.  It's a role
Douglas could play in his sleep ... and probably does!  Emily's passionate
trysts with the afore-mentioned David provide Steven with similar
"justification" for orchestrating her timely demise.
        The twist?  Steven entertains his wife's lover and makes him an
offer he can't refuse: $500,000 tax free.  "For just walking away from
her?" asks the painter with, it turns out, a scurrilous past (handy for
blackmailing purposes).  "I said tax free, I didn't say free.  You get
$100,000 now and $400,000 later."  "For what?"  "Killing my wife."  Well,
we've all seen the previews...
        OK, so it's not the most pleasant proposition on the planet but the
way Douglas says "my wife" is totally delicious.  I mean, I bet he's said
it a million times before in a million different movies but it's the sort
of phrase you want to record on a dictaphone and play back to yourself over
and over.  "My wife."  It's got that mean, menacing, rasping quality that
gives you the shivers.  Damn, that Michael Douglas is good!
        "A Perfect Murder" is a slick, smart, sexy, and satisfying thriller
from director Andrew Davis ("The Fugitive").  The film is well
cast--everyone and everything is gorgeous looking--and it doesn't insult
the intelligence like some other hack psychodramas.  There are the
requisite twists and turns and the murder weapon--a pair of scissors in the
original--is tastefully inspired, if a little too telegraphed, this time
out (causing this reviewer to mutter under his breath "he's done!").
        Davis' film is less than perfect--the ending briefly descends into
slasher flick-dom for one thing--but it's a murderously fun way to spend a
couple of hours in a darkened movie theater with or, preferably, without
"my wife."

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1996 David N. Butterworth/The Summer Pennsylvanian
Some might find it hard to take Charlie Sheen seriously these days.
>From his pumped up, exaggerated roles in HOT SHOTS! and its wackier sequel,
HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX, to his spotty appearance on the TV hit FRIENDS,
saying that Sheen's recent performances have bordered on self-parody would
be like saying TWISTER is a movie about the weather.  But it's his earnest
performance in THE ARRIVAL that raises this extraterrestrial flick above
your average We Are Not Alone science fiction thriller.
Sheen stars as geekazoid radio astronomer Zane Ziminski--where do they get
these names?--doing "dish time" from a secluded NASA-funded outpost,
tracking F-class stars and listening for signs of "non-Earth based" life.
It's like STAKEOUT with a glossier Sheen.
For the most part a radio astronomer's career is not an eventful one...
Until one night, when tracking star Wolf 336, 14.6 light years away, Zane
and his co-geek astronomer buddy get a "spike" on their oscillator, and
look out boys cuz it's a big one!
But Zane's gaga enthusiasm is quickly quashed by his icy, unsympathetic
boss Gordian (played by icy, unsympathetic Ron Silver, similarly corrupt in
TIME COP and BLUE STEEL).  Gordian tells Zane "If you can't confirm it, it
doesn't exist."  Forty-two seconds of non-random, non-Earth-based signal
doesn't amount to a hill o' beans if it doesn't repeat itself.  And, to add
insult to injury, Zane shortly learns that his position at the Jet
Propulsion Lab is being eliminated-government cut-backs and all that.
Sounds like a cover-up to me.  And Zane thinks so too.
So, with the help of some playful jump-cutting techniques, Zane signs up as
a satellite television repairperson and rigs up an elaborate scheme to
confirm his There's Something Out There notion, uncovering an equally
elaborate conspiracy of global warming and master plans.
Lindsay Crouse plays eco-botanical geologist weather person thing Ilana
Green, whose path crosses Zane's down in Central America (she's concerned
about thermonuclear temperatures or some such, and there's a creative
opening sequence in which you wonder why she's wearing such a big coat).
Zane has managed to trace the radiowaves to somewhere in Mexico: "one
signal sky-based, one signal earth-based."  Zane might look more like the
rocket scientist but even I could figure out what that means!  But by the
time he gets to the radio station broadcasting the signal...  Well, it's
toast.  Sounds like a cover-up to me!  Yep.  Zane's with me on this one.
And from there Zane finally stumbles upon the whole enchilada, when we
finally get to see the little green men for the first time--no "flashlight
fingers or metal teeth" here, but anatomically correct aliens of the
illegal variety.
The large-scale special effects are decent overall, but it's the little
ones that add more to this movie: the aliens' imaginative--if
under-utilized--dialect, for example, and the spinning copper sphere which
clears a room faster than anything in TWISTER.  And, of course, Sheen's
energetic, bug-eyed performance, technically not an effect but special
nonetheless.  Writer and first-time director David Twohy (he wrote the
under-appreciated WATERWORLD) keeps the production running smoothly, even
if his "the polar icecaps are melting" theorizing is starting to sound a
little too familiar.
The buzz on the street is that THE ARRIVAL is a slight, under-hyped
precursor of the Really Big summer alien invaders picture, ID4.  But if
you're already disappointed by the first wave of summer blockbusters, you
could do far worse than to check out this competent piece of S.F.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
        A triumph of style over substance, "The Cell" looks like the
product of a meeting between that darling of the British Film Institute
Peter Greenaway ("Prospero's Books," "The Pillow Book") and the costume
designer for "Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace."  It's as if they
got together one day and decided to make a horror film.
        There are more elaborate gowns, sets, and funny goings on in "The
Cell" than in all of the "Star Wars" pictures combined, and if Greenaway
thinks he holds a monopoly on outrageous headgear and collars that stick
way out to here, he's got another thing coming.
        "The Cell," unfortunately, remains a mixed bag because for all of
its strikingly creative visuals (think a high art version of "The Silence
of the Lambs"), it's a bit of a non-starter in the storytelling department.
        Jennifer Lopez plays a pretty psychologist who's recruited to
"enter the mind" of a serial killer so that she can discover where he's
stashed his latest potential victim.  The psychopath is boldly played by
Vincent D'Onofrio, looking remarkably like rocker Neil Young.  The film's
title refers to a nasty little chamber in which Carl Stargher (D'Onofrio)
likes to hole up his victims (all women), eventually drowning them and
turning them into dolls with some industrial-strength bleach.  This sicko
is also into body piercing and likes to suspend himself from chains with
metal rings cutting into his flesh, just for grins you understand.  He also
has an albino German Shepherd and drives a Ford pickup which provides the
FBI (in the form of a scruffy-looking Vince Vaughn) with a rather easy way
of tracing him.
        About that mind-entering stuff.  Catherine Deane (Lopez) is
employed by a bunch of company crackpots (among them "Secrets & Lies"'
Marianne Jean-Baptiste) who have developed this dubious scientific method
for allowing one person to engage with another, cerebrally.  The technique
is used for helping schizophrenic adolescents recognize and face their
fears, such as in the film's opening sequence set in a desert.  What the
process amounts to is having the two willing (or not so willing in the case
of the comatose Stargher) participants outfitted in blood-red Twizzler
suits, suspended above the floor while cloths with chic microchip designs
are laid over their faces, and cranking the knob until it hits eleven!
        This process allows the filmmakers, former music video director
Tarsem Singh among them, to spend most of the film buried inside Vincent
D'Onofrio's head.  Think about that for a minute.  If the bulk of the film
is all dream material, then they can go hog wild on the visuals, right?
And hog wild they pretty much go.  It's amazing stuff indeed, and if you've
seen the prevalent trailer you'll get a good sense of what you can expect.
(I liked the visual of the three women cloaked in monochromatic Medieval
garb sitting in a plowed field, their heads held high to the sky with their
mouths wide open like baby birds.  They turn to talk to Vaughn's character
but only for a moment, snapping their heads and mouths immediately back
into an upright, open position.  Now *that's* the stuff of dreams!)
        But where's the story?  There really isn't one.  But for most of
"The Cell" it won't matter; just sit back and enjoy the creepy, dazzling
ride.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
After dropping her son off with her ex-husband, Theresa Osborne (Robin 
Wright Penn) elects to spend a few days on the Cape before returning to 
the Windy City.  While jogging on the beach, she discovers a bottle 
half-buried in the sand.  Inside, there's a love letter.  "Dear 
Catherine..." the note begins.  It's signed "G."
Theresa is so immediately struck by the poetry, the passion, and the 
honesty of the writing that she's determined to locate its author.  
Charlie, her editor at the "Chicago Tribune" (a well-cast Robbie 
Coltrane), sees this as a great human interest story and prints the 
letter without Theresa's input.  The article produces a bonanza of 
reader feedback: two more letters materialize, both written on the same, 
handcrafted paper and using the same old-fashioned typewriter.  Since 
Theresa works in the research department, it isn't long before she's 
tracked the creator of these beautifully heartfelt passages to the 
little town of St. Claire on North Carolina's Outer Banks.
Cute idea for a movie, especially one called "Message in a Bottle."  
Actually, it's a cute idea for a book, since the film is based on 
Nicholas Sparks' novel of the same name.  Apparently the book is more 
moving than the film: "I didn't cry during this but when I read the book 
I couldn't hold back the tears," an older gentleman commented during the 
end credits.  Hmm...
Once Theresa shows up in St. Claire, starts poking around, and 
discovers that "G." is, in fact, Kevin Costner... well.  Things take a 
turn for the worse.
That's not exactly fair.  Costner, as Garret Blake, a boat restorer 
with a dead wife and adversarial in-laws, is no worse here than he was 
in, say, "The Bodyguard."  But he does tend to play two--and only 
two--distinct roles.  The significant, allegorical, God-like-figure 
role--The Mariner, The Postman, Lt. John Dunbar, Robin Hood.  Or the 
goofy, irreverent, sexy hunk who wears his baseball cap backwards and 
believes in long, slow, deep, soft, wet kisses that last three days 
role.
"Message in a Bottle" bids Costner a return to his more romantic roots, 
but since he's in mourning throughout most of the picture, he slips into 
portraying The Carpenter.
Robin Wright Penn is attractive and earnest herself, so the two get on 
well enough, but most of what they say and do is the stuff of clichéd 
cinema, which makes the second half of the film less interesting than 
the first.
It's not that Theresa and Garret don't have any chemistry; they're easy 
and likable and kind of chummy together.  But the film doesn't take any 
risks.  It's an unapologetic tearjerker right down to its manipulative 
climax.  And, of course, there's the big scene in the rain following 
Garret's painful realization of why Theresa came to St. Claire in the 
first place.  Why do films insist on pelting our heroes with tens of 
gallons of water during key moments such as this?  And why did I keep 
looking to see if Garret had little flaps of skin behind his ears?
Fortunately, "Message in a Bottle" has Paul Newman onboard to smack 
Theresa and Garret around a bit.  As Garret's father Dodge, Newman 
steals the film with his sarcastic put-downs and, frankly, superior 
acting talents.  Hats off to the film's producers for having the 
foresight to sign the gracefully-aging veteran.  Without him, "Message 
in a Bottle" would be lost at sea.


Title
Review for Real Blonde, The (1997)
        In the James Bond film "Diamonds Are Forever," Tiffany Case asks
007 whether he prefers brunettes to redheads.  Bond's response is that it
doesn't really matter, as long as collars and cuffs match.
        Well, collars and cuffs don't match in "The Real Blonde."  What
might have sounded good on paper ends up as a largely unfunny, meandering
comedy on screen.
        The film, supposedly a satire of the superficiality of soap operas
and the modeling business, is wafer thin.  It plays like an "Ally McBeal"
episode dragged out to the nth degree, replete with a few unnecessary
"fantasy" sequences.  Writer/director Tom DiCillo manages the material as
if poking fun at daytime dramas is a fresh idea.  It isn't.  The only
surprise here is that the talented DiCillo could make familiar terrain so
dreary.
        Matthew Modine plays Joe, a struggling actor waiting tables in
order to pay the rent.  He's 35 with no agent and no credits since he's too
proud to take on roles in commercials or soap operas.  "That's not really
acting" he tells his girlfriend of six years, Mary (Catherine Keener), with
whom he bickers constantly about sex.  But they need the money, so Joe
finally agrees to take a part in a Madonna video.  But it's not really
Madonna starring in the video but a lookalike (played by Elizabeth Berkley,
still trying to jump-start her career after "Showgirls").  This points out
how artificial this whole business is, one supposes.
        DiCillo has referred to "The Real Blonde" as "off-kilter, but an
interesting combination of all sorts of stuff..."  The film, which wanders
all over the place without getting anywhere, is remarkably *on*-kilter and,
with perhaps the single exception of the always-likable Modine (who's not
afraid to stand around in a very unattractive bathing suit surrounded by
hunks), the entire cast is vague and uninteresting.
        Catherine Keener, who's appeared in DiCillo's previous three films
(including the brilliant "Living In Oblivion"), is at her most annoying in
"The Real Blonde."  Look at her closely; she really can't act at all.  Her
reactions are all wrong, almost always out of sync with her co-stars.  She
reacts too soon, or too late, to lines and situations.  She moves her eyes,
or her mouth, far too much.  She frowns, she yells, she babbles--she blows
chunks.
        Maxwell Caulfield plays Joe's actor/waiter buddy Bob, the one
obsessed with dating a "natural" blonde.  Bob's personality (not to mention
Caulfield's acting ability) parallels that of the character he plays on the
soap opera "Passion Crest"--stiff and uninteresting.  Maybe that's the
point.  Daryl Hannah is dim and uninteresting as the real blonde of the
title, a soap dish who beds Bob both on- and off-camera.  Hannah looks
about fifty in this movie (she's only 37).  Why is that?  Almost all the
women in the film wear tops that show their nipples.  WHY IS THAT!?  Marlo
Thomas plays an uninteresting fashion photographer.  Kathleen Turner plays
an uninteresting talent agent.  Buck Henry plays an uninteresting shrink.
Christopher Lloyd plays an uninteresting caterer.  And so on.
        The best parts of the "The Real Blonde" are the beginning and the
end, brief scenes of an elderly woman losing and then finding her dog.
There's more depth and sincerity in a single close-up of her expressive
face than in the entire film.  While this contrast is supposedly meant to
highlight the shallowness of the other characters' lives, the only thing
that makes shallow and superficial interesting is if it's funny.

Title
Review for Zoolander (2001)
        Having a poke at the fashion industry (and, more specifically, its
preening portfolio of male models) doesn't exactly take a degree in rocket
science but Ben Stiller takes a stab at it anyway in "Zoolander," his
latest turn behind the camera.  It's obvious from the turgid Bond-ian
opening that something is amiss, and you quickly wonder just how long
Stiller, the put-upon star of "Meet the Parents" and the occasional
director of such films as "Reality Bites" and "The Cable Guy," can drag
this catwalk spectacle out.
        Derek Zoolander (Stiller) is the toast of the fashion world and, as the
film opens, is up for Male Model of the Year for an unprecedented fourth
time (he's won three years in a row).  Apart from being terribly
good-looking (his words not theirs), Derek has perfected The Look.  He
calls one of its several manifestations Blue Steel, an edgy glance to
camera, eyebrows tight, lips pursed in a half-kiss, half-smile.  It's a
look that can be seen all over town--on billboards, on magazine covers,
everywhere.  Le Tigre is another one (it's exactly the same look).  He's
working on a new one--Magnum--but after nine years it's still not perfected.
        The only threat to Derek's throne is a blue-eyed blond supermodel named
Hansel.  Played by Owen Wilson (from "Shanghai Noon"; he also played
opposite Stiller in "Meet the Parents"), Hansel is every bit as
handsome--and intellectually impaired--as his rival.  These two pretty
dimwits go at in on the runway and just about every fashion world cliché
gets trampled on in the process.  There's also a plot to kill the prime
minister of Malaysia!
        Stiller must be a popular guy in Hollywood these days because his film is
populated with a veritable Who's Who of television and movie talent.  Many
of these, like David Duchovny, David Bowie, and Winona Ryder, show up for
brief scenes and disappear soon after and some (like Gary Shandling and
Vince Vaughn) don't even get a speaking part.  But they clearly wanted to
be in Ben's picture.  I can understand that: Stiller's a terrifically funny
guy (and I mean that most sincerely: he's the *only* reason to ever rent
"Mystery Men"!).
        So how come "Zoolander" misses the mark?  Perhaps its subject matter is
simply too obvious and the jokes simply not funny enough.  If you're going
to take such an easy target you have to do something special with it but
Stiller, who co-wrote the movie with Drake Sather and John Hamburg based on
a VH-1/Vogue Fashion Awards character from five years ago, never really
moves the humor a notch above silly.  There are certainly chuckles to be
found here--it's hard watching anyone, let alone Stiller, who seems to have
a natural and uncanny aptitude for physical comedy, posing and posturing
and prancing around in silly outfits to Frankie Goes to Hollywood without
cracking a smile--but "Zoolander" never pushes the envelope, never touches
on inspired.  It's frivolous and not much more.
        Co-starring Will Ferrell as a poodle-coiffed designer named Mugatu, Milla
Jovovich as his butch henchwoman, Christine Taylor (still a dead ringer for
"The Brady Bunch"'s Marcia) as the love interest and, oh, Ben's Dad Jerry,
"Zoolander" is another one of those "Saturday Night Live"-styled sketches
dragged out in perpetuity.  The most disappointing thing about Stiller's
film, however, is that all it appears to be saying is that male models
don't seem to have a lot between the ears.  There.  I just saved you eight
bucks.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
LOCK, STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1999 David N. Butterworth
        It features a ne'er-do-well quartet of underachievers with names
like Soap and Bacon.  It's got a narrated, freeze-frame opening sequence in
which two tossers bolt from the fuzz to a pulsating rock soundtrack.  It's
got heavily-accented dialogue that could benefit from subtitles, lots of
ultraviolence, and a big bag of dosh.
        It's not "Trainspotting," the trans-Atlantic junkie hit that saw
Ewan McGregor (soon to be seen as the young Obi-Wan in the eagerly-awaited
"Star Wars" prequel) shooting heroin like there was no tomorrow.
        It's "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels," the latest anarchistic
exercise to bear the slogan "the film that took England by storm."
        Like Danny Boyle's "Trainspotting," Guy Ritchie's film finds
strength in its cast of virtual unknowns, SAG-speaking that is.  One face
will be familiar to a particular British audience, but seen spattered with
mud and blood on the small screen, not the big one.
        First, former Manchester United striker Eric Cantona had an
unexpected turn as a French ambassador in the acclaimed costume drama,
"Elizabeth."  Now, not to be outdone by his former English league rival,
Wimbledon midfielder Vinnie Jones has a sizable and affecting role in
"Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels."
        Whereas M. Cantona was simply adequate as an historical dignitary,
Jones' performance is surprisingly on the ball.  Not just when he exhibits
the kind of prowess he showed on the football field--a headbutt here, a
kick to the groin there, a fist to the face elsewhere--but also when he
portrays his character's odd sense of propriety and placidly threatening
demeanor.  Jones, appropriately attired, jeweled, and coifed, plays Big
Chris, debt collector to a seedy porn king with the catchy moniker of
Hatchet Harry.
        Harry likes to play cards, and it's one of his high stakes poker
games that first introduces us to our hapless heroes: Eddie, Tom, Bacon,
and Soap.
        Eddie is the brains of the bunch (and that's not saying much) who's
known how to handle cards ever since he could handle cards.  As the film
opens, Eddie and his friends are scurrying to find the considerable funds
necessary to enter Harry's card game.  Cash in hand, Eddie enters the fray
and eventually finds himself on the losing end of a pair of sevens
(depressingly realistic hands for a change).  Now the guys have a little
problem: one week to come up with half a million pounds to pay off the
hatchet man.
        The clever and complicated plot twists and turns and finally comes
full circle.  Whereas the script is smart, our protagonists are not, and
vast amounts of money change hands as often as the pair of antique firearms
referred to in the title.
        Writer/director Ritchie shoots all this with the grainy,
sepia-toned imagery of an old-fashioned western.  Whether it's an homage to
that genre or an unabashed rip-off of "Trainspotting," one thing is clear:
it's bloody funny.  Better make that bloody *and* funny, since "Lock, Stock
and Two Smoking Barrels" spares very little in either department.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
        You don't need to have seen the original "Species" to appreciate
how utterly lousy "Species II" is.
        With few exceptions, sequels tend to be worse than the films that
spawned them, but the fact that "Species II" is a follow-up isn't the only
reason it's so miserable.  It's the predictable storyline, the cardboard
characters, the banal dialogue, the failed attempts at humor, the revolting
special effects, the gratuitous nudity (all female, of course), the bad
acting, and the bland direction.
        The plot, simply geared at getting the alien species back on planet
earth so that it can reak some more havoc, involves three astronauts
landing on Mars and inadvertently bringing some alien slime in a soil
sample back aboard their shuttle.  The slime, well, sort of jumps out at
them and the screen turns black.  That should have been the end of the
movie right there.
        Back on terra firma, at least one of the crew is now a carrier of
alien DNA and, as you'll remember if you saw the first movie, driven by a
strong urge to procreate.  On a parallel track, government scientists have
cloned a version of Sil from the first film (now called Eve, again "played"
by Natasha Henstridge) and are keeping her around for some testing.  This,
apparently, includes observing Eve's reaction to "The Dukes of Hazzard" tv
show, which she appears to enjoy.
        Eve's bio-rhythms go off the scale each time one of her kinfolk
"mates," which we are forced to witness in gross-out detail, but otherwise
there doesn't appear to be a whole lot of reason why Henstridge is in this
film, unless it was written into her contract (let's hope it cited one
sequel and one sequel only).
        Eve finally breaks free of her confines--and her bra--for the
finale, but the effects are so messy you can't really see what's going on.
        Peter Boyle is totally wasted as an institutionalized scientist who
screams "I told 'em not to go!" at the top of his lungs, referring to the
Mars mission but more likely aimed at the makers of this piffle.  Michael
Madsen reprises his role of Press Lennox (so that he can enter high
security areas, flash a badge and claim to be Press, maybe?), as does Marg
Helgenberger as Dr. Laura Baker, the one subjecting Eve to the tv reruns.
They're both unbelievably wooden.
        What's a talented filmmaker like Peter Medak ("The Ruling Class,"
"The Krays," "Let Him Have It") doing directing this tripe, I wonder.  It's
an unfortunate trend, this: once-talented directors throwing in the towel
and lending their names to unchallenging horror flicks like "Species II."
Last year Peter Hyams gave us "The Relic"; no thanks necessary there.  And
the first "Species" was helmed by Roger Donaldson who, although certainly
no genius behind the camera, had demonstrated much better judgment with his
previous choice of projects.
        "Species II" is worthless.  Worse than that, it's also
exploitative, offensive, and insulting to the intelligence at every turn.
It's not that there isn't anything positive to say about the film.  There
is.  After 92 minutes, it ends.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
        Over the years, Kevin Spacey has delighted in playing louses:
charming men with hearts as black as pitch.  In his latest film, Spacey is
more a loser than a louse, but his Lester Burnham still maintains some
unpleasant, creepy-crawly qualities.
        For 14 years Lester has been a writer for a crappy media magazine.
He's married, unhappily, to Carolyn (Annette Bening), an aspiring realtor
who lives the image of success even though she's not really all that good
at selling houses.  The Burnhams have a teenage daughter, Jane (Thora
Birch), but neither of them really know her.  Lester, bitter and
unfulfilled at 42, hates his job, which is just as well because he's about
to lose it.
        And, as Spacey's narration informs us at the beginning of the film,
he's not going to make it to 43 either.
        That admission sets the scene for "American Beauty," a dark and
disturbing black comedy with an almost painful emphasis on the black part.
It's a film that revels in the decay and disharmony of suburbia; there are
moments when you think to yourself "things are going to get ugly" before
realizing that things have been interminable from the outset.
        Lester's life is spiraling out of control; unhappiness reigns
supreme.  Then Jane brings home a cheerleading girlfriend one night and
it's lust at first sight (since Carolyn isn't exactly meeting Lester's
needs in that department).  Lester begins to fantasize about Angela (Mena
Suvari) who, of course, is young enough to be his daughter.  Meanwhile, a
camcorder-obsessed boy called Ricky Fitts moves in next door and takes a
shine to Jane, offering to get rid of Lester as a token of his affection
(his father, played by Chris Cooper, is a bigoted Marine who requires urine
samples from his son every six months to ensure that he's drug-free).
        It's not immediately clear whether Ricky (played with stone-cold
credulity by Wes Bentley) is kidding, but as Alan Ball's not very pretty
screenplay unfolds, events soon begin to take more chilling turns.
        The strength of the acting in "American Beauty" keeps everything on
the edge, with Spacey especially good as the frustrated Lester.  Former
Broadway director Sam Mendes makes his big-screen debut with this film, and
it's a good one.  There are times when "American Beauty" feels like it
might be toppling over into melodrama, but Mendes grabs the reins and reels
his actors in, generating power and a lot of perspiration in the process.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
        So it's better than "Ready to Wear" ("Pręt-ŕ-Porter"), but that's
about the kindest thing one can say about "Dr. T and the Women," the latest
film by director Robert Altman, an over-cast and overextended project which
meanders and sallies for near-on two unfocused hours without really getting
anywhere.  Richard Gere stars as Dr. Sullivan Travis aka Dr. T, a
successful Texan gynecologist whose waiting room runneth over with the
finest fillies Dallas has to offer, lots of hot flushed gals with big
bouffants and lots of lacquer jostling for position in his fur-lined
stirrups.  In an all-time male fantasy quickly done in by an 80-year-old
with a yeast infection, the good doctor prods, probes, and pap smears his
way from nine to five yet remains strangely unfulfilled.  His cheerleading
daughter Dee Dee ("Almost Famous"' Kate Hudson) is about to check in to the
honorable estate of marriage while his loopy wife Kate (Farrah Fawcett)
checks into the local sanitarium.  Dr. T needs something new in his life;
something fresh.  Enter Bree, a golf pro played by Helen Hunt.  "You're not
like any woman I've ever met," he tells her to her face.  And if a
gynecologist tells you there are no two alike then you have to believe
there are no two alike.  With a screenplay by Anne Rapp (who penned
Altman's previous film, the over-cast and overextended "Cookie's Fortune"),
"Dr. T and the Women" follows pretty much the same path--a lot of talent
drowning under Lyle Lovett's Texas twangs.  Any film which opens with an
implicit pelvic exam and closes with an explicit live birth is trying to
say something, but the stuff in the middle, alas, doesn't amount to much of
anything.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
        He moves with the grace, swiftness, and agility of a mountain lion
stalking its prey.  He delivers a blood-curdling cry that carries for
miles.  He looks like Christopher Lambert.  And every time he pauses for
thought among the lush green vegetation of his jungle home, he's backed by
Phil Collins getting all earnest on us.
        Phil Collins?  After Elton John's contributions to "The Lion King,"
the conspiracy becomes clear: short, paunchy, balding, soft-pop superstars
living out their golden years on Disney royalty checks.
        Collins' occasional caterwauling aside (mercifully he performs only
five new songs), Disney's animated version of the Edgar Rice Burroughs
classic tale about the man raised by apes is not without its engaging
moments.  In fact, it sticks closer to Burroughs' novel than any of the
previous 47 screen variants (with perhaps the exception of "Greystoke: The
Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes" which starred, coincidentally,
Christopher Lambert).  But, animation-wise, it's not the most impressive of
summer releases from the Disney studios.  If nothing else, Tarzan made me
realize that my first impressions of last year's "Mulan" were perhaps a
little harsh.
        Tarzan himself, voiced by Tony Goldwyn (Tony who?), is nevertheless
wonderful in all three presented life stages--infant, juvenile, and
fully-formed, loincloth-sporting muscle man, who whips from tree to tree
faster than a Jedi speeder or "The Little Mermaid."
        As an infant, he's featured in the film's scariest scene (according
to my ten year old), when he tangles with a particularly nasty leopard
(nasty in both senses of the word; this animal has a particularly
badly-drawn head, and it makes one eagerly recall the lithe, sensuous lines
of "The Jungle Book"'s big cats--Bagheera and Shere Khan).  This is where
the soon-to-be-called Tarzan is rescued by a nurturing gorilla called Kala
(voiced by Glenn Close), much to the disapproval of the group's domineering
leader, Kerchak (Lance Henriksen).
        As a juvenile, Tarzan provides the film's funniest scene (according
to my eight year old) when, on a dare, he attempts to retrieve a hair from
the tail of an elephant and is mistaken for a piranha, causing much
consternation and trampling of plant life.
        But there's nothing really new here.  No ballroom scene ("Beauty
and the Beast"), no zebra stampede ("The Lion King"), no charge down a
snowy mountain pass ("Mulan").  Disney's animators appear to have spent
most of their energies devising how fast Tarzan can get around the jungle.
The supporting characters are flimsy at best: the big game hunter; the
bumbling, mustached scientist; and Jane herself (voiced by Minnie Driver in
her best role to date), who single-handedly drags Disney's feminist
advances back a good ten years.
        The obligatory wisecracking sidekicks are replaced here by a
cockatoo-coifed gorilla called Terk (Rosie O'Donnell--say no more) and a
dim-witted baby elephant.  The obligatory pink polka dotted underwear are
also in evidence.
        Unfortunately the best part of Disney's "Tarzan" (according to the
38 year old me) was when the whole disappointing affair came to an end.  If
Disney didn't set such high standards the potential for disappointment
would be undeniably less.

Title
Review for Switchblade Sisters (1975)
Prophetic words from Maggie (Joanne Nail) as she's bundled aboard the paddy
wagon in the final scene of SWITCHBLADE SISTERS.
Who would have imagined that, twenty-one years later, Jack Hill's 1975 cult
classic about a sexy street gang would have been given a second lease on
life.  And yet with our newly crowned prince of pulp Quentin Tarantino
behind the reissue, the question is less "why?" and more "what next?"  The
answer won't be long in coming since SWITCHBLADE SISTERS is just one of a
handful of cheapie exploitation films being re-released by Tarantino's
Rolling Thunder distribution company.
The meanest thing one can say about SWITCHBLADE SISTERS is that it plays
like a Tarantino movie--all swagger and little substance, with the lousiest
acting since Tarantino started putting himself in front of the camera.  But
this isn't Masterpiece Theater--SWITCHBLADE SISTERS  might contain awful
performances and awful dialogue but it's awfully good fun.  Of course it
helps if you're more in the mood for Russ Meyer than Merchant-Ivory.
Robbie Lee plays Lace, the leader of the Dagger Debs.  Lee looks and acts
like Pia Zadora, and it's easy to see why her career has nose-dived into
Smurftastic voice parts for Saturday morning cartoons.
In the opening scene, Lace and the rest of the Debs--Patch, Donut, Bunny et
al.--ridicule and rough up a slimy bill collector.  It's a nicely done role
reversal with the lone man in the elevator finally the object of some
menacing harrassment.  Although certainly no homage to feminism,
SWITCHBLADE SISTERS is refreshing in its entertaining depiction of men as
victims of leather-clad teen girls and in its sparing reliance on T&A.
Early in the film, the Debs congregate at the Burger Palace where Lace
encounters a stranger, Maggie, occupying her usual booth.  A fight breaks
out and Maggie, a feisty, hotpants-sporting gutter cat, impresses Lace
enough to be asked to join the gang--"people just stomp on you if you don't
have any muscle behind you."  However, the cops arrive and throw them all
in the slammer, including Maggie.  It's not until after a skirmish with the
very un-P.C. butch dyke prison warden Mom Smackley (Kate Murtagh, in a
scene destined to become a camp classic) that Lace and Maggie become
friends, and Maggie agrees to join the Debs.
The Debs live and fight in a world dominated by all-boy gangs who run their
high school's protection rackets, prostitution rings, and drug sales.  The
male gang members are a sight to see--there haven't been this many gold
lame' jackets, huge pointy collars, flared jeans, and shiny nylon shirts
since WELCOME BACK, KOTTER.
A new gang threatens to take over, led by Crabs (played with buffoon-laced
dementia by the Jim Carrey-esque Chase Newhart; perhaps Tarantino should
have considered a remake with Carrey and Zadora?).  Add some intra-gang
powerplays, new alliances with female African-American Maoist guerillas,
shady switches of sexual allegiance, and a new name for the Debs...  It all
adds up to plenty of rumbles.
As logic goes, this film quickly runs out of steam.  But as a crude, camp,
fashion-conscious throwback to the mid-'70s, SWITCHBLADE SISTERS is a gas.

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
        As Dr. Ian Malcolm so succinctly put it in "The Lost World: Jurassic Park"
(the second go-round of the trilogy-to-date ... and there's absolutely no
reason why they should call it quits with this one), "Oooh!  Ahhh!  That's
how it always starts.  Then later there's running and screaming."
        There's a lot of running and screaming in "Jurassic Park III."  What there
isn't is the afore-referenced Dr. Malcolm (a sorely-missed Jeff Goldblum,
who perked up the first two installments no end with his Chaos theorizing,
cool attire, and utterly sarcastic humor) and the sure hand of Steven
Spielberg who, perhaps wisely, has abdicated directorial duties to
"Jumanji" man Joe Johnston.
        For the third time running (and running, and screaming) the dinosaurs
alone are worth the price of admission--this time we get big nasty
spinosaurs with long snouts and huge finned backs, flying pteranodons with
vicious little babies, club-tailed ankylosaurs, noble brachiosaurs,
galloping herds of nanosaurs and, of course, a lot more razor sharp
velociraptors (although this time out *communicative* ones that can
vocalize better than their human prey).  Each time out the huge reptiles
get more and more convincing as technological advances bring them closer
into contact with the prix-fix beauzeaus that either wittingly or
unwittingly stumble onto their Isla Sorna.
        There seems to be some unwritten rule that future chapters of Michael
Crichton's dino-saga must feature cast-offs from a P.T. Anderson picture.
In 1997 it was Julianne Moore; in "Jurassic Park III" it's the turn of
William H. Macy (who, in the film's scariest realization, is the spitting
image of Homer Simpson's good neighbor Ned Flanders).  Moore is "replaced"
by Téa Leoni, naturally enough, which at first consideration seems to be a
sound casting decision ... until you witness Ms. Leoni trying to out act
the special effects.  Sam Neill is back as paleontologist Dr. Alan Grant as
is Laura Dern in a brief bit as Dr. Ellie Sattler; she does the only smart
thing and stays the heck off the island.
        The plot?  "Good dinosaurs, bad people."  OK, the real plot: Mr. and Mrs.
Kirby (Macy and Leoni) con Dr. Grant into helping them find their son Eric
(Trevor Morgan), who has accidentally parasailed onto a Costa Rican island
teeming with large, hungry carnivores.
        The "Jurassic Park" franchise will always be worth seeing for Stan
Winston's mesmerizing creature effects (if you like that sort of thing I
suppose--I almost hated "America's Sweethearts" and would have were it not
for the lovely Julia Roberts and her genuinely fetching smile, so I guess
it's all a matter of taste).  But if it's dumb humans crashing through the
undergrowth you're after, rent a Rambo movie instead.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Sydney (1996)
        Re-released unceremoniously to cash in on the success--or perhaps
more descriptively the ensemble chic--of P.T. Anderson's "Magnolia," "Hard
Eight" is writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson's first feature of four
years ago about a professional gambler (Philip Baker Hall, the game show
host in "Magnolia") with a penchant for taking lost souls under his wing.
In the film's opening scene, Sydney (Hall) approaches what appears to be a
bum sitting outside a Nevada rest stop and offers to buy him a cup of
coffee.  After John (John C. Reilly, the cop in "Magnolia") tells his tale
of losing his shirt trying to win enough money to pay for his mother's
funeral, Sydney offers to take John back to Reno and show him the tricks of
the trade.  As he showed with his second film "Boogie Nights" (as well as
the one with the frogs), Anderson has a staggering knack for snagging top
talent and bringing out their best.  In addition to Hall and Reilly, who
are very good in the film, there are also appearances by Gwyneth Paltrow as
a cocktail waitress/hooker named Clementine and Samuel L. Jackson as a
nasty piece of work named Jimmy whom the naďve John befriends against
Sydney's better judgment.  "Hard Eight" (which, if you're curious, refers
to a roll of the dice in craps) is an auspicious debut in the truest sense
of the word, an intricate and evocative work filled with Anderson's rich
characterizations, huge close-ups, and trademark snappy patter.  Can you
believe the young upstart actually has the nerve to write Sidney a line of
dialogue that begins "My darling Clementine..."?  Well he does.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
        In the wake of the recent Columbine High School tragedy, and the
not-so-recent Oklahoma City bombing, some people felt that a film like the
incendiary "Arlington Road," with its homegrown terrorism theme, might have
difficulty securing a widespread release.  But finally moviegoers are being
given an opportunity to see it, an opportunity well worth pursuing.
        "Arlington Road," for all of the difficult memories it may
reawaken, is an excellent motion picture.
        The only sequence more shocking than the film's disturbing opener
is the last, a heart-pounding, brilliantly-constructed series of events
that comes close to matching the surprise and unconventionality of
"Psycho"'s famous shower scene.  No amount of cold hard currency will force
me to reveal the film's startling denouement, but if you don't leave the
theater visibly shaken then blood does not flow in your veins.
        Sandwiched between these two cinematic highpoints is a taut, tense,
pulse-quickening film which raises the question "What do your neighbors get
up to behind closed doors?" and then goes on to answer that question in
truly terrifying style.
        The film stars Jeff Bridges, Tim Robbins, and Joan Cusack and is
written and directed by Mark Pellington, who shows great promise with this,
his second feature.  Bridges plays Michael Faraday, a history professor at
a District of Columbia university who teaches a class on terrorism.  After
helping the injured son of some new neighbors from across the street,
Bridges begins to suspect the normal-looking Langs of plotting a diabolical
scheme involving explosive devices.  Normal-looking, that is, except for
Robbins' severe haircut; just one look at that do and you *know* he's
guilty!
        Faraday's paranoia builds to national security-threatening
proportions, much to the frustration of his girlfriend (sympathetically
played by Hope Davis), and leads to a confrontation that thrusts his whole
family into immediate danger.
        Perhaps the scariest thing about the film is the justifiable fear
of a normal guy realizing how little he knows about the true characters of
his closest neighbors, what they might have hidden behind drapes, buried in
basements, or locked away in attics.  One of Pellington's trump cards is
that he doesn't tip the audience off earlier than necessary in determining
who's the real crazy in this drama.  And he made wise casting choices in
maintaining that suspense: Bridges is brilliant, as is Robbins, and Cusack
(in a rare straight role) has hardly been better.
        In addition to the fine performances, Angelo Badalamenti's creepy
score helps crank up the tension several notches.
        Several years ago, during the filming of a similar Jeff Bridges
mad-bomber thriller called "Blown Away," special effects experts
miscalculated and blew out windows of unrigged buildings adjacent to the
set.  Be prepared to be blown away by "Arlington Road": it carries that
amount of unexpected power.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
"Almost Famous," writer/director Cameron Crowe's first film since 1996's
hugely-successful "Jerry Maguire," will be on a lot of ten best lists come
the end of the year and it will be on mine.  Come the beginning of next
year it might well have won the Academy AwardŽ for Best Picture into the
bargain.
Pretty much everything you've heard about the film is true, since
word on the street is that "Almost Famous" is Absolutely Fabulous.  It's
also everything you'd expect from a Cameron Crowe movie, and more.
First of all, it tells a story.  A very good, semi-autobiographical
story.  "Almost Famous" follows a '70's highschooler (newcomer Patrick
Fugit) who bluffs his way into covering a Lynyrd Skynyrd-type rock band for
"Rolling Stone" magazine only to learn that truth-in-reporting isn't as
easy as it sounds.
Secondly, like "Jerry Maguire" and those other Crowe projects ("Singles,"
"Say Anything"), the film is very finely cast and excellently acted by all,
including Philip Seymour Hoffman ("Magnolia") as an approving editor,
Frances McDormand ("Wonder Boys") as a disapproving mother (she only knows
three words: don't do drugs), and the less-well known Kate Hudson as the
groupie--sorry, "band-aid"--love interest.  Let's not forget Fugit though,
who's outstanding in the lead, and Billy Crudup and Jason Lee as,
respectively, the band's enigmatic lead guitarist and outspoken lead
singer.  Both impress, especially Crudup, whose star has clearly risen.
Third, this film is extremely well written and directed.  Why wouldn't it
be?  It's a Cameron Crowe movie.  They always say the best writers write
from experience and "Almost Famous" is a composite of many of Crowe's
true-life memories--at 16 he covered the Allman Brothers for "Rolling
Stone"--and the film rings true as a result.  A good story, fine acting,
and great writing.  Sounds like enough.  But "Almost Famous" goes beyond
that by being warm, genuinely touching, and very funny.
It's also scarily accurate and subtle beyond measure: Crowe excels at the
delicate imbalance, the casual observation, the nuance.  There are
scenes--many, many scenes--that just feel Right, be it in tone, in length,
in look.  The director knows when to use dialogue (well), and when to have
Fugit's William Miller simply observe (better).  For a film about sex,
drugs, and rock and roll, Crowe keeps the emphasis on the music.
Stillwater, the band Miller is following, is also a composite, an amalgam
of several '70's rock bands--Skynyrd, Zeppelin, the Allmans, Bad Company.
Crowe's trump card in filming the band on stage, however, is never to give
away too much.  All we hear are snippets of songs, snatches of guitar solos
from Russell Hammond (Crudup) and convincing posturing from Jeff Bebe
(Lee).  Wisely, we are never given time to critique the music itself.  But
it's there, in the forefront and in the background, just like the songs
Crowe uses on the soundtrack.  Not just throwaway '70's hits but
well-chosen numbers which skillfully augment the narrative.
The film never flags for a moment, even during sequences you think you've
seen before (the everyone-sings-along-to-a-song-on-the-radio scene, for
example).  Here Crowe manages to make his version (in which a busload of
band members and their entourage harmonize to Elton John's "Tiny Dancer")
appear unique.  In the trailer it looks corny; in context it hits a nerve.
It's easy to get caught up in the buzz, but it's just as easy not to want
to succumb to the hype.  If you're smart you'll see "Almost Famous" and
then you'll want to see it again.  In fact, coming out of the theater it
will almost feel like a requirement.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
        "Timecode" is a brilliantly conceived and executed piece of
experimental filmmaking that questions the notions of traditional narrative
cinema by challenging the very way in which we view movies.
        The bad news is that it's written and directed (and produced and
scored and photographed!) by Mike Figgis, the man who made the overrated
drunk drama "Leaving Las Vegas," and the worst thing about it is that it
continues his sophomoric preoccupation with sex.
        But "Timecode," easily his finest work to date, is so different, so
creative a motion picture that even I could put away my anti-Figgis
sentiments for an hour and a half and enjoy the film purely on its own
considerable merits.
        Watching "Timecode" is like no other cinematic experience and you'd
be well advised to sit further back than usual, since your eyes will be
wandering--sometimes racing--all over the screen.  The film is actually
four separate yet (as time will tell) linked films presented in four
panels, so in the top right-hand corner of the screen, for example, we have
a woman talking to her psychiatrist while in the bottom left-hand corner of
the screen someone else is auditioning for a part in a Z-grade exploitation
flick.
        Each sequence is shot in one continuous take with no edits.  One
uninterrupted 93-minute take, to be precise, since that's exactly how long
a digital videocassette runs.  But it *feels* like there are edits, because
by the time your eye returns to one of the segments the action is closer
in, or further out, or in a completely different place.
        The actors, among them Salma Hayek, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Stellan
Skarsgĺrd, Holly Hunter, Saffron Burrows, Kyle MacLachlan, Julian Sands,
Richard Edson, Glenne Headly, Leslie Mann, and Steven Weber, improvise
around a loosely-structured narrative that requires them to do certain
things and be certain places at specific times--synchronized right down to
the millisecond.  What we see on the screen, therefore, are four distinct
storylines that, over time, come together--overlapping and interacting.
It's truly invigorating watching how characters that were once "down there"
are now "up here."
        Figgis, I hate to admit it, orchestrates the whole thing
beautifully, so that from time to time all four sequences "match," or run
parallel, while at other times they're completely out of sync.  And the
experience of watching the film is sensational, since it requires a
different *method* of viewing depending upon what's happening on screen at
any one time.  For example, at points in the film you can leisurely move
your head in a slow continuous circle, absorbing each of the disparate
stories, yet at other times you have to move your eyes quickly, scanning
each different area for clues.
        In-jokes abound, and Figgis is not afraid to make fun of himself or
his trade (note the surreal scene towards the end in which a diaphanous
beauty pitches her own familiar-sounding experimental treatment accompanied
by a rapper-keyboardist named Joey Z).  Every now and again there's an
earthquake, a minor tremor that rumbles through each of the four quadrants
sending our actors tumbling and reminding us, as if we needed reminding,
that these four stories are not only linked, but happening in real time.
But in the end the near-irrelevant "plot" takes second place to the film's
structure (and it's just as well, because I'd swear that Figgis came up
with the idea of having Hayek and Tripplehorn making out in the back of a
limo before he came up with his revolutionary four-camera technique!).
        If you're not into film, the medium, and the concept of a highly
structural film experience, then the novelty of "Timecode" might grow
tiresome very quickly.  But if you can allow yourself to put aside all
traditional expectations--just as I was able to put aside my tiny problem
of this being a Mike Figgis film--then you might just find it absolutely
fascinating.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Powaqqatsi (1988)
Culture shock can best be described as confusion and uncertainty affecting
people exposed to an alien culture without adequate preparation.  Much the
same can be said of POWAQQATSI, the new film by activist filmmaker Godfrey
Reggio, which certainly takes a different perspective in the way it
manipulates sound and images.  But if you stay with it, and become
acclimatized to its unique and personal point of view, the experience
proves ultimately rewarding.
A companion piece to Reggio's first feature KOYANNISQATSI (and reportedly
the second in a trilogy of films embracing various ways of life on our
planet), POWAQQATSI bears resemblance to that film only in its
non-narrative style.  There is no dialogue, no narration, little sound
aside from a richly textured and hypnotic Philip Glass score, which
accompanies the films visuals with a wall-to-wall intensity.  Whereas
KOYANNISQATSI  contrasted natural and man-made vistas, POWAQQATSI is a more
socially conscious piece, concentrating on human achievement in a variety
of forms--labor, craftsmanship, artistic creativity, religious
worship--each demonstrated by those in such Third World communities as
India, South America, Africa, and parts of Asia.
The film opens with a veritable army of workers hauling cloth sacks full of
dirt up the side of a mountain.  Very little in this film happens in "real
time."  The film has been slowed down to such an extent that not only do we
see the ropes cutting into the men's skin, but we can almost feel their
pain.  Eventually we see the body of a fallen miner being carried aloft,
and realize that there is a price to be paid for such industry.
But the film is less an evocation of the routine hardships these people
face than it is a celebration of the human spirit, and it soon becomes
clear that this film's major strength is its humanity.  We are confronted
by people at work, occasionally at play, dutifully going about their daily
business with conviction.  The characters here are bigger and brighter than
those you'll see in any "conventional" film.  A scene early in the film
depicts a row of Latin American children, curious, camera conscious, each
one decidedly different than the next.  Of course we are all different, but
we share the same human burdens.  We all toil, we all have to work hard in
order to make a living, irrespective of class or culture or social status.
And the film succeeds in contrasting these cultures by exposing the beauty
inherent in
the rigors of the everyday.
On a superficial level, the film could be seen as nothing more than a
travelogue for workaholics.  The images often seem arbitrary, lacking
continuity.  But it is difficult to dismiss them, however stylized or
pretty may they appear.  A young girl beating a donkey fervently with a
stick, a boy and a great white mare frolicking in the surf, another girl
transfixed as the camera focuses on a wall of graffiti behind her, ghosts
of cars passing the burned out shell of another, a goods train which goes
on for miles and miles--all are hard to forget.
One cannot, however, divorce the visual material, impressive as it is, from
the music.  It is as if they are one; inseparable.  Philip Glass's work has
matured significantly since his last collaboration with Reggio, yet it
still bears his inimitable trademark.  It is not as atonal or minimalistic
as his score for KOYANNISQATSI .  Instead, it borrows heavily from the
music and rhythms of the cultures and sub-cultures represented.  Highly
percussive in nature, Glass uses native as well as traditional instruments,
accented by an Hispanic children's choir.
But man's endurance comes through in the end, how he overcomes sometimes
major obstacles in order to further his own creations, extend life, maybe
even cheat death.  For this is the meaning of POWAQQATSI--an entity, a
spirit which consumes life in order to further its own.  Not a spirit in
the traditional sense, but a life force equal to those of nature, of light
and dark, land and sea, sound and image.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Blame it on sleep deprivation following the impromptu arrival of my
third daughter, Lilla, but I actually enjoyed "Deep Impact."
Given the lack of depth or significance in the previews, Mimi ("The
Peacemaker") Leder's film looked like it should have been called
"Sub-Compact" rather than "Deep Impact."  But as disaster movies go it's
not bad, and not nearly as disastrous as the endless slew of
end-of-the-world pictures that got rammed down our throats in the seventies.
Those productions, often directed by Irwin Allen, always featured
an all-star cast (often with no-star acting abilities) and concerned some
sizable global warning, usually drawing on various manifestations of those
famed four elements--earth ("Earthquake"), fire ("The Towering Inferno"),
water ("The Poseidon Adventure" and its sequel), and air ("Hurricane")--to
dictate the utter futility of the situation.  After all, you can't put up
much of a fight against Ma nature.
Since the seventies exhausted just about every natural disaster
there was, it's only recently that these kind of audience-grabbers have
returned to the silver screen.  In the last couple of years we've been
subjected to threats by twisters, floods, and (twice already!) volcanoes.
"Deep Impact," too, features a carefully selected all-star cast and, like
1979's "Meteor" (not to mention the upcoming "Armageddon"), a plot
concerning a large chunk of rock hurtling towards Mother Earth.
The difference here is that the deep impact of the title has more
to do with the deep psychological impact surrounding the imminent disaster
than the crash 'n' burn spectacle of it all.  That's a far cry from the
embarrassing squabblings of those familiar faces in, say, Allen's "The
Swarm," or any of the "Airport" movies.
Here, the ensemble cast including Téa Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa
Redgrave, James Cromwell, and Maximilian Schell all turn in decent
performances in the face of likely annihilation.
Leoni is especially good as an ambitious newswoman whose
investigation of a government scandal leads her to stumble over an even
bigger Whitehouse secret: there's a comet bigger than a Buick heading for
earth.  NASA sends up a space crew lead by Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall)
to detonate some nuclear charges and throw the comet off course, but the
implosions create *two* comets that are now heading for earth.  Good going,
Spurgeon!
Actually, this is a clever construct because it allows the visual
effects wizards to show off their technical artistry when the smaller of
the two comets hits.  Not enough to create total mass destruction, but
enough for us to witness a very impressive tidal wave taking out Manhattan.
"Deep Impact" gets a little preachy in the last twenty minutes,
especially Morgan Freeman's closing presidential speech, and I lost count
of how many times someone earnestly said "I love you" backed by a cherubic
James Horner score that finally wears out its welcome.  In addition, some
of the logic leaves a lot to be desired (for example when Leoni encounters
a monstrous traffic jam leaving the city she simply takes the hard
shoulder, which appears not to have occurred to anyone else).
But I'd rather watch a film that places intelligent human
dramas--how people really feel and react to life-threatening situations
like this--above predictable "we're all doomed!" histrionics.  And "Deep
Impact" does that.

Title
Review for King Is Alive, The (2000)
        Stranded in Africa's equivalent of the Australian outback, a busload of
tourists decides to stage an impromptu performance of Shakespeare's "King
Lear."
        Now perhaps group therapy through artistic expression wouldn't be the
first order of business for you or I under these circumstances, and indeed
there are some passengers who question the wisdom of all this, but then
again we're not appearing in a movie by Danish director Kristian Levring,
and don't have three hand-held cameras constantly thrust in our faces,
Dogme 95-style.  
        "The King is Alive" is the latest offering from the Danish movement
pioneered by the likes of "Dancer in the Dark"'s Lars Von Trier, a movement
which strips "modern day" filmmaking of what it considers to be trippy
conveniences--tripods, lighting, non-source music, and directorial credits,
resulting in a pure and "natural" film experience.
        If anything, the Dogme 95 style works especially well in "The King is
Alive," since the drama is played out amid the rough-lit dunes and
abandoned mining shacks of an arid North African landscape, where grainy,
gritty camerawork heightens the experiences of our marooned protagonists.
And indeed the play's the thing, with Levering and his international cast,
among them Jennifer Jason Leigh, Bruce Davison, Janet McTeer, and Romane
Bohringer, making the production entirely believable given the available
options (how quickly would *you* feel left out if someone else got to play
Cordelia?).
        Where the film breaks down, however, is in its characterizations.  Not one
of these people is anyone you would want to spend time with, let alone
perform alongside.  They're whiney and unpleasant, mean and hostile, and
this makes their ultimate fate--and that of the film--meaningless, since we
care very little about what happens to them.
        The cast gives it their all, and it's fascinating seeing how quickly the
sexual power struggles come to a head (and, especially, how quickly Levring
manages to avoid pretentiousness), but in the end "The King is Alive" more
closely approximates another of Shakepeare's works, at least in name: "Much
Ado About Nothing."
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Trixie (2000)
It takes unenviable skill to squander the talents of Emily Watson, Dermot
Mulroney, Nick Nolte, Nathan Lane, Will Patton, and Leslie Ann Warren, but
Alan Rudolph--ironically known for being an actor's director--has done
precisely that in his latest film, "Trixie."
Rudolph shouldn't take sole responsibility for this misfire, however.  Any
one member of this capable cast should have taken a look at his sorry
script and realized it just wouldn't play in Peoria (or anywhere else for
that matter).  There's plenty of potential here, as there always is with a
Rudolph story idea, but that potential got left in the dressing room, or on
the cutting room floor, or in the mind of the man who hasn't hit artistic
paydirt since 1988's "The Moderns."
Trixie (Watson) is an ineffective security guard with the darnedest
Chicago accent.  She takes a recuperative assignment in a lakeside casino
after witnessing her partner stabbed by a shoplifter and quickly becomes
involved with a stockpile of typical Rudolph oddballs.  We've got a pushy
ladykiller who hits on her (Mulroney, in the role Keith Carradine would
have played ten years ago).  We've got a smooth-talking lounge singer who
befriends her (Lane, who escapes with most of his dignity intact).  And
we've got a pleasure boatload of multicolored miscreants--Nolte as a
corrupt senator, Warren as a low-cut, washed-up diva, and Patton as...well,
the boat owner.
Warren, who's been in a couple of Rudolph pictures, is the most
underutilized of the impressive cast.  As Dawn Sloane she acts tipsy and
flaky on the boat, has a serious moment in a hotel room, and then she's
outta there.  Nolte's bent congressman borders on caricature, and Patton's
Red Rafferty is simply undefined.
What makes Trixie's character interesting, supposedly, is her propensity
to drop malapropisms at the drop of a bat, mangling metaphors and
butchering the English language every time she opens her mouth.  This is
not a particularly original idea, of course, but Rudolph overwrites it as
if he's just invented the palindrome.  If you can think of Trixie's
condition as a mental disease, a "Rain Man"-kind of syndrome, then you'll
feel more sympathetic towards her character.  But Trixie's constant abuse
of familiar sayings and incessant frowning every time someone says anything
the slightest bit contrary grow pat and predictable after about twenty
minutes (and the film is a long--a very long--two hours).
Murdering free speech isn't Trixie's only annoying habit, however.  If
she's not chewing wads of gum then she's sucking on a sodapop straw.  More
often than not she's doing both.
There are hints of what Rudolph might have been attempting when Trixie
waxes detective with Nolte's Senator Avery, Lane's Kirk Stans, and
Mulroney's Dex Lang.  Here the men's "straight" talk starts sounding not
unlike Trixie's botched babblings--maybe she's not so crazy sounding after
all?  But before long Rudolph loses all perspective with several multiple
endings and some out-of-leftfield zaniness in a restaurant kitchen that
recalls a Three Stooges movie.
With "Trixie," Alan Rudolph is reveling in redundancy.  Or, to quote his
overwritten heroine, "flogging a dead horse until it's dead."
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf" online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
        Billy Chapel is having a bad day.  He's been told that the Detroit
Tigers, for which he's had, until recently, a spectacular pitching career,
will soon be sold.  He's been told that, come season end, he'll probably be
traded to the Giants anyway unless, of course, he opts to retire.  And to
cap it all, he's just learned that his girlfriend has taken a job overseas,
and is scheduled to fly out on the next plane to London.
        The forty-year-old baseball player, who holds a nineteen-year
history with the Tigers, is in New York for the season finale against the
Yankees when the string of bad news comes down.  Standing there on the
mound, "the loneliest place on earth," Billy contemplates his life through
a series of flashbacks while pondering the decision to call it a day.
        Every once in a while, Kevin Costner makes a baseball picture to
make up for the poor decisions and lackluster performances that plague his
other films.  For every "Waterworld" and "Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves,"
there's a "Bull Durham."  For every "'Postman" and "'Bodyguard" there's a
"Field of Dreams."  With "For Love of the Game," Costner (who plays the
sanguine Billy Chapel) once again proves that if you stick him in a
baseball movie, they will come and come again.
        Costner is very good in this film; he clearly has a passion for
America's favorite pastime.  Fortunately the usually flamboyant director
Sam Raimi ("A Simple Plan") shows remarkable restraint in allowing that
passion to shape the story, rather than his own show-offy camerawork.
        Kelly Preston, whom you might remember from "Jerry Maguire," gives
Billy's "blonde of the week" a delightful balance.  Preston's Jane is
naďve, sensitive, forthright, and demure, afraid of committing to someone
of Billy's stature while at the same time unable to resist his considerable
charms.  She's "never had a love story," according to her teenage daughter
Heather, who's nicely played by a well-cast Jena Malone ("Stepmom").
Costner and Preston's relationship evolves naturally, from the time he
first spots her with her broken-down car on the freeway, to when they fall
into each other's arms at the airport.  It's a familiar story but here it's
played out with sophistication and real human depth.
        Although "For Love of the Game" is essentially a love story with a
baseball setting, such is the dramatic energy of the narrative that when
Billy finds himself in the middle of pitching a perfect game, the clichés
dissolve into poignancy and you find yourself caught up in the excitement.
The moment when Billy throws his final pitch is palpable, and that's as
much a tribute to the actor as to the writer and director.
        The writing by Dana Stevens, based on Michael Shaara's novel, is
always intelligent, powerful and absorbing, and Basil Poledouris provides a
lovely and effective score that never once gets in the way of the
principals.  On the baseball diamond, the film has that poetic quality
shared by all the great baseball movies--"Bang the Drum Slowly," "The
Natural," "Eight Men Out" ... as well as those two previously-mentioned
Costner vehicles.
        Do not, however, dismiss "For Love of the Game" as "just another
Kevin Costner baseball movie" because as Kevin Costner movies go, baseball
or otherwise, it's one of his best.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
Julianne is on a mission.  To wreck the upcoming wedding of her best
friend, Michael.  And in the process, just maybe, win his heart.
If this sounds like a recipe for prenuptial hilarity, then you're certainly
on the same page as the filmmakers.  Director P.J. Hogan's previous outing
was the hysterical ugly-duckling tale "Muriel's Wedding," with which he
demonstrated his deft skill at comedy.  "Muriel" was also moving, sad, and
a little bit tragic.  The sadness in my "My Best Friend's Wedding,"
however, is not part of Ronald Bass' script.  It's the uneasy feeling you
get from watching these characters play out their passions and their petty
jealousies, realizing that, unless polygamy suddenly becomes an option,
someone's going to be left crying at the altar.
Hogan's new film is, disappointingly, a little more mainstream than
"Muriel."  This means, for example, that Julia Roberts, who plays Julianne,
plays off America's recent fascination with the spectacle of beautiful
women falling down, popularized by Brooke Shields and Tia Leoni on prime
time television.  In "My Best Friend's Wedding," Roberts hits the deck
close to half a dozen times.  The first, when she tumbles off the bed when
Michael (Dermot Mulroney) tells her he's popped the question...to someone
else!...is funny.  After that, the pratfalls seem overdone and unnecessary,
and while Roberts is still as appealing as ever, she's no Chevy Chase.
Aiding and abetting Julianne in her wrench-throwing activities is her gay
friend George (the stiff upper lipped Rupert Everett), who flies in to the
Windy City and temporarily poses as her fiance.  "It's amazing the clarity
that comes with psychotic jealously," George observes, once Julianne
realizes she really does love Michael, suddenly the man of her dreams.
Everett exudes charisma all over the place; it's a broad but charming
supporting performance.  The object of Michael's affections is Kimmy,
played by Cameron Diaz.  Diaz is bubbly and believable as the "bright eyed
and dreamy" rival who threatens Julianne's sense of ownership.
In fact, Julianne, George and Kimmy are all likable, well-developed
characters.  The Michael character looks good on the surface, but does
little else to deserve the attention he gets.
In keeping with Hogan's love for musical interludes ("Muriel's Wedding" was
punctuated by Abba songs), "My Best Friend's Wedding" drums up a few of its
own, from the irresistibly cute opening title number, to a painful Karaoke
sequence, to a scene in a fish restaurant where everyone at the table joins
in a rendition of "Say a Little Prayer for You."  The only problem with
most of these moments is that they go on way too long.
While Julia Roberts and her co-stars sparkle, "My Best Friend's Wedding" is
an uneasy mix of well-realized humor and unrealized sadness.

Title
Review for I Went Down (1997)
        If Chris Farley had strapped some fake mutton-chop sideburns to
each side of his head, spoken with a thick Irish accent, and tried his
damnedest to play it straight, he wouldn't have been nearly as funny as
Brendan Gleeson in "I Went Down."
        Gleeson, who's not dissimilar to the late "Saturday Night Live"
alumnus in terms of physical attributes, plays a character named Bunny
Kelly in this delightful Irish film.  Bunny is sent to County Cork to
"retrieve" one Frank Grogan for an Irish gangster called Tom French (well
dressed like all good gangsters should be and menacingly portrayed by Tony
Doyle).  Bunny is to accompany Git Hynes (Peter McDonald), recently
released from prison and obligated to Tom for disfiguring one of his
cronies.
        That Tom French is a mean bollocks.  He wants Frank back.  And a
small matter of some Ł25,000 that Tom's wife was supposed to have given to
Frank.  For this he won't break anyone's thumbs.  Maybe.
        Inventively and engagingly written by Conor McPherson and directed
by Paddy Breathnach, "I Went Down" follows the trials and tribulations of
Git and Bunny as they knock around peat bogs, dimly-lit pubs, and seedy
hostelries trying to stay alive and out of trouble.
        McDonald is a newcomer and a promising one at that, but Gleeson has
been in over a dozen movies, most recently as Father Bubbles in another
film with a very Irish accent on hilarity, "The Butcher Boy."  Even if you
can't comprehend half of what they're saying, Gleeson and McDonald together
make "I Went Down" a trip worth taking.
        The film is in many ways reminiscent of another "little"
independent feature, 1991's "Highway 61."  That film, too, was a road movie
and it shares the same kind of wry dialogue and humorous situations as
McPherson's tale: whimsical observations on life, carefully-crafted
vignettes, deadpan conversational asides, and scenes that'll make you laugh
out loud.  Witness the episode in which our good-natured protagonists bind
Frank (played by Peter Caffrey) to a hotel bed, leaving him with only the
TV remote for company.
        What's also charming about "I Went Down" is how the relationship
between Buddy and Git develops.  Their trip becomes an education for both
of them, but the way it's handled is neither sappy nor labored.  The only
thing in the film which approaches clunkiness is the culminating
explanation, via flashbacks, of the relationship between Frank and Tom.
It's a little too Hollywood, and what makes "I Went Down" so refreshing is
the fact that it rarely panders to traditional conventions of Hollywood
gangster movies.  Sure it's gritty--make that grubby--but it's also pretty
goofy.
        Although "I Went Down" emphasizes the comedic elements of
dis-organized crime, there are a couple of fairly brutal scenes in keeping
with the subject matter.  Don't let these deter you, though; "I Went Down"
is a little gem.  It's only playing at one Philadelphia-area theater--and I
suspect it won't be there for long--so catch it while you can.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
        When I first saw the previews for Ron Howard's latest film, my
expectations were discouragingly low.  A show about nothing?  Sounds like
"Seinfeld."  A guy whose entire life is broadcast 24 hours a day?  Sounds
like "The Truman Show."  What is it with Hollywood that no sooner than one
production company puts out an animated feature about ants, another puts
one out about bugs?
        Which is why I was pleasantly surprised by "EdTV," which turns out
to be a fresh, insightful, and often times hilarious film about the follies
of instant celebrity.
        The writing, by Howard's longtime collaborators Lowell Ganz and
Babaloo Mandel, is right on the money and Howard himself should be credited
for giving the subject matter a fresh focus.  In the hands of a
less-experienced director, "EdTV" could easily have had all the flavor of
yesterday's meatloaf.
        With their 'True TV' cable ratings being threatened by 'The
Gardening Channel' (apparently people would rather watch soil), the
NorthWest Broadcasting Company is looking for a novel concept to attract
viewers.  Program Director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) comes up with
the idea of putting a nobody on the air and broadcasting his every waking
and sleeping moment.  The hook is to find a regular guy, someone normal
that people can relate to.  While scouting possible candidates, Cynthia's
camera crew discover Ed Pekurny and his pig brother Ray (Woody Harrelson)
in a bar, where Ray believes he has what it takes for his fifteen plus
minutes of fame.  But on watching the videotape, the show's producers are
more taken with Ed than with Ray.  He's cute, he says all the wrong things,
and he's 100% USDA hick.
        Cynthia's boss, played by Rob Reiner, gives the show a week to
deliver the goods and it's tough going in the early stages.  The most
exciting thing that happens is Ed brushes his teeth.  "Action shot!" wags
one of the production assistants when a couple of Pop Tarts jump out of the
toaster.  You get the idea.
        But soon enough, things--Nielsen-boosting kinds of things--start to
happen to this unassuming San Francisco video store clerk and the 'True TV'
cameras are right there to document it.  Ed's privacy is no longer his own,
his newfound fame starts having a negative impact on his family life, and
what little dignity he has left is trampled on by the media.  Who should Ed
go out with?  You can be sure the pollsters have a list.
        Not only is the film exceedingly well cast, but its performers are
consistently excellent.  Matthew McConaughey provides the face, the body
language, and the lovable Texan accent to fill the shoes of America's
latest phenomenon.  He and Harrelson look like they really could be
brothers.  Sally Kirkland is noteworthy in a difficult role as Ed's mother,
and Martin Landau is one of the film's highlights as Al, Ed's ailing
stepfather.  Jenna Elfman (from TV's "Dharma and Greg") proves herself
surprisingly worthy in the company of Kirkland and Landau, although those
Alpine eyebrows of hers get a little distracting.  Even DeGeneres and
Reiner are better than you'd expect.
        In 1979, writer/director/comedian Albert Brooks made a zany little
film called "Real Life" in which a small-time opportunist makes a real-time
documentary about a typical American family.  The scenes of Ed's family
sitting around the dinner table feasting on Kentucky Fried Chicken and
waxing idiotic play like a big-budget variant on that film, paralleling its
wickedly inventive humor.  As with most films by Albert Brooks, "Real Life"
was funny, but absurd.  The funniest--and scariest--thing about "EdTV" is
that it is absolutely believable.

Title
Review for Year of the Horse (1997)
Fans of Neil Young and Crazy Horse should relish the affecting documentary
"Year of the Horse."  Its director, Jim Jarmusch, clearly thinks the band
is the bee's knees.
The film is composed of concert footage of the band during their 1996
European tour, as well as interviews (in a kitschy laundry-room setting)
and additional concert and interview footage from 1976 and 1986.
Half the time the generally dazed and confused band don't know which city
they're in or, five minutes before a show, which song they're going to open
with.  As for the documentary itself, one of the band members is
consistently skeptical of the filmmaker's work-in-progress.  "Like asking a
few questions will capture everything there is to know about Crazy Horse?"
he scoffs.  He also accuses Jarmusch of making an arty film just so people
will think he's cool.
Ironically Jarmusch, the director of quirky, off-beat films ("Stranger Than
Paradise," "Night on Earth," "Dead Man," etc.) was cool long before he made
"Year of the Horse."  A smattering of acting roles have helped sustain that
image, most recently with his Frostee Cream Boy cameo in Billy Bob
Thornton's "Sling Blade."
What's surprising about "Year of the Horse" is its distinct lack of
insight.  When reduced to talking heads the band members--Ralph Molina
(drums/vocals), Billy Talbot (bass/vocals), Frank "Pancho" Sampedro
(guitar/vocals), and Young himself (guitar/vocals)--have little of any
significance to say.  The most descriptive summation of being a part of
Crazy Horse from a band member's perspective is "heavy."  "It's hard to
describe in words," he says.  It's not unlike some sporting superstar
talking about the game: "You go out there and you give it your best shot
and you hope you get a result"--duh.
But once Crazy Horse gets on stage these aging, not very attractive men
(although there's nothing wrong with Neil Young that a barber and a good
tailor couldn't fix) powerfully demonstrate everything they've been unable
to articulate verbally.  Instantly there's synergy: the three guitarists
playing together in close proximity, acting on non-verbal cues, totally
immersed in the music, creating their singular, soaring sound to thunderous
applause.
As the engagingly dull interviews get more and more meaningless, the music
gets increasingly potent.  "Pure," as Young himself puts it.  The music is
very good and Jarmusch gives us nine full songs, including "Stupid Girl,"
"Tonight's the Night," and the anthem-like "Like a Hurricane" that closes
the film.
Jarmusch's "glue" that holds the picture together is the artier stuff that
Pancho references, wonderfully edited by Jay Rabinowitz: collage-like
snippets of soundstages, motorbikes, and American landscapes flashing by;
adoring nationals, singing Swedes, indecipherable Glaswegians.
"Proudly" shot in Super-8, 16mm, and Hi-8 video, the graininess of the
material gives the film a home movie-like texture, echoing the band
members' grunginess (that's grunge in the seamy sense, not the Seattle
sound sense).  This is a film of contrasts: black and white; black and
white and color; decades--'76, '86, '96; words, and music.
A band that plays together doesn't always stay together but after almost
thirty years, Neil Young and Crazy Horse are still cranking it up.  And in
"Year of the Horse," it's the music that speaks for itself.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
With hundreds of sonnets, comedies, tragedies, and patriotic histories 
to his name, William Shakespeare seems an unlikely candidate for 
writer's block.  But that's the conundrum facing the illustrious Bard at 
the outset of "Shakespeare in Love," a deliciously witty and inventive 
comedy drama that reminds us once again of the true genius of England's 
greatest writer.
London, 1593, and Will Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes, no doubt sick of 
being referred to as "Ralph's little brother") is struggling with his 
latest play.  He needs inspiration in the form of a muse and finds it in 
Viola De Lesseps (a radiant Gwyneth Paltrow), who auditions for the male 
lead (since women weren't allowed on stage in Elizabethan England).  It 
isn't long before Viola, still in drag, starts canoodling in the wings 
with the smitten playwright.
Unfortunately Viola is to be wed this fortnight to the odious Lord 
Wessex (Colin Firth), which puts a bit of a crimp in our heroes' 
romantic future.
It goes without saying that this is a purely invented account of what 
inspired Will to write "Romeo and Juliet" (working title: "Romeo and 
Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter"), but it's absolutely credible and great 
fun in what it supposes.  Like any good Shakespearean work, "Shakespeare 
in Love" is filled with love, sex, villainy, despair, tears, sword 
fights, men dressed as women, women dressed as men, buffoonery, ribald 
humor, intimidating penmanship...and a dog!
Writers Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard (who's been down a similar road 
before with "Rosencrantz and Guildenstern Are Dead") take great delight 
in mirroring the diction, the meter, and the sentiment of Shakespeare's 
English.  Their screenplay is punctuated with earnest soliloquies, 
anachronistic asides and, most effectively, the kind of adult humor 
missing from so many mainstream scripts.  Where else but in "Shakespeare 
in Love" might you find "But, soft! what light through yonder window 
breaks?" within spitting distance of "for sixpence a line I'd cause a 
riot in a nunnery."
As sophisticated as the writing is, it's not the be all and end all of 
the piece.  "Shakespeare in Love" is a real team effort, from the fine 
direction of John Madden ("Mrs. Brown") to a superlative cast.  
"Shine"'s Geoffrey Rush plays the fool, Judi Dench plays the Queen, and 
Tom ("The Full Monty") Wilkinson, Ben ("Armageddon") Affleck, and Rupert 
("My Best Friend's Wedding") Everett all give fine accountings, with 
Everett brief but fun as Will's rival playwright, the ill-fated 
Christopher Marlowe.
Fiennes and Paltrow, of course, are terrific and make a handsomely 
engaging couple, even if the latter's nude scenes do seem cheap and 
somewhat distracting in this otherwise high-class production.
That said, "Shakespeare in Love" remains a wicked and wonderfully 
mature period romance, one with which the Bard himself, no doubt, would 
have been proud to be associated.


Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Close your eyes for a moment, if you will, and imagine the sound of
Stephen Rea's Gaelic brogue, silky smooth and Irish like a pint of
Guinness.  A lackadaisical, naughty little schoolboy voice that flirts and
gambols.  An acerbic, sing-song metered voice that evokes the startling
imagery and language of Anthony Burgess' "A Clockwork Orange."  A voice
that deliciously conjures scenes both porcine and puerile, like those out
of "Delicatessen," or "The Tin Drum."
Imagine all of that, and you'll get a good sense of what you can
expect from "The Butcher Boy."  Imagine that and more.
Neil Jordan's latest film "stars" Rea in more ways than one.  Rea,
the accomplished Irish actor most notable from his star turn in Jordan's
"The Crying Game," contributes a restrained and managed performance as Da
Brady, a small town drunk in an unnamed Irish community in the 1960s.  But
it's his wall-to-wall narration as the butcher boy of the title, Da Brady's
son, Francis, that makes Rea's "performance" worth watching, worth
listening to.
Playing the young Francie Brady is newcomer Eamonn Owens and he is,
without a doubt, a revelation.  For as much as Rea's voiceover permeates
almost every scene of "The Butcher Boy," Owens commands virtually every
frame.  It's impossible to take your eyes off him.  With his crop of
carrot-colored hair, ruddy complexion, and overall grubby appearance,
Francie Brady is an unlikely hero, refusing to be done in by his alcoholic,
trumpet-playing father, his depressive, suicidal mother, or the
neighboring, bespectacled monster known as Mrs. Nugent (Fiona Shaw).
In fact, everything was OK until "the Nugent" came to town.  Now,
she poses as much a threat to the safety and security of town bully Francie
and his best pal Joe (Alan Boyle) as the looming Commie menace ("The
Butcher Boy" is set at a time when the fear of nuclear obliteration is
first and foremost in the minds of many).
"Pigs!" screams Mrs. Nugent at the Brady menagerie.  "You're all
pigs!"  It's the start of many a related image.
After Ma Brady is shipped off to the "garage" for psychiatric
observation and Da Brady downs one bottle of whiskey too many, Francie
finally loses grip of his fantasy world of cowboys and indians, the Lone
Ranger, and other comicbook characters.  Squealing like a stuck pig,
Francie does "the likes o' that" on the Nugent's living room floor, and is
himself whisked away to a very Catholic remand home for "boney arsed
Bogmen," where his ever fertile imagination--and clever chicanery--runneth
over.
Director Jordan's vivid treatment of Pat McCabe's nightmare novel
produces a sometimes disturbing, dark comedy littered with surreal touches
(such as Sinéad O'Connor playing the Virgin Mary).  It's not as outlandish
as the trailers make out; instead, this remarkable film focuses on the
effects external influences have on the friendship between two boys
(schoolboy chums in real life), allowing us to empathize with their plight
in the presence of extraordinary behavior.
It's bleak and it's black but it's fundamentally very funny.  Rea
talks us through it, beautifully, and Owens drags us though it, admirably,
and, in tandem with Jordan's sure hand, theirs are contributions to make
"The Butcher Boy" a film worth savoring.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
        While screen adaptations of John Irving's novels have been
disappointingly uneven, the films have all shared one particular strength:
key casting.  Who can forget John Lithgow as Roberta Muldoon, the
transsexual quarterback of "The World According to Garp," or Nastassja
Kinski as Susie the Bear in "The Hotel New Hampshire"?
        A lot of good casting decisions have gone into the making of "The
Cider House Rules," an adaptation of Irving's poetic 1994 novel about a
restless young man called Homer Wells.
        Among those sound judgments was the decision to have the splendid
Tobey Maguire assume the pivotal role; the decision to cast Michael Caine
as his mentor and father figure, Dr. Wilbur Larch, the ether-addicted head
obstetrician of the St. Cloud's orphanage, Maine; and the decision to offer
Jane Alexander and Kathy Baker supporting roles as his head nurses.
        Then there are the brethren who populate the apple orchard where
Homer Wells finds himself shortly after leaving St. Cloud's, including
Delroy Lindo, OscarŽ-worthy as the foreman of the migrant work detail that
drifts up and down the coast as the seasons take them.  There's Kate
Nelligan as the matriarch of the cider house, and Charlize Theron as Candy,
the lovely, lonely wife of a WWII bomber pilot (Paul Rudd) sent away on a
mission overseas leaving Candy to set lobster traps with Homer Wells, a man
who's never seen the ocean before let alone a lobster.
        Am I forgetting anyone?  Yes.  Kieran Culkin and Paz de la Huerta
as dissolute orphanage residents who make you sit up and take notice every
time they're on the screen.
        But with "The Cider House Rules," the good people decisions don't
end with the cast.  Irving has written his own screenplay in order to get
it right this time (last year's "Simon Birch," loosely based on his "A
Prayer for Owen Meaney," was a big-screen example of Irving handled
sub-standardly); the author appears fleetingly as a stationmaster here.
Rachel Portman, a composer of such sweet and lyrical tenderness, provides a
score that's absolutely right for the project--sweet, lyrical, and tender.
There's impressive New England photography by Oliver Stapleton too.
        Last but by no means least is "My Life as a Dog" director Lasse
Hallström, who shows enormous skill in pulling this collective together and
helping bring Irving's marvelously touching story to life.  For the many
beloved who pass away in "The Cider House Rules," it's an extraordinarily
life-affirming story.  And now, thanks to these talented individuals, it's
an extraordinarily life-affirming film.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Last Dance (1996)
During the last half century, only one woman has been tried and executed
for her crimes.  Unfortunately for the producers of LAST DANCE, this
capital punishment movie fails to generate enough interest even to raise
the question "Is this *that* woman's story?"
Following on from last year's Academy Award nomination for her supporting
role in CASINO, Hollywood fave Sharon Stone continues her bid for
recognition as a Serious Actor.  After a diabolically-dreary turn in
DIABOLIQUE, Stone returns to serious cinema in a film that is seriously and
uncompromisingly average.  As death row inmate Cindy Liggett, Stone--sans
makeup and with a Meryl Streep-inspired Southern drawl--plays a convicted
killer who has been in the state penitentiary awaiting the death penalty
for 12 years.  With three stays of execution by a sympathetic judge yet
little hope for ultimate mercy, Stone's character is one that is beaten and
broken and ready to die.
Enter Rick Hayes (NORTHERN EXPOSURE's Rob Morrow), an inexperienced
attorney who is assigned to review Liggett's case for the Clemency Board.
Expected to follow standard operating procedure to an inevitable outcome,
Hayes instead finds himself drawn into a personal relationship with Liggett
as he investigates her crime.  Although there is no question that she is
guilty--as a teenaged crackhead, Liggett cold-bloodedly beat to death two
high schoolers--Hayes discovers a changed woman in Liggett and seeks to
have her sentence commuted.  Only a compassionate nod from the Governor can
save her from death by lethal injection as Hayes fights to uncover
discrepancies in her original defense trial.
But this is not a brutal, hard-hitting expose of life behind bars, which
might have made for better drama.  The worst the women prisoners appear to
endure is a steady diet of television soap operas and game shows!  LAST
DANCE's focus is on the relationship between Liggett and Hayes, and this is
where it falls down.  These two characters are similar in so much as no one
has expected anything of them in life, but otherwise there is simply no
chemistry between the two, for which we can blame both the weak script and
Morrow's featherweight performance as Hayes.  The film lacks emotional
punch right up until the climactic scenes, when Stone finally gives it her
all in glorious Technicolor.
Word-of-mouth and obvious comparisons to the superior DEAD MAN WALKING
should kill LAST DANCE off at the box office.  Sharon Stone fans are about
the only potential audience and they will be treated to a decent Sharon
Stone performance coupled with an atypical, anti-glamorous Sharon Stone
look.  She certainly does the best she can with the paper-thin
material--LAST DANCE is unlikely to hurt her career.
Veteran Australian director Bruce Beresford (BREAKER MORANT) is no stranger
to plots centering around civic injustice, but he plays this outing way too
safe, failing to inject any life or depth into the proceedings.  If there
was an opportunity for originality or creativity here then Beresford missed
the boat.  LAST DANCE fails to satisfy as astute character study,
provocative political treatise, or even camp women-in-chains potboiler.
As dances go, this is a slow one-step with no chance of appeal.

Title
Review for One Night Stand (1997)
"One Night Stand" is a slight, puerile, and rather pointless tale of
infidelity that tries too hard to be deep.  The performances are all fine;
it's the writer, composer, and director--Mike Figgis all--that spoil the
show.
Successful television commercial director Max Carlyle (Wesley Snipes) is in
New York visiting an old friend who's dying of AIDS.  He misses his flight
back to L.A., however, for a variety of reasons--a leaky pen in his shirt
pocket, bad traffic, and a more-than-passing interest in an intriguing
blonde called Karen (Nastassja Kinski), with whom he winds up spending the
night.
Max returns to L.A. where his petite, fun-loving wife Mimi (played by
Ming-Na Wen) tells him she misses her "Mr. Pufnstuf," referring to Max's
(recently used) "equipment."  Once home, the family dog acts all funny
around him (Max didn't *shower*!?) causing Mimi to comment, half in jest
and half in fear, "maybe he smells another bitch on you?"  Charming.
A year later, Max and Karen bump (and grind) into each other again,
triggering a chain of coincidences that result in the film's ridiculous
(double!) climax.  (Talking of entendres, there are plenty of unintentional
laughs in "One Night Stand" but deliberate attempts at humor fall
completely flat.)
Stylistically, "One Night Stand" is awkward.  Scenes frequently fade to
black, not at the end but throughout, and often.  It's a sophomoric
technique that damages the film's tempo: scenes that appear to have ended
continue, and those that require resolution have gone by the wayside when
the image returns.  Having Snipes talk directly to camera in the opening
sequence sets an inappropriate expectation also, especially as the
technique is never used again (one frustrated sigh to camera
notwithstanding).
Similarly, Figgis slaps together a schizophrenic score--jazz doodlings,
solo piano pieces, melancholic strings, and flighty vocal passages--as if
this multifaceted filmmaker can't decide what mood he wants to establish.
The crisis at the center of the film is troubling as it elevates "One Night
Stand" to a level of "significance" it doesn't deserve.  While Robert
Downey Jr. is appropriately cast and affecting as Charlie, Max's
HIV-positive friend, it's uncomfortable and decidedly tacky watching Max
and Karen groping at each other while Charlie's life ticks away.  Kyle
MacLachlan, as Charlie's brother Vernon, doesn't have much to do (unless
doubling for Matthew Perry was a script requirement), and Julian Sands and
Amanda Donohoe, both often extreme performers, are wasted in minor roles.
Nothing makes a whole lot of sense.  Max has a sexy wife so we should
believe he's looking for more than just physical gratification?  Mimi's
dinner conversation might not be all that stimulating--Max tries to stir
things up by suggesting, for example, that the California mudslides were
started deliberately--but he doesn't engage Karen in any kind of
intellectual discussion either.
While "One Night Stand" isn't nearly as Penthouse Forum as Figgis' previous
film, the critically-acclaimed boozefest "Leaving Las Vegas," it does
continue his penchant for seedy situations in which his lead actresses slip
in and out of flimsy outfits.  After a couple of wet dreams in a row, Mike
Figgis might want to consider refocusing his efforts in a less adolescent
direction--one that might provide him with the depth he seeks.

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
Watching "Little Voice," the motivations of dramatist Jim Cartwright 
become perfectly clear.  After witnessing Jane Horrocks performing 
spot-on vocal impersonations of some of this century's most expressive 
pop divas--Judy Garland, Marilyn Monroe, and Billie Holiday to name a 
few--Cartwright wrote a stage extravaganza specifically for the 
bantamweight British actress.
Five years after its run on the London stage, "The Rise and Fall of 
Little Voice" has been adapted for the big screen, albeit with an 
abbreviated title.
Not surprisingly, the best thing about "Little Voice" is what caught 
Cartwright's ear and imagination all those years ago--Horrocks doing 
Garland, Monroe, Bassey, and Dietrich to such intimate perfection you'd 
swear her vocalizations were dubbed (necessitating the film's closing 
statement to the contrary).  She's pretty amazing, and my main regret on 
leaving the theater was that I wanted to see and hear more of her.  Does 
she do Streisand too?
In fact, the film's "plot" often feels like padding, a thinly-veiled 
attempt to bridge the gaps surrounding the moments when LV (Horrocks) 
gets up on stage and belts out production numbers like Shirley Bassey's 
"Big Spender."
Following the death of her beloved father, LV (the initials stand for 
'little voice' on account of her limited capacity to express herself 
verbally) takes to her room, where she listens to her father's 
collection of long-playing phonograph records almost exclusively.  She 
mimics the performers as a tribute to her late father, and also to 
distance herself from her loutish and vulgar mother ("Secrets & Lies"' 
Brenda Blethyn), whose attempts to attract men would put a promiscuous 
teenager to shame.
Blethyn and Michael Caine, as a loan shark-avoiding talent agent, lend 
the film some added color with their loud, outrageous characterizations 
(and in Caine's case, loud, outrageous shirts).  Blethyn's role recalls 
something Julie Walters ("Educating Rita," "Intimate Relations") might 
have done for a laugh, and Caine is perfectly cast and loving every 
minute of it, including the moment when his Ray Say "discovers" LV and 
persuades her to perform at the local nightclub with the unfortunate 
name of Mr. Boo's.
Less in your face is Ewan McGregor, who has a subdued role as Billy, a 
telephone repairman's apprentice who races homing pigeons.  His hobby 
leads to some pretty obvious metaphors about caged birds being set free, 
but provides an opportunity for LV to ask Billy an amusing question 
about his prized pigeon, Duane: "What's he doin' in France?"
The film was shot (and presumably set, although nobody bothers to 
mention it) in Scarborough, a seaside town on the east coast of 
Yorkshire which could lay claim to being the Las Vegas of Northern 
England if it wasn't for Blackpool on the opposite coast.  These are the 
kind of places that make Atlantic City look glamorous.
But sometimes talent emerges from the crummiest of places.
"Little Voice," an ugly duckling tale about a little mynah bird that 
could, showcases a remarkable talent in Jane Horrocks.  Previously 
regarded for her nervous, withdrawn portrayals in working-class social 
dramas, or as Bubble in the British sitcom "Absolutely Fabulous," 
"Little Voice" allows another side of Horrocks' star to shine.


Title
Review for Jurassic Park (1993)
     On the strength of the McDonald's tie-in alone, kids this summer
will be turning off their TV sets and flocking to JURASSIC PARK, the
latest blockbuster from Steven Spielberg, the man who popularized
man-eating sharks, touch-toning extra-terrestrials and whip-toting
archeologists.
     The problem with the film, plain and simple, is that it focuses
all of its energies on the dinosaurs themselves.  Not one but four
different effects specialists--live action dinosaurs, full motion
dinosaurs, dinosaur supervisor, and special dinosaur effects--are
credited.  While there is no denying their work is truly eye-popping,
everything else takes second billing, resulting in a film with a
surprisingly flat exposition (the first third), a roller-coaster ride
of special effects (its remaining two thirds), and no ending (it just
stops).
     Take that laborious opening.  Spielberg of all people knows how to
set up a movie.  Just look at the first few minutes of RAIDERS OF THE
LOST ARK to experience tension, atmosphere, and pacing.  By contrast,
JURASSIC PARK's setup is long and uninvolving.
     We get to meet our two heroes, boyfriend and girlfriend
paleontologists Grant and Ellie (played by Sam Neill and Laura Dern),
who are visited by Is-He-A-Megalomaniac-Or-Is-He-Just-A-Doddering-
Old-Grandfather John Hammond (Richard Attenborough, taking a break from
directing).  Hammond makes them an offer they can't refuse:  Come
endorse my biological preserve off the coast of Costa Rica and I'll
fund your archeological project for the next three years.  He's already
popped open the champagne so you can assume he figures it's a done
deal.  It is.
     Fans of the Michael Crichton bestseller on which the film is based
will be disappointed.  Gone are all the fascinating details about the
park's upkeep, as well as most of the scientific wranglings about the
mysteries of DNA splicing and genetic reconstruction that made the book
such a good read.  Instead, Spielberg fobs the audience off with an
abbreviated explanation as to how these creatures came to be: Take an
amber-preserved mosquito that has fed off the blood of dinosaurs,
extract and analyze the blood, mix it with a little frog DNA to
complete the chain and bingo!  Barney without the songs or the
moralizing.
     Soon enough the park's chief technician (that fat guy Newman on
TV's SEINFELD) goes AWOL--he's stolen some frozen embryos for financial
gain--and a severe storm hits the island.  Time for the dinos to run
amok.  And run amok they do.  This is where the movie eventually takes
off.
     The audience is then subjected to a veritable onslaught of loud,
head-banging scenes of large carnivorous reptiles biting the heads off
humans and other, smaller dinosaurs.  Stan Winston's live action
effects are quite fantastic.  With few exceptions, these dinosaurs look
and act like the real thing (the scene in which a herd of
"veggie-saurs" thunder across the grasslands is a particular
standout).  Grown-ups and young children will probably be scared out of
their wits, but older kiddies will laugh and scream with glee at all
the mayhem.  Although JURASSIC PARK is rated PG-13, its violence
deserves an R.
     Jeff Goldblum (THE FLY) plays a mathematician called Dr. Malcolm.
In his black leather garb and tragically hip glasses he looks more like
a kook out of a Robert Altman movie than a scientist.  He hangs around
to provide the kind of wisecracks needed to offset all that on-screen
carnage.
     Throughout all this, no-one does anything especially clever, or
even heroic.  Grant and Ellie (and two of Hammond's grandchildren) just
run and run.  And you thought it was the dinosaurs who were supposed to
have brains the size of walnuts!  These humans don't think or plot
their escape; all they do is scream and watch in horror as their
colleagues meet grisly, bone-crunching deaths.  This is a *very* noisy
movie.
     For Steven Spielberg, a director from whom we've come to expect
consummate filmmaking, a lot of JURASSIC PARK is surprisingly shoddy.
The film's only achievements are technical, leaving us with a
mind-blowing assault on the senses in which the human beings are
infinitely less interesting than the dinosaurs.


Title
Review for Honey, I Shrunk the Kids (1989)
     Imagine being zapped by a laser beam and finding yourself reduced to the
size of a cheerio.  Imagine battling bugs as large as Buicks.  Imagine having
Rick Moranis for a father!
     These are just a few of the horrors the title kids have to face in HONEY,
I SHRUNK THE KIDS, the diminutive but enjoyable new miniaturization comedy
from the Walt Disney studios.
     The film continues Hollywood's fascination with our world as seen from a
different point of view.  The film doesn't attempt to live up to the 1950s
sci-fi classic THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING MAN, the yardstick against which all
like films are measured, but it does have a charming, harmless quality that's
undeniably appealing.
     Meet the Szalinskis -- nerdy, screwball inventor Wayne (Moranis),
wife/mother/realtor Diane (Marcia Strassman), children Amy (Amy O'Neill,
looking not unlike a young Laura Dern) and Nick (Robert Oliveri).
     The products of Wayne's eccentricity litter their suburban home like dirty
laundry, but his piece-de-resistance is a shrinking machine which he keeps
tucked away in the attic.
     Moranis is no Fred MacMurray, Disney's original Absent-Minded Professor,
and it's hard to take him seriously when his eight year old son constantly
upstages him.  Not that Moranis' Wayne Szalinski has to show any range or depth
of emotion, but his acting abilities are stretched far more in the McDonald's
soft drink commercial this film spawned than in the film itself.
     On the other side of the fence live the Thompsons, Russell (Matt Frewer)
and Mae (Kristine Sutherland) and their two sons, Russ and Ronnie (played by
Thomas Brown and Jared Rushton respectively).  Frewer, desperately trying to
shake off his image of television's Max Headroom, is suitably gawky in the role
of Big Russ Thompson.  His back-and-forth "who's crazier than whom"
altercations with Moranis are consistently droll.  They are not so much feuding
neighbors as mutually insensitive ones.
     When younger son Ronnie hits a baseball though the Szalinski's attic
window, it accidentally triggers the miniaturization device.  Venturing
upstairs to retrieve the errant ball, he and Nick are struck by the machine's
beam and shrunk.  Needless to say, the two older children soon join them amidst
the oversized dustballs on the attic floor.
     Wayne returns home after having been snubbed by his peers at a scientific
conference and proceeds to trash the contraption.  Sweeping up the resulting
debris -- as well as his progeny -- he dumps them in the garbage.  What follows
are the four Lilliputians' big adventures trying to get across the lawn, and
back to normal size, before dark.
     Realizing that it's literally a jungle out there now, Amy comments off-
handedly to her pint-sized brother "We're not in Kansas anymore, Toto," to
which he retorts, "We're not in the food chain anymore, Dorothy."  That aside,
and Amy's "I have six hours to get home, get big and get to the mall!" are two
of the better lines in the movie.  There's a cute relationship developed
between Amy and Russ, and the film does make some valid points about living in
suburban harmony and all that neighborly rigmarole.
     The special effects range from downright cheesy to generally effective.
Of particular note are the flight of the bumblebee -- an exciting addition to
the traditional buttercups-as-beanstalks scenario -- and the exploding droplets
of water from the lawn sprinklers.  And, except for the demise of an endearing
ant, the film keeps everything in perspective and is amusing and light-hearted
throughout.  The image of Moranis and Strassman dangling from a clothes line
with binoculars trained on the grass is a particularly silly one.
     In order to appreciate just how engaging the film is, one need look no
further than "Tummy Trouble," the Roger Rabbit cartoon which accompanies it.
That film, in direct contrast, is crass, mean-spirited and unbelievably
violent.  Children about to go into hospital could easily be affected by this
Maroon Cartoon's misguided portrayal of doctors and surgical procedures.
     Viewers of HONEY, I SHRUNK THE KIDS, on the other hand, might well think
twice before stepping on an ant again.  It's certainly a most uncomfortable
pairing, and one which should have Uncle Walt turning over in his grave.


Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
        Have you noticed nowadays how many movie previews push the name of
the director almost as much the film's principal actors?  "A film by Tony
Scott" or "A Mike Nichols film" the guy with the mouthful of marbles will
state confidently at the end of the preceding montage.
        I would tend to guess that most people who drag their carcasses out
to their local megaplex on a Saturday night couldn't care less who
*directed* the film they're about to see.  Half of them don't even care
who's *in* it.
        And so to "The Replacement Killers."  The voice-over at the end of
its television trailer somberly announces "Directed by Antoine Fuqua."
Antoine who?  Like, does anyone know who Antoine Fuqua *is*?  (No.)  Has he
directed anything of note before?  (No.)  Has he directed *anything*
before?  (Yes, a music video.)  So what's the point?
        The point, unfortunately, is that "The Replacement Killers" *isn't*
a film by John Woo.
        Woo is the acclaimed Hong Kong filmmaker responsible for some
highly kinetic action pictures on that side of the globe.  His films are
spectacularly staged ballistic ballets with, frequently, an ageless,
charismatic leading actor called Chow Yun-Fat caught somewhere in the
middle.  Movies like "A Better Tomorrow," "The Killer", and the sensational
"Hard-Boiled."  Then Woo came to the States and made a couple of duds, "Hard
Target" (with Jean-Claude Van Damme--no surprise there) and "Broken Arrow."
Then he finally redeemed himself with last summer's "Face/Off."  Next he's
executive producing a comedy/actioner of sorts, "The Big Hit," "a Kirk Wong
film."
        "The Replacement Killers" certainly *looks* like it could be a John
Woo film. (It should; he executive produced this one too.)  For starters it
stars Chow Yun-Fat.  And it's choc-o-bloc with scenes of hit men (and Mira
Sorvino!) flying through the air with both barrels blazing.  But there the
comparisons end.
        The action sequences, of which there are many, are not particularly
well staged, or crafted.  They're just there.  Ad nauseum.  The plot, too,
is relatively untaxing--hoods hound Chow when Chow reneges on hit; Chow
drags Sorvino's forger around town as security for ticket back to mainland
China to save family; Chow and Sorvino get shot at a lot--and it simply
allows for more of those understaged, sub-crafted shoot-outs.  As for
style, Fuqua's approach seems to be black=cool.  Witness Chow's sunglasses
(indoors!), the shadowy exteriors, the leather garb of the title
characters, and Sorvino's constantly exposed undergarments (she's supposed
to be tough and we know that tough chicks like to hang around in their
underwear, even when they're working, right?).
        Chow and Sorvino make a respectable pairing, and even Jürgen
Prochnow ("Das Boot") is suitably well-dressed and oily in a throwaway
henchman role.  When the replacement killers (cuz Chow reneged, remember?)
track the good guys down to a crowded video arcade and start shooting, all
of a sudden there's nobody around.  Where'd everybody go?  And why the heck
didn't Chow and Sorvino go with them!?  It's logic like that that leaves
"The Replacement Killers" in the gutter time and time again.
        Now that Chow Yun-Fat has crossed the ocean it would be nice to see
him handling something a little more sophisticated than a pair of firearms
(perhaps tinkling the old ivories like Clint Eastwood did in "In the Line
of Fire"?).  If you're planning on seeing Antoine Fuqua's film, let me
suggest any Woo/Chow movie on videotape as a replacement.

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
        Hilary Swank's breakthrough, Oscar=AE-winning performance as Teena
Brandon dominates "Boys Don't Cry," a harrowing, true-life tale about a
20-year-old Nebraskan native who chose to live her life as a boy until her
grisly end at the hands of her so-called friends.  Kimberly Peirce's film
is a difficult one to watch, a study of small-town ignorance and the
prejudice it breeds, with Swank truly remarkable as the self-destructive
youth who drifts from bar brawl to bar brawl before descending on the
depressed rural hamlet of Falls City.  With little more to do than lie,
cheat, and steal the days away, "Brandon" hooks up with a pickup-full of
beer-guzzling degenerates, one of whom (played by Chlo=EB Sevigny in an
Oscar=AE-nominated turn) he falls for.  Swank's distinction is not just her
ability to play a boy convincingly--her deep-set cheekbones and angular jaw
give Swank a discrete physical advantage--it's the emotional depth she
injects into the role of a juvenile struggling with a self-confessed sexual
identity crisis.  Sevigny, while not required to compete with Swank in the
complexity department, is nonetheless crucial as the na=EFve Lana, whose
unenlightened friends finally discover Brandon's true identity and, fueled
by alcohol, hate, and pathological fear, brutally rape and murder her.
Teena Brandon's downfall was not that she chose the wrong identity but that
she opted to hang out with the wrong group of people.  And in "Boys Don't
Cry," a film that rarely pulls its punches, Hilary Swank masterfully
realizes the emotionally disturbing ambiguities which governed that final,
fatal decision.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Angel Eyes (2001)
Jennifer Lopez is riding a wave of popularity right now so it should come
as no surprise to anyone to see the actress turned Queen of Q102 with
another movie in theaters (following close on the heels of her lukewarm
"The Wedding Planner").  Given Lopez's current appeal, it would probably be
unwise for her to attempt anything controversial or challenging at this
point, and "Angel Eyes," therefore, is exactly the right vehicle for her:
she looks good, she turns in a decent performance, but she doesn't do
anything risky, doesn't do anything to stretch herself as an actress.
Luis Mandoki's film (he made the Kevin Costner/Robin Wright sudser
"Message in a Bottle") is another drama/mystery/thriller/romance, but those
looking for anything more than a romance (replete with delectable JLo
close-ups) will be disappointed--there's not a whole heck of a lot of drama
here, even less mystery, and virtually zero thrills.
What starts out looking like a traditional police drama (Lopez plays a
Chicago cop with relationship problems) quickly shifts gears with the
arrival of a mysterious stranger.  Catch (played by James Caviezel) is
first seen observing (or, perhaps, spying on) Lopez's Sharon Pogue as she
hangs out in bars and coffee shops, shooting the breeze with her peers,
Chicago's finest.  When Sharon is called into action, Catch is there to
save her, but not after Sharon takes a few rounds to the chest (don't
worry: we've already seen her strapping on her bullet proof vest).  That
scene is one of the film's better ones, especially if you watch Lopez's
reactions as she rips open her protective garment to verify that it did its
job.
So Catch and Sharon are introduced, and the more strange and mysterious
Catch seems (that name, for instance), the more strangely and mysteriously
attracted to him Sharon becomes.  Judging from his rather
sparsely-appointed apartment though, it's clear the guy has never heard of
IKEA.
Unfortunately, "Angel Eyes" is almost always too obvious for its own good.
 It opens with a scene of Lopez's character rescuing someone from a car
crash, and it's pretty apparent to anyone with half a brain that Catch is
that someone, yet the filmmakers go out of their way to make that
revelation, when it eventually comes, surprising.  There's a
falling-in-love montage--we've all seen those a thousand times before--and
as the film slowly segues from tough police drama (Jen looks especially
good in uniform) to touchy-feely cop romance (Jim seems to be doing
*exactly* the same facial expressions he used in "Frequency" and "Pay It
Forward"), Mandoki and writer Gerald Di Pego ("Message in a Bottle" also)
turn up the manipulation factor one hundred fold.  Caviezel's monologue in
the cemetery is effective and convincing; Lopez's monologue at her parent's
house is redundant and poorly timed.
That's Sonia Braga ("Kiss of the Spider Woman," "The Milagro Beanfield
War"), by the way, looking a lot older than her years, as Sharon's mother
and Shirley Knight ("Dutchman," "Petulia," and other cult '60s movies),
looking just about right, as Catch's mother-in-law Elanora Davis.
"Angel Eyes" won't hurt Jennifer Lopez's career any but it's only a so-so
addition to her sometimes impressive résumé.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Much Ado About Nothing (1993)
     Kenneth Branagh's MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING proves that his
critically acclaimed 1989 production of HENRY V was no fluke.
     With his new film, Branagh once again brings one of William
Shakespeare's most popular works lovingly to the screen.  Some might
argue that a second adaptation of the Bard in four feature films is
nothing less than egotistical on the part of this "brilliant" young
director/actor.  But fortunately Branagh, the golden boy of British
cinema, doesn't let his ego interfere with the task at hand, and it's
to his credit that Shakespeare is very much the star here.
     Shot exclusively on location in Italy, MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING is
a lusty, vigorous, sun-drenched romp in which two parallel love affairs
intertwine with comedic and dramatic results.  It's a 17th Century
picnic, with love, lust and trouble being but a few of its main
ingredients.  The rousing title sequence, in which the pounding hooves
of horses bringing men home from battle are cut against the eager
rushings of womenfolk readying themselves, sets the tone for the
sensual imagery that is to follow.
     Branagh and real-life spouse Emma Thompson (last year's Oscar
winner for HOWARD'S END) play Benedick and Beatrice, mental sparring
partners that put even Burton and Taylor to shame.  "If her breath were
as terrible as her terminations, there were no living near her," snips
Benedick after one particularly heated interchange.
     The skirmishes of wit between them is matched only by their dogged
determination to remain single.  Benedick is little more than a
blowhard and Beatrice, although more well-rounded, freely confesses
that marriage is not for her--"not till God make men of some other
metal than earth."  It's pretty obvious that they have the hots for
each other, and it's great fun witnessing the transformation of their
put-downs, cuts and slurs into suggestive come-ons and gooey-eyed
fawnings.  MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING may be almost 400 years old, but
time has not dated this battle of the sexes.
     As an actor, Branagh's command of Shakespeare is impressive, and
his flamboyant soliloquies and readings bring new life and vitality
to the words.  And Thompson, whose acid-tongued Beatrice is "born to
speak all mirth, and no matter," is equal to Branagh.  Together, their
performances make the language viable and altogether accessible.
     Although the nubile young lovers Claudio (played by Robert Sean
Leonard, the aspiring actor in "Dead Poets Society") and Hero (newcomer
Kate Beckinsale) have less to do than Benedick and Beatrice, their
youthful innocence and exuberance for life perfectly complements their
warring counterparts.  Theirs is a love that is about to be undone by
the treachery of others.
     In addition to the leads, Branagh has assembled a stellar cast of
ensemble actors.  Denzel Washington is fine and upstanding in the role
of the dashing Don Pedro, and his intimate scene with Thompson is quite
touching.  Keanu Reeves' villainous Don John is all sneer and no shirt,
a well-greased torso that inspires hisses from the audience at every
turn. Heinous facial hair, Ted!
     There are some familiar faces among the supporting cast as well.
Brian Blessed, the wooly, teddy-bearish character actor of many British
films, guffaws his way through his role of Antonio with roguish
aplomb.  And Richard Briers (of the British television import, "Good
Neighbors") is equally affable as the patriarch Leonato, under whose
impressive da Vincian auspices this tapestry of lies, deceit and
revenge unravels.
     As in many of Shakespeare's plays, there's a bawdy entourage of
assorted bit players designed to add some levity to proceedings.
Michael Keaton's Dogberry, Constable of the Watch, is more or less a
reprisal of his character in BEETLEJUICE, a confusion of facial
contortions and bad teeth.  Unfortunately, some of his character's
choicest malapropisms are lost in the shuffle.
     Although the film is a comedy, there are some dark and fiery
moments to offset the lighthearted revelry.  These are best exemplified
in the wedding scene, in which the falsely accused Hero is attacked by
both her father and her betrothed, Claudio.  This scene, in which
Hero's friends and family are slow to protect her, is quite
terrifying.  When MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING gets serious, it is
genuinely powerful, and Branagh (as director) does a fine job of
balancing wit, melodrama and tenderness.
     "Man is a giddy thing, and this is my conclusion" waxes Benedick
eloquently towards the end of the film.  MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING is
itself a giddy thing, a good looking film, full of good looking
people--fresh faces, fine features, and firm, bronzed skin.  Summer has
indeed arrived!


Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
        "No Jews, dogs, or coloreds" reads the sign that hangs from the
chain link fence by the entrance to a public lake in the eastern section of
Baltimore in the mid-1950s.  Since dogs can't read, and none of them can
recall ever having seen a colored person sunbathing, this sign must be
strictly for the Jews, yes?  So surmises one of a group of three friends,
three Jewish friends, whose teenage experiences with race, religion, and
prejudice form the center of Barry Levinson's "Liberty Heights."
        It's the fourth nostalgic return to the director's hometown in a
series that has previously included "Diner," "Tin Men," and "Avalon."
While not as consistently well-written as "Diner," nor as bitingly funny as
"Tin Men," "Liberty Heights" is a solid comedy-drama that contains lots of
satisfying little moments rather than any significant big ones.
        If "Diner" could launch the careers of Steve Guttenberg, Paul
Reiser, Kevin Bacon, Daniel Stern, Timothy Daly, and Mickey Rourke, then
who's to say that Adrien Brody and Ben Foster--who play brothers Van and
Ben Kurtzman respectively--don't have a shot at future stardom?
        Brody and Foster are pretty terrific in "Liberty Heights," as are
most of the performers in the film, including Joe Mantegna and Bebe
Neuwirth as their parents.  Mantegna's Nate Kurtzman runs a burlesque house
and a numbers racket on the side and Neuwirth is his loving, supportive
wife.  As for their sons, Ben gets involved with a colored girl, and Van
falls in love with Cinderella with a magic wand, a well-to-do beauty he
meets at a Halloween party.
        There's a lot of wacky and not-so wacky situations spurred along by
Levinson's characteristically-incisive writing and ear for quotable
dialogue.  Notably strong is the relationship between Ben and Sylvia,
especially the staunch loyalty they show each other.  Propelling the story
forward is a varied score by Andrea Morricone, son of the great and
prolific Italian composer Ennio Morricone ("The Good, the Bad, and the
Ugly," "The Mission," "The Legend of 1900") which, every now and again,
reveals touches of his father's brilliance.  Levinson has shown immaculate
taste in bringing him onboard.
        Like Nate's mist green '55 Cadillac, "Liberty Heights" is a
pleasure to behold.  For Levinson and his followers, it only goes to show
you can go home again, and again.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for What's Love Got to Do with It (1993)
     Little Anna Mae Bullock sure loves to belt it out during her
Sunday morning gospel choir sessions, so much so that this young,
disruptive prodigy is often dragged outside.  Make no bones about it,
this kid can sing.  But life in Nutbush, Tennessee isn't all sunshine
and song.  Before we know it, her mother and elder sister have packed
their bags for St.  Louis, leaving the sad and frightened Anna Mae
behind.
     "Anna Mae who?" you may ask yourself.  "Never heard of her."  Well
maybe you know her better by her stage name.  Tina Turner.
     WHAT'S LOVE GOT TO DO WITH IT is a straightforward but thoroughly
irresistible biopic of the sultry rock legend who finally struck out on
her own after suffering years of abuse at the hands of husband and
mentor, Ike Turner.  The film is based on I, TINA, the 1986 biography
co-authored by Turner and MTV straight man Kurt Loder, and stars Angela
Bassett in an impassioned performance as the big-haired and big-heeled
pop diva.
     Twelve years after being abandoned, Anna Mae joins her estranged
family in St.  Louis, where she is bowled over by the sights and sounds
of life in the big city.  One such sound is that of lounge singer Ike
Turner (played by Laurence Fishburne), whose band performs in the
nightclub at which sister Jackie (Vanessa Bell Calloway) tends bar.
It's open-mike night, and before long that shiny metallic object is
dangled in front of Anna Mae.  The expression on her sister's face when
Anna Mae cranks out a gutsy blues version of "(Darlin') You Know I Love
You" is priceless.  A star is born.
     Ike takes Anna Mae under his wing and before long she's on the
road to stardom with a new name and a future.  But there's a price to
pay for success.
     The film contains more black eyes and bloody noses than ROCKY.
Like SWEET DREAMS, COAL MINER'S DAUGHTER, and LADY SINGS THE BLUES
before it, WHAT'S LOVE GOT TO DO WITH IT is a tragic chronicle of the
physical abuse suffered by one of our most beloved female
entertainers.  The scenes of domestic violence are extremely potent and
painful to watch.  Tina's explanation for enduring Ike's viciousness for
so long is "I know what it's like to have your own flesh and blood walk
out on you."  But when she finally finds the strength to fight back,
the crowd goes wild.
     Fishburne is excellent in a very unsympathetic role.  Ike Turner
could so easily have been portrayed as one-dimensional, but the
talented Fishburne gives this frightened wife-beater some depth.
     Angela Bassett, too, has done her homework.  Although she doesn't
physically resemble her, Bassett's body language and stage persona are
pure Tina Turner.  One of the film's many musical highlights is the
"Shake a Tail Feather" sequence, a loving recreation of Phil Spector's
THE BIG T.N.T.  SHOW.  Here Bassett struts her stuff with uncanny
accuracy.  The way she chases around the stage; the way she trails her
left arm behind her as she gyrates; the way she tips her head and
flicks her hair--all Tina Turner.  The lip-synching isn't always
perfect, but you'll be so caught up in the film's emotional energy that
you'll barely notice.  Turner did re-record some numbers for the film,
and her voice is as raspy and seductive as ever.
     It's a little eerie watching a movie about a rock star who's still
alive, and cutting to concert footage of the real Tina Turner at the
film's conclusion is somewhat jarring, as it tends to de-emphasize
Bassett's fine work in the film (especially when the transition from
teenager to middle-aged woman has been handled so deftly).  But it's a
small nitpick.
     Propelled by two star-making performances, WHAT'S LOVE GOT TO DO
WITH IT is an infectious, energetic musical experience that doesn't
attempt to smooth over the sordid details of Tina Turner's life.  It's
a success story with heart, and soul.


Title
Review for Dead Poets Society (1989)
     Few comedians command such respect as comics that, when they pause a while
for serious introspection, the audience sits up and listens.  Robin Williams is
such a performer.  In his latest film, Peter Weir's DEAD POETS SOCIETY,
Williams manages to blend humor and pathos without compromising either,
fashioning a part that is both touching and appealing.
     The action takes place at Welton Academy, a stuffy, upper-class edifice of
preparatory education rooted in pride and tradition.  Williams plays John
Keating, a charismatic English teacher whose unorthodox teaching methods endear
seven of his pimply-faced students to him, ultimately changing their lives
forever.  But these unconventional practices raise many an eyebrow amongst his
fellow professors, none the least of whom is the school's unswerving principal,
effectively played by Norman Lloyd of TV's "St. Elsewhere".
     Williams' character provides the essential catalyst in the story,
encouraging his pupils to reconvene the Dead Poets Society, a scholarly
opportunity he had as a youth to actively explore the language of Walt Whitman,
Dylan Thomas and William Blake.  Enlivening them, Keating urges that they "suck
all the marrow out of life", stimulating romance and passion and allowing it to
"drip from their tongues like honey."
     Scurrying busily to a nearby, off-limits cave to indoctrinate themselves
into their chapter of the club, the boys resemble monks, their hoods pulled up
over their heads like habits, flashlights cutting through the dense blue fog.
It's a superbly photographed sequence in a film which is both striking and
technically excellent.  The scene is altogether magical, taking on a special
wonder.
     But there is a darker side to the story, however.  The boys huddle around
Keating to look at the blurred, photographed faces of their predecessors now
housed under glass, faces not unlike their own.  "We're food for worms, lads,"
he tells them.  "These boys are fertilizing daffodils now."  Life does not go
on uninterrupted.  Their time too will come.
     Keating inspires his boys to seize the day - "Carpe Diem!"  - to act on
their impulses and be spontaneous, free thinkers.  He teaches them
non-conformity by camaraderie.  One, Neil Perry, maturely played by Robert Sean
Leonard, pursues an acting career, albeit against his malevolent father's
wishes.  Another, Todd Anderson (played with quiet reserve by Ethan Hawke),
builds confidence.  A third, Knox Overstreet (played by Josh Charles) finds
true love at last.
     Williams himself is a fine actor and his John Keating is a
characterization of rare sensitivity.  It's certainly his best work since THE
WORLD ACCORDING TO GARP.  GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM might have been a more
popular film at the box office, but wasn't Robin Williams simply playing Robin
Williams - loud, irreverent, hysterical?  His role here is a far cry from that
of the ostentatious, freewheeling Adrian Cronauer, but it is every bit as
effective.
     Contrary to the impression the previews would give us, Williams' role has
been reduced to somewhat of a supporting one.  He does get to utilize his
standard nightclub schtick, but it's both in character and in context.  People
coming to see the film simply for Robin Williams might be disappointed, but
they will also be missing the point.
     DEAD POETS SOCIETY takes the often frivolous ingredients of classical
literature - love, romanticism, passion - and turns them into a universal
theme, man's ability, man's right (if you will) to think for himself, to act
with spontaneity.  Ask yourself when it was that you last thought about these
subjects with anything more than a smile, or with a passing, cynical glance?
     The film makes us, the audience, take a long hard look at what inspires
us, what governs our motivations and determines our actions.  It emotes
feelings rarely felt in the movies these days.  Peter Weir skillfully handles a
subject matter which, in the hands of a lesser director, might have come across
as trite, even laughable.  But he has gathered together a young ensemble cast
of relative unknowns and allowed them, much as Perry as Puck in A MIDSUMMER
NIGHT'S DREAM, to shine.
     In so doing, DEAD POETS SOCIETY finally triumphs, laying to rest the age
old fallacy that the only good poet is a dead one.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Easily the most anticipated, most delayed film release of 1997, James
Cameron's $220 million "Titanic" steams into theaters with a slew of
questions to answer, most notably was it worth the wait, the hype, and all
that money?
Well.  "Titanic" is big, that's for sure.  The size and scope of the
production are evidenced by a massive, detailed replica of the White Star
liner, impressive visual effects, countless extras, and a love story
transcending the Atlantic ocean itself.  That, plus the fact that the
storyline is played out over three and a quarter hours, and we're talking
epic proportions here.
"Titanic," alas, doesn't quite live up to its promise or its
much-ballyhooed pricetag.  But it's an entertainment on a grand scale
nonetheless.
Water-bound dramas are rarely without their production problems.  Cameron's
own "The Abyss" had its fair share, and those dogging "Waterworld" (prior
to "Titanic," the most expensive movie in Hollywood history) are legendary.
On "Titanic," it's clear that Cameron the get-it-right-and-budget-be-damned
director fairs far better than Cameron the sounds-about-right screenwriter.
While the ship sinks convincingly and spectacularly enough, leads Leonardo
DiCaprio and Kate Winslet get saddled with lots of cornball situations and
dialogue.  Cameron's trump card was to make "Titanic" first and foremost a
love story.  However, his straightforward approach to that fateful night on
April 15th, 1912 lends itself better to his visual overtures than his
romantic undertones.
DiCaprio plays Jack Dawson, a freewheeling, penniless (are there any other
kind?) artist from steerage who's smitten by Winslet's Rose DeWitt Bukater,
a stifled society damsel from the upper decks.  Cameron paints the haves
and the have-nots a little too black and white--the rich are all stuffy,
boring snots while the poor are the only ones who really know how to have
fun--but on the darker side, Billy Zane is particularly good as Rose's
suave, callous fiancé Cal Hockley.
Of the innumerable versions of this ocean-going tragedy, this one might be
the first to imply that the Titanic hit the iceberg because its lookouts
were distracted by a couple making out on deck.
However, even at its epic length, "Titanic" is never boring.  Time skips by
quickly, and there are more than a few decent supporting performances to
enjoy, including Frances Fisher (as Rose's disapproving mother Ruth) and
Bernard Hill, in an underwritten role as the ship's ineffectual captain.
Perhaps the most interesting aspect of the film occurs during its
present-day setup, when a rugged salvage expert (played by Bill "We're
toast, man!" Paxton) has one of his staff explain, via a fascinating
computer animation, how the ship went down in the icy waters of the North
Atlantic, sending 1,500 of its 2,200 passengers and crew to their deaths.
All this, of course, is represented in larger-than-life Cameron-a-rama
later in the film, when the tragedy of 1912 is stunningly recreated.
At this point in "Titanic," DiCaprio and Winslet take a back seat to the
spectacle and, like the rest of us, hang on for dear life.

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
        The posters that adorn the walls of Bowfinger International
Pictures aren't the kind that would inspire many aspiring actors to shell
out $25.00 just to audition.  When these very walls pronounce "The Yugo
Story" (yes, the sassy little EEC compact) as the studio's top grosser, you
have to wonder what kind of a two-bit, third-rate production company this
really is.
        Well, it's the raison d'ętre of Bobby Bowfinger (Steve Martin), a
two-bit, third-rate movie director.
        Bobby, not surprisingly, has had some difficulty competing with the
Paramounts and the Universals until the day he reads a script that knocks
his socks off.  The treatment, not your typical alien invasion picture, is
written by Bobby's accountant/receptionist following Bobby's encouraging
"if you're as good with words as you are with numbers, well...  I don't
need to finish that sentence."  In "Chubby Rain" (quite the best film title
within a film since "Love and Death on Long Island"'s "Hotpants College
II"), Bobby smells a hit.
        Speed-dialing virtually everyone he knows, Bobby pulls his
downtrodden, pessimistic employees together for a ten o'clock meeting,
promising that this is finally It.  If Bobby is good at anything it's the
small-time scam, and he manages to swindle a respected Hollywood producer,
briefly played by Robert Downey, Jr., into proclaiming "Chubby Rain" a "go
picture," except for one minor caveat: the film must headline action
superstar Kit Ramsey.
        Bowfinger's subsequent efforts to sign Kit don't prosper, setting
the master manipulator's wheels in motion again.  How about this for film
nouveau: shoot the entire movie without the star's knowledge or consent,
but with all the bit players harassing the unsuspecting Ramsey at every
possible opportunity.
        As conceived and written by Martin, that turns out to be an
absolute humdinger of a premise.
        Some might gripe that Martin has almost written himself out of the
picture, but that's a tribute to him and his craft, and it's partly why
"Bowfinger" works; there's no bologna in the shoes here.  Similarly, Eddie
Murphy (who plays Kit Ramsey and his braces-wearing, errand-running dingbat
lookalike Jiff) is near-on sensational in a demanding dual role, yet he
doesn't steal the film either.  After all these years, Martin and Murphy
still have what it takes.
        On the minus side, Heather Graham ("Austin Powers: The Spy Who
Shagged Me") impresses in the early going as a just-off-the-bus Ohio hick
looking for fame and fortune in Tinseltown, but she quickly loses her charm
by forcing the issue.  Rollergirl was clearly a fluke; since her prominent
rise to stardom in "Boogie Nights," Graham has been very disappointing.
        While there are some perfectly inspired bits in "Bowfinger" (e.g.,
the scene in which they recruit the best film crew they can afford), some
scenes fall completely flat (e.g., Daisy's "hot chemistry" scene with
Jiff).  It's not clear whether the blame falls upon screenwriter Martin or
director Frank Oz (working here with the comedian for the fourth time), but
it makes for some uneven cinema.  In the long run, however, these
imbalances do little to harm "Bowfinger," a film that fans of Steve Martin,
Eddie Murphy, and skillfully written and performed comedy should enjoy.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Fish in the Bathtub, A (1999)
        Without intending to, "A Fish in the Bathtub" serves as an
effective counter-programmer to the upcoming Tom Cruise/Nicole Kidman
thriller, "Eyes Wide Shut," by proving that marrieds don't necessarily need
star appeal or magazine-cover looks to attract an appreciative audience.
        Don't go expecting anything as controversial as the late Stanley
Kubrick's swan song, however.  Joan Micklin Silver's comedy (she made
"Crossing Delancey") is light.  Very light.  Unlike most things this summer
it doesn't feature aliens or car crashes or steamy sex scenes, and there's
nothing particularly new or significant or eye-popping in its storyline.
But in a lot of ways that's what makes "A Fish in the Bathtub" so enjoyable.
        About that storyline (in 25 words or less): after nearly 40 years
of marriage, Sam and Molly have a worse fight than usual and Molly walks
out, leaving Sam to contemplate his lot in life.
        Sam and Molly are played by Jerry Stiller and Anne Meara who, like
Cruise and Kidman, are a real-life married couple.  Not surprisingly, the
two actors have an effortless, easy-going chemistry and charm that provides
the film with its rich core.  While some may argue that Stiller's character
isn't much different from his Mr. Costanza on TV's "Seinfeld"--stubborn,
loudmouthed, and insensitive--the veteran actor gives Sam a vulnerable,
sympathetic depth despite his bristly exterior.  Equally convincing, Meara
plays Molly not as an innocent victim but as a co-contributor to the
couple's problems, one who gives as good as she gets.
        The fish in question is a large carp that Sam purchases from one of
the Chinese-owned businesses that now occupy the previously Jewish
neighborhood of Sam's old lingerie store.  In a silly but nice touch, the
fish becomes Sam's closest companion during the marital discord.  It's easy
to be amused when visualizing Jerry Stiller shouting out the film's cute
(but unspoken) tagline: "the fish stays...the marriage goes!"
        "A Fish in the Bathtub" is populated by a plethora of supporting
actors who form the family and friends who are all affected by Sam and
Molly's disharmony.  While some of the performances are competent
(especially Jane Adams as the bickering couple's unmarried daughter
Ruthie), a surprisingly large number recall improv night at the local
amateur dramatics society.  It might be that Silver has used this minor
film as a springboard to test out some new talent but unfortunately many of
her choices--including Sam and Molly's married realtor son, the blonde
client he's attracted to, and his best friend who knows it--don't pass the
test.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
        The most depressing thing about the depressingly pedestrian James
Bond film "The World is Not Enough" is its final frame: white letters on a
black background proclaiming "James Bond Will Return."  Oh I certainly hope
not.
        With Pierce Brosnan in his third and reportedly last go-round as
James Bond 007, "The World is Not Enough" is the best example to date that
"'Enough" is enough.
        In this, the 19th chapter in the seemingly-endless franchise
featuring Ian Fleming's debonair British secret agent who likes his
martinis--and his nemeses--shaken not stirred, the sub-inspired
screenwriters have chosen to rehash all of the setups, stunts, and sexy
encounters of the previous 18 Bond flicks rather than coming up with
anything the slightest bit original.
        We've got previously-used speedboat chases, ski chases, and sticky
situations aboard nuclear submarines.  We've got a couple of hot-to-trot
babes without an ounce of acting ability between them.  We've got a
post-Cold War megalomaniac bent on world domination slash destruction (here
played by a skinheaded Robert Carlyle with mean, lean panache).  And, as
has been the case since 1977's "The Spy Who Loved Me," we've got a plot
that has nothing whatsoever to do with anything conceived by Mr. Fleming.
        We've also got a main title song by Garbage to which, with very
little effort, you can fit the lyrics to *both* songs from "Tomorrow Never
Dies."
        While originality was never the series' strong suit, the films were
almost always fun, with at least some thought going into the nonstop
stunts.  I can't think of one memorable set-piece in the entire--and very
dull--"The World is Not Enough."
        In addition, Michael Apted (yes, the respected director of such
films as "Coal Miner's Daughter," "Nell," and the "28Up" documentary
series) takes embarrassing advantage of the full range of Bond clichés.
You get the "talking killer" plot device--you know the scenario: the bad
guy has the good guy at his mercy yet waxes poetic just long enough to die
of old age.  And you get a slew of high-priced assassins who can't hit a
barn door at 20 paces: in the film's opening minutes (of an endless 128),
Bond chases a sultry sniper along the Thames and the leather-clad lovely
fails to hit Bond's souped-up "fishing boat" with a bazooka when he pulls
within a few feet of her.  Later, she takes off in a hot air balloon with
Bond dangling from a guy rope beneath her but is still unable to take him
out.
        These reliable absurdities are more frustrating than usual since
there are no distractions other than occasional ads for luxury automobiles,
vodka, or credit cards.
        In and among the rampant product placements, Brosnan grapples with
Carlyle, "Braveheart"'s Sophie Marceau (as former kidnap victim slash
heiress Elektra King; she's terrible), "Wild Things"' Denise Richards (as a
nuclear physicist Lord help me; she's laughable), and Judi Dench as M.
Dame Judi brings the only shred of dignity to a series that has long since
jettisoned its self-respect (about the time Roger Moore inherited Bond's
Walther PPK).
        Brosnan goes through the motions with the grace and charm you'd
expect of the former "Remington Steele" star, but even he has to be
thinking there's more to life than an easy paycheck.  He's given plenty of
wiseacre asides to deliver, but only one of them--"I don't know any doctor
jokes"--made me chuckle (although "I thought Christmas only comes once a
year" is more in keeping with the series' penchant for grown-worthy puns).
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
        When a mud-caked woman (Catherine Keener) in a ditch alongside the
New Jersey turnpike screams to another (Cameron Diaz) that she's carrying
*her* child, you snicker nervously, not just because of the absurdity of
the situation but because, in the scheme of things, you believe it.
        That's the strength of Charlie Kaufman's brutally original
screenplay for "Being John Malkovich," a film that's... well, just out
there.
        "Being John Malkovich" is the kind of film you might want to see
several times to appreciate fully: every characterization, every line of
dialogue, every frame of film stock has something unique to offer.  Even a
twenty-word synopsis of the plot screams originality in such bold
brushstrokes that you wonder how this picture even got made: "An unemployed
puppeteer takes a job as a file clerk and discovers a portal into the head
of John Malkovich."  That's "John Malkovich, The Actor" by the way.
        This portal only allows access to every living, breathing Malkovich
moment for fifteen minutes at a time though.  Then you're spat out into
that ditch alongside the NJTP.
        Channeling Kaufman's outrageously surreal imagination is first-time
feature director Spike Jonze (he was the fourth GI in "Three Kings").  A
former director of Beastie Boys rock videos, Jonze deserves enormous credit
here.  He doesn't get carried away with the strangeness of it all, and
keeps his editor under tight control.
        "Being John Malkovich" features a wonderful, largely unrecognizable
cast including John Cusack as the down-on-his-luck puppeteer (great puppets
by the way), Diaz as his pet shop owner wife who brings her work home with
her (did I mishear her or did she actually ask her *monkey* to help with
the dishes?), and Keener as the ice-cold office fatale who knows an
entrepreneurial opportunity when she sees one.  All three are excellent
(Keener excellent?  I did say she was unrecognizable).
        Most actors would kill to get their name above a film's title, but
Malkovich does the impossible: he gets his name *in* it.  And he deserves
it too.  Not only is he a terrific sport throughout, but he plays himself
brilliantly (which is harder than it sounds) and then adds to the fun by
playing himself possessed by John Cusack.  It doesn't end, or even begin
there--just wait until Malkovich enters his own portal!  It's wacky,
cerebral entertainment that knows no boundaries.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
        What would you do if no one could see you?  Well, if you're a super
smart bio-molecular research scientist working for the military, you'd
grope a co-worker and rough-up your neighbor from across the street.
        That's right.  Of all the non-criminal possibilities brought about
by rendering oneself invisible, in "Hollow Man" Kevin Bacon's character
opts to commit sex crimes.  Er, it's Kevin Bacon who plays the super smart
military bio-molecular research scientist?  Something sounds horribly wrong
already.  But this is a Paul Verhoeven film, and the sleazepin director of
such open-crotch classics as "Basic Instinct" and the infamous "Showgirls"
never lets a little credibility get in the way of his voyeuristic
tendencies which, when you come right down to it, is all this film is about.
        "Hollow Man" features a string of hapless, C-list actors (among
them Bacon, Elisabeth Shue, Josh Brolin, and Kim Dickens) in a grade-Z plot
with a lot of special effects that, frankly, don't look much better than
those used in the 1933 version of "The Invisible Man."  Oh Bacon glistens
when he gets wet all right and looks like a rather fatty side of cheap
flank steak when he's attempting reentry but otherwise it's lots of
"thermal" shots and inanimate objects (Elisabeth Shue included) bobbing
around without any visible signs of support.
        Since invisibility, once achieved, isn't much of an effect (the
actors spend half their time conversing with nobody and the other half of
their time talking to each other--it amounts to much of a muchness), the
director elects to wardrobe all of his female protagonists in
loosely-buttoned sweaters so that the minute Bacon's character gets
invisible he can head straight for them.  It's as if that fascinating
concept--what would you do if no one could see you?--is simply a Verhoeven
ploy to show some skin.
        As a horror film, "Hollow Man" is unsophisticated and disturbing
(in its intent, not its achievements) and not worth your time or your
hard-earned dollars.  It's minor Verhoeven--and even that's not saying
much--and boy is it hollow.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
        In order to be successful with the ladies, you have to have the Tao
of Steve, otherwise you're just a Stu.  So preaches "The Tao of Steve," an
independent first feature by director Jenniphr Goodman about an overweight
Santa Fe slacker who, for some unimaginable reason, women find irresistible.
        Certainly it's not his dining etiquette.  Ice cream, chocolate
sauce, and Readi-Whip go straight from the refrigerator into Dex's
mouth--no dinnerware necessary.  And don't forget to save some for the dog!
        Among those who fall for the pot-smoking yet high-on-existentialism
Kindergarten teacher are the wife of one of his best friends and a plucky
young student tending bar at the Ten Year Reunion which opens the film.
Dex is cool, Dex is hot, and when it comes to women, Dex has it all figured
out.  But then someone like Syd (Greer Goodman), a theatrical set designer,
comes along and suddenly Dex has more questions than answers.
        It's a cute idea for a silly movie but, sadly, "The Tao of Steve"
hits two major stumbling blocks: sub-standard actors and a sub-standard
script.  Most of the performers here are rank amateurs and come across as
such.  These, unfortunately, include Donal Logue as the portly Dex, who's
asked to carry the weight of the movie along with his own bulk, and the
task is just too much for him.  The best performer in the film is co-writer
Greer Goodman which is encouraging because she's also the director's sister.
        The script, by the Goodmans and Duncan North (based on North
himself, according to the end credits), isn't as clever as it should be.
If you have to explain who the Steves (Steve McGarrett, Steve Austin, and
Steve McQueen) who give the Tao of Steve its name are, then you're playing
to the wrong audience.  Constant name calling ("Hey, Martha Stewart"
someone quips while Dex prepares his aphrodisiacal mango mahi-mahi) doesn't
make your script hip either--there's way too much of this and not enough
meaningful jingoism.
        Is Dex as cool as he thinks he is?  Syd certainly seems impervious
to his charms.  But as soon as Dex starts spouting his Zen philosophies and
espousing the seductive merits of Kierkegaard, she too is all over him.  So
whatever couple conflicts the scriptwriters initially dreamed up soon
deteriorate into more of the same: Dex has got It.  Although he can barely
hold down a job, with the Tao of Steve in his repertoire Dex can sure hold
down the babes.  By the time this film is over you'll be asking yourself
"Why?"
        As lightweight as its central protagonist is overweight, "The Tao
of Steve" is an amiable little picture that bumbles along harmlessly all
the while banking on the new age affability of its lead Logue.  It is,
however, only occasionally successful in making pertinent observations
about the ongoing battle of the sexes.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
        People from England don't sound like Americans.  They have
different accents and use a somewhat different vocabulary.  There's a new
film in town which has decided that these differences are worth remarking
on frequently and, in fact, that they provide a cinematic raison d'ętre.
That film is "The Limey."
        As directed by Steven Soderbergh ("sex, lies and videotape," "Out
of Sight"), "The Limey" stars Terence Stamp as a career criminal recently
sprung from an English prison after a nine-year stint for armed robbery.
Learning that his daughter Jenny has died suspiciously in an automobile
accident in the States, Wilson (Stamp) heads out to L.A. to shakedown the
truth.
        The film starts out remarkably strong, and it's everything you'd
expect from a director of Soderbergh's caliber.  He uses an extremely
interesting expository technique in the first third of the film, almost as
if he has shot the story fifteen different ways, and then edited the pieces
together so that the dialogue and situations fit together linearly, but
visually the characters are in different hemispheres, different worlds.
It's a technique so rich and complex that the question is can he keep this
up for the entire movie?  He cannot.  Or perhaps worse, he does not.
        Anyway, for the film's first thirty minutes or so, we're absolutely
caught up in the comings, goings, and motivations of this relentless,
silver-haired mystery man who moves silently across the screen like
Murnau's ghost, speaks very economically (and, I'll admit it, with a bit of
an London accent), and doesn't seem too deterred by a bunch of crooks who
kick the crap out of him when he starts asking questions about Terry
Valentine (the successful music producer with whom Jenny was last seen).
        "The Limey" is at its absolute best when it's in reflective mode
though, with close-ups of Wilson sitting on a plane, thinking,  Or standing
outside a wrought-iron gate, his head cocked to one side with a cigarette
dangling out one corner of his mouth, thinking.  Or driving a green car up
Route 1 with the sun beating down through the windshield, a page torn from
a magazine rather than a frame in a movie, thinking.
        But as the film goes on, Wilson's accent gets thicker and
Soderbergh almost completely jettisons the revolutionary visual stylistics
that made the earlier part of the film so engrossing.  Wilson meets up with
a close friend of Jenny's, played by the always stellar Lesley Anne Warren,
and the two of them share some interesting scenes but not much chemistry,
since Wilson is as difficult to approach as a three-bar fire.
        Peter Fonda, playing Valentine, is nicely centered in the unlikable
role of the affluent, weak, and shady L.A. businessman, but perhaps as
strong is the performance of Luis Guzmán (you probably don't know the name
but you'll recognize the face), who appears as another friend of Jenny's
who serves as Wilson's tourguide.
        By the time we're two-thirds into "The Limey," the plot has
deteriorated into a standard shoot-em-up (Valentine and his pre-pubescent
floozy have bolted for his beach house in Big Sur where his dubious
bodyguards, headed up by Barry Newman, start shooting each other; I was
reminded of "Another Stakeout").  Stamp, on the other hand, has taken to
doing pitiable stand-up routines emphasizing his grasp of Cockney rhyming
slang, such as his scene in the presence of a dumb-struck narc.  What was
Soderbergh thinking here?
        Perhaps he was thinking that Stamp deserves the kind of "second
coming" that John Travolta effected with "Pulp Fiction."  This longtime
British actor has slowly been working his way towards household name-dom in
the last few years with roles--not exactly starring ones--in films such as
"The Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert," "Bliss," "Bowfinger"
... oh, and perhaps you saw him in "Star Wars: Episode 1 - The Phantom
Menace" as Chancellor Valorum?  No super-significant roles--until now, that
is.
        With "The Limey," Stamp proves he's more than adequate in filling
those shoes.  It's just disappointing that everything around him--a rather
routine thriller at the best of times--is allowed to disintegrate into
humdrum in the process.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
        About two-thirds of the way into "Topsy-Turvy," the ambitious but
ultimately disappointing new film from Mike Leigh ("Secrets & Lies"),
there's a scene which hints at what might have been.  William Gilbert, the
librettist who formed a highly successful collaboration with composer
Arthur Sullivan, is rehearsing three of his cast members in a scene from
the latest comic opera by Gilbert and Sullivan.
        That's right: these are *the* Gilbert and Sullivan of Victorian
England, and Leigh's film is a bold departure from his grittily-realistic
social dramas that featured working class stiffs, not the toast of London's
West End.  What's notable about the scene in question, however, is that
Leigh is once again at the top of his game as a writer and director,
infusing the sequence with humor, awkwardness, repetition, silly accents,
sarcasm, disrespect, and much more besides.  Had the entire film been this
delightful, then moviegoers would be in for a treat with "Topsy-Turvy."
        Unfortunately, everything prior to this point, some two hours of
admittedly grand-looking screen time, has been dull as plainsong, tra la la
on one note.  There's a lot of talk, none of it particularly interesting,
and several colorful musical numbers shot unimaginatively from the Savoy
Theatre stalls.  But there's no real inspiration here, let alone drama.
Leigh himself appears to realize this, and crams enough sordid details of
his characters' private lives into the film's final 40 (of a cramp-inducing
160) minutes to pad out an entire season of "Melrose Place": Gilbert's
long-suffering wife Kitty longing for a child she can't have; Sullivan and
his mistress discussing her next abortion; the operetta's leading lady
hitting the sherry after performances, and another prominent member of the
company shooting up before.
        Bang bang bang bang--all four of these come at us right out of the
blue, eliciting what one Gilbert and Sullivan critic refers to as
"topsy-turvydom."
        Advance notices might lead you to believe that "Topsy-Turvy" is a
period piece about the making of "The Mikado" but it's not until, again,
well into the film that Lucy "Kitty" Gilbert (played by longtime Leigh
regular Leslie Manville) drags her husband along to a Japanese exhibition
where the inspiration for Gilbert and Sullivan's most popular work is
sparked.
        Leigh has spared no expense on the look and feel of the production
but what's missing is his trademark ability to get inside his characters.
Jim Broadbent and Allan Corduner play the musical pair with authority, but
we get little insight into what made their association so successful given
that most of the film is spent with them stalemated at a creative impasse.
        Leigh's last three films--"Career Girls," "Secrets & Lies," and
"Naked"--were all "best film of the year" selections for me.  "Topsy-Turvy"
represents a change of direction for the director and in so doing takes us
away from what Mike Leigh does best: kitchen sink-styled slices of life
highlighted by true depth of character.  This is a "Mikado" that is sadly
missing its Yum-Yum.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Peter Pan (1953)
        Every year around this time, or during the Christmas season, the Walt
Disney studios unleashes one of its treasures on the general public.  The
motivations behind this, no doubt, are to introduce an animated classic to
today's younger audience, an audience very different from that when the film
was originally released.
     Last year, audiences were treated to THE LADY AND THE TRAMP.  This year,
it's the turn of PETER PAN, a somewhat cruder film than that canine love story,
but one which manages to mix enough elements to keep the young in years -- as
well as the young of spirit -- happily entertained even after they leave they
theater.
     Based on James M. Barrie's beloved novel, PETER PAN is a familiar
coming-of-age tale to most people, made all the more so by the recent
rebroadcast of the 1960s television special starring Mary Martin.  This
animated version is probably the only time Peter Pan has actually been "played"
by a boy.
     Even though the film is under 90 minutes long, it does tend to get a
little draggy towards to the end.  This is due in part to the fact that, about
two thirds of the way through, the film peaks, only to peak again not long
afterwards.  Captain Hook battles Peter Pan (and that infernal ticking
crocodile) and it wouldn't be giving anything away to say that the good guy
triumphs.  They could have ended the film right there.  Instead, Hook makes off
with Wendy which sets up the second climax.  It's confusing for the younger set
and repetitious for the older ones.
     One cannot easily think about PETER PAN and not the songs which accompany
it.  For example "I Won't Grow Up" and "Never Smile at a Crocodile."  In this
animated version, the former is never heard and the latter only appears in an
instrumental form backing the toothy protagonist's occasional appearances.
     It's hard not to notice the backgrounds in the film.  These, such as the
pirate ship, Skull Rock and scenes of London, are exquisitely detailed.  The
characters themselves seem somewhat flat in comparison, often lacking in
detail.  They register emotion more by a widening of the eyes than any kind of
body language.
     But the film really takes off when it shows us glimpses of these
children's world from an airborne point of view.  The scene where the children
fly over to London, following the second star on the right, is quite
breathtaking, much like those IMAX films about flight they show at the National
Air and Space Museum in Washington.
     And shots of Never-Never Land, also from the air, are quite magical.  One,
of Captain Hook and first mate Smee in a boat with captive Indian Tiger Lilly,
is so beautifully animated that the water looks real.  Disney has always been
able to convincingly bring water to life in all his movies -- remember the storm
in BAMBI or the subterranean sequences in PINOCCHIO?
     If you can ignore some of the film's minor flaws, you should have a ripe
old time at the movies.  Thirty-six years after it was made, PETER PAN still
makes for a wonderfully colorful entertainment.


Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
        After "Nobody's Fool" (the low-key, unsullied Paul Newman drama
from 1994, not the Rosanna Arquette romantic "comedy" from 1986), I had
high hopes for "Twilight," the latest film to team director Robert Benton
with the man whose salad dressing has become a staple in my household.
        Benton's "Nobody's Fool" was a thoughtful, satisfying, small-town
drama which, along with Newman's typically fine work, was tempered by a
couple of standout performances from the unlikely guises of Bruce Willis
and Melanie Griffith.  In his first film since then, Benton has assembled
another first-rate cast headed up by Newman, Susan Sarandon, and Gene
Hackman.  But this small-time film noir, about an ex-cop turned private
investigator, turned retiree, turned drunk, is remarkably--and
disappointingly--ordinary.
        Sarandon and Hackman, who play fading movie stars Jack and
Catherine Ames, are as solid and dependable as you'd expect from two
performers with over fifty films each to their credit.  Newman, too, is as
every bit believable as Harry Ross, the ex-P.I. who lives with the Ames
family and for whom he does occasional odd jobs.  Jobs such as heading down
to Puerta Vallarta to retrieve their teenage daughter Mel, played awkwardly
and toplessly in the opening scenes by the up-and-coming Reese Witherspoon.
        "Finding her was the easy part" Harry intones in the film's noirish
voiceover and, as it turns out, he was right.  This transaction sets up a
boorish running gag about Harry being accidentally shot in the, ahem, inner
thigh.
        But it's his next gig (since nobody's fool enough to buy the
"retired" line) that lands him in even hotter water; Harry finds himself
the unwitting focus of a murder investigation.
        The film pours on the supporting cast like there's no tomorrow but
I took great delight in seeing Liev Schreiber (from "The Daytrippers"),
then M. Emmet Walsh, then Stockard Channing, then James Garner, then
Giancarlo Esposito, then John Spencer, all popping up and contributing to
the proceedings.  It's the proceedings that just aren't all that special.
        "Twilight" is a moody gumshoe tale that, although well acted,
doesn't really take off.  The plot's twists and turns, if you can call them
that, aren't particularly riveting, and the substance of the piece, while
tried and true, seems almost too tried and true.  It's always fun watching
Newman, Sarandon, and Hackman--even though they've all done better work
elsewhere--as well as the supporting players but the writing (by Benton and
Richard Russo) is, sadly, tepid and uninvolving.
        There's not enough mystery, intrigue, or depth to make the film
play like something from the pen of Dashiell Hammett.  And there's not
enough style or atmosphere for it to rank alongside such noir classics as
"Chinatown," "The Maltese Falcon" or yes, even "L.A. Confidential" (nor do
I believe it's even aiming that high).
        No, "Twilight" has much smaller aspirations.  Unfortunately small,
as it does here, often amounts to less.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
        Fans of the Coen Brothers--they made "Raising Arizona," "Barton
Fink," "Fargo," and "The Big Lebowski," among others--are going to eat up
their latest film, a Depression-era musical comedy/drama loosely based on
Homer's "The Odyssey."  Others may be less appreciative, or downright
flummoxed.  Like those films before it, "O Brother, Where Art Thou?"
showcases the Coen's absurdist humor, their amazing ear for dialogue and,
mostly, their unrivaled inventiveness.  This is not a film you can easily
categorize or compartmentalize.  It's unpredictable, it's unorthodox, it's
occasionally quite funny (but, oddly, not as funny as it should be or,
perhaps, thinks it is).  And that, my friend, is the overriding problem
with the film: it's all a bit too much.  You come away with the feeling
that the boys have gotten a little full of themselves.  Brilliant has
always been a tough act to follow, I suppose.  "O Brother, Where Art Thou?"
(the title comes from the Preston Sturges film "Sullivan's Travels" and,
not surprisingly, the Coen's latest feels like a Sturges comedy for much of
the time) follows the trials and tribulations of three chain gang escapees
in rural Mississippi, circa 1937.  Our heroes are played by George Clooney,
John Turturro, and Tim Blake Nelson.  Ulysses Everett McGill (Clooney) is
the smooth-talking one; he's obsessed with his hair and getting to $1.2
million's worth of buried bank notes before the state troopers catch him,
or the dam bursts.  Clooney is really the pivotal character in the film,
since Turturro and Nelson just act dumb and vacant around him, heightening
Clooney's Dapper Dan appeal.  The film, like Homer's lengthy poem, is
episodic, with the boys' journey interrupted by various colorful
characters.  There's a black guitar player they meet at a crossroads who's
just sold his soul to the devil (he wasn't using it) and with whom, as The
Soggy Bottom Boys, the foursome cut a hit record.  There's a one-eyed bible
salesman (played by Coen regular John Goodman); a gangster, Babyface
Nelson, who prefers to go by George; and a wife (Holly Hunter) with seven
kids in tow.  In addition, there are three seductive sirens washing clothes
in the river; a Governor (Charles Durning) whose campaign is being done-in
by a midget; and the Ku Klux Klan.  On top of all this, cinematographer
Roger Deakins makes this the yellowest film you have ever seen!  Nobody has
ever accused the Coens of going mainstream, and they're certainly not going
to start now.  However, like that traveling bluegrass guitarist Ulysses,
Pete, and Delmar encounter along the way, "O Brother, Where Art Thou?"
seems to be missing just one thing: a soul.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Fled (1996)
FLED is a composite of so many other, better movies that watching it is
like sitting through a montage of clips at the Oscars.  You know, the kind
they slap together to honor the cinematographer or costume designer or
actor of the moment.  While not an altogether unsatisfying experience, it
leaves the viewer yearning to see the originals instead.
The obvious video rental alternative in this case is Stanley Kramer's 1958
classic THE DEFIANT ONES, which starred Sidney Poitier and Tony Curtis as
black 'n' white chain gang escapees on the lam in the beautiful South.
Manacled together, Curtis and Poitier were a marriage made in Hollywood
heaven, with both actors receiving Academy Award nominations for their
pains.
This time out, the monochromatic stars are Laurence Fishburne and Stephen
Baldwin.  After escaping from a Georgia prison work detail, convicts Piper
(Fishburne) and Dodge (Baldwin) are hounded by a no-nonsense, by-the-books
U.S. Marshall (Robert John Burke), a local county sheriff (Will Patton),
and the mob (nameless, collarless toughs dressed in black) as they race to
recover an incriminating computer disk that could bring down the Cuban
mafia.
As a fast-paced actioner, FLED is competent but little more than routine.
Director Kevin Hooks seems to have seen a few too many John Woo movies, as
he strives for the same kind of explosive action sequences--in a hotel
room, in a massage parlor, in a domed amphitheater--with bullets exploding
through walls, pillows and people with ballistic artistry.  It might be
intended as homage but, like everything else about FLED, it only whets your
appetite for the real McCoy.
As a snappy, rough-and-tumble buddy flick, Hooks' film isn't exactly
explosive in the chemistry department.  Larry Fishburne chained to all four
Baldwin brothers in the "land of CNN and co'cola" ... now THAT would have
been a movie to talk about!
As it is, the film's attempts at humor are largely confined to the running
gag of Dodge's constant movie references: "Didn't you see 'The Fugitive'?"
he observes, for example, when Piper's instinct is to head for the state
line.  "The first thing Tommy Lee Jones did was to set up road blocks along
the border."  Subsequent self-referential allusions seemed to please the
captive audience but aren't any wittier.
Salma Hayek (DESPERADO) puts in an untaxing appearance as a lonely divorcee
who appears to welcome the intrusion of two estranged fugitives into her
house.  In fact, she gives Piper her phone number before he can even get
his 'cuffs off!
Executive Producer and Writer (always a bad sign) Preston A. Whitmore, II's
screenplay is a hodgepodge of themes and ideas borrowed--to be kind--from
THE FUGITIVE, "48 HOURS, MIDNIGHT RUN, and the LETHAL WEAPON series to name
but a few.  As a result, FLED is a movie whose whole is significantly less
than the sum of its parts.

Title
Review for Too Much Sleep (1997)
The most striking revelation about the indie comedy-drama "Too Much Sleep"
is just how much it highlights the schizophrenic tendencies of its
fledgling director, David Maquiling.
Now Maquiling, a graduate of NYU's Tisch School of the Arts, can set up a
shot well enough, from the sleepy suburban opener of a young boy playing
with his Tonka trucks in the grass, to a Deli-ful of old duffers who sit
around waxing idiotic.  But often the scenarios that play out within
Maquiling's excellent frame are scattershot and self-consciously told.
Likewise Maquiling has a perceptive eye for character; his film is
populated with colorful brethren indeed.  There's our hero, Jack Crawford
(Marc Palmieri), the security guard who's distracted by a beautiful woman
on a bus, loses his gun, and spends the rest of the movie trying to find it
in the heat and the hostility of northern New Jersey.  There's the
beautiful woman herself (Nicol Zanzarella), a slight, diaphanous creature
who appears as if from out of nowhere, haloed by the blazing midday sun.
There's a funny guy with "connections" who helps Jack retrieve his missing
piece (as played by Pasquale Gaeta, Eddie's a character with a capital C).
And then there's Jack's mother, just a voice off-screen.
These are all finely written roles, all shapely individuals in one way or
another.
But the director's ability to create unique characterizations is undone by
his failure to cast competent performers in the roles; there's amateurism
run rampant here I'm afraid.  A lot is asked of Palmieri and frankly he
doesn't have the presence to be on-screen as long as he is (and this is a
short movie, relatively speaking: 86 minute's worth).  Kate (Zanzarella) is
really only asked to look good and with that she complies.  Gaeta is
amusing though.  He's no De Niro (although a lot of the time he sounds like
him) and his constant profanity--"if you pardon my profanity"--soon
develops a comforting, lyrical quality.  He's clearly the best of the bunch
and well utilized by the director.  Think Joe Pesci's funny uncle.
Maquiling, too, has an ear for dialogue.  Unfortunately it's a tone-deaf
one for the most part.  He can create manic, "After Hours"-styled
pandemoniums populated by complex and witty individuals but he has the
hardest time coming up with a line of dialogue that doesn't sound forced or
just plain awkward.  At times he seems to be trying too hard.  Some
improvisation might have helped the film considerably rather than having
the actors constantly forced to reel off the director's stilted conversations.
You would think that this schizophrenic style--everything coming together
at one point, everything falling apart the next--would tend to even itself
out after a while but it doesn't.  Both scenarios are frustrating because
they speak to what might have been.  "Too Much Sleep" has potential written
all over it; Maquiling knows what he's about and, with a little maturation
in the writing and casting departments, he's going to impress soon enough.
Not this time though.  "Too Much Sleep" is an unsatisfying mix that just
leaves one feeling overtired.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Cliffhanger (1993)
     CLIFFHANGER is everything you'd expect from a summer blockbuster
starring Sylvester Stallone--big, predictable, and dumb as houses.
     As action pictures go, CLIFFHANGER has its fair share of
white-knuckled, sweat-inducing sequences, and those sequences aren't
bad.  But when Sly isn't falling off a cliff, or perched high atop a
precipice, or flexing his muscles in general ... well, the movie's just
plain dull.  Perhaps Stallone's stunt double would have been better
employed in the acting department!
     The plot, for want of a better word, is your standard
Hero-Who-Has-to-Prove-Himself story.  Park ranger and expert
mountaineer Gabe Walker (Stallone) goes into seclusion after being
involved in a fatal, botched rescue attempt, but is lured out of
"retirement" when a government plane carrying $100 million in cold
currency goes down in the Colorado Rockies.
     Unbeknownst to our fearless rescue ranger, it wasn't the storm
that brought the plane down.  It's been skyjacked by a ruthless gang of
politically incorrect anarchists, led by international crackpot Qualen
(John Lithgow, in danger of playing one psycho too many).  Lithgow does
seem to be having some fun with this role; his Qualen is a malevolent,
single-entendre quipping maniac, with a stock generic European accent.
It's a shame the writers give him some of the flattest one-liners
since, well, Stallone's last movie (the addle-brained STOP! OR MY MOM
WILL SHOOT).
     Qualen's bunch of assorted heavies get more than they bargained
for when they force Walker to "fetch" the scattered suitcases of
booty.  Aided and abetted by ex-partner Hal Tucker (the familiar-faced
William Rooker), Walker goes mano-a-mano with the bickering thugs, a
sort of man-against- the-mountain in reverse.  Tucker's still smarting
over a hand-holding incident between his ex-girlfriend and Walker, so
there's interpersonal tension and then some!
     Walker's ex-girlfriend--there are a lot of ex's in this
movie--Jessie Deighan is played by TV's Janine Turner (NORTHERN
EXPOSURE).  Her emotional range in this film is severely untested; she
huffs and puffs up the mountainside, screeches in a cave full of
vampire bats (in one of CLIFFHANGER'S several allusions to the INDIANA
JONES movies), and whines in a ho-hum "Don't hog all the guilt for
yourself, spread it around some" head-to-head with Stallone that
detracts from all that pretty scenery.
     Bringing up the rear is the craggy-faced Ralph Waite (resurrected
from TV's THE WALTONS) who plays Frank, a forest ranger with a wacky
artistic bent.  Further comic relief is provided by a couple of
surfer-dude base jumpers, whose luck you just know will run out.
     Trevor Jones' overblown score is virtually identical to his
collaboration on last year's THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, give or take a
chord.  It's fine when the visuals comprise grand, sweeping shots of
the majestic Italian Dolomites (doubling for the Rocky Mountains), but
its oft-repeated theme grows tiresome during some of the film's less
cinematic scenes.
     Director Renny Harlin (DIE HARD 2) is in familiar terrain here,
but Stallone's larger-than-life Gabe Walker is no John McClane (Bruce
Willis moves his mouth when he speaks, for starters).  As expected, the
punch- drunk Stallone gets the crap kicked out of him, but barely lets
out a grunt (saving those for the film's more dialogue-bound moments
instead). After all, anyone who can survive being smashed into a cliff
face by the weight of a disabled helicopter and still work in a
one-liner can't be bothered by a little internal bleeding.
     All this adds up to a very tired formula that cries out for a
boost of adrenaline, but co-writer Stallone can contribute only
testosterone.  Will the two rangers battle the bad guys and make up by
the film's conclusion?  Will Jessie be suitably impressed by Gabe's
rock climbing skills?  Will Gabe ever find it in his heart to forgive
himself?  Will the audience wish they'd paid matinee prices instead?
     This movie isn't even worth trashing.  It's Sly Stallone up a
mountain with bad guys.  But then what else did you expect?  For all
its spectacular aerial footage and gravity-defying stunt work,
CLIFFHANGER is a snowjob of a movie that amounts to nothing more than
thin peaks.


Title
Review for Mansfield Park (1999)
        "Emma."  "Persuasion."  "Pride and Prejudice."  "Sense and
Sensibility."
        Moviedom's love affair with the work of Jane Austen has never been
more apparent than in the last several years.  And I'm not just talking
major motion pictures here; the Arts & Entertainment cable network has been
broadcasting an equal amount of made-for-British-television Austen fare for
months.
        Now we have "Mansfield Park" to continue the illustrious tradition,
a film inspired by Austen's journals, letters, and a tome of intimidating
length that bears the same name.  While not a strict adaptation of the
novel--the talent behind this new production has chosen to give "Mansfield
Park"'s heroine, Fanny Price, a contemporary air and heightened the
Antiguan slave trade subtext--the film nonetheless showcases Austen's
proficiency in developing characters so rich and vital you'll want to spend
many more hours in their collective company.
        As Fanny Price, Frances O'Connor is remarkable (and she doesn't
even get top billing!).  A young woman with a quick wit and a fine command
of the written and spoken word (some would say she possesses "a man's
intellect"), Fanny is shipped at an early age from her poverty-stricken
dockside home to the dreary elegance of Mansfield Park, an imposing
Georgian estate presided over by her wealthy uncle, the implacable Sir
Thomas Bertram.  Sir Thomas is played by the distinguished English
playwright Harold Pinter, whose screenwriting credits include "The
Go-Between," "Betrayal," and "The French Lieutenant's Woman."
        At Mansfield Park, Fanny is forced to endure a life little better
than a scullery maid, condescendingly treated by one Mrs. Norris (Sheila
Gish).  During her tenure there, Fanny witnesses various cousins, friends,
and neighbors falling in and out of love with each other--and herself--at
the drop of a handkerchief.
        Not only has Canadian writer/director Patricia Rozema ("I've Heard
the Mermaids Singing") retained all of Austen's feel and flair for the
world of 1806, but she has beautifully recreated the language that gives
the author's writings such energy.  The entire cast, especially Embeth
Davidtz (who does get top billing) as the shallow, worldly Mary Crawford,
Alessandro Nivola as her rakish brother Henry, and Jonny Lee Miller as
Fanny's cousin and confidante Edmund Bertram, is marvelous and the range of
emotions they traverse in two short hours is astonishing.
        Like all of Austen's works, "Mansfield Park" is drawn from the
author's own life experiences, a life spent almost entirely within her own
family circle of struggling country parsons, rich fools, eligible fops, and
young ladies itching to come out into society.  By continuing, unbendingly,
to write within that narrow world view she has given us great literature--a
precise and complex view of human nature wrapped in incisive humor, social
and moral consequence, and enduring style.
        With its gorgeous cinematography (often shot through leaded panes
of glass that haven't seen Windex in weeks), lovely muted score, and
sure-footed performances, especially by Frances O'Connor, Patricia Rozema's
"Mansfield Park" sets a new standard for adaptations of Jane Austen's work.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
        Whether you once worshipped at the altar of KISS, King Crimson, or
the Kinks, "Detroit Rock City" is the kind of movie that takes you back to
a time when music came on twelve-inch "long playing" records and grown-ups,
not Gene Simmons or Alice Cooper or Ozzy Osbourne, were the devil.
        This unashamedly nostalgic trip back to the Seventies features the
kind of songs you cranked up on your turntable until the neighbors called
the cops.  It features parents who just don't understand, including the
terrific Lin Shaye as a hyper-religious mother who torches her son's KISS
tickets while proclaiming the rockers to be Knights in Satan's Service.
        And, most gratifyingly, it features four young men--Edward Furlong,
Giuseppe Andrews, James DeBello and, especially, Sam Huntington--who are
the tops when it comes to portraying the angst, vulgarity, and pleasure of
rebellious teens.
        Adam Rifkin's film has an undeniable charm, from the time our
hapless KISS-happy quartet first see their tickets go up in flames to when,
triumphantly, they fulfill their dream of seeing their heroes performing
live on stage.  (Did Gene Simmons really have that flap of skin surgically
removed from the underside of his tongue?)  Teenage boys, past and present,
may relate more closely to the film than most ("borrowing" Mom's Volvo,
losing one's virginity in a confessional box, falling into a hot tub full
of naked groupies, etc.), but there's plenty here for others to enjoy too.
        Nicest of all is that "Detroit Rock City," for all of the anarchy
inherent in its subject matter, is a rather sweet little film.  It's far
from perfect but, for a film that claims to "kiss the rules goodbye,"
surprisingly amiable.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
        Like a filet mignon served rare, "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is an
exquisite sensory experience that's cold at the center.
        Anthony Minghella's film (he made "The English Patient") is the
second adaptation of Patricia Highsmith's novel; the first, a 1960 French
feature starring '50's heartthrob Alain Delon, was called "Plein Soleil"
("Purple Noon").  As time and circumstance would have it, the films share
some impressive strengths: they're intensely rich and colorful, feature an
impressive cast (this one stars Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Cate
Blanchett, and Jude Law), and provide dazzling entertainment for a solid
couple of hours.
        However, "The Talented Mr. Ripley" often seems like a completely
different motion picture from "Purple Noon," since Minghella has developed
themes and characterizations not pursued in René Clément's original.
        Damon plays the talented Tom Ripley, a sometime pianist, oft-time
bathroom attendant, and full-time sociopath.  Early in the film, shipping
magnate Herbert Greenleaf (James Rebhorn, soon to be seen as the
prosecuting attorney in "Snow Falling on Cedars") mistakes Tom for a friend
of his errant son Dickie, currently living the playboy life on the Italian
Riviera.  Greenleaf, quite taken with Tom, makes him an offer he can't
refuse: bring Dickie back to New York for the princely sum of $1,000.
        In the Mediterranean resort of Mongibello, Tom quickly insinuates
himself into the lives of Dickie and his classically bland fiancée Marge
(Paltrow).  He wears Dickie's clothes, drinks Dickie's champagne, spends
Dickie's money.  But when Dickie grows tired of Tom, the talented Mr.
Ripley will stop at nothing to protect what--and whom--he has worked to
become.
        Damon and Law are as sun-drenched and handsome as the surrounding
topography, yet Paltrow is oddly graceless.  She really only impresses the
once, the lump-in-the-throat "I don't believe a single word you've said"
scene that's in the prevalent trailers.  Blanchett is much more interesting
as Meredith Logue, a slightly naďve socialite who keeps turning up in the
last places Tom wants to see her.
        Whereas I cannot fault "The Talented Mr. Ripley" in terms of its
technical accomplishments or star power, that cold center left me feeling a
little detached.  These are beautiful people for sure, but their
cold-heartedness left me more with a craving for hamburger than for prime
steak.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
        A follow-up to Disney's live-action "101 Dalmatians" that's better,
more entertaining than the first?  Just as unlikely.
        With "102 Dalmatians," the Disney studios have proven that when it
comes to going to the dogs, more is definitely *not* the merrier.
        1996's "101 Dalmatians" certainly wasn't the greatest movie-going
experience of all time, but it did feature Glenn Close in an outrageous,
larger-than-life performance.  In addition, we had two amiable leads in the
form of Jeff Daniels and Joely Richardson, and lots and lots of adorable
spotted puppies.  This time around there seem to be fewer puppies on the
screen, and Close's facial and physical gyrations are starting to feel as
old as the 53-year-old actress under that startling black and white wig of
hers.  But that's only half the problem with Kevin Lima's laborious film.
        What makes "102 Dalmatians" such a collosal bore is its
embarrassing attempts at humor (here almost single-handedly foisted on a
wisecracking macaw who thinks he's a dog, voiced by Eric Idle), its rabid
plotlessness (Cruella goes after puppies again; winds up in goo again) and
most of all, the incredibly wooden actors who plays the romantic "heroes"
of the piece, a Welshman named Ioan Gruffudd and the blander-than-bland
Alice Evans as a parole officer named Chloë.  Gruffudd is cute and
harmless, perhaps, but Evans can't even aspire to that.  The dogs upstage
them both, of course, but in the case of Evans, even Close's split ends are
more animated.
        Bad acting, however, seems to be a requirement for this sequel,
since Gérard Depardieu shows up as a French furrier with a haircut like
Robert De Niro's in "Men of Honor."  Jean Pierre Le Pelt is a flamboyant
fashion designer with a penchant for fine furs and Depardieu's over-the-top
antics mimic those of the campy Close flail for flail, and wail for wail.
France's most popular export besides brie has long since turned into a
caricature of himself, and in "102 Dalmatians" the producers milk that
realization for all it's worth--Le Pelt likes to refer to the furry little
critters as "poopies," par example (and ad nauseum).
        The finesses of the script (attributed to four screenwriters no
less, and far removed from anything Dodie Smith ever dreamed up) are
quickly dispensed with, since all it takes for a paroled Cruella to be
shaken from her years of successful aversion therapy in the slammer is the
tolling of Big Ben (?).  That done, it's back to the mansion to roll around
in her heretofore off-limits sables and minks and a plan to skin those
little dahlings for the sake of a hooded designer gown.
        The dogs are pretty cute--try making a puppy look otherwise--but
that's pretty much all they are.  There's always the feeling that there's a
trainer off in the wings, coaxing the dogs to open doors, or pick up their
food bowls in unison, or pop a tape into the videocasette recorder.  Savvy
holiday goers should skip "102 Dalmatians" and pop the original 1961
animated classic into *their* VCRs instead.  It's one Dalmatian less, but
101% more satisfying.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
        Anyone unconvinced of Paul Thomas Anderson's talent following the
critical success of "Boogie Nights" (the film which put Mark Wahlberg's
"talent" on the map) need look no further than his latest film, "Magnolia."
        "Magnolia" stars Julianne Moore, William H. Macy, John C. Reilly,
Melora Walters, Philip Seymour Hoffman, and Philip Baker Hall, all of whom
appeared in "Boogie Nights."  Utilizing a stock company of repertory
regulars is an approach employed by the likes of Robert Altman and Alan
Rudolph, and it works well for Anderson too; every single member of his
ensemble delights in profound and significant ways.  "Magnolia" also stars
Jason Robards and Tom Cruise, and they complement Anderson's veterans
extremely nicely.
        In a story of intersecting lives and emotions, Robards is bed
ridden and dying of cancer, Moore is his emotional wreck of a trophy wife
who's finally learned to love him, and Hoffman is his sensitive and
beleaguered nurse.  Cruise, in a dynamic performance, plays a misogynistic
motivational speaker with turbulent ties to the dying man.  In parallel
story threads, Reilly is a San Fernando Valley cop who falls for the
coke-addicted daughter (Walters) of a TV game show host (Hall), and Macy
appears as a former game show prodigy with love in his heart for a
tinsel-toothed barkeep.
        As you can probably tell from these brief character descriptions,
"Magnolia" is structured more as a series of vignettes than a traditional
central narrative yet many of these disparate storylines come together very
untraditionally in the film's breathtaking final act.  The film is a little
over three hours long but you'd never know it; the minutes simply fly by.
        Anderson, some say an upstart of a filmmaker at 29, wrote as well
as directed "Magnolia," yet the film plays out with the sophistication and
maturity of someone beyond his years.  Since "Magnolia" was supposedly
inspired by a lyric from an Aimee Mann song, it makes perfect sense that
Anderson would employ the talents of the former 'Til Tuesday lead singer,
whose melancholy refrains are featured predominantly on the film's
soundtrack.  That soundtrack also features impressive music by Jon Brion
(Anderson's "Hard Eight").  His insistent score is especially effective in
its ability to heighten passions, pulling the characters together with its
urgent layering across scenes.
        In addition to drawing superlative performances from his cast,
Anderson takes two major risks in the film, sequences so against the grain
you'd expect some conventional bigwig to have exorcised them from the final
cut.  The fact that they meld perfectly with the escalating human drama
only further substantiates Anderson's skill as a writer and director of
unique and remarkable vision.
        Unfortunately, "Magnolia" was released in Philadelphia one week too
late to be included on my list of outstanding films of 1999, but even this
early in the new year I can guarantee it will make it onto my best films of
2000 list.  As a candidate for the best film of the year, it's gonna be a
tough act to beat.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
It will come as no surprise to fans of Elvis Costello that his 
beautifully expressed observation that "writing about music is like 
dancing about architecture" has served as inspiration for a motion 
picture.
In writer/director Willard Carroll's articulate "Playing by Heart" (a 
film that was originally titled "Dancing About Architecture"), talking 
about love is said to be as foolish a pastime.  Yet this early assertion 
paves the way for an examination of how people find love, how others 
hang onto it, and how some are forced to let it go.
The city of Los Angeles forms the backdrop for an ensemble piece that 
in many ways resembles Alan Rudolph's "Welcome to L.A."  While "Playing 
by Heart" doesn't quite capture the mood and seductive atmosphere of 
Rudolph's film, it makes for an interesting companion piece in its 
observations about human interactions.
In "Welcome to L.A.," Richard Baskin's songs were woven conspicuously 
into the framework of the film; here, John Barry's soft and fragmented 
score is pretty much relegated to the background, providing a delicate 
dotting of the I's and crossing of the T's after the actors have spoken 
their often-wordy piece.  The writing isn't always there--either Carroll 
has too many characters, or too many points he wants to make--but for 
every interchange of languid dialogue there's a scene that's 
surprisingly potent.
Billed as a romantic comedy with a twist, the film actually serves up a 
number of twists along the way, including the print ads' tip-off that 
"these three couples are about to come together in an unexpected way..."
Joan and Keenan meet at a rave.  Joan is vivacious and relentless in 
her pursuits; Keenan is restrained and consistent in his brush-offs.  
This makes Joan crazy for him.  The couple are played by Angelina Jolie 
(Jon Voight's daughter) and Ryan Phillippe, last seen clubbing in "54."  
Although Keenan "doesn't date," they wind up at a midnight screening of 
"The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" and that alone is almost reason enough to 
recommend "Playing by Heart."
After 40 years of marriage, Hannah (played by Gena Rowlands) discovers 
her husband Paul (Sean Connery) with a souvenir of a 25-year-old love 
affair.  These veteran performers are typically solid, but it's a pity 
they're given some of the film's weakest lines.
And then there's Meredith (Gillian Anderson of "The X-Files") and Trent 
(Jon Stewart).  A divorced theater director, Meredith is better at 
orchestrating other people's lives than she is her own.  Divorced 
himself, Trent simply wants to buy her dinner, but Meredith deplores the 
"contrived artificiality" of the dating scene.  Unfortunately Anderson's 
strongest characteristic is an annoying forelock which she's constantly 
pushing out of her face.
Padding out the film (not that it needed any padding) are an adulterous 
couple played by Madeleine Stowe and "E.R."'s Anthony Edwards; a 
self-absorbed alcoholic (Dennis Quaid) who drifts from cocktail bar to 
cocktail bar; and a mother tending to her dying son (Ellen Burstyn and 
Jay Mohr).
Pets, martinis, and a common jargon help tie the knotty relationships 
together.
Strangely enough, Jolie and Phillippe fair far better than "Playing by 
Heart"'s more seasoned professionals.  Jolie oozes a brash confidence 
and Phillippe is every bit her match in a moodier, more introspective 
performance.  It's difficult to develop a relationship to a convincing 
"I love you" climax in under two hours, even in a VW bug in the rain, 
but it's a tribute to Jolie and Phillippe that when they share that 
conviction, you believe it.


Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
        First let me dispense the answers to those burning questions which
have been dogging you for weeks now.
        Yes, "Music of the Heart" is directed by Wes Craven, the veteran
shockmeister responsible for over 20 horror films including such
blockbusters as the "Nightmare on Elm Street" and "Scream" series ("Scream
3," incidentally, is due out February 4th).  "Music of the Heart," although
(unintentionally) scary at times, is his first radical departure from the
genre.
        Yes, Meryl Streep wasn't the original choice to play Roberta
Guaspari, the substitute teacher who revitalized an East Harlem public
school and many of its students with her successful violin program (when no
one wanted one) and the subject of Craven's new film.  Madonna was the
director's first pick, but she bailed out early citing "creative
differences."
        And yes, singer Gloria Estefan makes her acting debut in the film
but blink and you'll miss her.  Ms. Estefan spends more time nibbling on a
carrot than she does acting, and her name up there alongside Streep's,
Aidan Quinn's, and Angela Bassett's is like saying Kevin Costner starred in
"The Big Chill."
        If the storyline sounds at all familiar to you (and you'd be in the
minority if it does), then that's because Roberta's success story was
profiled in an OscarŽ-nominated documentary from 1996 entitled "Small
Wonders."  I suspect few people saw that film, but someone clearly felt
that this story was interesting enough to turn it into a large-scale
Hollywood product with brand-name stars and a new song by Gloria to send
the Miami Sound Machine groupies skipping off to Tower Records after the
show.
        "Let's dramatize it" someone must have said after seeing "Small
Wonders."  Unfortunately they did everything but.
        The main problem with "Music of the Heart" is that it's devoid of
drama, making it an extremely difficult film to pigeonhole.  Nothing much
really happens, no one tries to prevent it from happening, and when it does
happen it's not very interesting anyway.
        Streep, as you'd expect, is pretty good in the role, here passing
on her usual accent-of-the-week.  Streep's messy perm and bloodshot eyes
aren't exactly flattering to Ms. Guaspari, but I suspect they're closer to
the real Roberta than anything Madonna might have thrown her way.  Quinn,
on the other hand, seems strangely out of whack (he provides Roberta with
the obligatory love interest, is sent packing halfway through the film, and
then, surprise surprise, reappears for the big Carnegie Hall finale).  And
it's a pity to see the skilled Angela Bassett ("How Stella Got Her Groove
Back," "Waiting to Exhale") stuck in a stock high school principal role.
        That big Carnegie Hall fiddlefest, by the way, is shot with an
incredible lack of flair by someone clearly more comfortable orchestrating
decapitations and disembowelments.  Even the presence of violin greats
Isaac Stern and Itzhak Perlman can't pep it up any.
        On the plus side, the kids who learn about the finer points of a
violin bow have real charisma and with a little more drama than "Sorry, I
forgot my violin today Miss Guaspari," "Music of the Heart" might have
scored some much-needed points.  Instead, it's a poor choice for Craven, an
odd choice for Estefan, and a particularly good choice for Madonna.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
In 1990, no longer content performing all of his own stunts, diminutive
Hong Kong martial arts star Jackie Chan took another turn at co-writing and
directing one of his own features, "The Armor of God II."  Retitled and
re-released as "Operation Condor," it's the third Jackie Chan movie to
reach these shores in the past six months (following "Jackie Chan's First
Strike" and the reissued "Supercop"), and it's a decision that ultimately
proves you *can* have too much of a good thing.
Chan fans (Chan-atics?) can tell you that the plots of his movies are the
least interesting elements.  Fortunately, the plot of "Operation Condor" is
a relatively simple one: Jackie battles bad guys in search of some Nazi
gold.  This leaves plenty of room for what makes a Jackie Chan film worth
watching: lots of spirited, high-kicking action, a little low-brow comedy,
and plenty of stunts.  In "Operation Condor," Chan the director,
recognizing his marketability as a lovable action star, gives us a
globe-trotting slapstick adventure peppered with chopsocky action
sequences, rather than the reverse.
There's a superfluous James Bondian pre-credit sequence in which
Aboriginal-like cave dwellers with picket fences on their heads chase
Jackie after he drinks their holy water.  "Holy?"
There's a shoot-out in a Moroccan hotel that goes on for days, with
Jackie's demure, towel-wrapped co-operative, Ada (Carol Cheng) fighting for
her modesty.  It's a testament to the film's lunacy that the worst thing
that happens to her is that it finally comes off.
And there's a finale in an underground German munitions store that makes
full use of a huge fan and some wind tunnel technical effects that grow
more jaw-droppingly ridiculous by the minute.  It's as if Chan's goofy grin
isn't enough; he had to subject it to some face-changing G-forces as well.
Still, the stunts and set pieces, no matter how exhausting, are pretty
amazing as usual.  Chan rides a motorcycle like it's an extension of
himself, this time crashing through a banana warehouse in an attempt to
out-maneuver his adversaries.  The culminating stunt, when he leaps from
the harbor-bound cycle onto a bale of cargo being loaded onto a ship, is
almost lost in the mayhem.  Fortunately Chan photographs it from two
different angles, and leaves both shots in the film!  With the agility of a
springbok, Chan traverses a 10-foot high wall with an effortless, Z-shaped
leap, yet the customary end-credit outtakes illustrate just how difficult
it is to nail the landing.  And to be fair, there are some very funny bits
in and among the frenetic fisticuffs, as when Jackie batters a bad guy who
is holding Ada in front of him as a shield.
The obligatory babe role is played by not one, but three!, winsome
charmers.  The aforementioned Ada.  A Brigitte Nielsen-styled blonde (Eva
Cobo DeGarcia), who happens to be the grand-daughter of the German officer
who buried the hoard of bullion at the end of the war.  And a dum-dum with
a pet scorpion called Ding Ding, played by a squeaky Shoko Ikeda.  By the
time these bubbleheads form an alliance and start beating up on the doltish
opposition, it's like watching a female version of the Three Stooges.
The film's reworked title, by the way, is every bit as meaningless as the
plot.  Ada very briefly refers to Jackie as "Condor" during the mission's
initial setup--blink and you'll miss it--but for all the thought that went
into that decision the movie could have gone by "Operation White-Throated
Grebe."  In "Operation Condor," as it turned out, Jackie's motto is "Expect
the worst.  Hope for the best."  While this principle holds true for almost
any Jackie Chan movie, his latest effort falls precariously somewhere in
between.

Title
Review for Naked Gun 2 1/2: The Smell of Fear, The (1991)
     From the brother of the director of GHOST comes THE NAKED GUN 2
1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR, a movie two-and-a-half times funnier than last
summer's paranormal blockbuster, an uproariously daffy (if equally
para-normal) follow-up to the 1988 comedy, THE NAKED GUN: FROM THE FILES
OF POLICE SQUAD!
     And the good news is that THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR"
is just as dumb, just as silly ... and just as hilarious as its
predecessor.
     Based on an short-lived TV series (one that CBS is slated to
re-broadcast later this month), THE NAKED GUN: FROM THE FILES OF POLICE
SQUAD! sent up the police/crime drama to the point of idiocy.  Now,
with THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR, that lunatic tradition is
continued, with Frank Drebin (Leslie Nielsen), the soft-boiled Police
Lieutenant with the deadpan delivery, embroiled in an irrelevant plot
about some political campaign for clean energy.  
     Watching the inept, monosyllabic Drebin blunder his way through
this nonsense is a hoot and a half.  It's an inspired and goofball turn
by Nielsen.
     The original film wound up with Drebin finding himself in a
compromising position with the Queen of England.  It seems only fitting,
therefore, that the sequel would have a go at this nation's President
and First Lady.  Most people wouldn't consider Barbara Bush a natural
stooge, but in THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR, she takes it on
the chin -- literally -- on more than one occasion.
     Priscilla Presley once again plays Jane Spenser, the object of
Drebin's affections.  "She has the kind of body that could melt a cheese
sandwich from across the room," he observes, in typical police melodrama
voice-over.  "With the kind of breasts that say, 'Hey - look at me!'"
Presley is the straightest thing in the film, and it's nice to see her
finally finding her niche.
     Robert Goulet plays Quentin Hapsburg, an oily, David Niven-esque rogue with
designs on the curvaceous Jane.  Although THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: The Smell
of Fear" is far from being brilliantly conceived, the way in which Hapsburg
buys the farm is, and is worth the price of admission alone.
     That earlier reference to GHOST, of course, is more than just
familial.   There can be few people who haven't yet seen the film's
central "homage" to director Jerry Zucker's 1990 tearjerker, and I won't
spoil it for those who haven't.  Suffice it to say the obligatory stock
footage of trains going into tunnels and oil wells erupting has never
been funnier.  And I was humming "Unchained Melody" days after seeing
this movie, which is more than I can say for GHOST.
     Another cleverly constructed scene is the one in which Drebin
visits a lounge called "The Blue Note," a morose and dimly lit hangout
frequented by manic depressives, with its wall-to-wall paintings of the
Hindenburg, Titanic and other national disasters.  When Drebin orders
the strongest thing they have, a body builder shows up.  So when he
settles instead for a Black Russian, the audience groans in
anticipation.  But the waiter's ahead of us and, facing the camera,
shrewdly shakes his head.
     Similarly, when one of the bad guys is spotted in Washington,
D.C.'s red light district, Drebin questions his motivations.  "Sex,
Frank?" suggests Captain Ed Hocken (George Kennedy, in a reprise of his
role).  Drebin appears to contemplate the statement for a while and then
declines the "offer" with a "No.  Not right now, Ed."
     As you can tell, the impetus behind these films -- which began in
1980 with AIRPLANE! -- is to cram as many sight gags and corny
one-liners as possible into ninety minutes.  In that film, producers
Zucker, Abrahams and Zucker's machine gun scattering of belly laughs
were constant and hysterical, and the film set the pattern for future
comedic outings, such as the under-appreciated TOP SECRET!
     Of course, with this many jokes-per-minute, not all of them can
work.  But those that do are consistently big enough to sustain you
throughout the few that don't.
     A minor criticism with THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR is
the way in which characters often react to an on-screen witticism by
moving their eyes from side to side in bewilderment.  A more distracted
approach, with no observed response to the joke, might have been
funnier.  But why carp?
     When asked why the sub-title "The Smell of Fear," director David Zucker
responds "It just sounded funny."  That thinking appears to be what fires
THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2" -- go for the quick laugh fast.
     From the wild ride (with an equally wild conclusion) of the opening
credits to the trumped up finale, it's a film overflowing with cheap,
stupid and side-splittingly funny jokes that will make even the most
hardened criminal crack a smile.

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
        Like so many of the great Robert Altman films--"Nashville," "The
Player," "Short Cuts"--and even some of his not-so-memorable ones
("Pręt-ŕ-Porter"), "Cookie's Fortune" is a character-driven drama that
engages the viewer through the slowly unfolding interactions of its
multiple leading players.
        Altman's latest round robin relies a little too heavily on plot,
plus some of the characterizations are too eccentric for their own good.
But even a minor Altman movie challenges an audience in a way few Hollywood
products can.
        The setting of Cookie's Fortune is the sleepy Southern hamlet of
Holly Springs.  Here, the local police force spend more time fishing--or
talking about fishing--than they do citing parking violations, the most
serious crime in town.  But that's about to change.
        The Grande Dame of Holly Springs is an aging matriarch called
Jewell Mae Orcutt, known to everyone as Cookie.  Recently widowed, Cookie
is so starved of her husband's company and affection that she decides to
join him in the afterlife via a pistol shot to the head.  Upon discovering
the body, Cookie's nieces Camille and Cora decide to disguise the suicide
as a murder, not simply to eliminate any chance of a scandal blackening the
family name, but to make a bid for the sizable ancestral estate.
        As Cookie, veteran actress Patricia Neal ("Hud") heads Altman's
cast of keen ensemble players.  Whereas Neal is convincing in the role, her
character outplays her welcome early on.  Cookie moves slower than
molasses, all the time ruminating over her recent loss.  When the gunshot
comes, it's a relief to all.
        Charles Dutton, as Cookie's hired hand and confidante, fairs much
better.  As Willis, Dutton evokes a sympathetic character of immensely
human proportions.  He's the kind of person who "borrows" a half pint of
bourbon from the local bar only to return a fresh bottle, surreptitiously,
the next day.  When he's accused of the murder (because his are the only
fingerprints besides Cookie's found in the house), even the cops don't
believe it.  Fortunately for them, Willis proves a game Scrabble opponent.
        Glenn Close (in the role of Camille) continues her recent trend of
wide-eyed, melodramatic characters.  When Camille is not crossing police
lines with gay abandon, she's directing the local congregation in an
adaptation of Salomé.  Julianne Moore, wearing little if any makeup, is
oddly effective as the impotent Cora.  Rounding out the cast is Altman
favorite (although I still haven't figured out why) Lyle Lovett, who plays
the same creepy oddball he played in "Pręt-ŕ-Porter" and "Short Cuts."  Liv
Tyler is the tomboyish Emma, and Chris O'Donnell plays the young cop who
has the hots for her.
        Altman doesn't quite know when to call it quits, and that twanging
guitar constantly reminding us of where we are soon grows tiresome.  But
along the way we're treated to some assured performances, stunning
cinematography, and exchanges of wonderfully wistful dialogue courtesy
former script supervisor Anne Rapp.
        "Cookie's Fortune" might not be among Altman's best works, but it's
another rich and intriguing film from this most creative of filmmakers.

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
        Savage, perceptive, and brutally funny, "Your Friends & Neighbors"
is a perfect antidote for anyone considering cheating on his or her partner.
        Continuing where he left of with last year's "In the Company of
Men," writer/director Neil LaBute has crafted another unsettling film in
which his characters say the kinds of things many of us would be hard
pressed to admit to even thinking.
        Jerry and Terri, although names seem inconsequential in "Your
Friends & Neighbors," are live-in lovers whose problems in the bedroom set
the film's wheels of deceit in motion.  Jerry (Ben Stiller) likes to talk
during sex, but it affects Terri's concentration.  Terri is played by
Catherine Keener, who finally gets the neurotic anger bit right.
        Jerry teaches theater to college students but occupations, too,
appear to count for little in this film (for what it's worth, Terri writes
advertising copy for the sides of tampon boxes--surely only a man could
have come up with that?).  The on-the-outs couple get together with some
old married friends of theirs, Barry and Mary, played by "Men"'s Aaron
Eckhart and "Heat"'s Amy Brenneman, who are experiencing some sexual
dissatisfaction of their own.  They've barely finished with dessert when
Jerry secretly asks Mary out on a date.  And it's not exactly for coffee.
        Barry likes to hang with his misogynistic friend Cary (Jason Patric
in a brilliant performance of such psychological cruelty it'll make your
skin crawl).  The two men compare notes by boasting about their sexual
exploits at, where else, the health club.  Jerry sometimes hangs out with
them too, but it's pretty obvious he doesn't care for Cary's misplaced
machismo.
        Nastassja Kinski (playing an artist's assistant called Cheri)
rounds out the sexually suspect sextet.  Along with falling for one of the
film's fivesome, she's a key player in a recurring gallery motif that
empirically strips social intercourse down to its most mundane roots.
        Although the entire cast is laudable, Patric is a standout.  In a
particularly uncomfortable episode, the camera slowly zooms in on him
delivering a scene-stealing monologue.  With a bead of sweat hanging from
his lower lid, Patric has the look and all of the malevolence of Alex in "A
Clockwork Orange."  At times LaBute's envelope-pushing dialogue seems
designed solely for shock value, but Patric's performance cannot be
faulted; it's hard to believe this is the same actor who floundered his way
through "Speed 2."
        Cary is a guy without an ounce of sympathy, sensitivity or, let's
face it, moral fiber.  If he was *your* best friend, you'd need some
serious counseling too.
        The film, which toys with the idea of what constitutes a good or
bad person, is at its best when its characters go picnicking on one another
with caustic, uncompromising viciousness.  It's not always pretty, but it
is insightful and LaBute milks the humor from these troubled situations
with consummate skill.
        Like the inscription "hold me" that Mary scrawls in a book she
lends to Jerry, "Your Friends & Neighbors" will make you want to hold onto
what you have--the wife who chews her fingernails, the husband who watches
too much television--recognizing that there are friends and neighbors out
there not worth having.

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
"Wag the Dog" isn't a bad film by any means.  In fact, it's thoroughly
enjoyable.  But its comedy is better described as frothy and lightweight
than biting and satirical.
Some clues become evident early on.  The tag line uses a structure that has
been done to death: "A comedy about truth, justice, and other special
effects."  The pre-credits explanation of the title phrase is simply
unnecessary.  And almost everything else feels familiar, as if begged,
borrowed, or stolen from other films.
Robert De Niro plays Conrad Brean, a "Mr. Fix-It" recruited by government
officials to help the President out of a tight spot.  Eleven days before
the election our nation's leader has been caught with his hands in the
cookie jar--a sex scandal with an underage girl scout.  Conrad needs a
distraction before the story breaks.  Something big.  How about...a war?
With, er...Albania?  Not a real war, of course.  "A pageant."
Conrad trots off to seek the assistance of Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman),
a Hollywood producer whose home is bigger than the White House.  Stanley,
who's never won an award of any kind (since no one understands producers),
sees this fabricated conflict as his big opportunity, his "Doctor Zhivago,"
if you will.  Much humor is derived from the fact that Stanley is always
intoning "this is *nothing*!" when things start getting out of hand.  "Try
a ten o'clock pitch meeting coked to the gills and you haven't even read
the treatment!  *That's* hard."
With "Wag the Dog," Hoffman continues to prove he's one of the most
versatile actors around.  De Niro, no slouch either, has a more subdued
role in the picture; the two of them play off each other like Bert and
Ernie.
Anne Heche, perhaps better known for her off-screen role than her on-screen
characterizations, is efficient and spunky as White House aide Winifred
Ames.  Willie Nelson has a small but cute bit as--what else--a
country/western songwriter churning out patriotic pop.  In fact, with the
exception of Woody Harrelson, whose loonie-with-bad-teeth-in-a-wool-cap
character is starting to get real old real fast, the cast is nicely
balanced.
Director Barry Levinson reportedly pulled all this together in a scant four
weeks.  With that in mind, the film is remarkably well crafted--breezy
camerawork, careful staging, lots of zingy, David Mamet-penned dialogue,
and twangy, toe-tapping music by Dire Straits-man Mark Knopfler.
The idea of marketing a war out of political need was more broadly realized
in "Canadian Bacon," an under-appreciated 1994 comedy that starred the late
great John Candy.  As for a scathing satire of the news media, Paddy
Chayefsky's brilliant "Network" has yet to find an equal.  For a biting
satirical comedy, see "The Player."  Or "Broadcast News."  Or "The Great
McGinty."  The list goes on.
While "Wag the Dog" doesn't have as much bite as any of those films, it's
still an entertaining movie-going experience.

Title
Review for City Slickers (1991)
     With DANCES WITH WOLVES making the great Hollywood western
respectable again, it stands to reason that an attempt to rejuvenate the
great Hollywood western parody wouldn't be too far behind.
     The first of this breed is CITY SLICKERS, an amiable but
surprisingly unfunny fish-out-of-water comedy starring Billy Crystal.
In one of the flattest cowboy spoofs to mosey on down the trail in a
long time, CITY SLICKERS simply leaves the viewer tired and saddle-sore.
     One of the problems with the film is its laughs, or lack thereof.
At almost two hours, there aren't enough of them to sustain a film of
this length.  Screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel (SPLASH)
have taken what is, after all, a pretty easy target and come up with a
seemingly endless stream of banal and largely uninspired one-liners, the
cow pat kind of humor that only appeals to little kids.
     Comedic everyman Crystal plays Mitch, who sells radio air time for
a living.  Mitch has gotten to the point in his life where he's the best
he's going to be, look or feel ... and it's not that great.  He's on
the verge of his 39th birthday and a mid-life crisis both at the same
time.
     Mitch's best friends are Ed (Bruno Kirby, who co-starred with
Crystal in WHEN HARRY MET SALLY)  and Phil (played by a bespectacled
Daniel Stern).  Ed, a sporting goods salesman with an eye for adventure,
co-habits with a 24 year old underwear model who adores him, yet he's
afraid to make any kind of long-term commitment.  Phil is a hen-pecked
grocery store manager whose tyrannical wife has made his life a living
hell.  These three amigos could sure use some serious counseling.
     They settle instead for a couple of weeks of soul-searching out
west, driving two hundred head of cattle from New Mexico to Colorado.
It's a perfect opportunity to come to terms with their identities whilst
fulfilling some of their adolescent fantasies - machismo, male bonding
and merriment under the stars.
     Mitch, Ed and Phil are joined on this trek by a motley crew of
stereotypically offbeat characters, including the mandatory
blonde-haired, tight-jeaned temptress who comes along for the ride,
keeping our saddle- pals' hormones percolating along with the coffee.
     Western veteran Jack Palance has a colorful role as the prickly
trail boss who laughs at the ineptness of it all.  "Two weeks out here
is supposed to change your life?" he scoffs, astutely.  Yet by the time
these "city folk" finish horsing around, we are supposed to buy just
that.
     Dwarfing everything in the picture -- especially the laughs -- are
the sprawling deserts of New Mexico, with their magnificent buttes and
mesas.   Too bad we don't get to see more of them, and less of Crystal,
Stern and Kirby.  These are two-dimensional characters in a
three-dimensional landscape -- and a very spectacular one at that.
     Another of the film's drawbacks is that it spends too much time
dabbling in the seriousness of the male menopause.  When the three
aspiring cowpokes ruminate over sex, baseball and the other-worldly
pleasures of their lost youth, this introspection comes across as
sounding trite and awkward.  If there is a balance between humor and
sincerity, then the film never quite finds it.
     The film momentarily comes to life in a scene in which Mitch,
having first delivered a calf with his own hands (a sweetly sentimental
if sticky moment), later risks his life to save it.  It's a rare
dramatic sequence in a film crying out for some genuine emotion.
     Early in the film, Mitch's wife realizes that her husband needs a
break from the rigors of everyday life.  "Find your smile," she
earnestly implores him.  But by the movie's end, this viewer was still
trying to find his.

Title
Review for Scandal (1989)
     If you plan to go to see SCANDAL because of the much publicized orgy scene
which twice garnered the film an "X" rating prior to its release, don't bother.
The scene has been trimmed to virtual non-existence by an overzealous board of
film censors.  What's left is a movie which, considering its subject matter,
remains surprisingly unerotic.
     SCANDAL documents the sensational events which lead to the toppling of
Britain's conservative government under Prime Minister Harold MacMillan in the
early 1960s.  It chronicles the sensational relationship between then Secretary
of State for War John Profumo (played in the film by Ian McKellen) and alleged
call girl Christine Keeler (Joanne Whalley-Kilmer in a standout performance),
an affair which shocked the nation.
     John Hurt plays Dr. Stephen Ward, the osteopath who is obsessed with
beautiful young women.  He takes Keeler and Mandy Rice-Davies (Bridget Fonda,
daughter of Peter) under his wing and into his home.  This is the type of role
which Hurt could play in his sleep - upper class, oozy and reptilian, yet
somehow sympathetic.  
     By contrast, Joanne Whalley-Kilmer is altogether stunning as Keeler.  She
does most of her acting with her chocolate brown eyes and her physical presence
dominates the film.  As Ward later tells her, "When I see beauty like yours, I
want to liberate it.  I could do wonders with you.  I could shock the world."  
Ironic words indeed.
     With Ward's social connections, it is not long before he is propositioned
by British Intelligence to use his women friends to entrap Russian naval
attache Eugene Ivanov (Jeroen Krabbe).  He complies by throwing Keeler and
Ivanov together and daring Keeler to seduce the phlegmatic Russian.
     Ward's connections also enable Keeler to mingle with government officials.
It is at a party at Clifton, a country estate belonging to Lord Astor, a friend
of Ward's, that she literally runs into War Minister Profumo wearing nothing
more than a few palm fronds and a smile.  It's an introduction that needs no
introductions.
     The affair which transpires is notorious in its own right, but made all
the more  so by Keeler's dual involvement with a top Cabinet official and a
suspected Russian agent.  When Profumo demands her complete devotion, Keeler
refuses to leave Ward's flat and Profumo breaks off their affair.
     In the meantime, Ward does not stop at making socially correct
introductions for his "little baby."  He introduces her to London's Jamaican
subculture, where she quickly becomes involved with illicit drugs and the
object of several drug dealers' desires.  Two clash over her affections, and
the subsequent shooting incident makes the headlines.
     The Profumo scandal breaks when a reporter from the "Sunday Pictorial"
talks with Keeler about the shooting, and Keeler, hurt by Profumo's rejection,
confesses her relationship with him, as well as with Ivanov and other public
figures.
     Once his involvement becomes public knowledge, Ward's influential friends
drop him and his life is destroyed.  He is formally charged with accepting
money gained through prostitution, although Keeler flatly denies the
allegation.  As a result of all of the publicity, Profumo steps down after
admitting that he lied in his personal statement to the House of Commons, a
statement in which he vouched that "no impropriety" took place between himself
and Keeler.
     When the outcome of a film is known beforehand, it is all the more
important to closely examine the motivations of its lead characters.  In this
regard, the film is somewhat aloof.  On the one hand, it might be
understandable why a woman of Christine Keeler's age and background could be
seduced into what was, essentially a lifestyle of sex, drugs, and rock and
roll, a lifestyle which, Wards tells her, "in order to enter one has to be very
clever...or very beautiful."  But that doesn't tell us everything.
     One thing we do learn is that she does it for love.  Stephen Ward allowed
her to enter his world, and in return she loved him.  He was, by her own
admission, the only man she had ever loved, yet they were never sexually
intimate.  This provides a moment of insight into her character -- for her,
there is a world of difference between love and sex.  Sex was her ticket to a
more glamorous life.
     On the strength of Michael Thomas's screenplay, it would appear that the
events surrounding the Profumo affair were certainly sordid.  The film
successfully captures the flavor and vulgarity of England in the early 60s.
Sex in this world is portrayed as quick, common and dirt cheap, rather than
anything meaningful or erotic.
     What's left of the orgy scene is a total turnoff.  Much more erotic - in a
trashy sort of way - is the sequence in which Keeler and her girlfriend Rice-
Davies dress for a night on the town.  They are filled with their own sexual
power and, though their weapons are lipstick and lingerie, they are like two
gladiators preparing for battle.  It is, perhaps, the only titillating scene in
the film.
     Everything else in SCANDAL is either lewd or sad by comparison, an apt
description for an affair which single-handedly ended a political era.

Title
Review for So I Married an Axe Murderer (1993)
     After suffering through Mel Brooks' latest atrocity, ROBIN HOOD:
MEN IN TIGHTS--quite possibly the worst film I've seen In My Entire
Life--the idea of stomaching a second supposed "comedy" two nights in a
row didn't exactly thrill me to the gills.  The ominously
awful-sounding SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER was the movie in question.
     Not only is the film funny, sometimes side-splittingly so, but
it's also very well made, with unexpected moments of real tension and
tenderness in and amongst the comedy.  For a movie that promises to mix
marriage and murder, there isn't a mean moment in this melange.  Kudos
to director Thomas Schlamme, writer Robbie Fox, and to a stellar
comedic cast that includes Mike Myers, Nancy Travis, Anthony LaPaglia,
Brenda Fricker, and ... er, Mike Myers.
     Set in the heart of San Francisco, SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER
tells the story of Charlie Mackenzie, a happenin' bachelor who performs
his unique brand of beat poetry in a retro-chic coffeehouse.  By
"unique" I mean bad. Charlie, it seems, has yet to meet the perfect
girl.  Afraid of commitment, he's dumped each of his previous
girlfriends for less than perfect reasons ("She smelled like soup," for
example).  Or so he tells his buddy Tony, an underappreciated cop
played by Anthony LaPaglia.  LaPaglia is cute and cuddly in this movie,
and shares some great moments with his police captain boss (an
unbilled, amusing cameo by Alan Arkin).
     But when Charlie meets Harriet (Nancy Travis), who works at a
butcher shop called "Meats of the World," it's love at first sight.
He's smitten--"full of smit" as he calls it.  The couple share a funny
meat montage together, replete with missing limb gags and ALIEN-style
chest-bursting humor. However, evidence soon begins to mount that
instead of finding Ms. Right, Charlie might well have stumbled upon
Mrs. X, whom the tabloids call "The Honeymoon Killer."  Mrs. X has the
tendency to slice and dice her husbands on their wedding night and
Harriet, after all, is quite adept at wielding the necessary
paraphernalia.  Needless to say all this makes Charlie more than a wee
bit paranoid.
     Among the film's funniest scenes are those in the Mackenzie
household. Brenda Fricker plays Charlie's over-friendly mother May and
her flexibility as an actress is astonishing, especially when you
compare this character to her dramatic, Oscar-winning role in MY LEFT
FOOT.  Mike Myers serves double duty in the film, playing Charlie's
overly Scottish father, Stuart. If anything, he's funnier as Dad than
he is as Charlie, continually yelling at his younger son (whom he calls
"Head" on account of the boy's disproportionately large hairdo) with a
brogue that's spot on.  Wearing heavy makeup and thick-lensed glasses,
Myers' Stuart is an armchair-ridden, McKewan's lager guzzling
caricature of hysterical proportions.  And his bagpipe-backed rendition
of Rod Stewart's "Do Ya Think I'm Sexy" is almost as funny as the Bay
City Rollers music that thunders from the Mackenzie homestead.
     With the exception of Arkin's, many of the film's cameos (by the
likes of Phil Hartman, Michael Richards, Stephen Wright and Charles
Grodin) are distracting, but otherwise the film maintains an even
keel.  Myers and Travis are silly but likable as the nervous newlyweds,
even though Myers obviously finds it harder playing it straight.  It's
not too much of a challenge figuring out the film's ending, but in "So
I Married an Axe Murderer," the accent is more on comedy than mystery,
so don't let that fact spoil your enjoyment of an otherwise
entertaining film.
     From its frothy Cappuccino-Cam(R) opening to its dramatic rooftop
conclusion, SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER is a surprisingly fun night at
the movies, buoyed along by a smattering of WDRE hits on the
soundtrack, picturesque views of the San Francisco Bay area, and
consistently droll injections of humor.  It's a goofy comedy/thriller
with an edge.


Title
Review for Firm, The (1993)
     "I want the truth!" demands hotshot lawyer Tom Cruise in last
year's military drama, A FEW GOOD MEN.  And in his new film, THE FIRM,
Cruise once again plays a hotshot lawyer who's searching for the
truth.  Talk about a stretch!  Actually, Cruise's character Mitchell
McDeere stumbles upon the truth fairly quickly in the film.  But
unfortunately for him and THE FIRM, dealing with the unsavory aspects
of that truth produces more fizzle than sizzle.
     Okay.  So Tom's this red-hot Harvard Law School grad who, as the
film opens, is being courted by all these prestigious law firms.  But
Cruise's Mitch is astute and won't take any old offer.  He wants the
best.  He's got a mother in a trailer park and an estranged brother in
the county lockup so he's got something to prove.  And he wants to give
his adoring wife Abby (the cozy bathrobe-sporting Jeanne Tripplehorn)
more than a mere hand-to-mouth existence.  They are young, beautiful
people after all.  Surely they deserve better than that?
     So when the small but prosperous Memphis law firm Bendini, Lambert
& Locke make him an offer he can't refuse, well, he can't refuse it.
     So.  Mitch and Abby U-Haul it down to picture postcard-perfect
Tennessee where they're wined and dined by the Firm.  Their house is
beautiful; it's furnished, carries a low-interest mortgage, and even
has a Mercedes in the driveway.  But what's most important is that the
Firm doesn't forbid its lawyers' wives to work and "encourages
children."  "How *exactly* do they do that?" questions Abby, with
keen-eyed skepticism.
     As idyllic as home life should be, the workplace is tough as
hell.  Nobody's ever failed the bar exam Mitch is told once, twice, one
hundred times in a zany montage of mounting legal tomes and dwindling
desk space.  But before the film gets bogged down in legal
pen-pushing...  Bang!  There's an explosion aboard a yacht in the Grand
Caymans where two of the Firm's associates were vacationing.  Both
killed.  "That's four dead lawyers in under ten years," comments a total
stranger in a greasy spoon late one night.  One of the guys, played by
Ed Harris, has a bald head and thick-rimmed glasses and looks like a
Fed.  "Who are you guys?" asks Mitch, inquiringly, but they've ordered
their steak sandwiches *to go*!
     Before long, Mitch and his assigned mentor Avery Tolar (Gene
Hackman, who's name is inexplicably missing from the film's
advertisements) whip down to those treacherous, attorney-claiming
islands to bully a client.  Because Mitch is a hotshot lawyer, you know
it won't be long before he starts getting suspicious.  I mean, those
boxes of files in Avery's closet with the names of the dead lawyers on
them and stuff?  Something is definitely up.  But Mitch goes overboard
on the rum punches one night and partakes of one local delicacy too
many, so to speak.  Eight-by-ten glossies in a brown manila envelope to
follow.
     In the nation's capital, Agent Tarrance (Harris) pops up again and
we get the low-down on Mitch's employers.  (C'mon...  All that's
missing from the film's title is the word "unscrupulous.")  But what
the government needs is proof.  Incriminating evidence of the
documentary kind.  What they need is for some hotshot lawyer to make
photocopies and stuff so that they can put the whole lousy stinking
operation away for a long, long time.  Mitch says "No way!"  But he
sleeps on it and comes up with a scam involving $1.5 million, a Swiss
bank account, and the early release of his brother-the-convict.  Takes
a real hotshot to rip off the Federal Bureau of Investigation!
     THE FIRM is never boring (even at almost 2 hours and 40 minutes)
but it never really sparkles either.  Sure there's some tension, but
McDeere's plan to bring the Firm to its knees (which even his *wife*
doesn't want to hear about) isn't exactly awe-inspiring.  And the
denouement, which was changed from novelist John Grisham's original
ending, requires a humongous stretch of the imagination.
     The acting, much as you would expect from this cast, is uniformly
solid.  Gary Busey plays private eye Eddie Lomax who buys it with
style.  Blam!  Pow!  Holly Hunter plays his gum-chewing secretary Tammy
Hemphill who was under the table giving him a "pedicure."  David
Strathairn sensitively portrays Mitch's incarcerated brother, Ray.  Hal
Holbrook is the Firm's senior partner Oliver Lambert, and Wilford
Brimley its tough head of security who's "paid to be suspicious."
     Similarly, Sydney Pollack's direction is competent and
workmanlike.  The script, adapted from Grisham's bestseller, was pulled
together by David Rabe, Robert Towne (who wrote CHINATOWN), and David
Rayfiel.  But the feeling you get from all their efforts is just one
more humdrum movie-going experience.
     If the thought of another Tom Cruise hotshot still turns you on,
then THE FIRM is definitely for you.  But if you're more interested in
a slick, engrossing tale of corporate corruption, read the hardcopy
version instead.


Title
Review for In the Line of Fire (1993)
     Who wouldn't relish the opportunity to redeem themselves for a
past failure if given a second chance?  That's the simple premise
behind IN THE LINE OF FIRE, the latest film to star Hollywood legend
Clint Eastwood.  But the movie takes this thin idea and runs with it,
resulting in a taut and genuinely believable political thriller that's
every bit as watchable as the laconic star himself.
     Eastwood plays Frank Harrigan, a Secret Service agent of long
standing with a Presidential skeleton in his closet--he failed to stop
the bullet that killed John F. Kennedy.  Thirty years later he gets the
chance to prove himself when a would-be assassin comes a-calling,
taunting Harrigan with threats of repeating the horror of Dealy Plaza.
     Eastwood's Harrigan seems like a real person.  He's a
self-confessed "borderline burnout with questionable social skills" who
collects jazz records, tinkles the old ivories, and likes to ride
public transportation.  He also "knows things about people."  Harrigan
refers to himself as "over fifty" in the film (Eastwood is actually
63), and one of IN THE LINE OF FIRE's strengths is that it doesn't
pretend otherwise.
     In fact, Harrigan is paired with a rookie cop, played by Fred
Dalton Thompson, to play up his comparative age and experience.  Then
there's a repeating theme about how Harrigan's just too old for this
line of work--the killer calls, the Feds trace the call, the Feds race
out the door, Harrigan huffs and puffs along.  Given his age, it's
remarkable that Eastwood does so much of his own stuntwork (i.e.,
running).  Finally, the touching relationship that develops between
Harrigan and agent Lilly Raines (Rene Russo) works because Eastwood
isn't playing a standard romantic lead.  Their abbreviated love scene
evokes a smile rather than a cringe.
     John Malkovich is convincing in the role of James McCrawley, an
obsessive paranoid who's as smart as he is dangerous.  He's not a
generic lunatic, suffering from some pat psychological disorder, but a
frighteningly plausible personality.  And he takes great delight in
pushing all of Harrigan's buttons.  There are lots--and I mean lots--of
shots of Eastwood, receiver pushed to his ear, temples pounding, brow
like a newly ploughed field.  "I don't have to listen to any more of
this!" he growls.  But he's paid to take this psycho's abuse.
McCrawley dribbles and snaps and flips out often; it's clear we're
dealing with a timebomb of a man who's likely to explode at any
moment.
     One of the things that makes IN THE LINE OF FIRE so realistic is
that the producers don't pretend Eastwood's a spry, 30-year-old action
hero.  He, Russo, and Malkovich all perform admirably.  In fact,
Eastwood comes awfully close to acting at times.  Some weak and obvious
wisecracks apart, he really shines.
     Also impressive are the film's supporting characters.  Dylan
McDermott plays Chief-of-Staff Harry Sargent whose role is that of the
typical shortsighted bureaucrat; he's so focused in on his job (in this
case the success of the Presidential campaign) that he's oblivious to
the threat of any real danger.  Gary Cole and John Mahoney play
high-ranking government officials with equal competence.
     But perhaps the nicest surprise is the way IN THE LINE OF FIRE
gives Presidential bodyguards their due.  Their role, protecting
someone as prominent as the U.S. President, is depicted as extremely
difficult and uncompromising.  At a political convention, with
flashbulbs bursting and photographers swarming, Harrigan is among the
anxious agents keeping order.  This is a tough job all right.
Ironically, Harrigan refers to some Secret Service operations as
"window dressing."  If someone wanted to take an anti-tank gun to the
President's limousine, a dozen Federal agents running alongside isn't
much of a deterrent.  All they really do is make the President look
more Presidential.
     What you need in a film like this is a tough, likable lead, a
sympathetic (but not whiny) sidekick/love interest, and a convincing
villain.  IN THE LINE OF FIRE has all three.  Add well-rounded
supporting characters, a surprisingly good storyline (from the pen of
Jeff Maguire), and brisk direction (by Wolfgang Petersen) and you've
got yourself a well-paced thriller worth watching.


Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
        With a definition like that, you know from the get-go that "Affliction" 
isn't going to be a walk in the park.  And with a screenwriter like Paul 
Schrader ("Taxi Driver," "Raging Bull") at the helm, plus Russell Banks' 
("The Sweet Hereafter") searing novel providing the source material, 
it's even less likely that the film is going to serve as anyone's idea 
of "light entertainment."
        In the last several years, filmmakers have used the white stuff, the 
cold, harsh grip of midwinter, as a backdrop for some emotionally 
intense psychological dramas.  Films like "Fargo," Atom Egoyan's 
afore-mentioned "The Sweet Hereafter" and, most recently, "A Simple 
Plan" have all been set in some distant, desolate place where the sun 
barely shines.  It's a familiar sight: our protagonists crunching 
through freshly fallen snow, looking like alien beings with their woolen 
hats pulled down tightly about their ears, oversized mittens rendering 
their fingers immobile, their huge coats flapping in the icy Arctic 
wind.
        "Affliction" is the latest addition to the cold winter drama, and once 
again the snow and the ice lend the film a certain dignity, reminding us 
unequivocally that bad things happen in bad weather.
        Set in the upstate New Hampshire neighborhood of Lawford, "Affliction" 
focuses on the character of Wade Whitehouse, a man with one humdinger of 
a toothache.  Born and raised in the economically depressed town, Wade 
functions as Lawford's solitary law enforcement officer, but is often 
relegated to acting as school crossing guard or performing odd jobs for 
a local entrepreneur.
        A struggling alcoholic, Wade is separated from his wife Lillian (an 
unrecognizable Mary Beth Hurt) and trying to maintain a relationship 
with his teenage daughter, whose line "I love you Dad, but I just want 
to go home" summarizes a lot of the pain experienced by children 
embroiled in bitter custody battles.  Wade is all too aware of 
parent-child conflicts, having been raised by an abusive, drunken father 
(James Coburn), whom he occasionally visits at the crumbling family 
farm.
        When a prominent businessman is accidentally shot and killed on the 
first day of the deer hunting season, Wade suspects foul play, and sees 
the investigation as an opportunity to re-establish himself in the eyes 
of the disillusioned community.
        "Affliction" is a bleak, downbeat tale with few rays of light or hope.  
As Wade, a man on the emotional edge, Nick Nolte turns in a powerhouse, 
OscarŽ-nominated performance that is sometimes sensitive, often times 
brimming with intensity.  Coburn also received a nomination for his fine 
work here.
        Willem Dafoe (from Schrader's "Light Sleeper") as Wade's brother Rolfe, 
who has escaped Lawford for an arguably better life, narrates the tale, 
sparingly.  Sissy Spacek--where's she been hiding all these years?--is 
excellent as Wade's beleaguered girlfriend, Margie Fogg.  Also worthy of 
mention is Paul Sarossy's cinematography--Sarossy shot "The Sweet 
Hereafter"--and Michael Brooks' somber score that never outplays its 
welcome.
        As the barn burns and Wade pours himself another drink, we're left with 
the disturbing image that we are what our parents taught us, how their 
emotional and psychological abuse can diminish our capacity to love and 
to be loved as human beings.  In Wade Whitehouse's case, that is the 
deepest, darkest definition of "Affliction."


Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
        In the finale of Disney's "Mighty Joe Young," a 15-foot tall, 
2000-pound gorilla holds a frightened young boy in its clutches as it 
topples from a crippled Ferris wheel and plummets to the ground.  Upon 
impact, rugged everyman and perennial do-gooder Bill Paxton rushes in, 
containing the emotional crowd with an earnest "move along now folks, 
there's nothing to see here."
        OK, so those aren't exactly the words he uses, but it's probably 
one of the few clichés not uttered in this unnecessary remake of an 
unnecessary remake of that mother of all monster movies, "King Kong."
        1949's "Mighty Joe Young" was an update of that classic creature 
feature, also based on Merian C. Cooper's original story (16 years after 
"'Kong" it appeared the world was ready for a new take on the beauty and 
the beast fable).  Now some 49 years later, at least according to 
Disney's way of thinking, the world is ready for one more.
        Not so.  The only--and I mean only--reason to see the 1998 
version is for the special effects.  And these, unfortunately, run hot 
and cold.
        Today's Joe Young is designed and produced by special-effects 
whiz Rick Baker, who has been wowing audiences with his state-of-the-art 
make-up effects since 1971's "Schlock" (which, incidentally, featured a 
Baker-enhanced "gorilla").  Joe is a combination of animatronic effects, 
computer graphics, and that old standard, a man in a monkey suit.  While 
there are occasional flashes of brilliance--Baker's had a lot of 
practice with simian effects, after all, including "Gorillas in the 
Mist," "Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes," and the 1976 
remake of "King Kong"--there's also some surprising cheesiness.
        One of the film's most embarrassing moments is when Paxton's 
band of African trackers first encounter and pursue the larger-than-life 
primate (in a scene unashamedly ripped off from "The Lost World: 
Jurassic Park").  Paxton jubilantly extols the beast's majestic gait at 
the same exact moment as Joe, and the computer effects driving him, 
stutter to a halt.
        Also, if the film's producers had wanted us to focus our 
attentions on the titular ape they shouldn't have paraded female lead 
Charlize Theron ("Trial & Error") around in a seemingly-endless wardrobe 
of spaghetti-strapped tops.  Even Joe seems distracted at times.
        The film piles on the clichés like there's no tomorrow, 
including the predictable plot (anthro-zoologists ship gigantic gorilla 
to L.A. where urban havoc is inevitably wrought), predictable villain (a 
Lithuanian I think I overheard someplace), predictable love story (Bill 
and Charlize--surprise!), and predictable denouement ("'twas box-office 
receipts that killed the beast").  Kids raised on "Men in Black" 
(non-monkey effects also by Baker) are going to find Ron ("Tremors") 
Underwood's outing a little lame by comparison.
        While certainly better than 1978's "King Kong Lives" (itself a 
lousy sequel to a not particularly good remake), "Mighty Joe Young" 
proves how the mighty keep falling.


Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
        "Be gentle," urges Natasha Henstridge to Matthew Perry in "The
Whole Nine Yards."  "I haven't made love in five years."  "Neither have I,"
rebuts Perry.  "I'm married!"
        If Jonathan Lynn's latest comedy relied simply on jokes of that
caliber--and it certainly tries--then it'd be an innocuous if rather
obvious little film.  Instead, its failings go much deeper.  First off, who
hasn't had enough of the tough wiseguy intimidates the timid wise guy
genre?  If you want to make a pretty penny or two in Hollywood nowadays
simply write a "comedy" which pairs a Robert De Niro/James Caan/Bruce
Willis type with a Billy Crystal/Hugh Grant/Matthew Perry type and wait for
the royalties to roll in.  Who's next?  Jack Nicholson and Martin Short?
It certainly doesn't have to be funny.
        "The Whole Nine Yards" is not a particularly funny film, but it is
borderline offensive.  Offensive in the way it continues a trend of poking
fun at career criminals who wouldn't think twice about pushing your
mother-in-law off the Brooklyn Bridge with her feet encased in concrete.
That might sound like a funny sight gag, but the problem is these films
have long since lost sight of the fact that taking a human life isn't all
that funny to begin with.  When the corpse is placed in a car, doused with
gasoline, set ablaze and referred to as "barbecue," it makes you wonder
when all this playing killing for laughs is going to end.
        "The Whole Nine Yards" is also offensive in so much as its three
central female characters are portrayed as nothing more than sex objects.
Rosanna Arquette plays a slutty, chain-smoking French Canadian who's
married to Matthew Perry's none-too-successful dentist.  It's an
unflattering role made all the more so by the unflattering outfits--and
unflattering situations--into which Arquette is thrust.
        Then there's Natasha Henstridge ("Species" I and II) who plays the
well-to-do wife of contract killer Bruce Willis.  She gets involved with
Perry's character when he comes to Chicago hoping to negotiate a finder's
fee with mob boss Yanni Gogolack (Kevin Pollack, transposing his Vs with
his Ws) after Willis' Jimmy the Tulip Tudeski moves in next door.
Henstridge and Perry's characters hitting it off is about as likely as
Bruce and Demi getting back together.  Perry might have the charm but he
doesn't have the physical attributes of a traditional leading man,
especially in close-up.
        Most objectified of the bunch is Amanda Peet, who turns in a
sexually-ripe performance as Perry's dental assistant with, it transpires,
questionable career goals.  Peet's gratuitous nude scene proves how low
this movie will stoop to keep its audience from dropping off.
        When "My Cousin Vinny" is the highpoint of a directorial career
including such forgettable films as "Clue," "Greedy," and "Sgt. Bilko," you
have to wonder if Lynn chose the wrong career path.  Perry's pratfalling
goofiness coupled with Willis' likable hardness could have had some
potential but with no script to work with, and a director who seems to be
watching from the wings, their characters run out of gas quickly.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
        The choices we make in life, however small, can have a profound
effect on our destiny.  Or, conversely, these choices make no difference at
all--fate has already determined our ultimate course and every zig and zag
along the way.
        No matter to which of these hypotheses you ascribe, Tom Tykwer's
exhilarating "Run Lola Run" reconsiders--and re-executes--the pitfalls,
obstacles, and decisions its central character faces during the longest
twenty minutes of her life.  And it shows, with amazing dexterity and
creativity, how a talented filmmaker can turn a simple storyline into an
elaborate game of "what if...?"
        As the film opens, a frantic Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) is
telephoning his girlfriend, Lola.  Where was she?  He completed the shady
deal involving some hot Mercedes but Lola wasn't there to pick him up as
arranged.  So he wound up walking to the station but accidentally left the
bag of cash on the train.  Now he has only twenty minutes to deliver the
missing 100,000DM to a bald-headed thug called Ronnie or he'll wind up with
a bullet in his head, or worse.  He needs Lola's help.  Fast.
        Lola tells him to keep calm.  She'll be there.  She'll come up with
something.  "Just wait there for me, Manni" she urges.  "Don't do anything
stupid."
        It's 11:40am and Lola starts to run.  She runs from her apartment
and down the stairs (in animated form).  She runs through the ornamental
garden, down the street, across the plaza, over one railway bridge and
under another, past strolling mothers, bicyclists, and nuns, to the German
Transfer Bank where, she hopes, her father will help her out.  Quickly.
But her father is engaged in a serious conversation with an other woman.
Lola's mother, on the other hand, is back in Lola's apartment muttering
something about shampoo and Sagittarius.
        "Do you want to have a baby with me?" asks the woman of Lola's
father in the grainy, close-up style of a sleazy daytime drama.  "Yes."
This is clearly not a good time to be asking her father for favors, so Lola
bolts again.
        The question, of course, is will Lola get to Manni, cash in hand,
before the clock strikes noon?  In "Run Lola Run," the answer is yes, no,
maybe...  Along with the "Rashomon"-styled what-ifs envisioned by Tykwer,
the relatively-unknown director punctuates his film with some inventive
and-thens, as the denizens Lola encounters on her twenty-minute marathon
have their futures economically summarized in snap-happy Polaroid fashion.
Here Tykwer is non-discriminating in his shrewd stabs at sex, religion,
vice, death, and success.
        As Lola, Franka Potente breezes through the film like the Olympic
flame, her burning orange hair flying behind her as if her whole head were
ablaze.  Lola is a commanding figure in the film and an equally persuasive
runner, driven by a pulsating soundtrack (by Tykwer and two of his
collaborators) that matches her pace for pace, and breath for breath.  The
film has wit, style, and adrenaline to spare and its relatively brief 88
minutes are over all too quickly; one wonders what other fanciful scenarios
the fast-witted Tykwer might have conceived.
        In German with English subtitles, "Run Lola Run" plays like a rock
video with substance.  It's superbly edited, visually thrilling at every
turn, and an absolute rush.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
        Have you heard the one about the priest, the rabbi, and the
prostitute?  Of course you have.  Well now you can *see* the one about the
priest, the rabbi, and the workaholic.  It's called "Keeping the Faith" and
it's a romantic comedy about this comely threesome, firm friends in the 8th
grade who come together one wacky weekend and hooboy don't you know it the
two guys wind up falling for the same girl.  Edward Norton ("Fight Club")
is the priest, Ben Stiller ("Mystery Men") is the rabbi, and Jenna Elfman
("EdTV") is the corporate "plumber" (she talked McDonalds out of the
McOyster) and the object of their conflicted affections.  Conflicted in the
sense that Norton's character shouldn't be feeling this way, being a member
of the cloth an' all, and Stiller's character should be dating a Nice
Jewish Girl from the Bronx, not some fast-talking west coast blonde who's
surgically attached to her cell phone.  Stuart Blumberg's script touches on
the struggles between serving your god and servicing your woman, but since
this is a romantic comedy the emphasis leans more towards big laughs, of
which "Keeping the Faith" serves up plenty.  The film is perhaps too long,
and there's a strange anti-climax when Norton's character professes his
love for Elfman's.  Nevertheless, it's very watchable, with Stiller
typically engaging and Elfman as cute as a button.  Norton is
underutilized, but that's probably due to the fact that he serves triple
duty on this film, as co-producer and director as well as one of the
principals--arguably, "Keeping the Faith" was not the best choice for
Norton's debut behind the camera since the young up-and-came-already actor
fails to impose any kind of unique stamp on the rather deliberate
screenplay.  What we have here is an extended episode of "Dharma and Ben
and Ed" with a religious bent.  Not that there's anything wrong with that.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Crusoe (1988)
     There have been many film adaptations of Daniel Defoe's classic novel
about the enigmatic castaway.  These variations range from straightforward
translation (Luis Bunuel's THE ADVENTURES OF ROBINSON CRUSOE) to sci-fi parable
(the 1964 ROBINSON CRUSOE ON MARS) to racially-pointed satire (MAN FRIDAY).  
     CRUSOE, the latest interpretation of this saga, is more in keeping with
Bunuel's version, and therefore the book itself, but it suffers from deliberate
pacing and a shallow, uninspired viewpoint.  
     The twist here is that Crusoe is portrayed as a Virginian slave trader who
journeys to the island of Guinea in the hope of purchasing low-priced captives.
Aidan Quinn plays Crusoe, and is in fine acting form.  But his boyish features,
complete with baby blue eyes, are a little distracting, as is his thick,
East-coast accent.  
     Crusoe sets sail at an inopportune time of year, weather-wise, and it
proves to be his undoing.  The ensuing spectacle of model-shop proportions
pales in comparison to the storm-at-sea sequence near the beginning of INDIANA
JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE.  The shipwreck in CRUSOE could have used some of
Indiana Jones' adrenaline.  
     The film barely touches on Defoe's theme of man's fear of, and difficulty
in dealing with, solitude.  This Crusoe doesn't seem to mind being alone at
all.  There are a couple of scenes in which we feel that this existence is not
as idyllic as it may seem, but these are few and far between.  The arrival of
cannibals on the island provide Crusoe and two of the natives with an
opportunity for social intercourse.  Updating the novel to 1808, the height of
the North American slave trade, was no coincidence, as the resulting power
plays between slave and master would reveal.  But on no occasion does Crusoe
refer to either one as "Friday."  
     As far as presenting a unique vision or a refreshing outlook, Walon
Green's literal screenplay rarely works overtime.  But there's enough up there
on the screen to appease the most undemanding viewer.  And it's buoyed along by
an evocative Michael Kamen score which, combined with the lush, tropical
scenery, creates the film's principal mood.  
     As one would expect from cinematographer turned director Caleb Deschanel,
the film is lovely to look at.  But it would have taken a supremely untalented
crew of individuals to travel to the Seychelles (where the film was shot) and
make the surrounding topography look drab and uninviting.  
     But when the film does set up an arresting situation, it rarely has the
faith to develop it, and ends up sitting on the fence.  It's almost as if the
film makers couldn't decide what kind of a film they wanted to make.  The
result is a film which hovers awkwardly between straightforward storytelling
and social commentary.  
     On the surface, CRUSOE might appeal to those who have either never read
the book, or who are looking for some ideas as to where to spend their summer
vacation.  But don't go looking for any kind of depth or imagination.  Those
elements, like Crusoe himself, are all washed up.  


Title
Review for Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss (1998)
        Sometimes a film with such a tantalizing title comes along that
you're compelled to slap down your seven bucks without first seeing the
trailer, reading a synopsis, or even consulting the cast list.  "Billy's
Hollywood Screen Kiss"--say that again?--is one of those films and by the
time you've wrapped your tongue around the nomenclature, you'll realize the
title is one of the better things about the movie.
        "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" starts out with a sequence
comprised entirely of Polaroid photographs and narration that includes a
bold statement: this film will help you understand some of the differences
between gays and straights.  The film doesn't come close to delivering on
that promise.  In fact, the main problem with the film is that it all too
often sets up an expectation and then fails to provide the goods.
        Billy is a gay, L.A.-based photographer, currently "unemployed and
loveless."  According to many of his friends, this puts him at his creative
peak.
        Encouraged to shoot a series of photographs featuring great
Hollywood screen kisses, like the one exchanged by Deborah Kerr and Burt
Lancaster amidst the pounding surf in "From Here to Eternity," Billy casts
a handful of drag-queen acquaintances in the women's roles.  But he needs a
fresh face, a good-looking male model to substitute for the Clark Gables
and the Jimmy Deans.
        While hanging out in a coffee shop with his girl friend George
(played with Barbra Streisand panache by co-producer Meredith Scott Lynn),
Billy suddenly finds himself gazing into the eyes of an angel, a
blond-haired, blue-eyed Brad Pitt lookalike appropriately named Gabriel.
It's love at first sight, professional ethics be damned!
        Figuring out if Gabriel is gay and, if so, whether he's interested
in Billy, forms the core of "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss."
        For a picture like this to succeed you have to feel some kind of
empathy for the main character.  Empathy, interest, understanding--all of
these help.  I couldn't muster up much.  Not only is Billy unappealing as a
character--perhaps the goatee reminds me of comedic everyman Eric
Schaeffer, who ruins every project he's associated with--but Sean P. Hayes
who plays Billy is a fledgling actor, which causes a further distancing.
        Fortunately the film is peppered with a large collection of minor
characters who *are* appealing, which makes up for a lot.
        The film would have been more interesting, though perhaps not
necessarily as amusing, if it spent as much time focusing on Billy's photo
essay as it does his awkward mumblings and fumblings in the presence of
Gabriel.  Although Billy's daydreams are presented as black-and-white
teasers complete with celluloid leaders, the only Hollywood screen kiss
actually realized is the afore-mentioned "From Here to Eternity" embrace.
I was hoping for more.
        On the other hand, three very enthusiastic drag queens provide an
amusing opening credits sequence plus various "intermissions."  And cult
filmmaker Paul Bartel ("Eating Raoul") appears as a fashion photographer
who offers Gabriel an underwear gig on Catalina.
        Overall "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" is a mixed bag--likable,
yet not without its frustrations--and a reminder that one should never
judge a book by its cover.

Title
Review for Va savoir (2000)
        Veteran French filmmaker Jacques Rivette has a reputation for making long
films.
        His masterwork, "Celine and Julie Go Boating" (1974), clocks in at a
little over three hours, but that's but a drop in the bucket compared to
his experimental 16mm films of the early 1970s--the 12-hour 40-minute "Out
1: Noli Me Tangere" and its heavily edited cousin "Out 1: Spectre" (four
hours plus), for example.  Perhaps Rivette is best known to American
audiences for his four-hour art/nude marathon "La Belle Noiseuse," an
experience that some cynics have likened to watching paint dry.
        Which is why, at a mere 150 minutes, his latest film "Va Savoir" ("Who
Knows?") seems positively miniscule in contrast.
        The downside to "Va Savoir"'s scant two-and-a-half hour duration is that
just when you're starting to get to know and appreciate its stellar cast of
characters, the film ends.  Rivette understands the long format better than
anyone, and an extended running time gives the former Cahiers du Cinema
critic-turned-auteur the opportunity to develop his characters more fully.
Since Rivette loves to play around with films (or plays) within his bodies
of work, there's more scope for repetition and cross-referencing, something
the 73-year-old director juggled to perfection in "Celine and Julie..." but
really only has the time to hint at in "Va Savoir."
        Typically a successful French farce or, in this particular case, a
romantic comedy is quickly remade by an American studio for singularly
economic reasons, yet here for perhaps the first time Sony Pictures
Classics is unleashing "Va Savoir" ahead of a very similar-plotted domestic
production (Edward Burns's "Sidewalks of New York").  Both films feature a
sextet of various displaced and disturbed individuals who wind up rubbing
shoulders and elbows over the movie's elaborate and sometimes volatile course.
        "Va Savoir" focuses on three such "couples."  There's Camille (Jeanne
Balibar), a gamine of an actress who has recently (and nervously) returned
to Paris from Italy after a three-year hiatus to perform in a play, "As You
Desire Me," with her co-star/director/lover Ugo (sympathetically played by
Sergio Castellitto).  There's Camille's ex-husband, the pretentious Pierre
(Jacques Bonnaffé), and his wife Sonia (Marianne Basler), whom Camille
insists on meeting.  And then there's a pretty young student, Do (Hélčne de
Fougerolles), who helps Ugo track down a missing manuscript he's been
obsessed with for years.  Do lives with her possessive half-brother Arthur
(Bruno Todeschini) who, in turn, is orchestrating an affair with Sonia.
It's a condensed new wave Parisian redux of "La Ronde," with Rivette and
his screenwriters (Pascal Bonitzer and Christine Laurent) working overtime
in juxtaposing theatricality with reality and reveling in the conflicts it
creates.
        An able--not to mention bilingual--cast are both charming and disarming,
with Balibar particularly radiant.  As with many of his previous films,
Rivette continues to provide fully fleshed-out female roles and while the
sense of improvisation is gone for the most part, the characters are so
well written that it doesn't seem to matter.  My only complaint, again, is
that "Va Savoir" develops a tempo that is abruptly and disappointingly
interrupted by a shorter than average (Rivette-wise) running time.
        Who indeed knows what high drama and/or comic excesses might have ensued
had we been treated to another intriguing hour or two...
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Snow Day (2000)
        On a snow day, anything can happen.  Young love can be requited.  A
TV weather forecaster with falling ratings can win the approval of his
community.  A mother can learn to put her family before her cell phone.
And the scourge of the neighborhood, a demonic snowplow driver with bad
teeth and a pet raven, can get his comeuppance.
        "Snow Day," a family film with the emphasis on family, doesn't get
too bogged down delivering on these individual plotlines, but it does have
a lot of fun getting there.  A Paramount Pictures/Nickelodeon Movies
production, the film features "big name" stars in Chevy Chase, Chris
Elliott, Jean Smart, and Pam Grier but, wisely, relegates them to minor
roles and allows its real stars, its child actors, to shine.
        Most engaging of these is Philadelphia's own Mark Webber, who plays
highschooler Hal Brandston.  Hal sees the unseasonably mild winter's first
freak snowfall as a sign to pursue the girl of his dreams, high-dive beauty
Claire Bonner (Emmanuelle Chriqui).  Hal's little sister Natalie (Zena
Grey) is more obsessed with derailing the efforts of the menacing snowplow
man (Elliott) in an effort to set the Syracuse record of two snow days in a
row.  Their flatulent younger brother Randy, played by Connor Matheus,
spends most of this time rolling around in the white stuff like a beetle on
its back.
        Chase and Smart are their parents, both heavily involved in their
careers, with Chase as Syracuse's No. 2 meteorologist playing second fiddle
to John Schneider's flashy Chad Symmonz, and Smart as a soft drink marketer
who cannot let the phone ring unanswered even if it means losing a bet.
Also a joy to watch is Schuyler Fisk, daughter of Sissy Spacek and art
director Jack Fisk, as Hal's down-to-earth friend and confidante Lane
Leonard--this is a promising performance from Fisk; watch for bigger things
from her in the future.
        "Snow Day" is not a remarkable film in any way, but in today's age
of indiscriminate sex and violence it's refreshing to watch a film in which
sexual situations are replaced by sincere expressions of teenage love and
violence is reduced to a high school principal being bombarded by unseen
snowball assailants.
        Chris Koch's film is silly and fun, tapping into that primal
excitement of hearing one's school closing number on the radio.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
"It all comes off this summer" is the tag line for "The Full Monty," the
latest take on how the working class of Britain's industrialized north
contend with the devastating effects of economic depression.
As for Peter Cattaneo, the director of this audaciously sweet comedy, it
*does* all come off: "The Fully Monty" is as big a crowd pleaser as they
come, a film full of little, special moments rather than big ideas or
ambitions.
"The Full Monty" opens with an authentic-looking documentary trumpeting
Sheffield's burgeoning steel industry.  "This is a town on the move!"
warbles the enthusiastic narrator.  He neglects to say in which direction,
however.  Twenty-five years later the factories have closed and with them
the loss of thousands of jobs.  Men like Gaz (Robert Carlyle, the psychotic
Begbie in "Trainspotting") and his best mate Dave (Mark Addy) are two of
the affected, reduced to stealing steel girders from the abandoned mills in
order to make ends meet.
When they happen upon a packed-to-the-rafters nightclub hosting an
appearance of the Chippendales, the Gazzer has an idea to scrape up some
dosh.  How about him and his mates going one better?  The full monty!  Or
sans G-strings, as we might say over here. The only problem is they're all
either overweight, over the hill, or overly ordinary.
"The Full Monty" is, essentially, a one-joke movie but it's handled with
such charm and levity that the one joke is funny enough.  "Brassed Off,"
another recent example of the genre, was distinctly lacking in charm, full
of irritating characters that you didn't really care about.  The unemployed
steelworkers of "The Fully Monty," by comparison, are sympathetic,
endearing, even lovable blokes.  You laugh with them, not at them.  And
because they actually try to do something about their plight--earning, in
Gaz's case, enough money to be able to pay child support to see his
son--you wind up rooting for them, no matter how ill-advised their scheme
might seem.
The scene at the Job Centre is even funnier in context than it is in the
trailer: a gangly line of shiftless factory workers starts shifting, slowly
and instinctively bumping and grinding in unison to Donna Summer's "Hot
Stuff" wafting in over the loudspeakers.  It's a wonderful moment of
perfect comic timing.
Simon Beaufoy's script touches on some serious matters (such as the
objectification of women, when the guys realize that the audience might
find them as lacking as they find some of the models in the girlie
magazines), but doesn't let these get in the way of the tomfoolery.  It's a
wise decision.  Carlyle is solid as Gaz, but more impressive are Addy, and
Tom Wilkinson as their former foreman, the garden gnome-fancying Gerald,
who teaches the boys a step or two.  Addy and Wilkinson skillfully portray
men who's self-esteem has been badly bruised and it's these honest
characterizations, coupled with a breezy, easygoing style that make "The
Full Monty" as infectious as a Donna Summer disco hit.
It's sure to leave a silly grin on your face.

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
        If, as the saying goes, you're only as good as your last picture,
then the pressure on "L.A. Confidential" director Curtis Hanson must have
been enormous.  That 1997 film was nominated for nine Academy AwardsŽ--a
tough act to follow indeed.  Which might explain why Hanson has spent three
years bringing his next project to the silver screen.
        That project is "Wonder Boys," a film based on the novel by Michael
Chabon and adapted by Steve Kloves ("The Fabulous Baker Boys").  Ironically
(or not), its central character, cynical college professor Grady Tripp
(Michael Douglas), is also someone who has had to deal with high
expectations.  His first novel was a runaway best-seller, but that was
seven years ago now and the promising author's follow-up is, even at 2,500+
single-spaced pages, far from finished.
        To top it all, Grady's wife has chosen to walk out on him (again)
on the same exact morning that his editor, Terry Crabtree (Robert Downey,
Jr.), is flying into town to find out what's going on with Grady's latest
work-in-progress.  "It's pretty much finished," lies Grady when asked about
the status of his manuscript.  "I just need to tinker with it a bit."
        "Did he ask you about the book?" asks Sara Gaskell (Frances
McDormand), Chancellor of the Pittsburgh university where Grady works, wife
of the English department chairman, to whom Grady reports, and Grady's
mistress, currently with child.  Grady's child.  "Yes."  "Are you going to
tell him?"  "No."
        You'd think Grady Tripp's life was complicated enough but in his
English class there's a suicidal young writer called James Leer (Tobey
Maguire) and a pretty young thing called Hannah Green (Katie Holmes) to
whom Grady rents a room in his house.  And faster than an exasperated Grady
can say "Well, you could have just pulled him off me!" there's also the
Gaskell's now-deceased dog to contend with, two bullets to the midriff
courtesy James' "cap" gun.
        Douglas dominates the film with this kind of sardonic humor and the
support provided by Maguire, McDormand, Holmes, and Downey, Jr.
(especially) is second to none.  Unfortunately, these engaging performances
do not make for a completely satisfactory whole: "Wonder Boys" is a
scattershot affair that bobbles along episodically but doesn't quite gel.
Although undeniably funny, the film is often times extremely bleak in its
tone and in its delivery: these are people who have difficulty connecting
and no amount of pat Hollywood ending--wonder boy gets wonder girl--can
eliminate that.
        The trailer for this film is wonderful and Hanson would have done
well to have employed the talents of the individual(s) who pieced it
together.  For all of its pacing problems, however, "Wonder Boys" is still
worth seeing for Douglas' controlled and highly entertaining performance as
Grady Tripp.
        The only remaining question is whether three years was too much
time, or too little, for Hanson to take making it.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
        The most satisfying thing about "Six Days Seven Nights" is the
print ads.
        Harrison Ford is shown pounding through river water with his shirt
unbuttoned to the waist right there alongside Anne Heche, whose blouse is
similarly--and predictably--agape.
        While this might represent an equitable first in terms of a film's
publicity materials, "Six Days Seven Nights" doesn't waste much time in
pointing out--via Ford's character Quinn Harris--that Robin Monroe's
(Heche) breasts are, in fact, "too small."  The audience is in a unique
position to argue this fact given that Heche's chest is prominently on
display in the film--covered, but under such skimpy tops that one doesn't
need a copy of "Gray's Anatomy" to hand to figure out exactly what it is
we're looking at.
        Add to that fixation the fact that the filmmakers have written
Quinn's "assistant" Angelica (Jacqueline Obradors) as a buxom brunette who
exposes herself (back to camera, thus upholding the film's PG-13 rated
tone) to Robin's fiancé and you've got yourself a lightweight yet
singularly top-heavy movie that could have benefited from an ounce of
subtlety.
        Ooh yah, broad is what we have here.  If the thought of Heche
telling Ford not to smile as he attempts to fish a snake out of her shorts
makes you smile, then perhaps this movie is for you.  They're not the worst
pairing in the world, but Bogie and Hepburn bickered a lot better in "The
African Queen" (and he never once felt her up from what I can remember).
Heck, even Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner made a mismatched duo more
deserving of an occasional chuckle in "Romancing the Stone."
        What's perhaps most intriguing about "Six Days Seven Nights" is
that Heche was cast shortly before going public with her romantic
involvement with "Ellen"'s Ellen DeGeneres.  The timing of this revelation
puts the on-screen chemistry between Heche and Ford under more scrutiny
than it can withstand--in the back of our minds we're all wondering what
Indiana Jones is doing running around in the jungles of Macataya with
Hollywood's latest lesbian.
        "Forced" is probably the best word to sum up "Six Days Seven
Nights."  The slightly neurotic New York glamour mag editor and her beau
(David Schwimmer) on a week's vacation in the South Pacific.  The grizzled,
middle-aged pilot who likes his life on the simple side.  The emergency
photo shoot that puts the two of them on a short plane hop to Tahiti
together (can you think of *any* reason why the David Schwimmer character
would have stayed behind?).  The storm.  The forced landing.  The broken
landing gear.  The realization that they're going to be stuck on this
island paradise for quite some time now and had better learn to get along.
The wacky adventures with wild animals, pirates, and a "but I thought you
were dead, honey!" boyfriend.  Etc.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
        In 1984, Joe Dante made a modest little film called "Gremlins," in
which a boy's cute little alien pet spawned a legion of very nasty
creatures that devasted a picture-postcard perfect town.  In 1998, he made
exactly the same picture, this time calling it "Small Soldiers."  That's
about it.
        "Gremlins" had some decent ideas, but its creativity was undermined
by in-jokes, sappy side characters, and too much repetitive violence.
Since "Small Soldiers" is essentially the same picture as "Gremlins," the
same criticisms apply.
        "Small Soldiers" starts out promisingly enough.  The new hard-line
head cheese at toy manufacturer Hartland Play Systems seeks innovation.
Toys that do what they appear to do in the commercials.  Talk.  Move.
Shoot.  Kill.  With today's technology it shouldn't be a problem, right?
He gives his remaining two employees three months to revamp their latest
product ideas.
        The merchandise is a collection of action figures called the
Commando Elite, headed up by Chip Hazard (voiced by Tommy Lee Jones).
They're a super tough rabble of  Rambo-like mercenaries with Jay Leno
chins; their incessant motto is "There will be no mercy."  Since action
figures need adversaries, the toy makers also conceive the Gorgonites, a
race of various alien creatures who look like rejects from the bar scene in
"Star Wars."  Emissary of the Gorgonites is a reptilian humanoid called
Archer.  His voice is supplied by a very polite sounding Frank Langella.
        In order for these toys to look and feel like the real thing, their
creators seek out a super microchip (using the Boolean arguments
"microcomputer chip," "state-of-the-art," and "surplus" via that darned
Internet), discovering the X1000 courtesy the Defense Department.  One
thing proves to be key about the X1000 munitions chip, however: it's
defective (perhaps "surplus" was an infelicitous search term to use?).
        Before the Commando Elite and the Gorgonites can be recalled, a kid
called Alan Abernathy (Gregory Smith), whose father has left him in charge
of the company store, helps a shipment fall off the back of a truck, so to
speak.  Before you can scream "Gremlins 2" (better make that "Gremlins 3,"
since Dante is already credited with an official sequel), the pumped-up
plastic commandos have busted out of their shrink wrap and are tracking
down their arch enemies.  Unfortunately the passive Gorgonites have been
programmed only to hide and lose.
        At this point in the film we're well into "Gremlins" territory,
with the Commando Elite causing much twelve-inch mayhem courtesy Stan
Winston's animatronic and computer effects.
        Not all of "Small Soldiers" is a bust.  Tommy Lee Jones is
appropriately "cast" as Chip, who talks in a plethora of (often mixed-up)
military clichés, and Denis Leary, in a small role as the cut-throat CEO,
is typically dry and effective.  Also, the idea behind creating toys that
actually perform like they do in the TV spots, without explicity showing
the kids doing all of the work, had some potential.  But Dante and his four
screenwriters trash the interesting possibilities behind the concept as
quickly as their diminutive militia trash the town.
        By all means remake a bad movie and improve on the original.  Or
remake an old, good movie for the benefit of today's audience.  "Small
Soldiers" does neither.  It takes a mediocre movie and makes a mediocre
movie out of it.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
        Douglas Fairbanks made his "mark" in 1920, as did Tyrone Power
twenty years later.  John Carroll "rode again" in 1959.  Now it's the turn
of Latin heartthrob Antonio Banderas to wear the mask of Zorro.  Whether
the titular reference be a sign, a ghost, a whip, or a son, the umpteen
big- and small-screen variants of the Zorro legend have, by now, milked the
living daylights out of the masked avenger who carves his name--or at least
his initial--with pride.
        While one might have expected a revisionist version of this classic
tale for today's audiences, the producers of "The Mask of Zorro" have
decided to play this go-round surprisingly straight.  Unfortunately, they
don't play it straight enough, choosing to pad the two-hours-plus running
time with awkward moments of slapstick, primarily on the part of Banderas,
which dilute the otherwise splashy, hot-blooded proceedings.
        It's almost as if a pre-release audience decided that this
interpretation wasn't funny enough.
        "Zorro, the Gay Blade," a 1981 spoof starring George Hamilton, was
more focused in its lampooning of the title character and a better choice
if you're looking for something camp.  But when Zorro reminds you more of
Inigo Montoya from "The Princess Bride" than he does Errol Flynn buckling
swashes, it's clear that the makers of "The Mask of Zorro"--let's blame
"GoldenEye" director Martin Campbell--have made a miscalculation somewhere.
        Still, when Banderas (or his horse) isn't acting cute, "The Mask of
Zorro" is eminently watchable, suffused with solid readings from Anthony
Hopkins as Don Diego de la Vega (the older, wiser Zorro), Catherine
Zeta-Jones (from British television's "The Darling Buds of May") as his
beautiful daughter Elena, and not one but two odious villains to hiss at.
        The film opens in old Spanish California, circa 1821.  The Baja
natives have found a champion in their midst, a mysterious masked man known
only as Zorro, who protects them from the money-grubbing land barons.
Mean, lean Spanish governor Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson) discovers
the identity of Zorro and in the struggle surrounding his apprehension,
kills de la Vega's wife and abducts his infant daughter, claiming her as
his own.
        Twenty years later when Montero returns with plans to make
California a republic, de la Vega escapes from prison and takes a common
thief, Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas) under his tutelage, grooming him as
the next Zorro.
        Zeta-Jones, in her first big production since the ill-conceived
"The Phantom," gives an uplifting performance as Elena, who finally
discovers the truth behind her origins.  Elena proves she can parry with
the best of them, which is why it's disappointing that her sword fight with
Zorro culminates with our black-clad hero stripping her of her dignity.
Hopkins is typically commanding as the retired caped crusader (who hangs
out in a cave like that other one), and Banderas is suave and dashing as
his protégé.  In fact, "The Mask of Zorro" fully exploits the good looks of
all three of its leads.
        Try to ignore the brief farcical lapses and you should find "The
Mask of Zorro" to be a flamboyant, rousing display of derring-do.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
So ask yourself what "8MM" ("Eight Millimeter") is really all about.
Is it about a wholesome surveillance man who loses sight of his values 
after becoming enmeshed in the seedy, sleazy underworld of hardcore 
pornography?
Is it about the business itself, how, bubbling just beneath the surface 
of big-town Americana, there's a sordid world of sick and depraved 
people who won't necessarily stop short of murder in order to satisfy 
their sick and twisted desires?
Or is it about those who can, those who are in a position to influence 
the making of the kinds of films sick and demented people want to see?  
I'm not talking about snuff films, supposed "documentaries" of victims 
being brutalized and killed on camera.  I'm talking about films like 
"8MM" and its director, Joel Schumacher.  With a recent run of big 
budget movies to his credit--"Batman & Robin," "A Time to Kill," "Batman 
Forever," "The Client"--Schumacher certainly has that kind of influence.
Is "8MM" something you really want to see?  Probably not.
The first two-thirds of "8MM" unwind as a fairly conventional missing 
persons drama, albeit with a particularly unsavory core.  Then, as it's 
been threatening all along, the film explodes into violence.  And just 
when you think it's finally over, Schumacher tags on a ridiculous 
self-righteous finale that drags the whole unpleasant experience down 
even further.
Trust me.  There are better ways to waste two hours of your life.
Nicolas '"Snake Eyes"' Cage plays private investigator Tom Welles who 
is hired by a wealthy Philadelphia widow to determine whether a reel of 
film found in her late husband's safe documents a young girl's murder.  
Welles goes about his assignment rather matter-of-factly, and the pieces 
of the puzzle fall into place rather neatly, almost as if you don't need 
any specialized skills or training to do this.  Welles certainly makes 
it look easy.  And cops, obviously, never look in toilet tanks for 
clues.
The deeper Welles digs into his investigation the more obsessed he 
becomes, like George C. Scott in Paul Schrader's "Hardcore."  
Occasionally, a little flickering sound whirs in his head like sprockets 
winding through a film projector, reminding him of his unpleasant task.
There are hints that this is taking its toll on his lovely wife, played 
by Catherine Keener, who is frustrated by her husband spending all of 
his time in Cleveland rather than in their ugly split-level home in 
Harrisburg, PA.
"8MM" doesn't condemn or condone its subject matter, it just exploits 
it.  The irony, of course, is that Schumacher and "Seven" scribe Andrew 
Kevin Walker's vision of life in the snuff lane is limited by what they 
can show in an R-rated, first-run Hollywood product.  So we only see 
snippets of snuff, and a lot more footage of Nicolas Cage covering his 
face in horror.  Later it's the turn of Joaquin Phoenix (who's quite 
good and by far the film's most interesting character as adult bookstore 
flunky Max California ) to cover his face as the horrid thing is 
screened over and over again.
All this to get to the familiar yet offensive "revelation" that sexual 
deviants are not, indeed, monsters but everyday people like you and me.  
Neither Super nor Standard, "8MM" is shocking only in its banality.


Title
Review for Licence to Kill (1989)
     See: A man eaten alive by a shark!  See: A man impaled on the jaws of an
earthmover!  See: A man's head decompressed beyond recognition!
     No, this is not an ad for one of those so-called video nasties, but what
you can expect to see in LICENSE TO KILL, the latest James Bond film and second
to star Timothy Dalton as 007.
     Bond is back all right -- bigger and bolder, perhaps, but (children under
thirteen take note) certainly bloodier than ever.  Audiences have learned to
expect girls, gadgets and great stunts from these films, but gore?  No thank
you, Mr. Bond.
     LICENSE TO KILL is the sixteenth installment in the seemingly endless
series of James Bond films which began back in the 1962 with DR. NO.  Back
then, Bond pictures could be considered more or less family entertainment.
Irrespective of the sex and violence inherent in the films, they were never
sordid or nasty.  They were never unpleasant.  Times, indeed, are a-changin'.
     In the ensuing twenty-seven years, Bond has battled his way through
several guises, a good number of dry martinis, and more than his fair share of
women (an advocate for safe sex this guy is not!).  But in all those years,
Bond -- the man as well as the series -- has kept killing above board and
respectable.  In LICENSE TO KILL, however, the producers have prostituted good
clean fun for explicit violence.  The bloodletting is jarring, and needlessly
so.
     This time around, the globe-trotting Bond touches down in such exotic
locales as the Florida Keys, Bimini, and the fictional city of Isthmus.  On
their way to the wedding of CIA friend Felix Leiter (David Hedison, in a
reprisal of his role in LIVE AND LET DIE), Bond and Leiter are alerted to the
fact that nefarious drug magnate Franz Sanchez (menacingly played by Robert
Davi) is within striking distance, and the proceedings are quickly curtailed.
     However, Sanchez quickly escapes and does the dirty on Felix, turning him
into shark bait.  This scene is about as uncomfortable to watch as the chainsaw
sequence in Brian DePalma's SCARFACE.  As the bad guy, Davi is certainly one
of the most formidable villains Bond has come up against, at least in recent
years.  He makes SCARFACE's Tony Montana look like Mr. Rogers.
     Bond swears revenge but M (Robert Brown), fearing that Bond will turn
this into a personal vendetta, insists that he take on another assignment.
Bond cannot and resigns, thereby having his "license revoked," the film's
original title.
     Carey Lowell and Talisa Soto play the Bond girls.  In keeping with Bond's
new found monogamy and 1980s image, ex-CIA operative Pam Bouvier (Lowell) is
portrayed as a tough cookie, and not just another bit of fluff.  However, it
isn't long before she hauls herself out of her military garb and parades around
in her underwear for a scene or two.  Cute, Carey, but no Oscar nod this year,
okay?  Soto plays Sanchez's girlfriend-on-the-make Lupe Lamora and gets to wear
a lot of red outfits, hussy that she is.
     The usual wisecracks are very much in evidence -- a bloodied Felix shows up
with a sign around his neck which reads "He disagreed with something that ate
him."  But this time the one-liners are in bad taste because they invariably
follow scenes of overt violence.
     In THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS, Dalton's first venture into the role of British
agent extraordinaire, there was on-screen nudity for the first time in a Bond
movie, albeit brief nudity.  Now we have an occasional profanity stirred --
sorry, shaken -- into the proceedings.  Some might call it keeping up with the
times, others a lowering of standards.
     Gladys Knight performs the snappy GOLDFINGER-inspired title song and
it's the best musical motif in the film.  In earlier films, John Barry's score
was as much a character as the villain or the Bond girls themselves, and it is
sorely missed in this picture.  Michael Kamen, who appears to be scoring every
other movie release this summer, steps in for Barry on LICENSE TO KILL, but his
contribution is mostly flat and hopelessly derivative.
     The Bond films have always tried to top each other in terms of spectacular
stunts, and LICENSE TO KILL is no exception.  In fact, the film's memorable
conclusion is probably one of the most explosive action sequences ever put on
celluloid.
     But the problem with the film is the tone, plain and simple.  Over the
years the character of James Bond has slowly, imperceptively segued from secret
agent to super-hero.  He has, in his own way, become an indestructible force in
the movies, a caricature of sorts.  Nowadays, Bond is much like Freddie Krueger
or Jason Voorhees, whose wheelings and dealings this film often seems to
imitate.
     Moviegoers will have to wait a little longer for the latest incarnations
of those familiar faces this summer, but if your appetite for that kind of
murder and mayhem needs to be whetted sooner than that, you might want to check
out LICENSE TO KILL first.  You won't be disappointed.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
        "Man on the Moon" is Milos Forman's biopic of the late "Taxi" star
who succumbed to a rare strain of lung cancer following a short-lived
career carved out by an eccentric style of humor and elaborate pranks that
kept his audiences guessing.
        As brilliantly realized by Carrey, Kaufman was a neurotic (some say
psychotic) who turned traditional notions of stand-up comedy on their head.
Kaufman's idea of entertaining a room full of college students, for
example, is to read them "The Great Gatsby," cover to cover, with a dubious
British accent.  "Now *that's* funny."  We never really know what makes
Kaufman tick in "Man on the Moon," but it never seems to matter--the road
traveled is a sad, funny, and remarkable one, made all the more remarkable
by Carrey's unnervingly accurate portrayal.
        Forman pulls us into the comedian's twisted, singularly manic world
early on, with black and white, pre-credits footage of Kaufman (Carrey)
telling us that this film is over before it even begins.  In some ways, it
is.  And for Kaufman, in a lot of ways it was.
        Kaufman is discovered by agent George Shapiro (Danny DeVito), who
witnesses his cutting-edge stand-up act in an improv comedy club.  "You're
insane, but you might also be brilliant" he tells Kaufman over dinner.
Soon after, Shapiro offers Kaufman a part in a sitcom called "Taxi" (with
Judd Hirsch, Marilu Henner, Carol Kane, and Christopher Lloyd all reprising
their roles; the years have been kinder to them than you'd expect).
Believing sitcoms to be the lowest form of entertainment, Kaufman will only
agree to the contract if certain conditions are met.  His terms include his
own television special (creative control assumed) and four guest
appearances on "Taxi" by some no-name Vegas lounge singer called Tony
Clifton.  Tony who?  The network top brass don't seem to care and Kaufman
is on the payroll.
        Tony Clifton, it turns out, is really one of Kaufman's many
alter-egos.  Keep 'em guessing indeed.  "Kaufman is Clifton, and Clifton is
Kaufman" waxes Shapiro.  "You get two Kaufman's for the price of one."
Actually, *we* get two Carreys for the price of one (and one Carrey is
usually more than enough for any one movie).  Like everything else in
Kaufman's repertoire, Tony Clifton is just another gag, just another
fabrication to get him onto that next rung of the show business ladder.
Unconsciously, the abrasive Tony Clifton signaled the beginning of
Kaufman's self-inflicted decline.  The self-proclaimed "song and dance man"
was beginning to alienate his audiences now and, while Kaufman could still
fill auditoriums with ease, he was often times guilty of playing to an
audience of one.  Himself.
        Successful and unsuccessful appearances on "Saturday Night Live"
follow.  Then "Taxi" is canceled.  His transcendental meditation doesn't
seem to be helping.  Kaufman starts a new gig--inter-gender wrestling in
Memphis--where he meets a woman called Lynne (Courtney Love, powder fresh
from Forman's previous biopic "The People vs. Larry Flynt"), pisses off a
whole lot of God-fearing Southern women, and starts a brawl on "Letterman."
Oh, and then he gets cancer.  All part of the act?  Many--family members
included--aren't convinced.
        Andy Kaufman was a wild and crazy guy.  Jim Carrey is a wild and
crazy guy.  Together, they make for fascinating cinema in Milos Forman's
stellar "Man on the Moon."
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Matilda (1996)
A film review by David N. Butterworth
Copyright 1996 David N. Butterworth/The Summer Pennsylvanian
Danny DeVito's MATILDA isn't about a boxing kangaroo.  It's an adaptation
of Roald Dahl's beloved tale of a little girl with amazing powers who's
"born into a family that doesn't always appreciate her."
As Matilda, Mara Wilson (one of the kids in MRS. DOUBTFIRE) is predictably
annoying.  Someone must have told her once that acting means blinking a lot
and I, for one, felt sorry that they didn't cast the marsupial instead.
Fortunately, there's enough to like outside of the title character to make
MATILDA worthwhile.
Neglected by her worthless parents Harry and Zinnia Wormwood (Danny DeVito
and Rhea Perlman), Matilda is forced to feed, clothe, and educate herself
from a very early age.  By the time she's four, she's read every magazine
in the house and starts walking ten blocks to the library each day in order
to enjoy such classics as Ivanhoe, Moby Dick, and The Pickwick Papers.  She
can also do complex calculations in her head.
Her parents are so caught up in their tiny little lives that they barely
notice Matilda's burgeoning genius.  When Harry finds her reading novels,
he chastises her with "there's nothing you can learn from a book that you
can't learn from TV more quickly."  His idea of quality family time is
snarfing cheese doodads while watching endless game shows.
DeVito and Perlman are clearly having fun in their roles.  Perlman is
colorfully over-the-top as the Brooklynesque, bingo-obsessed Zinnia and
DeVito is equally excessive--and very funny--as the shady car dealer Harry,
who fails to realize Matilda's true potential.
Harry's booming trade in stolen auto parts interferes with this daughter's
formal education.  "Who'll sign for the packages!?" he gasps, when his
six-and-a-half year old finally asks to be sent to school.
But sent to school she is, to the bleak and imposing Crunchem Hall, whose
principal Agatha Trunchbull is a tyrant of monstrous proportions.  An
ex-Olympian at shot-put, hammer-throw, and javelin, Trunchbull instills
fear in the students with the crack of a riding crop, throwing these
"squirming worms of vomit," "walking pustules" and other sleights out of
windows, or locking them in the "chokey."
"Use the rod, beat the child" is Trunchbull's personal adage, and it's in
keeping with the school's particularly downbeat motto: "If you are having
fun, you are not learning."
As Trunchbull, British actress Pam Ferris offers a tour-de-force
performance.  Ferris is rarely photographed more than two inches from the
camera lens, so we get to see her blemished skin and decaying dental work
in excruciating detail, adding to her gargantuan nastiness.  There's a
nicely bitter and twisted tone in her portrayal of the brutish
headmistress.  DeVito obviously delights in the macabre--witness the black
humor in THE WAR OF THE ROSES and RUTHLESS PEOPLE--and when he revels in
the darker side of Dahl's original story, MATILDA works best.
Being big fans of Mary Kate and Ashley, my daughters had no problem with
Mara Wilson's acting prowess.  They liked Matilda and her sweet yet
ineffectual teacher Miss Honey (Embeth Davidtz); they laughed at the funny
bits and cowered during the scary bits; and they cheered at the ending,
when Matilda uses her phantasmagorical powers to thwart the evil
Trunchbull.
The caricatures of evil in the film may be one-dimensional, but they're
infinitely more fun than Matilda's forced precociousness.  If you can look
past Wilson's cloying exhibition and appreciate the supporting
performances, MATILDA is everything it should be--an enjoyable children's
fantasy.

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
        For a big-budget studio film, there are a lot of art house
pretensions in Scott Hicks' "Snow Falling on Cedars."  Artistic shots of
young lovers catching raindrops on their tongues in the bowels of a tree,
or making out behind dimpled glass.  A non-linear narrative structure so
complex that you could be excused for thinking the lead character (played
by Ethan Hawke) actually stumbles across himself washed up on a beach, many
years older and ravaged by war.  An intricate, distracting soundtrack abuzz
with overlapping dialogue, babies wailing, wind and rain beating down on an
old creaky courthouse, all set to strings that swell and swell some more.
        Fans of David Guterson's best-selling novel will probably wish that
Hicks, the director of "Shine," would just shut up and get on with the
story.
        That story is a post-World War II courtroom drama cum love story
set in the high country of Washington state where the cedars touch the sky
and everything is blue and gray (except for the occasional red of the
women's lipstick).  The courtroom drama results from the death of a local
fisherman and the accusation of a Japanese landowner for his murder.  The
love story is one from the past: how a local reporter named Ishmael
Chambers (Hawke) once loved the accused man's wife (Youki Kudoh).  This all
transpires in a time and a place when anti-Japanese sentiment was at its
zenith.
        Earnest, handsomely mounted, and empty, "Snow Falling on Cedars"
takes a difficult chapter in this nation's history--how the United States
interred thousands of Japanese-Americans in concentration camps following
Japan's attack on Pearl Harbor--and forsakes a lot of hard questions in the
process.  Max von Sydow's defense attorney does, however, deliver a darned
good closing argument as this two-hour film draws to a close.  Hicks knows
it, and doesn't cut or pull back for a second.
        It's a rare moment of truth in a film that exploits its cinematic
strengths--exquisite photography, manipulative music, and a fractured
narrative style--at the expense of honest storytelling.  Von Sydow is
magnificent in this scene.  Magnificence, alas, is a quality that "Snow
Falling on Cedars" strives, yet fails, to achieve.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Twist (1992)
     Promoting itself as "an instructional dance film," TWIST purports
to chronicle the evolution of rock-and-roll dance.  Instead it jumbles
together a wide and disjointed assortment of nostalgic images, leaving
the audience to figure out what it's all about.  As a result, TWIST is
a dance documentary with two left feet.
     The film is structured as eight dance "lessons," complete with
flashy title boards, but there's nothing especially unique to be
learned from each section.  Canadian producer/director Ron Mann uses a
combination of old film and television footage and interviews with now
middle-aged AMERICAN BANDSTAND dancers and recording artists.  He
spotlights these performers by having them jiggle in front of heavily
stylized backgrounds and, frankly, it's embarrassing.
     It's clear from the observations of Betty (Romantini) Begg, Carole
(Scaldeferri) Spada and Floss (Harvey) Mancini why they are dancers,
not commentators, as Mann allows them to ramble on even though they
have almost nothing to say.  In addition, Hank Ballard, Joey Dee, and
to some extent Chubby Checker come across as egotistical jerks--surely
not the director's intention.
     The film kicks off with the early 1950s, when ballroom dancing was
all the rage.  In the juke joints and nightclubs of Harlem, places like
Smalls, The Apollo and The Savoy, a rising young star called Hank
Ballard and his group the Midnighters were performing their hits, songs
like "Get It," "Sexy Ways," and the infamous "Work With Me Annie."
Ballard's lyrics were raw and suggestive.
     With the arrival of such notables as Elvis Presley, disc jockeys
on radio stations like Philadelphia's WDAS stopped calling Ballard's
style of music R&B and started calling it rock and roll--"to attract
the white kids."  On WFIL-TV's AMERICAN BANDSTAND, regulars on the show
started imitating the black kids and claiming the dance steps as their
own. Mann's interview with BANDSTAND dancers Joan (Buck) Kiene and
Jimmy Peatross attempts to illustrate how the white mainstream ripped
off the African- American culture.  As a political message it's too
simplistic; Mann lingers on their shallow repetitiveness and misses the
opportunity to make a major statement.
     Most of the information presented in TWIST isn't new--the fact
that rock and roll was considered to be a "communicable disease" under
Eisenhower's presidency, for example--but the section on the Twist
itself is informative and well-structured.
     In 1959, Ballard's recording "The Twist" took the nation by
storm.  Twisting was easy; you just moved your hips.  As legend has it,
Dick Clark assumed that the song would be too dirty coming from
Ballard, and it didn't show up on BANDSTAND until the cleaner-imaged
Chubby Checker recorded his version in 1960.  A year later the dance
had become a world-wide sensation and the song returned to number one,
spawning over 300 Twist spin-offs. It was probably the first time those
immortal words "It's got a good beat and you can dance to it" were
spoken on prime time TV.  At a New York club called the Peppermint
Lounge, Manhattan's rich and famous were rubbing shoulders with the
commonfolk to get in on the action.
     For a brief moment the film becomes quite fascinating; we learn
how influential the Twist really was, starting fashion trends and
saturating popular culture.  If only the rest of the film could have
maintained this momentum.  Unfortunately, Mann follows this portion of
the film with a downward-spiraling epilogue that simply flings more
contrived dance floor maneuvers in our face.  The Swim, the Jerk, the
Watusi--all less successful derivations.  The Hully Gully and the
Hucklebuck; imitations that paled by comparison.  When the British
invaded in 1964, one kind of musical hysteria was traded for another.
     For all the shimmying and shaking going on in the film, TWIST is
amazingly lacking in energy.  The archive footage is varied and often
fun (a clip in which Marshall McLuhan shares his thoughts on the dance
craze, for example, is a howl), but Mann does very little with it.
Many scenes lack continuity.  After a while, the frenzied
black-and-white footage of teenagers bopping and jitterbugging becomes
repetitive and ultimately boring.  It's hard to tell the Fly from the
Frug, the Millie from the Monkey.  Even though TWIST runs only
seventy-eight minutes, it's a long haul.
     It's not clear whether TWIST is supposed to be a celebration, a
tribute, or a condensed history lesson.  As a simple account of dance
styles from the Fifties and Sixties, it's poorly-conceived (it would
have made a fine short film).  For all its instructional aspirations,
TWIST doesn't know when to lead and when to follow.

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)
"Shadow of the Vampire" features a typically earnest performance by John
Malkovich as the great German Expressionist filmmaker Friedrich Wilhelm
Murnau, spitting lines like "I will finish this picture!" and "You can eat
Greta *after* your death scene!" with unequivocal abandon.  And it features
a wonderfully creepy, nuanced performance by Willem Dafoe as Max Schreck,
the mysterious vampire-like star of Murnau's gothic masterpiece, "Nosferatu."
But there's not much else to E. Elias Merhige's slow-moving tale about the
making of Murnau's 1922 film.
The focus, of course, is on Dafoe, who looks terrific--and acts
terrifically--under all that makeup.  As Count Orlock (Bram Stoker's estate
refused Murnau the rights to film Stoker's "Dracula" so he simply changed
the name) he outdoes Jim Carrey in "How the Grinch Stole Christmas."
Needless to say Dafoe's performance is more introspective, although he does
roll his eyes a lot in keeping with the over-the-top acting style of the
times.
Credit, too, must be given to Dafoe's startling makeup design.  Ann
Buchanan makes Dafoe a very convincing-looking Schreck, from the little
tufts of white hair behind his pixie-like ears to his long, skeletal
fingers, which look like a cross between Freddy Krueger's razor-sharp
appendages and those of the face hugger from "Alien"--wizened and
white-knuckled with fingernails as long as a toll collector's on the Jersey
turnpike.
Like "Gods and Monsters," a 1998 film that chronicled the making of James
Whale's "Frankenstein," "Shadow of the Vampire" is a thoughtful,
contemplative film that attempts to inject new blood into the machinations
of a cinematic auteur.  Unlike Bill Condon's film, however, we do get some
insight into the mind of a man who conjured up truly horrific
visions--Murnau was a fanatic and an obsessive, one who defied his producer
(here played by the great Udo Kier), worked excessively, hounded his
actors, kept secrets, and left everything to chance, all tempered by daily
doses of laudanum.  Unfortunately, the shaggy dog core of the film is that
Schreck wasn't exactly acting when he sucked the blood of his leading lady
(we're tipped off in an opening title board that refers to "Nosferatu" as
one of the most *realistic* vampire films ever made).  This puts a bit of a
shaky spin on an otherwise "serious" treatment.
Under Merhige's workmanlike direction, "Shadow of the Vampire" is murky
and meditative while revisiting the kind of murky vampire lore we've seen a
thousand times before.  Malkovich, surprisingly, doesn't even attempt a
German accent!  (Cary Elwes, as a replacement cinematographer, does, and
it's to his discredit.)  The opening credits sequence is so long and
puzzling--it's not obvious what we're supposed to be looking at--that it
sets a bad tone for the rest of the picture.
Co-produced by Nicolas Cage of all people, "Shadow of the Vampire" is
still worth catching if, for nothing else, Dafoe's fine contributions.
It's an OscarŽ-caliber performance that, sadly, will no doubt be dismissed
along with the notion that this film is just another vampire picture.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Carne trémula (1997)
        A standoff.  A man holds a woman, a diplomat's daughter, hostage in
his embrace, a gun pressed to her head.  A cop, impaired by drink due to
his wife's philandering, trains his gun on the man's nether regions,
threatening to shoot.  Another cop holds his gun to his partner's temple,
forcing him to disarm.  The scene unfolds like a foursome bidding in
bridge--upping the ante, signaling tacitly, going for game.  The second cop
retrieves the first cop's weapon, the suspect lowers his, and the woman
caught in the middle moves--in slow motion--to safety.  It is then that the
intoxicated officer makes his move, grabbing for the assailant's gun.  The
room turns upside down, a shot rings out, a cop is down.  Shot in the back
and paralyzed for life.  The young man who found himself in the wrong place
at the wrong time is sent to prison for six years for a crime he didn't
commit.
        Storytelling has always been one of Pedro Almodóvar's greatest
gifts and in "Live Flesh" he gives us a twisting, turning, compelling tale
peppered with well-written, colorful characters.  Characters who find
themselves, more often than not, in carefully-constructed scenes like
these.  Characters played by actors we might not know, but who look
strikingly familiar nevertheless.
        Take the ruggedly handsome Victor Plaza (Liberto Rabal), for
instance.  Before he gets out of prison he could easily be mistaken for
that Almodóvar favorite, Antonio Banderas.  When we first meet Elena
(Francesca Neri), the woman in the middle of the nervous shakedown, she
looks like Spice Girl Barbie with her frizzy shock of orange hair, but
later tones down her look sufficiently to pass for Juliette Lewis.  Elena's
husband David (Javier Bardem) is the cop crippled in the shooting and he
wears David Schwimmer's bemused expression throughout.  Playing the
inebriated cop and his cheating wife are José Sancho and Angela Molina--no
lookalikes spring to mind, but they round out the excellent cast.
        It's a credit to Almodóvar's craft that these five individuals
cross paths and intertwine with such credulity.  "Live Flesh" begins and
ends with a live birth and the film's contradictions come almost as often
as the contractions.  Between the two childbearings, coincidence, irony,
and a hefty dollop of sex form the key elements of this thoroughly
entertaining film.
        Although based on a Ruth Rendell story, "Live Flesh" is brimming
with the acclaimed Spanish director's high-heeled flourishes.  Women are at
times alluring and repulsive, their extravagant hairdos and animal print
coats providing colorful highlights to the intricately-woven drama, an eye
bruised by an abusive husband here, a mouth bloodied by an impromptu
delivery there.  While in prison, Victor learns Bulgarian from an inmate
and learns to love the Bible, quoting from Deuteronomy thereafter not
unlike the way by which David and Sancho refer to themselves as "guardians
of a sick flock."  Victor's pre-fab inheritance is a shambles in a slum
resembling Sarajevo.  "Dear son, I got cancer" his mother writes to him in
jail.  She dies before he is released and it's at the cemetery that Victor
is reacquainted with Elena--redemption, ultimately, substituting for
revenge.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
        As far as "Mystery Men" is concerned, the burning question is less
"is it really as bad as it looks from the trailer?" (the answer there is an
unequivocal "yes") and more "how in the name of sweet Jesus did first-time
director Kinka Usher get such a first-rate cast to act in this muck?"
        "Mystery Men" features Greg Kinnear as the heavily-sponsored
Captain Amazing and Geoffrey Rush as his arch nemesis (singular) Casanova
Frankenstein.  A veritable police lineup of hot Hollywood talent plays the
superhero wannabes of the title, who join forces to get C. Amazing out of a
tight spot when C. Frankenstein puts the screws on Champion City.
        There's William H. Macy as the mild-mannered Shoveler, Hank Azaria
as the cutlery-flinging Blue Raja (no knives, but a phony English accent
that's just as sharp), Ben Stiller as Mr. Furious (whose only power seems
to be his ability to get hot under the collar), Janeane Garofalo as a
crazed bowler with her father's skull interestingly preserved, Wes Studi as
a rhetoric-spouting cowled avenger, and Kel Mitchell as the token (and,
adding insult to injury, invisible!) black guy.  Bringing up the rear, so
to speak, is Paul Reubens (yes, that's Pee Wee Herman Paul Reubens) as...
well, let's just call him the gas man.
        The production design is overblown, the special effects are
overdone, and the script (based on Bob Burden's "Dark Horse" comic book
series) is overbaked.  The appealing actors are uniformly good and Stiller
is even stellar, but they can't begin to save "Mystery Men"--it's just one
big mess.  You're better off renting the video and pressing fast-forward to
get to the funny bits.  I believe I counted three.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Spike Lee got game.  Ain't no two ways about it.  Should anyone
tell you otherwise, consider this for starters:
The music for Lee's latest film, "He Got Game," is by the late 20th
Century composer Aaron Copland, he of the sublimely obnoxious opus
"Appalachian Spring."  Now I've never liked Copland, especially
"Appalachian Spring."  But in "He Got Game," Copland works.  Majestically.
Even the snatches of "Appalachian Spring" on the soundtrack didn't cause me
any discomfort.  Not at all.  In fact, I loved it.  The brass; the
cacophony of sound--it just worked.  Coupled with prominent rap songs by
Public Enemy and "He Got Game" exhibits one of the most esoteric song
scores in recent memory.  Credit that to filmmaker Lee, the man with--among
other talents--game.
Lee's latest film takes two complex themes and expertly blends them
into what appears, on the surface, to be a relatively straightforward
story: if incarcerated felon Jake Shuttlesworth (Denzel Washington) can
convince his basketball-playing, high school hot-shot son to opt for the
Governor's alma mater, his stay in the state penitentiary will be
curtailed.  The themes, as presented, seem simple enough too: the high cost
of fame, and the even higher price of having accidentally destroyed
something you loved.
"He Got Game" reveals the surprising sadness of being wooed by both
slick professional agents and countless universities promising assurances
of the good life, and how that pressure can sometimes be too enormous a
burden to bear.  And with startling honesty, this profound difficulty is
contrasted with Shuttlesworth's own personal tragedy.
At the beginning of "He Got Game" it's not clear why convicted
Attica inmate Shuttlesworth is doing time,  And that's another strength of
Lee's film; the story details unfold with precise, revelatory specificity,
like pieces of a jigsaw puzzle snapping into place.
Washington, if not already, should be deigned a national treasure.
His work here is superlative, surpassing almost anything he's done before.
His portrayal of Jake, a loving, supportive family man at odds with his
son, is by turns sensitive, tough, and ultimately human.
The supporting performances in "He Got Game" are worthy of mention
too: Milla Jovovich ("The Fifth Element") as a strung-out Coney Island
hooker; Lonette McKee as Jake's wife, Martha; Zelda Harris as their
resilient daughter, Mary.  All are commendable.  And last but by no means
least, NBA star Ray Allen, a brilliant acting debut as Jesus Shuttlesworth,
the son torn by promise, prestige, and conflicting family loyalties.
Stylistically, Lee's film is a marvel, covering the court with a
variety of cinematic techniques: documentary-style commentary from famous
college hoop coaches (such as Temple's John Chaney); kinetic, solarized
jump-cut sequences that play like a Nike commercial; slow-motion basketball
montages that will make even a non-believer sit up and take notice--all
backed by Copland's blaring horns and harmonics.
I don't doubt for a minute that this accomplished director could
make even a game of cricket appear exciting.
"He Got Game" is, pure and simple, one slam dunk of a motion picture.

Title
Review for Jacknife (1989)
     The issues raised in JACKNIFE are not new.  Neither is the film's
approach.  If you really want to watch a provocative film which examines the
effects the Vietnam War had on those who served in the offensive, and those who
waited for them back home, check out the likes of THE DEER HUNTER or, better
still, COMING HOME.  The fine performances in JACKNIFE are worth the price of
admission, but the story and screenplay fall short.
     Three men serve in the same platoon in Vietnam and become the best of
buddies.  One is crazy, one is smart, and one is scared.  Robert De Niro,
naturally enough, plays the crazy one, Joseph Megassy, or "Megs."  The scared
one is played by Ed Harris (THE RIGHT STUFF), almost unrecognizable in his
role as David Flanagan, a burned out, beer-guzzling truck driver.  Ironically,
the smart one never returns home, a victim of a Vietcong bullet.
     Remembrance of the friend left behind becomes the central theme in this
story.  His death haunts David with frightening regularity.  We are treated to
occasional flashbacks of combat sequences which do little to further the drama.
They are all too familiar in a story about coming to terms with oneself after
the horrors of war.
     David lives with his beleaguered sister, Martha (played by Kathy Baker).
Their relationship is the only thing of any stability in his life.  She is his
comfort and his companion, but cannot ease his conscience.  Latent fears are
stirred in David when Megs shows up on the scene, acting on a promise that the
two of them go trout fishing together.
     Predictably, De Niro is attracted to his buddy's sister and the drama
begins to unfold in damp suburban disharmony.  The bleak Connecticut background
provides a peaceful contrast to that which both men were subjected to a month
previously.
     Sporting facial hair last seen in THE MISSION, De Niro walks through his
role with ease.  He gets all the good one-liners (his idea of an "elegant
cocktail" is a Bud!)  and lives life in the fast lane -- literally, from
speeding in his friend's truck to smashing his fist through windows when he
gets perturbed.  Perhaps in an attempt to attract moviegoers, the producers
gave the film a snappy title.  All that JACKNIFE actually refers to is the
wartime nickname De Niro's character was given because he used to crash big
rigs when he was younger.  All in all it's a pretty shoddy marketing ploy.
     Harris, on the other hand, has a much more difficult role, yet it is hard
to feel sympathetic towards him.  He plays what has sadly become a
stereotypical Vietnam veteran role -- psychologically scarred, tortured by
guilt, a little bit responsible, full of denial.  He drinks to forget.
     But the real star of the film is Kathy Baker.  She is a jewel in an
otherwise ordinary production.  Her part motherly spinster, part shy, retiring
violet of a Biology teacher is so well developed, so fine-tuned, that it's hard
to tell where her character ends and the actress begins.
     Director David Jones is no stranger to acting threesomes.  His 1983 film
BETRAYAL brought together Jeremy Irons, Ben Kingsley and Patricia Hodge in a
powerhouse drama of infidelity.  In JACKNIFE, Jones once again manages to milk
fine performances from his three leading players, but what's at fault here is
the material itself.  You can't help feeling that, with a better script, this
too could have been a formidable drama.  Instead, the film disappoints.  The
able cast tries its best but the writing just isn't there, and that fact soon
begins to take its toll on the proceedings.
     Stephen Metcalfe adapted his stage play, STRANGE SNOW, for the screen.
On stage, this might have worked better as the plot would no doubt have taken a
back seat to the actors' presence and vibrancy.  On screen, however, the story
and its mundane treatment wear pretty thin pretty fast.
     Admittedly, the film appears to be full of good intentions, but all too
often it comes awfully close to being stuffy and self-righteous.  We have,
after all, seen and heard all this before.  No one is denying the reality that
was Vietnam, but this movie paints its after-effects in an inappropriately pat
and self-effacing style.
     JACKNIFE is not a bad film -- it simply fails to say anything new about
the post-Vietnam experience.

Title
Review for Hocus Pocus (1993)
     Touchstone Pictures, an offshoot of the Walt Disney Studios, was
established partly to showcase films of a slightly more adult nature.
But its latest release, a corny, slapstick affair called HOCUS POCUS,
is strictly for kids.
     Bette Midler, Kathy Najimy, and Sarah Jessica Parker play the
Sanderson sisters, three Salem witches circa 1693.  So broad are their
performances that HOCUS POCUS often feels like a high school theatrical
production--and not a particularly good one at that.
     Midler's Winifred looks like a cross between a hamster and
Margaret Thatcher on steroids.  Sporting diabolical costumes and
devilish hairdos, this Miss M is anything but divine.  Bette's scenery
chewing histrionics include an obligatory musical number, "I Put a
Spell on You," although the Screamin' Jay Hawkins' original seemed more
integral to the plot in Jim Jarmusch's STRANGER THAN PARADISE.
     Najimy gets less mileage out of her role as Mary Sanderson.  Much
as you would expect from an actress whose previous performance was that
of a fat nun in SISTER ACT, Najimy plays a big broad with a big nose.
Mary's a little simple, but delights in that fact that she can smell
children a mile away.  Food for thought indeed.
     But Parker steals the show as Sarah, a squeaky femme fatale with
long, blond, Rapunzel-like hair and blackly made-up eyes.  Her
alluring, boy-crazy bimbo is a treat for this or any other Halloween.
     Three hundred years after the sisters are hanged for witchcraft,
three young trick-or-treaters sneak into the deserted Sanderson
domicile and unwittingly bring our ghoulish gals back to life.  This
they achieve by lighting the black flame candle--the deal is the
spirits will return if the candle is lit by a virgin on Halloween
night.  And boy do the producers milk *that* joke for all its worth!
     As it so happens, Winnie, Mary and Sarah can stay young forever by
eating the town's children, or turn into dust when the sun rises,
whichever comes first.  With the help of a talking cat, Binx, the three
kids try to undo their egregious error and condemn these Sisters of
Satan to eternal damnation once and for all.
     Omri Katz plays the young hero Max Dennison, Thora Birch is his
annoying kid sister Dani, and teen heartthrob Vinessa Shaw is the one
with the "yobbos."  (Remember.  HOCUS POCUS is a family film; this is
easily the dirtiest word spoken in the entire movie).  They're a
tried-and-true bunch of semi-likable, smart-alecky movie kids whose
parents tend to act younger than they do.
     Predictably, that oft-used plot device--strange-looking outsiders
can pass virtually unnoticed on Halloween night--comes in quite handy
here.  It is best utilized in a brief scene with Don Yesso (from TV's
FRANK'S PLACE).  He plays a bus driver who "picks up" the three hags
and gets some of the film's biggest chuckles in the process.
     There are bubbling cauldrons and a magical spell book and a zombie
that keeps losing its head and cinematic prestidigitations and
overacting like crazy but it's all in good, clean, laugh-out-loud fun.
     You're more likely to laugh out loud if you're under thirteen,
however.  THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK it ain't.
     Director Kenny Ortega has a lot riding on this film, as his only
other directorial effort was the disastrous movie musical, NEWSIES.
HOCUS POCUS was reputed to have cost $28 million--high for a Disney
production--and it makes sense when you realize the cat stand-ins
alone (all eight of them) earned $200 a day!  What *doesn't* make sense
is why they are releasing this holiday film now, at the height of the
summer.
     In any case, the money doesn't really show on the screen.  The
effects are downright cheesy, especially the talking cat, whose
computer-animated facial expressions look worse than if they'd spread
peanut butter on its lips.  Everything looks cheap and obvious, from
the suspended-on-wires flying broomstick sequences to the
electricity-from-the-fingers that Winifred uses to keep the kids in
place.  The set design is elaborate and fanciful, giving the haunted
Sanderson house the look and feel of something out of HANSEL AND
GRETEL, but the whole fabricated fantasy wobbles precariously between
high-tech and low-cost.
     "We're talking about three ancient hags versus the twentieth
century!" exclaims Max exasperatedly at one point during the movie.
"How bad can it be?"


Title
Review for Let's Get Lost (1988)
     "Everybody has a story about Chet Baker.  He was bad, trouble, and
beautiful."
     LET'S GET LOST, Bruce Weber's visually thematic biography of '50s jazz
musician Chet Baker, might well be the ultimate story, an evocatively
photographed, seamlessly edited collage of sights and sounds.
     Unfortunately, many people are going to pass up the film for two reasons:
one, it's a documentary -- and two, it's in black and white.  But those two
elements alone combine to make LET'S GET LOST more compelling than most of this
summer's run-of-the-mill movie fodder.
     The life and times of this jazz trumpeter and vocalist, whose troubled
career culminated in a fall to his death from an Amsterdam hotel window in May
of 1988, is chronicled through a variety of cinematic techniques.  Candid
interviews with an ensemble of friends, relatives, and fellow musicians,
stills, archive footage of Baker himself, in concert and out, moody,
mesmerizing, iconoclastic.
     Baker's whisper-like vocals permeate the background like cigarette smoke,
ever present, softly punctuating the blank spaces.  It's a near perfect blend
of styles, yet it is never showy or pushy.
     In his 20s, Baker was the James Dean of the jazz world, his boyish good
looks as much a part of his image as his hypnotic trumpet playing and soulful,
lyrical style.  Working initially with the likes of Charlie Parker and Gerry
Mulligan, Baker quickly branched out on his own.
     Soon his angular face was gracing record jackets everywhere.  He even
appeared in a number of movie bit parts, such as 1955's HELL'S HORIZON (billed
as "Chet Baker and his trumpet"), as well as a number of disposable, Italian
teen-flicks.
     Almost forty years later, the change is dramatic.  Baker's once
Adonis-like looks are wizened -- wrinkled creases of skin abound; aged, hollowed
out eyes; bloodless cheeks; a leather-faced, lipless junkie.  Baker knew more
than anyone that you gotta pay the price if you wanna play the blues.
     Baker's Midas touch on stage became leprous in his private life.  A
compulsive womanizer, he left a legacy of cast-off wives and embittered
offspring in his wake.  There is a lot of hate in this movie; few people have
much respect for this burned out, unlikable shell of a man.  Even his mother,
when asked if Chet was a good son, cannot answer in the affirmative.
     What's so compelling about the film is that, as unappealing as Baker is,
his music is anything but.  The only time that we feel he's being totally
honest with us is when he's performing.  Then, and only then, do we feel the
man's sincerity, his quietly hushed and sexy vocal style totally absorbing the
viewer.  The allure of his stage persona compared to the shambles of his
personal life is staggering.
     In one scene, Baker recalls the names of other jazz greats who have
succumbed to the lure of drugs.  The list seems endless.  But this is not an
anti-drug movie.  It's a film about contrasts, about the profound affect one
man had on the lives of others.  Director Weber has gotten to the crux of the
issue so adeptly that at times it's hard to believe that a lot of this film was
shot before Baker's death.
     At Cannes, nearing the film's end, Baker comments to Weber that this is
the first time he has ever faced such a rowdy audience.  "At those other places
you could hear a pin drop," he observes.  So when he calls for silence before
performing his final, haunting number, "Almost Blue," you probably could hear a
pin drop.  That silence, and the performance which follows, is a fitting elegy
to a genius who lived hard yet made it all look so easy.


Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
        The central theme of "Love and Death on Long Island" is that love
can sometimes be found in the most unusual of places, and it's a
refreshingly warm-hearted tale at that.  But the film's distractions are
many and director Richard Kwietniowski's unsure touch is what finally does
it in.
        Dominating the film is John Hurt, who plays a stuffy and reclusive
British writer, Giles De'ath (pronounced day-ath).  Giles, a widower,
rarely leaves his London home, either to give interviews or do lectures,
but has reached a point in his life when he feels the need to do something
new.  Happening out to "the pictures" for the first time in years to see an
E.M. Forster adaptation, Giles accidentally winds up in the adjacent
theater showing the sophomoric comedy "Hotpants College II" (a terrific
title, by the way).  As he is about to leave, he catches sight of a boyish
stud playing a pizza boy and, if you believe in such things, it's love at
first sight.
        Giles' interest in Ronnie Bostock (Jason Priestley) turns into an
obsession.  He starts a scrapbook (which he labels "Bostockiana") replete
with cut-outs of the teen idol from juvenile magazines sporting such
headings as "Hollywood's most snog-able fellas!"  He rents Ronnie's cheesy
videos--"puerile romps without a single redeeming feature"--like "Tex Mex"
and "Skidmarks."
        And, on the advice of his agent, who suggests Giles take a trip, he
heads to Chesterton, Long Island in the hope of meeting the object of his
affections.
        It's a nice idea, and Hurt plays Giles to the hilt.  But although
Hurt is good, he can't keep this "erstwhile fogey" from bordering on
cliché.  That's because the writing and direction are sub-par; we've all
seen the eccentric Englishman in strange environs before and the
fish-out-of-water situations that are meant to be humorous actually dilute
the film.  "In America you ask for the check and pay with a bill while in
England you ask for the bill and pay with a check?"  It's true, I'm afraid.
Having a video clerk yell out embarrassing-sounding movie titles to the
stock boy in back is also too familiar.
        Ultimately, it's hard to believe that Giles has been so reclusive
that he can't tell a microwave from a "video player," or that you also need
a television set in order to preview the original "Hotpants College."
        When Giles gets to Long Island he locates Ronnie's supermodel
girlfriend, Audrey (played stiffly by the Courtney Cox-esque Fiona Loewi),
and uses her to wrangle a meeting with Ronnie.  Slowly--and the film is
extremely slow paced--Giles get to know Ronnie and finally confesses his
love for him in an awkward scene in which Priestley's acting ability is
severely tested.
        One central difficulty with this unashamedly sweet love story is
that Giles' initial crush on Ronnie is entirely superficial, and the scenes
where he comes to "know" him are unconvincing at best.  Dudley Moore
learned his lesson in "10," but poor Giles never catches on: there's more
to love than hotpants.
        "Love and Death on Long Island" has its funny moments and is
unquestionably a fine vehicle for Hurt, but its lightweight predictability
makes it hard to recommend.

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (2000)
If home is where the heart is, then Novalee Nation's home is the rambling,
timber-framed ranch house she builds in Sequoyah, Oklahoma.  Yet Novalee
did not spring from such lavish roots.
Pregnant and penniless in her tender teenage years, Novalee and her
fly-by-night boyfriend Willy Jack Pickens do what many pregnant and
penniless Tennessee teenagers do--head out to California with its promise
of a new life and new opportunities.  Instead, Novalee's dream is shattered
when Willy Jack abandons her at a wayside Wal-Mart, and it's at that
Wal-Mart, during the last of many illegal sleepovers, that Novalee's baby
is born.
Her "Wal-Mart baby" becomes the toast of Sequoyah and, upon the advice of
the store's resident photographer, Novalee gives her daughter a strong
name: Americus.
This is just the beginning for Novalee, and just the beginning of "Where
the Heart Is," one of those "dramadies" that follows many years--here it's
about five--in the life of its protagonist, watching her grow, be
challenged, fail, fall, love and learn, and all that Big Stuff that
confronts us on our journey through the backroads--and the Wal-Mart parking
lots--of life.  And "Where the Heart Is" is indeed a journey full of ups
and down.  So many ups and downs, in fact, that the movie soon settles into
a predictable pattern--good stuff happens, bad stuff happens, good stuff
happens, etc.  A little variety from the screenwriters would have helped.
That screenplay, by the team of Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel ("Father's
Day," "A League of Their Own," "Splash"), is based on the best-selling
novel by Billie Letts, and is often times guilty of succumbing to forced
humor, predictable outcomes, and unnecessary contrivances (Novalee's
illogical fear of the number five, for example).
But the film is saved time and time again by some deft direction by
newcomer Matt Williams and many exemplary performances, none the least of
which is Natalie Portman as Novalee.
Portman carries the weight of the film on her young shoulders and its a
lot to ask of the 18-year old, who until now has mainly played supporting
roles (in such films as "Beautiful Girls," "Star Wars: Episode I - The
Phantom Menace," and the recent "Anywhere But Here").  "Where the Heart Is"
is her film through and through, and even though the writing is a little
schizophrenic at times, she couldn't ask for a finer supporting cast.
Complementing Portman is a wonderful ensemble of actresses who take
potentially clichéd roles and turn them into characters brimming with life
and vitality.
There's Stockard Channing as Sister Husband who takes Novalee
in--weather-beaten, maternal, alcoholic; Ashley Judd as Novalee's
ever-pregnant friend and confidante, Lexie--Judd grows into her character
well; Joan Cusack as a hard-boiled talent agent who hooks up with Willy
Jack--it's a small part but a good one; and Sally Field as Novalee's
worthless, state-fleeing mother.  All four are excellent, and Field is
probably better in her one scene here than in her last ten movies put
together!  Yes, there are men in this movie, but they simply cannot compete.
Is "Where the Heart Is" a chick flick?  Sure.  But it's also a better than
average film that should appeal to just about anyone with a heart beating
in their breast.
Got beef? Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
        Separating Woody Allen's private life from his creative body of
work is getting harder and harder, especially given how closely his Art
imitates life.  *His* life, that is.
        Call me unsophisticated, but I found his films a lot more appealing
before he started sleeping with his daughter.
        The burning question at the heart of Allen's latest film,
"Deconstructing Harry," is just how much of Harry is Harry, and how much is
Woody.  Distancing the character from its creator is a key theme in the
film and Allen seems to revel in Harry's unpleasantness.  Given the
talented director's despicable off-screen behavior, some could construe
"Deconstructing Harry" as Allen's personal admission of guilt.  Of course,
we're supposed to know better.
        In "Deconstructing Harry," Harry Block (Allen) is a successful
writer whose latest bestseller has pissed off just about everyone he knows,
including his three ex-wives.  Harry has used a lot of autobiographical
experiences as source material and, naturally enough, the people in his
life are not happy having their dirty laundry aired.
        Perhaps this is why no one wishes to accompany Harry to upstate New
York to be honored by his alma mater; the best companion he can come up
with is a prostitute called Cookie (shades of Mira Sorvino's hooker in
"Mighty Aphrodite").
        I guess even now there's some sort of prestige to being linked with
a Woody Allen film.  "Deconstructing Harry" stars, among others, Billy
Crystal, Robin Williams, Judy Davis, Bob Balaban, Mariel Hemingway, Amy
Irving, Julie Kavner, Tobey Maguire, and Eric Bogosian.  The reason Allen
is able to employ such a large cast for what is a relatively simple
storyline is the way he (de-)constructs his story: actors play both the
characters in the film as well as characters in Harry's novel, which are
often the same, only different.  Harry himself is played by Allen in
"reality" but by Richard Benjamin and Stanley Tucci in fiction.
        This isn't as confusing as it sounds although the way that Allen
elects to shoot the piece is, roaming around like some NYU Film School grad
who's just discovered the jump cut.
        You can't help but feel embarrassed for television's Kirstie Alley
and Julia Louis-Dreyfus who, in order to bolster their flagging resumés,
subject themselves to some brief but nevertheless humiliating sequences for
the privilege of working for the Woodster.  Young, nubile women fall for
rich, famous, wizened old men all the time but witnessing Elisabeth Shue
kissing Allen full on the mouth in excruciating close-up is about as hard
to watch as the wood-chipping scene in "Fargo."
        "Deconstructing Harry" has its funny moments but often the writing
is stagnant, hitting dumb-joke rock bottom during the 'Descent into Hell'
sequence.  Unless you enjoy the spectacle of a self-absorbed,
sexually-obsessed neurotic making light of his own crimes and misdemeanors,
you might want to stay away from "Harry."

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
        In "Cast Away," Tom Hanks plays Chuck Noland, a time-obsessed
Federal Express executive who tells his girlfriend (the ubiquitous Helen
Hunt) one Christmas Eve that he'll be right back, crash lands somewhere in
the Pacific, and spends the next four years of his life on a remote desert
island conversing with a volleyball.
        The film re-teams the star of "Forrest Gump" with that film's
director, Robert Zemeckis.  "'Gump" won six Oscars, including Best Picture,
and "Cast Away" looks like it has a pretty good shot at repeating that
film's success, again because of the strength of its acting, a bold script,
and mature direction.  "Cast Away" is a modern day Robinson Crusoe on paper
but director Zemeckis avoids a lot of easy pitfalls, strengthening the
emotional experience in the process.  There's no Man Friday, no cuddly
animals to interact with and, unlike that Harrison Ford/Anne Heche comedy
"Six Days Seven Nights" from two years ago, no threatening pirates. 
There's also no rousing music score punctuating the action at every
opportunity.  There's just Tom Hanks at odds with, and at one with, nature.
        The popular star of "Saving Private Ryan," "You've Got Mail," and
last year's "The Green Mile" is terrific in "Cast Away," especially since
he spends much of the film's 143 minutes (which simply zip by) saying very
little, reacting to the elements around him, trying to survive.  And
survive he does.  But at what cost?
        The film plays out in three distinct acts: the setup, in which we
learn about Chuck Noland's relationship with Kelly (Hunt) and how
everything in his life absolutely, positively needs to be calculated right
down to the millisecond; the middle act, in which Chuck must learn to
survive, alone, at the edge of the world--find food, water, and shelter,
avoid going mad; and the conclusion, in which he has to face those who have
long since considered him dead (no real spoiler here, since the trailers
have long since tipped us off in that department).  The emotional content
is at its strongest in the third segment, when the film makes us appreciate
how much we take for granted.  In a lesser film these realizations would
appear pat and obvious; in "Cast Away," they feel integral and genuine. 
Hunt isn't in the film much, but she easily earns her paycheck in these
climactic scenes.
        That volleyball, by the way, is one that Chuck finds wrapped inside
one of several FedEx packages that wash up on the beach.  He paints a face
on it and calls it Wilson, occasionally participating in one-sided
conversations with his round leather friend.  It's a clever idea that
provides a way for the audience to know what Chuck is thinking without the
use of an intrusive voiceover.
        "Cast Away" is no ordinary film.  In fact, both Zemeckis and Hanks
do extraordinary work here.  Together they have taken William Broyles,
Jr.'s screenplay and transformed it into an experience that truly resonates.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
After its recent, serious-minded entries--the bleak "Hunchback" and the
tragic "Pocahantas"--the Disney studios have finally put the fun back in
feature-length animation with their 35th effort, "Hercules."  A colorful,
toe-tapping odyssey that is closer to the exuberance and charm of "Aladdin"
and "The Little Mermaid," "Hercules" follows in the footsteps of those
winning films, echoing their respective hipness and style.
Hercules the man (or is that the god?) lends himself well to the Disney
treatment.  While his twelve labors are conspicuously absent from the film,
he does put in a full day's work, battling hydras, cyclops, and a love
interest with ambiguous allegiances (Meg, voiced by Susan Egan, who looks
like she was modeled on Fran Drescher).  Meg's smart, curvaceous female is
just one of the typical components of the tried-and-true Disney formula.
Add also the well-chiseled hero, fighting to prove himself; the bumbling,
wise-cracking sidekicks, in this case the Bobcat Goldthwait and Matt Frewer
rendered Pain and Panic.  And, of course, the villain.
The bad guy in "Hercules" is Hades, ruler of the Underworld, performed by
James Woods.  Woods is the commanding force in the movie, fast-talking,
fast-scheming, and fast on his way to becoming his very own Mickey D's
tie-in.  With his blue, pilot light jet of hair, Hades is like a demonic
auctioneer on acid, waxing mythologic and anacronistic, with topical
references to Siskel and Ebert and everything in between.
Hades, wishing to topple Zeus and mount a hostile takeover of Mount
Olympus, sends his shape-changing sidekicks to steal Zeus' son, the infant
Hercules, turn him mortal, and knock him off.  The fates have forewarned
Hades that "should Hercules fight, you will fail."  Pain and Panic bungle
their mission and Hercules grows up mortal but with superhuman strength.
After learning of his origins, Herc sets out to become a "true hero," the
requirement for returning to Olympus.  His personal trainer is a cynical
satyr, Philoctetes ("call me Phil"), gleefully performed by Danny DeVito,
whose goofy irreverence evokes both the genie from "Aladdin" and the
flatulent warthog from "The Lion King."
Unfortunately, Hercules confuses fame with heroism, and it takes more than
a couple of sticky situations for him to learn that true strength comes
from within.  Coming as late in "Hercules" as it does, this message is not
too intrusive, although the film's "zero to hero" theme seems to have been
shamelessly borrowed from "The Mask."
While none of Alan Menken and David Zippel's see-you-at-the-Oscars,
gospel-influenced score--the pastiche-laden production numbers or slower,
soul-searching ballads--contain any real show-stoppers, the five Motown
muses who carry the story along provide a refreshing change of pace.
With the additional vocal contributions of Tate Donovan, Rip Torn, Samantha
Eggar, Barbara Barrie, and Paul Shaffer, "Hercules" is a grab bag of
personalities.  But at the end of the day, it's Woods and DeVito who give
"Hercules" its strength.

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
        In preparing for my review of "28 Days," Sandra Bullock's new
melodrama, I gatecrashed an AA meeting at which a young woman, probably not
much older than Bullock's character, spoke for thirty minutes about her
struggle with alcoholism.  What this woman had to say or, perhaps equally
importantly, the way in which she told her story, was absolutely
fascinating.  It was like watching Spalding Gray doing his "Swimming to
Cambodia" thing.  She kept going for thirty minutes straight with barely a
pause.  Her monologue was loaded with humor, pathos, and poignancy.  It was
filled with harsh truths, anguish, pain and suffering, yet is was somehow
delightful.  It was the kind of speech I wish I could have captured on
videotape to replay over and over again to savor every heartfelt moment,
every aspiration, every moving detail.  "28 Days" is not like this.  It's a
well-meaning film about what it's like to have a Bud with your daily
Wheaties but it's strictly AA Lite.  Bullock plays a party girl who, after
taking out a lawn jockey and crashing a limo into someone's porch during
her sister's wedding, is sentenced to 28 days of detox in a rehab clinic.
Here she gets with the program with a bunch of thinly-written caricatures
of drug and alcohol abusers, many of whom are played by miscast performers
(including Steve Buscemi as her counselor and Viggo Mortensen as a
pro-baseball player with a love for the soaps).  Bullock's character spends
more time trying the break the rules than trying to quit drinking and as a
result her month-end turnabout seems hurried and implausible.  There have
been some fine movies about alcoholism ("The Lost Weekend") and there have
been some not-so-fine movies about alcoholism ("Leaving Las Vegas").  "28
Days," alas, comes closer to the latter.  Bullock is good, and her
relationship with her sister--played by Elizabeth Perkins--is excellent,
but "28 Days" is still about 26 days shy of sobriety.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Different for Girls (1996)
Finding love in today's day and age is difficult enough, but when the girl
you fancy used to be a boy, it makes for some added complications.
The relationship between a straight guy and a transsexual (who also happens
to be straight) forms the root of "Different for Girls," a transmuted
romantic comedy that is only partially successful.  Tony Marchant's script
works best when it deals directly with the relationship between Prentice
(Rupert Graves), a free-wheeling, arresting young man, and Kim (Steven
Mackintosh), a repressed transsexual trying to come to terms with her
sexual identity.
The two were schoolboy friends back when Kim was Karl.
Twenty years later Prentice is working as a courier for a London dispatch
service and "hasn't really come through puberty."  At 34 he's still
listening to punk 45s from the late seventies--Stiff Little Fingers,
Wreckless Eric, the Buzzcocks, etc.--and has a volatile personality to
match.  Kim, "three years pre-op and one year post," writes creative verse
for a greeting card company, and the two run into one another on the city
streets, rekindling lost interests and emotions.
What's refreshing about their relationship is that Prentice, for all his
rudeness and crudeness, is so accepting of Kim.  His attraction to her is
unexamined and non-judgmental.  Kim refers to Prentice as an "odd sock";
like those you lose in the wash, they invariably come back together.  The
implication, of course, is that she's his match.
Unfortunately, the events surrounding their social intercourse is the stuff
of pure soap opera, which wind up bogging the film down, such as when
Prentice is arrested for some indecent highjinks after a rant.  In
addition, there's a distracting and way too obvious subplot concerning
Kim's brother-in-law, whose infertility brings into question his definition
of manliness.
Writer Marchant's brushstrokes are far too broad: Prentice is rough-edged,
Kim is refined and softly-spoken (although in most scenes her masculinity
is as obvious as a five o'clock shadow).  When they groove to the sounds of
"The Only Ones" in Prentice's hovel of an apartment, it's oddly moving,
their contrasting dance styles distinguishing the roles they have chosen in
life.  But it's one of the few sequences that really work in the picture.
A voyeuristically uncomfortable scene, in which Prentice asks to see Kim's
surgically-altered body for himself, comes across as gratuitous rather than
pivotal, as if seeing a naked transsexual formed the initial conceit behind
this film.
At times director Richard Spence seems more concerned with the
industrialized landscape of the London Docklands than he does the
interaction between Prentice and Kim, utilizing unnecessarily dramatic
crane shots and thunderous rock music to contrast the unfolding human drama.
Graves and Mackintosh give a good account of themselves but "Different for
Girls" simply doesn't have the courage to examine forcefully the issues at
its center.  In fact, for a film that claims to be different, it's
remarkably--and disappointingly--mainstream.

Title
Review for Croupier (1998)
        Heavy on style and seductiveness, the British film "Croupier" is
one of those unassuming Channel Four franchises that creeps out of nowhere
and provides a thought-provoking alternative to the blather of Hollywood's
summer lead-in.  In Mike Hodges' film, a blocked writer (expertly played by
Clive Owen) takes a temporary job as a croupier in a London casino to make
ends meet and soon becomes drawn into the complexities of gambling,
gamesmanship, and goodness knows what else.  It's a simple enough storyline
but it's given remarkable depth by writer Paul Mayersberg and significant
worth by its stellar cast, mostly unknowns on this side of the Atlantic
(although the croupier's girlfriend, played by Gina McKee, will be
recognized from "Notting Hill").  Owen, handsome as all get out with his
jet-black hair and matching tux, commands the film with a smoky, smoldering
performance that's matched only by his own smoky voiceover, often times
nicely at odds with--or second guessing--the narrative, and a smooth jazz
scoreline by Simon Fisher Turner.  "Croupier" is more a character study
than a card-sharp drama, yet Hodges scores some winning touchdowns in the
casino proper.  Here the hush of a dealt card and the chink of one chip
against another provide delicate soundscapes that contrast with the glam of
the ensuing roughness.  Good stuff this, as Jack (Owen), who was raised in
South Africa and did some dealing there, soon regains his wonderlust for
watching people lose as he tries to walk the straight and narrow.  But it's
a wicked twisted world out there where temptations are ripe and
commonplace, more frequent, certainly, than the turn of a friendly card.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Title
Review for Filth and the Fury, The (2000)
        In 1976, Britain's economy was struggling, thousands were without
jobs, and garbage was piling high in the streets.  It was time for a change.
        In "The Filth and the Fury," Julien Temple's second film about the
notorious punk rock band that changed the face of music and "waged war on
England without meaning to," the Sex Pistols reminisce about rising from
that landscape of despair and hopelessness.  "We literally dressed in
garbage (bags)" says lead singer John Lydon (aka Johnny Rotten).  "And when
your clothes are falling apart, what do you use to hold them together?
Safety pins."
        When the Sex Pistols snarled their way to the top of the British
music charts with their subversive, anti-establishment hit "God Save the
Queen," they did it even though the record was banned both from radio
airplay or being performed live.  The British have a pretty reliable track
record of banning just about anything that's a little bit off-the-wall, a
little bit off-color, or anything that points out the political hypocrisy
of the ruling classes.  "God Save the Queen" fit very nicely into all three
categories.
        I remember attending one of my first-ever teenage parties at which
a copy of "Never Mind the Bollocks... Here's the Sex Pistols" was passed
around, its garish pink, black, and yellow ransom-note titles jumping at
you right off the sleeve.  I remember listening to "Bodies" from that album
over and over, a signature tune of unwholesome nastiness with outrageous
lyrics ("She was a girl from Birmingham/she just had an abortion/she was
case of insanity/her name was Pauline, she lived in a tree").  I remember
the buzz in school the day after the infamous Bill Grundy interview, in
which the drunk talk show host goaded band members into using the F-word on
primetime television.
        But what I remember most about the Sex Pistols is their
music--driven, powerful, music that stayed with you.  And they always knew
how to end a song: cleanly, angrily, often with an exasperated expression
of disgust from Rotten.  In those days it seemed unique to listen to a
dozen tracks in a row without any fadeouts.  Ironically, "Never Mind the
Bollocks..." plays like a quintessential Greatest Hits compilation today
since it was the only LP the Sex Pistols produced during their
spectacularly short-lived, 26-month career.
        "The Filth and the Fury" (the title comes from a tabloid headline
decrying the Grundy business) tells the story from the Pistols' point of
view.  "It's to set the record straight," says Lydon, since Temple's other
Sex Pistol's film, 1979's "The Great Rock 'n' Roll Swindle," highlighted
the band's meteoric rise and fall from the viewpoint of their egomaniacal
manager, Malcolm McLaren.  McLaren, whose clothing store in London's King's
Road is where he first met drummer Paul Cook and guitarist Steve Jones,
always claimed the Sex Pistols as a product of his own making, but "The
Filth and the Fury" sees it differently.
        In silhouetted interviews (the film's only contrivance outside its
jocular opening credits), the four original band members recount their side
of the story: what they think of McLaren (not much), Sid Vicious' hooker
girlfriend Nancy Spungen (even less), and Sid himself, who replaced bass
player Glen Matlock in 1977.  Spungen was fatally stabbed in a hotel room
in 1978; Vicious himself died of a heroin overdose not long afterwards.
        Temple and his editor Niven Howie intercut these talking heads with
a kaleidoscopic frenzy of footage of the band in performance, culled from
many hours of heretofore unseen archival material--rehearsals, live gigs,
recording sessions, and promotional bits--as well as TV outtakes,
newsreels, and lots of clips of Laurence Olivier in "Richard III."  There's
a lot of music too, and it sounds as raw, urgent, and influential today as
it did way back then.
        If you see only one Sex Pistols movie this year, make sure it's
"The Filth and the Fury," as second time around Julien Temple gets it right.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb
